comment body,comment author,comment id,subreddit
"How is there a deadline for counting votes??  This is baffling.  So they are going to disenfranchise all those voters just because it takes time to count them?

How is this legal??",MostSensualPrimate,e99u6y2,democrats
"To the cowards that deleted his comment: They weren’t “found,” they were rejected.  Rejected ballots are still recorded; these ballots, and their received state, are on file, they just weren’t added to totals for one reason or another.  They don’t fall off a truck or whatever some people think. ",WorseThanHipster,e99w5rz,democrats
Should I email them since my mail in ballot was not tabulated? Same with my dad and my boyfriend. I live in a heavily republican county in Florida. ,hayleec,e99v78q,democrats
"Due to overwhelming response the email is now a webpage:

https://twitter.com/PamKeithFL/status/1060330396842422272?s=19",porkman384,e99xi1z,democrats
[https://twitter.com/KevinCate/status/1060591101613146114](https://twitter.com/KevinCate/status/1060591101613146114),deircr33,e9b8d1w,democrats
"Like many laws, it’s well intentioned. It’s intended to hold officials accountable. To prevent them from taking their sweet time and delaying the inevitable, or worse - figuring out a way to mess with the results. “Sitting on uncounted ballots” is an unintended possible consequence. 

The benefit to keeping the time limit is that the ballots are recorded. So if they just “sit” on these ballot and the results are challenged in court, they’ll likely be forced to be counted by the court. The time limit allows for court appeals like that to happen before the candidates are supposed to take office. ",_manoftheyear_,e9adyaf,democrats
yes it should be no limit especially in populous counties like broward and miami so we have more time to count the votes. Let Wasserman schultz do her magic baby! It's straight up unfair that rules would be applied the same in all places when not all places are democrat. Let those stupid rednecks in the panhandle have a deadline but not the intellectuals in Broward. ,Texas_Rangers,e9a3nj7,democrats
"Yes, it doesn't hurt to try, and your vote should count.",patronising_patronus,e99x728,democrats
"Other classics include: ""how dare you assume I know what i'm talking about at any given moment"" or ""yeah totally, let me just get on twitter real quick""",Angeldehpanda,e9bz1bx,democrats
"Accurate. 

He was being a jerk because he knows the Dems are about to go up his ass. ",UserN-me,e9c0he8,democrats
"""I don't stand by anything""",SlobBarker,e9bze9q,democrats
Hey Trump if you can’t stand the heat send out Sarah ,walter1950,e9bwe2a,democrats
"Perfect font, simple and ugly!",c0tt0nc4ndyTA,e9bxelf,democrats
Finnish news said the White House is spreading sped up video about the incident to vilify the journalist even further. If this is true you guys kinda let facism happen. How could you let facism happen?,Astraalimyrkky,e9c8wh8,democrats
So when is Trump’s White House access going to be revoked for assaulting women?,orderofGreenZombies,e9c7awr,democrats
this is just super cringy,EAwinsadownvote,e9c7tfi,democrats
Absolutely disgusting behavior yesterday.,kerryfinchelhillary,e9c2xtb,democrats
"I couldn’t care less about drama between trump and the press. He’s a troll and he’s doing this to avert our attention from what truly matters, his policies. ",Horusprime,e9cpmqw,democrats
"YOU SHOULD BE ASHAMED!!!!

-the man incapable of feeling shame.",muddypaws,e9cvust,democrats
"This is why the president, no matter party, should not be the one controlling the stage.

That's a one way road to dictatorship. ",Bomaruto,e9d12e7,democrats
"You guys are crazy, Acosta was and usually is being a complete ass. He goes up their to protest not ask real questions ",JoshuaWalter,e9cpvtl,democrats
We all need to realize that while Trump was totally unpresidential and completely embarrassing; Acosta was completely out of line. Not providing context and just painting a completely biased picture is called fake news. But that’s just an opinion from a Canadian liberal.,mattschilly,e9cmymf,democrats
can this even be called a meme?,bpieszak,e9cfald,democrats
So says Adolf Trump. ,Angelwells,e9c1exq,democrats
I'm Ron Burgundy?!,carbonFibreOptik,e9c7s0y,democrats
"I was honestly surprised that this slob didn't tell his dopey supporters that he won the House by 100, they wouldn't know.",slingtarp,e9clzg7,democrats
"All I can think about is how bad this meme is and wonder why someone wasted time making it and sharing it. The fact that it has almost 5K upvotes says a lot about /r/democrats. I'm a liberal voter, have been my entire life. I'll be blocking your sub now. This is way past my cringe limit. Goodbye.",notapotamus,e9ctjhj,democrats
"So is anyone else having the feeling that this incident is being pushed to overshadow the protests against Whitaker being installed as the new Attorney General, threatening Mueller's probe into the 2016 elections? 

Read up here to get a good summary of what's going on: https://np.reddit.com/r/OutOfTheLoop/comments/9v5yz1/whats_the_deal_with_the_protests_for_thursday_nov/e99pldp/?fbclid=IwAR14b1h9kLB4dBTpcylrQu_nZvfc9I5QWCtxVE1Y-N9qwzgND7GOqdK1k4A

",Toothpaste_Sandwich,e9cu69c,democrats
Y'all really gotta up your meme game.,Qui-Gon_Djinn,e9ceftb,democrats
Imagine thinking Acosta is an even remotely decent journalist. ,RedArmy-,e9ci7vj,democrats
Trump bad. EA bad. Praise Geraldo. ,Tron_Impact,e9cjskq,democrats
"Yeah, pretty much.",DoriCee,e9c2lwo,democrats
"Listen to some of the press conferences that are audio only, he doesn't act nearly the same. We have differing perspectives on Trump but it’s always the same questions from the guy and it gets old when you’re trying to hear critical questions relating to the topic at hand, not always the same nothingburger over and over ",zetsubou_sensei,e9cerux,democrats
Still more honest than Obama ever pretended to be.,zeohyr28,e9chnuu,democrats
*THHHH*,JayJay-TheFknPlane,e9cpts0,democrats
Pathological liar,caligirl2287,e9cvpgo,democrats
Fake news,mojoh44,e9cf3fw,democrats
The question mark made it hard to read,chrixz333,e9cir9g,democrats
https://youtu.be/qUxyLb-ZfOM,Darrinantonio,e9cao6c,democrats
Did Acosta just get accosted!,blumpkin-pie88,e9ck0ui,democrats
LETS GO r/fat_diddy,kayge_gunne,e9byjza,democrats
"""you know what, you are rude.""

HE is rude? Lordy he's the king of ~~protection~~ **projection**. ",BedWedOrBehead,e9ckuwr,democrats
Better fuck him good. ,Essential_tranquilo,e9cbm7q,democrats
His cage was clearly rattled. ,BedWedOrBehead,e9ckvft,democrats
"""I might lie to you."" ",BedWedOrBehead,e9ckvuz,democrats
"the spelling right, so not that authentic",galgacus84,e9bycls,democrats
"Not enough of us are fighting it. And too many (around 30%) of our population seem to *want* it.

Edit: why in the world is this getting downvotes? ",Basalit-an,e9ca9nz,democrats
"> how could you let facism happen?

Short answer it was a combination of: starting slowly, red herrings and the previous generations inability to stand up for themselves (or having someone else will fix it mentality)

I would explain better, but to be honest I couldn't explain it right (with facts and links and such).

I would reccomend looking up this previous election and just seeing how voting isn't working. Honestly, who knows how long voting hasn't been tallied correctly.

You might say fix it, but how?

Voting doesn't work, rioting wouldn't work, protesting isn't working... 

",BecauseICan96,e9cbmd9,democrats
Ohh we are trying. Lotta fucking hillbillies here tho,CanderousBossk,e9cihyc,democrats
"We havent. He acts like a fascist but we just took back the house and Mueller is coming for Don Jr. The fascist marches have calmed down because the scumbags get doxxed and lose their jobs. And ANTIFA sometimes punch them in the mouth.

He’s acting out because he’s scared. ",guitarelf,e9cpg0i,democrats
"[The video wasn't sped up. That was a conspiracy theory.](https://twitter.com/imbadatlife/status/1060534039403212800)

(People gaslighting hard in this sub...)",,e9cei1t,democrats
Please post on Reddit.  The US needs to know how the world feels about trump.  ,Cheesebooger10,e9cbnpz,democrats
Or yanking arms instead of shaking hands,Emrico1,e9cf2ml,democrats
"He who loves the word ‘disgrace’ is the greatest disgrace the office has seen. Worst person to hold the title in our lifetime, but yet still not the worst President. That honor belongs to GW Bush, let’s not let that get forgotten or distorted over time. ",Boomslangalang,e9cxoku,democrats
"The press are there to challenge the power, not act as their mouthpiece. ",Bomaruto,e9d1awy,democrats
"Right? Trump was an ass, sure, but Acosta is a terrible reporter. He wasn't there to get answers to questions, he just wanted to stir up shit. People like him are the reason the political divide is so strong lately.

CNN *should* be ashamed of him.",andrewsad1,e9d0i29,democrats
Why do you think Acosta was out of line?,PoorlyOverEducated,e9d3ibn,democrats
For real. I was scrolling r/all and saw this and I'm frankly embarrassed for them. Dems wtf is this meme?,notapotamus,e9csh58,democrats
The right always says the “left can’t meme” which must be a lie because the right can’t read ,guitarelf,e9cpha9,democrats
Imagine thinking Trump is an even remotely decent president.,skankhu,e9co2s7,democrats
"How so? There's a website that records promises made by individual presidents and how many they've kept, and he's dropping lower and lower every single day. I can understand where you're coming from, but you've been tricked. It's just that simple.",Jaymz95,e9cmj1a,democrats
"HE PROJEC.

HE ATTAC. 

HE LIKE DEAD FISH IN TEH SAC.",guythatsaidthatthing,e9d069p,democrats
Projection? ,gummycarnival,e9coj4j,democrats
With no lube and a McGriddle wrapper as a condom,AliGLeaph,e9ced5r,democrats
"""I may be wrong, I mean I may stand before you in six months and say, ‘Hey I was wrong.’ I don’t know that I’ll ever admit that, but I’ll find some kind of an excuse.""
",SlobBarker,e9cxk8v,democrats
What can the avg citizen do tho? I've become so apathetic I'd rather just leave,BigBrozosMofos,e9cff8h,democrats
"dude voting does work, but it doesnt really work if you only vote every 4 years and ignore senate, house, judicial and local races. The reason its like this is that the old racists are consistently voting every time and democrats, by and large, are not voting on the small elections... then all of a sudden were up in arms about a racist super majority.

""how could this happen?"" ""who did this?""",1_km_coke_line,e9ctidl,democrats
Honestly people need to start caring about where they spend their money. Stop giving money to the people buying our representatives to pass laws that fuck us. ,SharkBait661,e9ci51l,democrats
We’re just not rioting hard enough,RideTheLighting,e9cekah,democrats
"Sidenote to this. I've found houses in western New York, an hour south of the Canadian border, that were sporting the confederate flag. This shit is everywhere.",Orvi,e9cranc,democrats
go kil.... nevermind,Lazylions,e9d1156,democrats
"Cause we’re not edgey little nazis, chill. Normies need memes too. Is easy to be dank when you have zero values.",JustAcceptThisUser,e9ctj4x,democrats
"Acosta is a shitty journalist, and Trump is a shitty president. But you guys don't care about being right, you care about being *left.*",andrewsad1,e9d0mv6,democrats
You can keep your doctor (hand gesture) ,huskerarob,e9crv63,democrats
Dammit. Fixed. ,BedWedOrBehead,e9cotcn,democrats
He probably has wet dreams about using mc griddle wrappers as a condoms.,bbwipes,e9cjz70,democrats
"Good reference, that was a good read and a terrible movie",Jaymz95,e9cmeyf,democrats
"Call representatives, vote, write emails, go to rallies/marches, keep yourself informed, make sure you're loved ones are informed, VOTE(obvi.), hell, run for office. 

Volunteer with groups such as [ACLU](https://www.aclu.org)or the [National Lawyers Guild](https://www.nlg.org/committees/)

Any little thing you can be motivated to do helps. I have issues with depression, so have times where it feels like too much also. When it gets like that take a little break until you can go again.",Basalit-an,e9cfy9k,democrats
"Not join Trumps army is one step.

He is the head of the military, so by serving in the army you're serving him not the country.",Bomaruto,e9d17wa,democrats
"> Normies need memes too.

Clearly, but I suggest you spend a little more time researching how things work before diving in. This is the kind of thing a grade school kid with no information about politics would come up with. You're more than a little out of touch here.",notapotamus,e9cuxuf,democrats
"I agree, having to get a new doctor is such a pain in the ass. It's totally comparable to the destruction of a democratic process that people pride themselves on being patriotic towards and was a beacon of benevolence to an entire world at one point. Yep, damn Obama and his filthy lies.",Bigbigmoooo,e9cysph,democrats
Does one false promise equate to literally thousands of lies while president for 2 years? I can show you the list if you want,axelG97,e9cvyp3,democrats
"Yeah no. As a veteran you serve the people of the US, and are sworn to uphold the Constitution. He is the nominal CnC, because civilian control of the military is a necessity in any free society. If Donald Trump tried to keep or take power back after say, losing an election, watch the military March right on up to nab his ass.",HillbillyPartySloth,e9d2vbp,democrats
"“How things work”? 

If you want to discuss politics I’d be happy to. The right knows how to meme but their politics are moronic. ",JustAcceptThisUser,e9cvkhw,democrats
Stop underestimating your opponent and start working on your own shed.,notapotamus,e9cxm6p,democrats
"Underestimating? No. They get wins. I won’t be surprised if Trump is reelected 2020. They run on fear and propaganda. They abuse power and position. I don’t underestimate them. They’re effective. 

They should also all be lynched for treason. (Not the voters, they’re just idiots.)",JustAcceptThisUser,e9cy4fy,democrats
"> They should also all be lynched for treason.

Are you fucking high? We're an elected democracy. You don't get to murder the winning party because you don't like their politics. Grow up and start looking in the mirror when you're calling people idiots.",notapotamus,e9cyq5j,democrats
"I’m not against the other party winning. At all. 

People who abuse power and position. Not all republicans do, democrats do as well. They should be tried for treason, the lot of them. Set a precedent. Mega corporations committing massive financial crimes against american civilians should be tried as well.  

I actually like most of republican voters even if I think they’re politically stupid. Moderate republican politicians can be alright sometimes. Radical right wingers are trash but if they don’t commit crime, then idc. 

Georgias Kemp literally just abused his power and position to rob American people of their right to vote for personal elevation. He should be tried for treason and if found guilty, hung by the neck until dead. If not found guilty, then obviously he’s got the right to keep his position and earns a degree of validity. Innocent until proven guilty. The whole deal. 

That doesn’t change my opinion on maximum punishment and lax definition of treason. 

I’m not one of those “life is invaluable” liberals. Im a neoliberal, pro-regulation **capitalist**, pro2a, more power for states, better representation and accountibility for electoral colleges, anti-drug abuse welfare, pro-maximum punishment.",JustAcceptThisUser,e9d0pxi,democrats
Republican legislators are afraid of their own base,ShelSilverstain,e9ccyox,democrats
I'm sure that'll drive whoever took the page on climate change off the WH website crazy.,kerryfinchelhillary,e9cxf53,democrats
"Here's the side by side showing the added frames Infowars added in. The additional frames makes it look like he violently shoved her arm down


https://twitter.com/aymanndotcom/status/1060424768653062149?s=09",Anthonym82,e9at79n,democrats
About goddamned time somebody started saying that a lie is a lie.,ManlyBeardface,e9auw7m,democrats
We back you Jim ! ,Perspective2018,e9aeq0l,democrats
The nation can clearly see the truth of the matter! We stand behind Acosta!,asilverwillow,e9asi8s,democrats
"Sarah Sanders is a paid liar and like the rest of this corrupt administration, not a very good one. We stand with Jim Acosta! The rest of the press should boycott her future lie conferences until this matter is corrected.",amatrixa,e9b95l6,democrats
Trump is such a fucking child. ,Simps5333,e9blmh4,democrats
Trump and his brainwashed robotic army of idiots are a bunch of Delicate Buttercups.,muddypaws,e9bl63m,democrats
[There's a Trump tweet for everything. ](https://mobile.twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/714855025055514624),muddypaws,e9blczm,democrats
Jim Acosta is the Dan Rather of our time ,OldGrayMare59,e9awh2b,democrats
Back in u,sparky76016,e9amick,democrats
Sour Crybullies,WorkingLikaBoss,e9b9yt5,democrats
"Adding the [original video ](https://twitter.com/nbcnews/status/1060224231722627072?s=21)  shared by NBC 24 hours ago, hours before the doctored video was shared.

",Womeisyourfwiend,e9aye7z,democrats
I don't even see that in the doctored video. Just one person trying to grab something out of another's ha d and incidental contact. Who knew that seeing red would blind you to all else?,whygohomie,e9ba1b1,democrats
"I really am having a hard time seeing the different. Both videos it looks a little quick with his hands. 


My litmus test is if this was Fox News and Obama instead of CNN and Trump. I don’t think it passes that test. ",Machismo01,e9b2sdp,democrats
[removed],,e9b5co5,democrats
I'd back fucking Sean Hannity if the same thing were happening to him. How this is even a partisan thing doesn't make sense to me. Acosta did nothing wrong and the White House is acting totally inappropriately. ,lotusbloom74,e9bkfua,democrats
Well that just gives them more power to hide there lies.,2HeadedTasmanianBoy,e9bgrf7,democrats
What rational person believes unarmed reporters are physically intimidating and acting violently towards the president and his staff surrounded by secret service anyway? What could they possibly gain?,LucidLynx109,e9bqaak,democrats
"What you don't see in the video was, while one hand was deflecting her from grabbing his microphone (penis reference) he was grabbing her pussy with the other hand. Who's to say which is worse, her grabbing his figurative penis or him grabbing her pussy. I claim sexism on both parties.

HARD /s btw",SquirrelHumper,e9btcrq,democrats
https://mobile.twitter.com/rafaelshimunov/status/1060450557817708544,mooncow321,e9b7h6j,democrats
"Its not to major, but on the right it makes it seem like he slammed her hand down and not just accidentally push it.",2HeadedTasmanianBoy,e9bgolh,democrats
https://mobile.twitter.com/rafaelshimunov/status/1060450557817708544,mooncow321,e9b7gw2,democrats
"What worries me is how willingly republicans trample the constitution. Unless it’s the second amendment (which I do support), they are completely against things like the right to a free press if they feel like it supports their position. 

The right to a free press isn’t for the press by the way, it’s for the rest of us!",LucidLynx109,e9bq52m,democrats
They are trying to shut him up because his questions were too tough for the president. ,erca111,e9bszm8,democrats
[deleted],,e9bgvsv,democrats
"Yeah, this is basically narcissism or extreme manipulation in action.  Their position is so extreme and so illogical that people gloss over how insane it is for some reason.

Aside from the terrifying implications, it's a startling phenomenon.",whygohomie,e9bqt39,democrats
"Wow. There it is. 

Like, they didn’t need that shit. They could have made a reasonable argument that he handled it poorly and violated the decorum of the White House. Instead, they supported a doctored video. 

Jesus. ",Machismo01,e9b9ee7,democrats
https://m.imgur.com/a/8gh8d80,mooncow321,e9b9xhl,democrats
The House better impeach on day one for this flagrant violation of free speech ,RecallRethuglicans,e9bsa0d,democrats
So you changed your mind? ,2HeadedTasmanianBoy,e9bhpp9,democrats
I thought you were talking about the administration not the press. Maybe you should have been more clear.,amatrixa,e9bigv0,democrats
"I was talking about the administration, sorry for the confusion.",2HeadedTasmanianBoy,e9bk9t4,democrats
Rock on Sinema. ,walter1950,e9bwb64,democrats
"How are there 500,000 remaining votes thus far removed from the election?",runnerswanted,e9bwu3o,democrats
Mail in ballots. ,Tribat_1,e9bxwv3,democrats
That the GOP is trying to get thrown out by suing.,dirt_and_shovel,e9byy6d,democrats
"You average my and Bill Gates net worth, and I friggn' loaded. 

Ca and NY have more folks. And there are lots of fly over states. ",grumpman,e9awjo9,democrats
"There are more people living in my zip code than in the entire state of Wyoming, yet they get the same number of senators as the entire state of California. Makes no sense. ",mbkthrowaway,e9axkol,democrats
My comment must have flown over your head ,biznash,e9bcapo,democrats
"2020 is it, it’s where it really matters. 

Are we going to stop the re-election of Trump and elect more democrat senators to swing the senate or will they lose House again?",UserN-me,e9bpyrp,democrats
Just a PSA: some districts didn’t even run GOP candidates,crimsonchin68,e9b0as8,democrats
Dems had 3 million more votes and the asshole is still in the white house...,rlossing,e9b1kb5,democrats
Gerrymandering is a bitch.,Ceilani,e9bkxm4,democrats
"We need to step up to our party name and demand actual democracy in America.

This is ridiculous in 2018.

Plus the lack of democracy is being used to drive America off a cliff into tyranny - the exact opposite of the original purpose of balancing the states against each other.

We are increasingly faced with the choice to take real freedom or have none at all.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e9bqenq,democrats
Just wait till California is counted ,biznash,e9b3uc9,democrats
"*slaps gerrymandered districts*

You can fit so much corruption into this bad boy",mandogvan,e9bx30a,democrats
The system isnt broken at all. Move along. ,SFWitmustbeSFW,e9bw4fb,democrats
Also CA had two Democrats facing off so *all* of the CA votes tally up in the Democrat column.,anuser999,e9aydyf,democrats
"That's what the House is for (even though the seat cap has messed with that somewhat).  If there wasn't the Senate giving smaller states actual representation they would have no reason to be a part of the country, and the country likely wouldn't have formed in the first place.",anuser999,e9ayhdw,democrats
">Makes no sense.

That's why there are 2 chambers in Congress. One is population proportional, the other gives each state equal representation. They are a check on each other. If not for the Senate, the heavily populated states would dominate the legislative process and the smaller states wouldn't have much representation. Now, you can argue that is the fair way, but I wouldn't agree. I think how we do it now is the best way. 

Either way, one side will be upset. If we switched to just a popular vote, smaller areas would complain they have no say. If we give them an equal say, the other side complains that they have too much power. At least right now the only real benefit is in the Senate, and that limits the power those smaller states can have. And you can't do much with just a few small conservative states in the Senate. ",r3dt4rget,e9az3az,democrats
That's a good thing. If it were just popular then we would have a mob rule mentality and everything would go to shit.,HA5396,e9bm24v,democrats
"Actually it makes perfect sense.

Better apportioned voting would help a lot as well. By state instead of by district. Which would eliminate gerrymandering.",f2f3s,e9b05y9,democrats
If you are republican and only have a choice between two democratic candidates and you don’t approve of either then you choose to vote for neither in which case your vote doesn’t get counted in this statistic.,JudgeGroovyman,e9bq4vq,democrats
Some districts didn’t even run Democrat candidates. ,UserN-me,e9bpv3r,democrats
That doesn't negate the point. Those districts support Democrats so much more than Republicans that they didn't even have any Republican candidates (make it past the primary election). So if the point of the statistic is to show how many more Americans support Democrats over Republicans - despite how the results of our elections turn out - then that fact doesn't negate that point. ,bumbiddlytake2,e9b4erf,democrats
[removed],,e9bk9el,democrats
The Senate is so gerrymandered,RecallRethuglicans,e9bsfnp,democrats
"You are ignorant lol gerrymandering has nothing to do with it (seriously, the Senate isn't gerrymandered) ",Lacoste_Rafael,e9cbf41,democrats
"The house exists to keep the big states happy, the senate exists to keep the small states happy. The electoral college combines both of them. Stop complaining",ewheck,e9c4lbz,democrats
It was!  Twice!!,miketeeeveee,e9b785y,democrats
"*slaps gerrymandered Senate*

Didn’t  know you could gerrymander the senate",ewheck,e9c4j4r,democrats
Which was the choice of the people of California.,AdequateOne,e9bcqjh,democrats
How does that change anything?,RecallRethuglicans,e9bsbjb,democrats
I'd say the seat cap screwed that up a lot. The reapportionment act of 1929 should be repealed and replaced. ,runnerofshadows,e9az21k,democrats
">That's what the House is for (even though the seat cap has messed with that somewhat).  If there wasn't the Senate giving smaller states actual representation

Not saying they shouldn’t have representation. I’m saving the representation should be proportional to their actual support without the affirmative action  that the senate is providing these sparsely populated areas. 

>they would have no reason to be a part of the country, and the country likely wouldn’t have formed in the first place.

Fortunately we settled the secession question in 1865. They can’t secede. Cut the weight their vote carries and let ‘em whine.  ",mbkthrowaway,e9b6m7h,democrats
"> If there wasn't the Senate giving smaller states actual representation they would have no reason to be a part of the country

**Good.** 

I am sick of small states thinking they deserve an equal voice because... something? *Land doesn't vote*. People do. ",ATLBMW,e9b5bd6,democrats
"Gerrymandering has messed with it more. Like the initial PA map that netted republicans 13/18 seats despite them being the minority of voters. Dems really shouldn’t lose the house unless they’re dramatically unpopular, which they haven’t been in at least 30 years. ",greenflash1775,e9bi10y,democrats
"The problem is that the model was designed for an era of fewer states, less partisanship and less interconnected economies. I don’t think the framers anticipated that you would have a large number of sparsely populated states that are firmly and reliably under the control of one party. The senate is not limiting the smaller states’ power, it is allowing one party have more control over the judiciary and policy than their numbers justify. ",mbkthrowaway,e9b0jvi,democrats
Like what we have in this country right now? ,mbkthrowaway,e9btirn,democrats
"Yeah, but those districts don’t have 0% republican support, so there’s going to be a pretty significant imbalance. I’m not even saying there’s not more public support for democrats, which is the core claim here. However, I don’t think it’s helpful for anyone to take a very misleading stat at face value, which is what most people who repeat this “popular vote” stat are doing.",crimsonchin68,e9bah4y,democrats
"Yeah Obama was, shame the brain damage delusionist was set loose there",rlossing,e9br2x9,democrats
"Not sure if being sarcastic, but Senate can't be gerrymandered. At least, as far as I know. I'm not sure if there are any states that count Senate votes differently, but most are by popular vote. It's the House that has been gerrymandered to hell. There are some statistics on how many more D votes have to be counted for every to be equal to an R vote. It's genuinely incredible that so many seats were won there.",HrothgarTheIllegible,e9bzurq,democrats
"In the classical sense, no, the senate cannot be gerrymandered. However, given the fact that a huge swath of middle/rural America is deep red territory, while no current politician did it, the forefather’s effectively ensured a conservative majority (likely without even realizing they were doing so).

Btw, people are usually more apt to listen to what you have to say when they are not immediately called ignorant. All you had to do was explain why you thought I was wrong about gerrymandering, without bringing name calling into the mix. ",Ceilani,e9ciar8,democrats
"> Stop complaining.

Dear low-karma troll account: GTFO.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e9c5ala,democrats
"What? Do you not understand how the electoral college elects senators? 

...or what are you saying ? I might not be understanding what you're implying. ",mandogvan,e9c5xtk,democrats
[removed],,e9bjvbd,democrats
"> I’m saving the representation should be proportional to their actual support without the affirmative action  that the senate is providing these sparsely populated areas.

Well without it the small colonies never would've signed on and we wouldn't have a country.

> Fortunately we settled the secession question in 1865. They can’t secede. Cut the weight their vote carries and let ‘em whine.

But would it really be ""secession"" if the fundamental compromise that brought them into the country was reneged on?  At that point I think we're talking a whole new Constitution and ratification and they probably would simply refuse.",anuser999,e9b7km7,democrats
"You do know that those states are where most of your food and water and other natural resources come from, right?  Take away their reason to stay as part of the country and they take that stuff and go home.  There is no way to remove the Senate that doesn't result in having to re-form the country from scratch, and without representation the small states simply won't sign on.",anuser999,e9b89zo,democrats
"Dont worry, when you graduate high school you will learn all about taxation and representation. Also waht is the name of our country called? Oh yea United STATES of America.",CircumScyther,e9bnxwy,democrats
"No, the system was structured without direct popular vote of Senators. It was never intended to be democratic in that way and was specifically built as a federal model.

Now, no one gives a crap about their local electeds because it doesn’t really matter.",TonyzTone,e9b38n0,democrats
"We dont have that, if we did hillary would have won and the country of 50 states would be ruled by 4 states.",HA5396,e9btlwj,democrats
The same is true for Republicans. In Texas there are several regions where there are only Republican candidates we can vote for. ,Catsnamedwaffles,e9bpdqv,democrats
How did Republicans gain 3 Senate seats when more Democrats voted? Gerrymandering ,RecallRethuglicans,e9c55sz,democrats
"Someone when people say dumb things they get made fun of. 

States are semi-autonomous governments. If we lived in a country that didn’t have states that were previously autonomous territories, maybe what you’re saying would make sense. ",Lacoste_Rafael,e9cx0x0,democrats
He's pointing out that the US senate is not gerrymandered lol,Lacoste_Rafael,e9cbhjd,democrats
As if the “greatest president of all time” doesn’t wipe his ass with it daily 🧻,mbkthrowaway,e9bmux7,democrats
"You know we can buy food from other countries right?   
I'm not actually a staunch opponent of the senate situation, but the ""they grow our food/have our natural resources"" argument is a weak one. For starters, they don't actually have that much more in the way of natural resources, alot of them are pretty fucking sparse in that regard, which is partly why they have low population, it's hardscrabble land that can only be useful in large quantities with few people working it. Lots of pasture, and other low intensity agriculture. Yes some have fossil fuels, like Alaska, North Dakota, and Oklahoma (OK is pushing mid-sized for a State) but so do California and, particularly, Texas, which have huge populations. Besides, I'd love for us to use less fossil fuels. The truth is that if the US broke up, and the West Coast and Northeast became separate nations they'd be just fine, and the South and West would suffer mightily. ",LiberalArtsAndCrafts,e9bmkv2,democrats
"So? The people in the populated states make your cars, your computers, your planes, and oh, also a shit load of food. Not to mention the fact that the taxes they pay overwhelmingly pay for the government that doesn’t pretend to represent them. ",ATLBMW,e9ba4jz,democrats
"I’m in my mid thirties and own a Tesla, but cool story. ",ATLBMW,e9bnz6x,democrats
“Mob rule” has the connotation of people acting irrationally and who do not respect the rule of law. That’s exactly what we‘ve had under the Republicans.,mbkthrowaway,e9buhnx,democrats
"Gerrymandering pertains to redistricting electoral/Congressional district boundaries. Each electoral boundary has to represent a certain amount of the population. That population votes for their house representative. Gerrymandering effects who goes to the house, but the Senate is typically determined by popular vote. 

The article points out that more Democrats voted Democrat senators than Republicans did for Republican senators. This is more a result of equal representation in the Senate and that the election map was not in Democrats favor this midterm.",HrothgarTheIllegible,e9c5o7m,democrats
"The republicans won ten seats and the democrats won 18 how is this gerrymandering?
",PM_ME_YOUR_NICE_EYES,e9c7tdg,democrats
[removed],,e9bn3x3,democrats
"> The truth is that if the US broke up, and the West Coast and Northeast became separate nations they'd be just fine, and the South and West would suffer mightily.

I doubt that wholeheartedly.  The West Coast, specifically SoCal, is not inhabitable for its population without water getting piped in from pretty much the entire West, and I highly doubt that they'd continue to get unrestricted access to that water if they became independent.  Also remember that their ag industry is mostly cash crops so the ""biggest ag sector"" argument isn't really valid.

For both the West Coast and the Northeast I think their populations are too big to be self sustaining, and without being able to drain the best and brightest from the rest of the country in this scenario I think there'd be some major regression in their main industries.  

Cities and urban areas are and always have been wealth aggregators, but without the supporting area to provide that wealth to aggregate I don't see them being nearly as well off as they are now.  That's why the best thing for all involved IMO is to re-decentralize power and let the """"""regressive"""""" states go ahead and be that way if they want (within reason - no resurrecting slavery, but past that leave them be).  If liberals are really that worried about the people that will be negatively impacted then they can take the money they spend lobbying for federal laws and instead form nonprofits that have the job of helping those people get out.",anuser999,e9bnlri,democrats
Thought you'd own a bmw. And with that type of response you have assured me you are 14 and in the middle of a call of duty game. ,CircumScyther,e9boil7,democrats
You could argue the mobs have been left leaning as well and a majority vote will never work in any government. It always leads to the prosecution of minorities.,HA5396,e9byw1r,democrats
"Because of the way the districts were drawn in the first place. Most city districts are drawn to isolate typically Democratic votes into the least amount of districts as possible, and then shave off the rest of the Democratic leaning population with an overwhelmingly Republican leaning population. Therefore, you can make more statistically Republican Congressional districts than statistically Democratic. Essentially, you can work the odds in your favor if you are the group drawing the maps. The Republicans in the last wave were the ones able to draw the maps.

In order for Democrats to win the seats they won, they needed higher than normal turnout to beat the odds that were against them. Add that to the fact that Republicans statistically turn out in higher numbers during mid terms than Democrats, and the result are pretty amazing. 

So, the outcome for the Democrats meant that they had to work significantly harder to get the vote out in order to take as many seats as they did.",HrothgarTheIllegible,e9ccqeq,democrats
The Democrats won 8 more seats and lost 3 in the Senate. How ISN’T that gerrymandering?,RecallRethuglicans,e9cdsro,democrats
I just think it’s hilarious that you only reference the document you clearly have no respect for when it’s convenient for you. ,mbkthrowaway,e9bn6xq,democrats
.... you know there are many countries that can't grow their own food right? They do just fine. There are countries that are basically just a city. No major issues. ,LiberalArtsAndCrafts,e9bro8p,democrats
Okay. ,ATLBMW,e9bojap,democrats
Lol I love that answer for some reason. I’m 30 and drive a Tesla.  Well holy shit let’s stop what we’re doing for this guy.  ,Arimer,e9bz5f3,democrats
"Source? It *always* leads to prosecution of minorities, huh? ",Redditduck1,e9c5bhm,democrats
Except we're talking about the Senate race where each state is it's own district. And considering that state lines haven't been redrawn in a significant way since the addition of Hawaii to the union in 1959 its safe to say that gerrymandering had no effect on the results of the Senate election.,PM_ME_YOUR_NICE_EYES,e9cdi10,democrats
"Like I said, the Senate is completely gerrymandered ",RecallRethuglicans,e9cda8s,democrats
"In 2016 the republicans won 22 of the 34 seats open and lost two seats, how is that different from what happened in this election?",PM_ME_YOUR_NICE_EYES,e9ce2ok,democrats
[removed],,e9bncle,democrats
"Although ""im30anddriveatesla"" would be a pretty good reddit username...",CircumScyther,e9boooa,democrats
"Yes, because minorities dont have as much say so they always just get out voted. How are they protected in a a full democracy?",HA5396,e9c5dzj,democrats
Who do you think was involved in drawing those lines? His name doesn’t start with gerry but he was there.,RecallRethuglicans,e9cfznj,democrats
"Yeah, sorry. That was in response to ""RecallRethuglicans"" who keeps stating that the Senate was gerrymandered. I'm in agreement with you. I was just explaining how redistricting and gerrymandering only applies to house seats and not Senate seats. 

The other person is just trolling.",HrothgarTheIllegible,e9co9zf,democrats
We aren’t talking about 2016. They stole the White House then.,RecallRethuglicans,e9cfcfv,democrats
We don’t ignore the 2nd. We just interpret it differently. There’s nothing in it specifies that AR-15s and other weapons of mass destruction should be privately owned. The Congress is perfectly within its right to impose limitations and guidelines on the types and amount of arms you’re permitted to own. ,mbkthrowaway,e9bnm2d,democrats
Okay ,ATLBMW,e9boqw1,democrats
"I asked you for a source that minorities are always persecuted. You’ve shifted the goal posts here to “they get out voted” from “they always get persecuted.” 

Also, a bill of rights and amendment process isn’t impossible or even improbable under democratic rule. Our rights are the primary mechanism for protecting against government overreach. 
",Redditduck1,e9c6fur,democrats
I don't know but according to you Abraham Lincoln.,PM_ME_YOUR_NICE_EYES,e9cg3hj,democrats
"And we aren't talking about presidential elections either, how was the out come of this Senate  election is ""gerrymandered"" when 2016's isnt?",PM_ME_YOUR_NICE_EYES,e9cx0zy,democrats
[removed],,e9bq070,democrats
"Which is why reddit, facebook, television, and other medias of mass destruction should not be entitled to free speech. Congress is within its rights to impose limitations and guidelines on the types of media youre permitted to consume.

What was the point of the second amendment? Do you trust Donald Trump? Could someone worse be put it charge someday?",CircumScyther,e9bo8rt,democrats
"There haven't been any direct democracies in history to reference, but if we did move to one, how would the minorities be protected?",HA5396,e9caxec,democrats
"Good lord, only the lunatic right would compare the right of the press to critique this corrupt administration with the right to murder indiscriminately. If you cannot see the difference, you guys should not be anywhere near policy making at least until you are no longer a danger to the public. These are weapons of war, designed for combat. We need to ban the sale, the manufacture, and the ownership of these death machines and I’m convinced we can do so legally.",mbkthrowaway,e9brmh7,democrats
"There is no right to murder indiscriminately. Your debating skills need work. They are not weapons of war. If our troops went into combat with an AR15 they would be outgunned everywhere. Learn the difference. ""Death machines"" give me a break. How many people die from homicides using guns? A small fraction. The only information about guns you have is from left leaning sources. Its ok though. The left loves the police, and they think only police should have guns...

Edit: and please let democratic leadership be as oblivious as you are. Please let them run on this platform. Would be the easiest win for the right. The slogan for you guys can be ""the constitution sucks""",CircumScyther,e9c2rbr,democrats
"As long as high capacity weapons and ammunition are available for private consumption, there is a right to commit mass murder. Even people who sell these machine guns say they are not practical for anything other than killing large numbers of people in a short span of time. The AR-15 was developed specifically for military use. As far as Democrats running on this,  being pawns of the NRA didn’t seem to help a lot of these Republicans who just got drummed out of office in the midterms. I think there’s every indication that the public is tired watching people slaughtered for no other reason but being in the wrong place at the wrong time when some guy with a machine gun finally snapped. They want change. ",mbkthrowaway,e9d0ct1,democrats
"No machine guns have been used in a mass shooting in recent memory. An AR15 is a civilian rifle. People want to ban features, but they dont understand these features. A right to commi t mass murder means there is no consequences. Let me know when a mass murderer was let off because he has a right to kill people.

There are close to or more guns and america than people. VERY few people die to guns in mass shootings. Scary AR15s are a fraction of a fraction. Dont turn law abiding citizens into criminals for owning something that will never be used in a crime.

While I dont agree with this sentiment, alcohol is much more dangerous than firearms. It causes depression and poor choices, and evidently rape as of late. We should ban it. See how crazy that is?

Agree to disagree, I have experience with guns, you do not (apart from maybe ""my dad had a shotgun growing up."") I know, i know, appeal to authority argument. But if you think machine guns have killed anyone outside of war lately, you need to reexamine your definitions and research guns more, just like your politicians.

Posted from phone, not proofread btw. Just ramblings.",CircumScyther,e9d4qw2,democrats
Just like they stopped talking about Hillary's emails after the 2016 presidential election and how they stopped talking about Ebola after the 2014 midterms.  Hmmmm.,kerryfinchelhillary,e9aja0b,democrats
It’s almost like they’re disingenuous assholes. ,94potato,e9ag6tl,democrats
"They WANT people watching them.

We only need a few to monitor and counter their propaganda.  There's no need to drive any significant traffic to them.
",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e9b5yhe,democrats
"They talked about it today, wtf are you talking about. ",MilitantSatanist,e9bp5bg,democrats
"No, actually we are NOT watching Fox news.",Frebdignabliaq,e9asxj1,democrats
"Oh I’m sure the caravan hype was to turn up Republican voters. Fear works, Trump knows it. 

It’s also why he waited until after the election to “fire” Sessions. He wanted to avoid blow back for doing it at the ballot box. 

",UserN-me,e9bis4v,democrats
CNN and MSNBC do the same thing for the other side. They pander to audiences they are businesses and want make a profit. Their job isn't to be truthful or honest. It is to get as many comsistant viewers as possible. If we just look at the mainstream media as a buisness instead of some other entity then their motives and stories become crystal clear.,HA5396,e9b5zgq,democrats
"""Desparation is a stinky cologne""
-Chief Grady",Flight2-0-9er,e9anaje,democrats
"I haven’t been watching them, did they really let go of Clinton’s emails after the 2016 election? All I know is that Trump and his minions are still bringing them/her up as constantly as if the news about them broke yesterday.",CaptainJAmazing,e9bbyj6,democrats
What happened to kavanaugh? Bad poll numbers? Man I hope those senate seats were worth it.,tbktheamazings,e9bgyzg,democrats
Or like how Trump “fired” Sessions (Mueller’s boss) AFTER the election. ,UserN-me,e9biyn5,democrats
Why not? It’s good to get information from both sides. That’s why I’m subbed to both democratic and republican subreddits. ,collectioncard,e9av9bs,democrats
"Don’t assert a fake parallel where it doesn’t exist. CNN is bad, but it’s no FOX",tscaffolding,e9bep4p,democrats
Not more of this “the other side is just as bad!” crap!,UserN-me,e9biu1q,democrats
"> information from both sides

Except that what you get from Fox News is bullshit, not information.",Frebdignabliaq,e9avi4q,democrats
"I'm not saying it's bad at all, but the coals of all the networks is to make as much money as possible. And they do this  by pushing narratives one way or another to maintain a fanbase.",HA5396,e9bm7zi,democrats
That wasn't point of my comment. I was just saying that media is a buisness and that stratagedy is used by every media source. ,HA5396,e9bmpfe,democrats
Good to know what bullshit is being spewed so you can be prepared for your elderly relative's new topic at thanksgiivng.,MrClickstoomuch,e9ay5fz,democrats
Semantics. The point stands. It's good to know what the enemy is doing.,Jaibamon,e9b8saj,democrats
"To be clear Fox News intent is to mislead and push an agenda for political power.

CNN is actual news. The bad part is it has a narrow range of topics it deems important delivered in a format that suggests there are always two equal sides to any position when in reality one is scientifically supported and the other is very weak at best to create drama for ad revenue. 

Not the same.
",tscaffolding,e9bnuv5,democrats
"You’re still trying to paint a false equivalence. 

Yes MSNBC caters to liberals but it’s no where the same.  ",UserN-me,e9bp3t6,democrats
"Every time you watch Fox news, you are putting money into Rupert Murdoch's wallet.  Eyeballs mean dollars, thanks to the A.C. Nielsen Company.

I agree that knowing what the opposition is thinking is important, but there are lots of other people who can do that for me without my giving money directly to Murdoch.",Frebdignabliaq,e9buywm,democrats
"That's your personal opinion. There isn't an objective answer. CNN has clearly shown bias, you just happen to agree with them.",HA5396,e9bq5lp,democrats
Why is it different.,HA5396,e9bq65u,democrats
I think the only difference is that you agree with them.,HA5396,e9bq79b,democrats
"How so? 

The “journalists” who worked for FOX say they were not allowed to talk about news they were whitewashing.

CNN hasn’t had this reported

Fact checking  FOX news stories often shows inaccuracies and lies. 

CNN is about a tenth as much.

Facts are observable not opinion",tscaffolding,e9bqkmd,democrats
Because fox news straight up lies bro.,threemileallan,e9cknro,democrats
Where are you getting these statistics?,HA5396,e9bqq5k,democrats
Fox and Friends has a liberal as part of their discussion group so they can get opinions from the other side and not have completely one-sided discussions. I bet there's no CNN shows that include a conservative as part of their talk show to get competing viewpoints within their discussions and that's because they WANT their shows to just be a huge circle jerk.,WilliamWallace54,e9bxf00,democrats
So do most other media bro. What about the CNN guy who harassed a bunch of people. Keeping that secret was a lie. As well as their coverage of guns with many misinformed people talking on the subject.,HA5396,e9cv74p,democrats
"So you can throw them into doubt?  I used the word about so if you look them up and find FOX News is  8 or 16 times  not 10 time less accurate it still stands. What does it matter? By asking for sources in something as obvious as this you make it clear you won’t be convinced anyway. 

",tscaffolding,e9bs529,democrats
And the reason they won’t let Soros on is because they don’t want to be biased?,tscaffolding,e9by0dt,democrats
"It is obvious to you but not to me. And you should always be skeptical about thing mo matter what source you get then from.
   ",HA5396,e9bsahp,democrats
"I mean, is this based on some sort of data? It's not unreasonable for claims be substantiated. I'm legit curious if fox news is that bad.",ohlookitswally,e9bv4vw,democrats
i'm not saying they're completely unbiased but they seem to be less so than CNN since CNN would never have a conservative as part of their discussion team. Actually another case in point is Tucker Carlson who has debates against liberals on his show. Liberal reporters are too scared to have any-one with an opposing viewpoint on their channels it seems. It's as if they think they will lose the argument.,WilliamWallace54,e9by5sb,democrats
"It’s not that you should be skeptical. It’s that you should research them for yourself. Being skeptical just lets you believe things that challenge your beliefs.

Look up how accurate stories are on FOX vs CNN. You are likely to be shocked if you think it’s not obvious.",tscaffolding,e9bsufm,democrats
"I’ll post the first hit on Google. Not as proof but as a guide of what to expect.  You should do your own research.   

If you think for example that there were more people at Trumps inauguration than Obama even after seeing photos then you need not apply.

https://www.politifact.com/punditfact/article/2015/jan/27/msnbc-fox-cnn-move-needle-our-truth-o-meter-scorec/",tscaffolding,e9bvgzw,democrats
"You made the claim, the burden of proof is kn your hands. If you dont provide proof then you can make any claim you want and just say go do research because social media and google results dont lean left at all.",HA5396,e9bsxzi,democrats
I did look into it and all the left leaning media says fox lies more and right leaning media says CNN lies more. It is just a bunch of finger pointing with cherry picked statistics.,HA5396,e9bt5ke,democrats
"Its fair to assume that somebody who uses a specific number (10x) that it came from somewhere. Chances of me finding that specific article are pretty low. So yeah citing sources is good practice.

Based on your link, assuming both networks put out roughly the same amount of content, that would make fox news 3x more full of crap (assuming half true is a reasonable truth level).

To the point this other guy is making, 15% of CNNs news is unequivocally true, fox is 10%. So both networks are totally pushing an agenda. Fox is worse, but the numbers are bad all around. Also this is from 2015, probably need updated numbers.",ohlookitswally,e9bx5v4,democrats
It’s not cherry picked statistics if they were chosen randomly.  Pick 10 random front page FOX stories and 10 random front page CNN stories and fact check them yourself,tscaffolding,e9btuv6,democrats
If citing sources online was effective I would. You are missing the point.,tscaffolding,e9bxa6t,democrats
I'm sure there will be lying and omission on both sides in relatively equal amounts. If you weren't liberal you would be saying all of the exact same things about cnn.,HA5396,e9bytrp,democrats
"Citing sources online is 99.9% effective. It's a fact look it up.

You're arguing that CNN isnt pushing an agenda. If that's the case why are only 15% of their statements 100% accurate according to your source? Why would 85% of their news be misleading to some degree? Maybe they have a moderately liberal agenda they are pushing?

I think this other guy has a good point, all the media outlets seem to push an agenda. But you're right fox news says more fake news.",ohlookitswally,e9bxwrn,democrats
"Just because I can spot a lie doesn’t justify putting me in your box of liberal. Historically speaking I’m a right wing Regan conservative. “A house divided can not stand.” Lincoln was an amazing Republican. You don’t have to be a socialist to see there is something that stinks in giving Trillions away to billionaires.

I’m not defending CNN. I’m saying they are just bad corporate news. 

CNN is awful but  to understand what is going on you need to understand they haven’t moved to the left. CNN is not extreme. Fox News has moved to the extreme right. 

Extreme makes it so they need to lie to the point that they fabricate things to produce fear that have almost no basis in reality.

The caravan of immigrants coming to the south boarder wasn’t a threat to the US at all. They spun that story so many ways to try to scare us. Seriously there are more diseases in your golf club house than the whole group of desperate people they dehumanized.

Where is the parallel story of liberal lies from CNN that is an extreme left view that has almost no basis in reality?

Are there stories promoting true communism in America and that there shouldn’t be any more private corporations and all wealth should immediately be redistributed?  Did they run stories suggesting that wealthy business people are bringing diseases to America and we should send the military to protect us?
",tscaffolding,e9cbems,democrats
The kavenagh hearing is a good example as well as promoting hillary and then the blue wave for the midterms. As we as being blatantly misinformed about guns and spreading lies about those as well. There are lots of examples.,HA5396,e9cv3iq,democrats
"Sure! Throw his hat into the ring! 2020 is going to be a big crowded primary. 

(Actually... sadly and disturbingly, with our new normal of campaigns lasting 2 years when a primary is involved, the primary starts in just a few months in spring 2019... sigh.)",bumbiddlytake2,e9bqvg2,democrats
"I'd say if Beto doesn't run, or ultimately doesn't get the nomination for President, he's almost certain to get tapped for the VP spot by whoever does get the top pick on the ticket.",jdmiller82,e9bvki3,democrats
"I think the biggest issue is from what I’ve read he’s openly opposed to running so that he can spend time with his family.

They may be able to tempt him only time will tell.",ScentedShark,e9bx2lh,democrats
He can be 2020's Lincoln Chafee,Brysynner,e9chv95,democrats
"I'd take Harris - Beto. 

Beto could single handily fill his own rallies. ",Webby915,e9cjl0s,democrats
Hahahahahahahahahahahahahahaha,1ruiner2another,e9c1gm4,democrats
Doubt it. Would make a great VP if Sanders or Biden get the nomination however,GroriousNipponSteer,e9cczad,democrats
"Not interested.  

I've been Hope and Change and Burned before.  ",MecatolHex,e9c9opr,democrats
"Run a non progressive like Harris or Booker or Biden and the dems lose again. Every dem who ran progressive beat the polls by large margins check Beto, Ojeda, Ocasio-Cortez. Those who ran as corporate dems did not beat any polls. You get people out to vote by running on populist issues like Medicare for all, living wages, no corporate pac money, criminal justice reform, affordable college, etc. When the dems lose again you’ll know why. Stop running corporate dems and moderates they have no substance to stand on.",Cmize253,e9cw1t8,democrats
Right... someone who couldn't beat the most hated man in America (Ted Cruz) is going to beat Trump? Dream on Dems.,starman09,e9c5485,democrats
"Next spring is optimistic. We could have some candidates declare over the winter.

It wouldn't be unprecedented, John Edwards announced at the end of December 2006.",randomaccessvagaries,e9bro60,democrats
"I was JUST talking about this with a family member.  
It makes more sense to have him as VP anyways.   
He is a great personality and his campaigning was progressive even amongst the progressives. He may not have won him his election, but countless others would be more than happy to give homage to their victories because of him. ",LinusWiger,e9d1ycv,democrats
"Ouch, I have to believe he'd do better than Linc. Maybe 2020's Martin O'Malley. (And I say that as someone who likes O'Malley.)",randomaccessvagaries,e9cul2x,democrats
"Sanders and Biden are both trash and we are explicitly not doing a two white men ticket.

Get with the program. ",Webby915,e9cjlle,democrats
It's not so cut and dry. There were also plenty of moderate victories and progressive losses on Tuesday.,randomaccessvagaries,e9d2n5o,democrats
"Once again a Regressive proves thinking is something it is incapable of.

Half of Texas would vote for a literal dog before they'd vote for a Democrat. That he came as close as he did is amazing.",AkiTendo,e9c8b3x,democrats
"I actually think Beto is in a similar position as Bernie Sanders. A good portion of their popularity was about who their opponent was. 

I don’t see there being a villain to prop up someone this time around.

For Beto, I’m not sure how he can get away from the pack when you have a bunch of Senators running who can get free press resisting Trump from the Senate floor",Brysynner,e9cvit7,democrats
"How about we act like rational people and run on a meritocracy. If a Sanders/O’Rourke ticket is the strongest chance of winning the White House in 2020, why not support it?",GroriousNipponSteer,e9cjnp6,democrats
I’m saying progressives get more people out to vote. Watch them run another Hillary-type dem and watch what happens.,Cmize253,e9d3q0f,democrats
"Because they aren't the best chance and Sanders is fucking horrendous on policy and old as shit?

Biden is old, creepy, dumped on Clinton, and not where the party is going. 

Beto would be a great vice in an effort to both get Texas and as a fundraiser, but paired with preferably Harris, Booker, or Gillibrand. ",Webby915,e9cjrif,democrats
"> Because they aren't the best chance and Sanders is fucking horrendous on policy and old as shit?



Sanders is old, sure. I don’t see age as an issue. That’s why Beto is there. As for his policies, polls show that the majority of Americans support his policies. He has the highest favorability ratings of any sitting politician. Your claim he is “horrendous on policy” is completely subjective and has no basis in fact.


> but paired with preferably Harris, Booker, or Gillibrand. 

I have no gripes with any of these candidates. I would support them because I am a Democrat. That being said, they’re completely uninspiring. To the voter they represent the same-old, same-old establishment Clintonites. Whether that is the truth or not is irrelevant, the court of public opinion deems it so. Beto is inspiring. Beto can inject spirit into the hearts of voters across the nation. Bernie can do that too. It’s only logical, therefore, to pair them together.",GroriousNipponSteer,e9cjzmy,democrats
"Sounds like you might just be an old white sexist my guy. 


Bad policy is defined as attempting inefficient methods to achieve stated goals. Such as using a $15hr min wage to reduce poverty, supporting rent control, and not opening the borders. 

Also this is r/democrats, so please stop promoting politicains who are not democrats",Webby915,e9cxjc3,democrats
I was pleasantly surprised by the flipped House seats there.  If only my state had flipped a few :(,kerryfinchelhillary,e9cx2cn,democrats
"Its hilarious when they try to argue “no evidence”. 
The evidence is there, there’s mountains of it. Its for the courts to determine if that evidence has legal merit. 
Simpletons. ",usposeso,e9c6tc7,democrats
[removed],,e9d0pab,democrats
Thought this sub might be interested in this. This is an episode of [the daily](https://np.reddit.com/r/Thedaily/) podcast by the NYTimes discussing how the democrats came up with a winning strategy to use across different places and how it worked out.,kitkid,e9d0y7o,democrats
"/r/democrats does not allow the direct linking to external subreddits without the use of ""np"".  Please use http://np.reddit.com/r/<subreddit> when linking into external subreddits. 

The quickest way to have your content seen is to delete and repost with a corrected link.  

*I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/democrats) if you have any questions or concerns.*",AutoModerator,e9d0rg5,democrats
"His ""embrace"" from ""the don"" was not long enough. ",wheezergeezer,e9d0le3,democrats
"Its just a tactic to win over undecided voters who may look at both subs to see whats happening.

If they can convince someone whose undecided that Dems have no platform- however untrue that is- then their chances of getting that vote go up.

Of course, there are also those who likely do believe that Dems have no policy ideas and that they only hate Trump as their whole agenda, but I suspect thats a smaller group than the former category.",begonetoxicpeople,e9bli1o,democrats
"Hi. I am your local libertarian that lurks this sub to see how you guys feel about issues. As someone more on the outside of your party I can say you guys do have a problem connecting with the people right now and I think it comes from over saturation. 

Let me explain: Right now everything revolves around how you respond to Trump.  The republicans are doing this as well right now. If you are not either publicly stating you are for or against trump it is simply not really covered. The Orange Man dominates all political discussion on a national and even local level which is why both parties candidates are basically viewed only by there stance on Trump.  

&#x200B;

Anyways, Congratulations on winning the house and I hope you can bring the government to a standstill for the next few years. ",Tempestor_Prime,e9byxff,democrats
Lies are all they have,AkiTendo,e9bl7e5,democrats
"My problem with self-identified *'conservatives'* these days is that they're more accurately labeled reactionaries and/or Trump cultists.

Today's right isn't something William F Buckley would have embraced. The main problem with the right today is militant antiintellecualism which has decayed into anti-science, anti-evidence, anti-rationality, pro-religion, pro-unthinking orthodoxy, pro-guns for all reasons and seasons which revels in the annoyance it can generate on the left.

The right have become toddlers who enjoy seeing how angry they can make you by refusing to listen to you.

Your choices are to act just as childish or leave them to their own echo chamber.",hrlngrv,e9btgnw,democrats
That's why I don't hang out in conservative subreddits.,kerryfinchelhillary,e9c2ji4,democrats
"Thank you for responding. I guess republicans have controlled the conversation for the past 30 years or so.
Lol idk if you want the government to come to a standstill or not but you do you.",pikamachue,e9c8fh7,democrats
The endless gaslighting is maddening. I understand your frustration. ,aLittleHiddenTree,e9cvh4x,democrats
"They are seeing in the other what day essentially do. Their basic MO is try to get power by any means necessary, twisting laws and basic ethics and positions, while doing anything to get in power. There's no question that's what they do to a considerable extent.",ravia,e9d0du7,democrats
I think blind hate is a factor too. Or maybe some brainwashing. ,Chestnut529,e9bp3zw,democrats
"*Lies* assumes they're able to distinguish between truth and falsehood. Republicans' relationship with truth is more like amorality than immorality. They have their *beliefs*, and those are more valuable to them than any objective, verifiable truths.

Semantics: if one really believes a falsehood, is one lying when one utters that belief?",hrlngrv,e9btqck,democrats
"Yes. There's even a word in the English language for such individuals.

Fools.",AkiTendo,e9c7x7v,democrats
75% vote by mail?  Are they the snowbirds?,3Suze,e9c4f9t,democrats
I love this!,kerryfinchelhillary,e9c3aio,democrats
Get ready to hear the phrase “executive privilege” a LOT,shawnemack,e9ao8vp,democrats
Nice.,2HeadedTasmanianBoy,e9bkts9,democrats
"Please do. Pence is a better conservative candidate.

Edit: this is a literal fact. Pence has more conservative views. Downvote facts all you want. Its the left's best defense.",CircumScyther,e9bocr9,democrats
"Don't get your hopes up... the local newspaper is reporting this was probably due to poor ballot design, where many people just didn't see the Senate race boxes to bubble in. In that case if no votes were recorded Nelson won't gain enough to win.",starman09,e9c5bz5,democrats
"Step 1) Stop legitimizing the “Acting Attorney General” by asking him to recuse. Instead, say this: “this asshole is not the AG! OPEN INVESTIGATION!”

Step 2) Go on every news channel and repeat above.",SeriouslyItsAmy,e9cdw3n,democrats
Agreed.,LeadingPiano,e9cnmme,democrats
"In the event that Whitaker defunds the investigation, can we start a GoFundMe?",asilverwillow,e99wbrg,democrats
"Does that fat orange fuck WANT to get impeached?

Or did grow some balls knowing that those crony Republicans and that that bastard Mitch McConnell and his appointed judges will protect him?",UserN-me,e99p7vm,democrats
"From U/poppinKream 

Who is Acting Attorney General Matthew Whitaker? The new Acting AG has the all the authorities afforded to an Attorney General, Deputy AG Rosenstein no longer oversees the Russia probe, Mueller must report to the Acting AG. The Acting AG can refuse to indict anyone and can interfere with the investigation, he has previously indicated defunding the investigation.

Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein was not appointed to the role of Acting Attorney General and Special Counsel Mueller will report to the new Acting AG as he is not recused from the Russia investigation. Jeff Session's Chief of Staff Matthew Whitaker has been appointed by President Trump to be the Acting Attorney General,[1] to reiterate he is not recused from the Russia investigation, will be receiving a complete briefing about the investigation from Rosenstein and will most likely interfere the Russia probe. Whitaker is a Trump supporter who has defended the infamous Trump Tower meeting claiming any campaign would have accepted a meeting with a foreign adversary during an election,[2] has attempted to obfuscate Russian interference,[3] and has mused about defunding the Mueller investigation.[4] Acting Attorney General Matthew Whitaker wrote an opinion piece denouncing Special Counsel Mueller claiming the investigation was going too far.[5] 

Last month, when President Donald Trump was asked by The New York Times if special counsel Robert Mueller would be crossing a line if he started investigating the financesof Trump and his family, the President said,""I think that's a violation. Look, this is about Russia.""

The President is absolutely correct. Mueller has come up to a red line in the Russia 2016 election-meddling investigation that he is dangerously close to crossing.

However, Special Counsel's purview includes any crimes discovered upon their investigation into Russia's interference.[6]

Context - Former Attorney General Jeff Sessions' Recusal from the Russia investigation and the Appointment of Special Counsel Mueller

Former Attorney General Jeff Sessions resigned at the request of the President and in an unusual move his Chief of Staff was appointed as Acting Attorney General.[7]

President Trump has repeatedly denigrated his former Attorney General for not doing enough to protect the President from the investigation and has gone as far as to ask Sessions to fire Mueller publicly.[8] However, former Attorney General Sessions was forced to recuse himself from the Russia investigation,[9] he met Russian Ambassador Kislyak during the 2016 campaign.[10] AG Sessions cited Title 28, Chapter 1, Section 45.2 of the Code of Federal Regulation, titled ""Disqualification arising from personal or political relationship"" as the reason as to why he recused himself from the Russia investigation.[11] Deputy AG Rod Rosenstein took over the Russia inquiry and subsequently appointed Special Counsel Mueller.[12] Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein is a Republican, who appointed former FBI Director and Republican Robert Mueller as Special Counsel and was lauded by the Republican party,[13] Rosenstein was nominated by President Trump.[14]

Be respectful, cordial, do not give President Trump and his allies any excuse to label protesters as violent extremists. The nation and world will be watching, make your message loud and clear. Whitaker is not an impartial individual, he has repeatedly attacked the Mueller investigation and defended the Trump campaign's illegal actions. Acting Attorney General Matthew Whitaker must recuse himself from the Mueller investigation immediately and relinquish oversight to Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein.

1) Wall Street Journal - Attorney General Jeff Sessions Resigns from Trump White House

2) CNBC - Trump's Acting Attorney General Matthew Whitaker, who has criticized the Mueller probe, will now oversee it

3) Newsweek - Who is Matthew Whitaker? If Trump fires Rosenstein, Jeff Sessions' Chief of Staff will take over

4) Washington Post - Trump’s new acting attorney general once mused about defunding Mueller

5) CNN - Mueller's investigation of Trump is going too far

6) Office of the Deputy Attorney General - Appointment of Special Counsel To Investigate Russian Interference With The 2016 Presidential Election and Related Matters

7) The Globe and Mail - U.S. Attorney-General Jeff Sessions resigns at Trump’s request

8) Twitter - Donald J. Trump, This is a terrible situation and Attorney General Jeff Sessions should stop this Rigged Witch Hunt right now, before it continues to stain our country any further. Bob Mueller is totally conflicted, and his 17 Angry Democrats that are doing his dirty work are a disgrace to USA!

9) Bloomberg - Mueller Investigated Sessions for Perjury on Russia Statements

10) Reuters - Mueller probing Russia contacts at Republican convention: sources

11) Cornell Law School - 28 CFR 45.2 - Disqualification arising from personal or political relationship.

12) U.S. Department of Justice - Appointment of Special Counsel

13) USA Today - Rare bipartisan moment: Both sides embrace Robert Mueller as special counsel

14) Reuters - Trump to nominate Rod Rosenstein to be deputy U.S. attorney general",isthisforeal,e99omxf,democrats
"Oh god, they fired Mueller?",HawlSera,e99m5b0,democrats
"Search ""rapid response"" up vote all threads. Then upvote this comment or make it if you don't see it. ",godweasle,e99wfh8,democrats
guys i need suggestions for a sign,DisNameTho,e9akjzd,democrats
[removed],,e99fj03,democrats
Call your local radio station and request Green Day's American Idiot to be played at 5PM. ,2018Blunami,e9abtqj,democrats
Does anyone know where the event for Durham NC is? I can't find it. The website is not working for that location,starkey2,e9afv8m,democrats
But Trump told us there was no problem with Russia. That it was a fake story. Does he have something to hide?,azr0ckerB50,e9ak7ps,democrats
"Yeah I agree, mueller seems like a guy who has planed for this eventuality, I just want to see it all unfold and not get blundered by criminals. ",wantabe23,e9c8hae,democrats
"Richmond VA cancelled per email from the  host because he doesn’t have enough time to set everything up and get enough resources, but suggested we go to other closeby ones

Edit: Richmond is back on with new host",wandeurlyy,e99vpme,democrats
I wonder if that would be allowed. ,atomicspacekitty,e9a3pxk,democrats
And they will.  Unfortunately he is not getting impeached.,Diorj,e99pi9h,democrats
"Trump will never get impeached. He's confident after last nights results and unfortunately, he is above the law now unless his pisses of senate Republicans.",Dblcut3,e99vbwr,democrats
"What’s the actual plan? Draw out an investigation to dirty him up and poison his public persona so he loses the 2020 campaign, regardless if he’s actually guilty of anything, but he might not get impeached bc the real goal is 2020?

Or, he fights back and gets impeached, which helps a 2020 bid? Are those the two options democrats are giving him? 

Im ok with both. 🤔",bluegirlwins,e99xrkn,democrats
"not directly, but a loyal trump crony took over for sessions and thus because he hasn't recused himself like sessions did takes over the investigation from rosenstein so now Mueller answers to a guy who has gone on record to referring to his investigation as ""a witch hunt""

&#x200B;",Lugalzagesi712,e99ooah,democrats
"Not quite, more of a hamstring-without-quite-firing deal. Please spread the word.",Autodidact2,e99mdd3,democrats
"Trump most likely won't fire Mueller. Instead he will have Whitaker hamstring the investigation so badly by cutting his budget and scope that it will be hard for Mueller to move forward.  

My guess though is Mueller is most likely prepared for finding love at the same time though.  ",Liljoker30,e9a0rbq,democrats
Not that I’m seeing anywhere.,jlhouse36,e99m82s,democrats
"From U/poppinKream 

Who is Acting Attorney General Matthew Whitaker? The new Acting AG has the all the authorities afforded to an Attorney General, Deputy AG Rosenstein no longer oversees the Russia probe, Mueller must report to the Acting AG. The Acting AG can refuse to indict anyone and can interfere with the investigation, he has previously indicated defunding the investigation.

Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein was not appointed to the role of Acting Attorney General and Special Counsel Mueller will report to the new Acting AG as he is not recused from the Russia investigation. Jeff Session's Chief of Staff Matthew Whitaker has been appointed by President Trump to be the Acting Attorney General,[1] to reiterate he is not recused from the Russia investigation, will be receiving a complete briefing about the investigation from Rosenstein and will most likely interfere the Russia probe. Whitaker is a Trump supporter who has defended the infamous Trump Tower meeting claiming any campaign would have accepted a meeting with a foreign adversary during an election,[2] has attempted to obfuscate Russian interference,[3] and has mused about defunding the Mueller investigation.[4] Acting Attorney General Matthew Whitaker wrote an opinion piece denouncing Special Counsel Mueller claiming the investigation was going too far.[5] 

Last month, when President Donald Trump was asked by The New York Times if special counsel Robert Mueller would be crossing a line if he started investigating the financesof Trump and his family, the President said,""I think that's a violation. Look, this is about Russia.""

The President is absolutely correct. Mueller has come up to a red line in the Russia 2016 election-meddling investigation that he is dangerously close to crossing.

However, Special Counsel's purview includes any crimes discovered upon their investigation into Russia's interference.[6]

Context - Former Attorney General Jeff Sessions' Recusal from the Russia investigation and the Appointment of Special Counsel Mueller

Former Attorney General Jeff Sessions resigned at the request of the President and in an unusual move his Chief of Staff was appointed as Acting Attorney General.[7]

President Trump has repeatedly denigrated his former Attorney General for not doing enough to protect the President from the investigation and has gone as far as to ask Sessions to fire Mueller publicly.[8] However, former Attorney General Sessions was forced to recuse himself from the Russia investigation,[9] he met Russian Ambassador Kislyak during the 2016 campaign.[10] AG Sessions cited Title 28, Chapter 1, Section 45.2 of the Code of Federal Regulation, titled ""Disqualification arising from personal or political relationship"" as the reason as to why he recused himself from the Russia investigation.[11] Deputy AG Rod Rosenstein took over the Russia inquiry and subsequently appointed Special Counsel Mueller.[12] Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein is a Republican, who appointed former FBI Director and Republican Robert Mueller as Special Counsel and was lauded by the Republican party,[13] Rosenstein was nominated by President Trump.[14]

Be respectful, cordial, do not give President Trump and his allies any excuse to label protesters as violent extremists. The nation and world will be watching, make your message loud and clear. Whitaker is not an impartial individual, he has repeatedly attacked the Mueller investigation and defended the Trump campaign's illegal actions. Acting Attorney General Matthew Whitaker must recuse himself from the Mueller investigation immediately and relinquish oversight to Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein.

1) Wall Street Journal - Attorney General Jeff Sessions Resigns from Trump White House

2) CNBC - Trump's Acting Attorney General Matthew Whitaker, who has criticized the Mueller probe, will now oversee it

3) Newsweek - Who is Matthew Whitaker? If Trump fires Rosenstein, Jeff Sessions' Chief of Staff will take over

4) Washington Post - Trump’s new acting attorney general once mused about defunding Mueller

5) CNN - Mueller's investigation of Trump is going too far

6) Office of the Deputy Attorney General - Appointment of Special Counsel To Investigate Russian Interference With The 2016 Presidential Election and Related Matters

7) The Globe and Mail - U.S. Attorney-General Jeff Sessions resigns at Trump’s request

8) Twitter - Donald J. Trump, This is a terrible situation and Attorney General Jeff Sessions should stop this Rigged Witch Hunt right now, before it continues to stain our country any further. Bob Mueller is totally conflicted, and his 17 Angry Democrats that are doing his dirty work are a disgrace to USA!

9) Bloomberg - Mueller Investigated Sessions for Perjury on Russia Statements

10) Reuters - Mueller probing Russia contacts at Republican convention: sources

11) Cornell Law School - 28 CFR 45.2 - Disqualification arising from personal or political relationship.

12) U.S. Department of Justice - Appointment of Special Counsel

13) USA Today - Rare bipartisan moment: Both sides embrace Robert Mueller as special counsel

14) Reuters - Trump to nominate Rod Rosenstein to be deputy U.S. attorney general",isthisforeal,e99ooel,democrats
"No your Mom. Put down the controller for a few seconds, put some pants on, and go upstairs and check on her, shes probably upset.",Tangpo,e9adv5w,democrats
"правдивость
",thedrew,e9bdixg,democrats
Can’t be any more illegal than what’s happening,thatdude473,e9a66x0,democrats
Figuring that our taxes pay for it in the first place. This way at least we know our money would go straight to them.  ,asilverwillow,e9a9wcv,democrats
"No he won’t because the democrats don’t have the senate 


HOW FUCKING DUMB DO YOU HAVE TO BE TO SUPPORT THIS MORON?!",UserN-me,e99q49j,democrats
He may. Just depends on whether the Dems are willing to do it ,backtoreality00,e99wd2j,democrats
[removed],,e99ymws,democrats
I guess we're doomed then,HawlSera,e99oqxh,democrats
Leak findings to the press before he gets fired,wantabe23,e9a3bcr,democrats
I'm scared,HawlSera,e99mesh,democrats
"Would it be a tax deductible donation?
/s(?)",Fadreusor,e9aetrm,democrats
"I dont support him, but he is not going to get impeached. ",Diorj,e99saie,democrats
">No he won’t because the democrats don’t have the senate 

2020.   :/",smeagolheart,e99wyx7,democrats
MAGA,Wihdenghi,e99zres,democrats
"No, you need the Senate. ",i-FF0000dit,e9ac6gg,democrats
"Kind of like Republicans did with Comey?

""Oh, yeah he's awesome... he threw Clinton under the bus.""

""OMG HE'S AWFUL.  I CAN'T BELIEVE HE DEFIED GOD LORD TRUMP""",DargeBaVarder,e9a1jvl,democrats
What do you mean “good on the left?”,bluegirlwins,e99ypq5,democrats
"The Dems in the House are going to kick his ass, they will do the investigation themselves and go after him in any way possible, to include his businesses. 
Although they can’t impeach, Trump waited til
the midterm elections for this move, so that it wouldn’t impact the midterm elections...he was planing to all along. 

He was planing on taking out Mueller all along. 

He realizes the Dems without the Senate, he’s safe from impeachment so he’s going to act as shitty as possible. 

Trump is a slimy fucking bastard and likely the most corrupt and criminal element we’ve ever had in the White House. ",UserN-me,e99pfoi,democrats
Mueller doesn't come across as a guy who will leak findings. Mueller won't get fired. Trump and his cronies will just suppress Mueller as much as possible.  ,Liljoker30,e9av1hm,democrats
"Good one. 😆 Seriously though, i wonder if we could really do this. ",asilverwillow,e9af9af,democrats
Make authoritarians great again?,timoumd,e9ac8p0,democrats
"Make America Go Away? 

Because he sure is trying his best to destroy everything that makes America great. His supporters are the biggest bunch of imbeciles in recent history. Dark times. Dark times for sure. ",HappyGirl252,e9an92c,democrats
Not to impeach. See: Bill Clinton,backtoreality00,e9aer7i,democrats
[removed],,e9aug1l,democrats
"Clinton emails, and pizzagate ",NgocMamBomb,e99z2pp,democrats
They will be able to impeach. Just not convict.,backpackwayne,e99pl3i,democrats
"To pass articles of impeachment you only need the House. (But that doesn’t really do anything)

Just like they did with Clinton. 

The same thing is likely to happen. The Dems in the House pass articles of impeachment on Trump, Senate looks at it...wipes their ass with it and throws it out. 

Senate will defend Trump at all costs because he is their lord and master and to turn against Trump is to commit political suicide for his constituents kiss his ass and so they must. 

The SCOTUS will defend Trump and call various acts to remove Trump unconstitutional. Trump knows this. He knows all of this. ",UserN-me,e9av7wr,democrats
"No they don't.  They loved Comey when he did that.  They started hating Comey when he started going against Trump.

Stop lying.",DargeBaVarder,e9awozf,democrats
[removed],,e9a05c4,democrats
"They won’t be able to impeach because it takes a 2/3 of the SENATE (not the House) to impeach him. 

That’s why he’s walking around chewing out reporters right now and acting like a stupid cunt. 

He KNOWS he’s safe until 2020 ",UserN-me,e99qbzs,democrats
"Oh certainly, but that still means he would be impeached",backtoreality00,e9awfci,democrats
"also the faked moon landing, crop circles, lizard people, and moon nazis",zcleghern,e9ah1f1,democrats
Impeachment occurs in the House. It involves bringing the  charges. Then they are tried in the Senate. That is where they need the 2/3 to convict. There isn't anything that 2.3 of congress can agree upon though. Not even what they wanted for dinner.,backpackwayne,e99qhwy,democrats
"> They won’t be able to impeach because it takes a 2/3 of the SENATE (not the House) to impeach him.

No, 2/3 of the Senate to convict. First comes impeachment by the House, which only requires a majority vote. ",felinebeeline,e99r7s1,democrats
Which means nothing. He needs to be removed from office and prosecuted.  ,UserN-me,e9az899,democrats
"And do you think Mitch “Trumps bitch” McConnell is going to let that happen in a Republican run Senate? 

Do you think the SCOTUS and pieces of shit like Kavanaugh are going to let that happen?",UserN-me,e99qp69,democrats
"It doesn’t “mean nothing”. The suggestion was that he can’t be impeached, which he can. What happens after that is uncertain. But seeing as the Dems just won nationally with 12 million more votes Trump is appearing more toxic than ever to the GOP",backtoreality00,e9azmvu,democrats
You don't seem understanding. Impeachment is not the removal of the president. That happens in the senate.  Impeachment is the bring of charges which occurs in the House by a simple majority. That would be entirely possible with a democratic controlled House.,backpackwayne,e99r1ao,democrats
"Impeachment is kind of equal to indictment, not equal to conviction. Not equal to removal. It’s closer to “being charged with something.” 

I really do love how much you clearly despise Mitch The Bitch. ",KellyJoyCuntBunny,e99sdmw,democrats
"The point of impeachment is to remove them. 

We are at such a stalemate. War very well may be the only solution. Politically we are finished. ",UserN-me,e9b3jv2,democrats
"And bringing charges will likely mean bringing in evidence, for all to see.",gelinrefira,e99ylqp,democrats
No ones fighting a war over this. If anything Trumps presidency has proven just how resistant our political institutions are to this malignant cancer and how the electorate responds. Shots corrupted but the fact is 12 million more Americans just voted for Dems and that can’t be stopped.,backtoreality00,e9b4r0s,democrats
That is an excellent point. ,backpackwayne,e9a1jz4,democrats
"Resistant? No, that would be stopping people like Trump from coming to power. ",UserN-me,e9b5nqw,democrats
"Bullshit.

[""Democrats picked up more House seats than they have in any midterm election since 1974, three months after Richard Nixon’s resignation, and a dozen races still remain uncalled by the Associated Press.""](https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/powerpost/paloma/daily-202/2018/11/09/daily-202-four-ways-the-midterm-results-challenged-conventional-wisdom/5be50aa81b326b39290546e0/)",wenchette,e9d3e7p,democrats
Facebook makes the people who use it stupid and mean. Stop reading it before it completely ruins your mind.,AngelaMotorman,e9d3uno,democrats
"Here's hoping they keep it up and don't get discouraged. It takes multiple elections to make a difference, and hopefully the youth vote turns out in 2020, 2022, and thereafter to keep making a difference. ",anusangelicus,e9bcief,democrats
I would not get your hopes up for a Nelson win. Local press is reporting a poor ballot design in several Broward precincts where people probably missed the Senate race. If votes were not cast Nelson won't gain anything.,starman09,e9c5gge,democrats
maybe he could build a wall around the white house  ,wylie99998,e9arq25,democrats
Conway. Where have I heard that name before?,therecordcorrected,e9caw6q,democrats
So this is the day when USA becomes a theocracy.,Deneb58,e9ctimo,democrats
"The Acting Attorney General deleted lots of his old tweets as well.  Luckily, some people screenshotted them.",kerryfinchelhillary,e9cxuzx,democrats
"So, who’s going to DO anything about it?",joaniemansoosie,e9cb1cx,democrats
Flake and Coons are putting forth a bill Monday to make Mueller an Independent Counsel. Let's see if the Republicans shit talking about protecting Mueller holds. The Democrats will haul this guy before the House Judiciary Committee and want to know everything he and Trump talked about before getting the position and if he has obstructed the investigation.,therecordcorrected,e9cbbdg,democrats
"Who cares? Take the W, let's get busy.",HillbillyPartySloth,e9c6h49,democrats
"Don’t forget gerrymandering dampened the results.

https://www.washingtonpost.com/outlook/2018/11/08/how-gerrymandering-kept-democrats-winning-even-more-seats-tuesday/?utm_term=.9041d5a1c215

",ultra-secret,e9cbc13,democrats
Agreed ,Stupidiseverywhere,e9c9r2i,democrats
"Yup!

I'm frustrated with pundits who.... Gah! I watch The View (my secret shame) and I would love to give Meghan McCain a good face slapping. She's been screeching since Tuesday about how it was nothing like 2010, and nobody fucking challenges her on it. Democrats need to own their wins.",profeDB,e9cen7j,democrats
"No matter the outcome, the KKK knows it has a welcome home in Florida.",AkiTendo,e9bfkkj,democrats
"I’m a liberal (even banned from T_D), but this is a REALLY toxic attitude to have, some of my best friends are republicans and they are good people. You have to be careful with grouping people. Be kind and you’ll realize that they are human too despite what the radical lens of the World Wide Web will tell you.",dead-inside69,e9bxk5x,democrats
You're spot on. Greedy self absorbed sheep being led to shearing and ignorant of it.,rockcandymtns,e9bxsra,democrats
"You're right, at least with respect to Trump supporters, i.e. most Republicans. I have respect for some Republicans who have rejected Trumpism and watched their party leave them behind, but the ones cheering for him are just shitty people who aren't useful for much of anything.

You shouldn't be so quick to lump ""killing animals"" in with Republican evils, though. Factory farming is indefensible, but that's not the only way people get meat. I'm a Ph.D. ecologist, a liberal, and a hunter and angler. Population regulation is an inevitable and necessary process in nature, because most species evolved reproductive rates far too high for their habitats to sustain without a lot of animals dying long before old age. The big three sources of regulation are predation, starvation, and disease. Of these, predation entails the least suffering, especially when humans are the predators because our weapons are more humane than claws and teeth. If we stayed away from killing animals by hunting and fishing, our prey species would not on average live longer lives or suffer less in death; we would be doing them no favors, just outsourcing nature's ""dirty work"" (although there's really nothing dirty about it) to other mechanisms. We can also scientifically regulate our level of predation to facilitate population stability, and the meat we sustainably hunt reduces our collective demand for industrial agriculture by millions of tons. Additionally, sportsmen are by far the dominant political and financial force in support of habitat protection and fish and wildlife science, with money coming from license fees, taxes on sporting goods, and donations to nonprofits like Ducks Unlimited and the Rocky Mountain Elk Foundation. 

It's all well and good if you want to be a vegan personally, and you have the moral and scientific high ground over those who support factory farms. But a smug disdain for all forms of ""killing animals"" puts you in stark opposition to the relevant science, much like an anti-vaccer or a climate denier. There are good reasons why you'll never find a wildlife biologist who thinks everyone should be a vegan. ",Belostoma,e9byrag,democrats
"Yeah, I'm worried it is toxic. I like the ideals of the Republican Party in theory, but I like the ideas of the Democratic Party in action if that makes sense. 

&#x200B;

But every adult I had a problem with growing up encompassed the attitude that modern day conservatives have especially in the era of Trump. On the other hand, all of the compassionate adults I respected growing up have more liberal leaning and understanding ideas. ",Gothboi777,e9by467,democrats
"Interesting. This is a subject I certainly know very little about, and I'd never heard those things in my life before admittedly. Hunting for sport has always rubbed me the wrong way, but for food I've always found it justified. 

I eat a shit ton of meat so I can't bitch about that anyway, but I'll ask you this: if there was NO sport hunting at all in some hypothetical impossible version of America, would that hinder the things you're talking about? Or is even that somewhat necessary? ",OmarIsaiahBetts,e9c8vkh,democrats
"Holy shit did you see that shit going on RIGHT NOW nvm about that acceptance BS, we should be VERY WORRIED",dead-inside69,e9c0pii,democrats
"> Hunting for sport has always rubbed me the wrong way, but for food I've always found it justified.

The two almost always go hand-in-hand. It's very rare, and in most cases illegal, for people to hunt animals without putting the meat to good use, or in some cases the fur. Wasting game meat is viewed as extremely dishonorable by the hunting community and will generally get somebody flagged as a useless scumbag. The one exception is when people kill predators like coyotes that aren't regarded as very good to eat but can be a real problem for other species when their numbers get too high.

That said, the 'sport' aspect of it is a great attraction for a lot of people, myself included. For example, one of the most difficult and rewarding experiences of my life was a solo Dall sheep hunt in the Alaska Range. I already had meat in the freezer from a successful caribou hunt, but I would have eaten every ounce I could salvage from a sheep as well. These sheep live in some of the hardest-to-reach, most inhospitable country in North America. I packrafted across a large glacial river and then backpacked about 40 miles through the wilderness, through insane willow and alder thickets, steep mountain passes, driving winds and icy rain, all many miles from the nearest other human or road or trail. Several scenes from that hunt are burned into my mind as vividly as anything in my life, spectacular views it's likely no human had laid eyes on for decades. Living in the state for ten years, I did a lot of spectacular drives and trail hikes and saw a lot of pretty country, but it's not even close to the same. Having such a specific and difficult goal drives a hunter to endure extremes to get off the beaten path, but this pays off in so many more ways. I also got into the best shape of my life for that hunt, and I spent years on ""easier"" hunts (many of them also life-changing epic experiences) practicing the wilderness skillset I needed to try this safely by myself. I only saw a few sheep and no legal rams. It didn't really matter.

Of course, it's not like that for everyone. There are other hunts for lazy rednecks or fat rich guys who just want to sit in a heated blind, or the back of a truck, and kill something for bragging rights. I don't have a lot of respect for them, and I don't like what their stereotype does for the reputation of hunting as a whole. ""Sport"" hunting is so much more than that for most of us.

> if there was NO sport hunting at all in some hypothetical impossible version of America, would that hinder the things you're talking about? 

Yes, it would dramatically hinder wildlife conservation. The funding and political will to support wildlife biology would disappear almost completely. Even work on species we don't hunt is often funded by revenue from species we do hunt, and vast tracts of habitat are protected for the sake of hunted species but to the benefit of many other species. 

As for the effects of predation itself, in some places (like Alaska and parts of the mountain West) wild predators would increase their populations to compensate for reduced competition from humans if we stopped hunting. The ecosystem could get along without us, but that's not really superior to a system in which we participate in scientifically balanced equilibrium with the other species. We would miss out on the benefits we get from hunting (in terms of enjoyment, healthy meat, reduced industrial agriculture), but the animals wouldn't end up living longer on average or suffering less in death. However, in more populated areas, the natural habitat is often too fragmented to support the numbers of large predators needed to keep up with herbivores like whitetail deer that do extremely well near people. Without sufficient hunting, deer do overpopulate in these areas and cause lots of damage to property and crops, vehicles in highway collisions (including many human deaths), etc. Such high population densities are conducive to spreading infectious diseases like chronic wasting disease, which is a miserable way for deer to die. 

It just makes sense from every conceivable angle for humans to hunt: we're serving a necessary role in the ecosystem, while gaining great personal and nutritional benefits and reducing our demand for industrial agriculture. It's obviously not something that can sustainably meet anything close to a majority of the human food demand, but it's very valuable that some of us hunt within sustainable limits. If you're curious to learn a bit more about what good hunting is really like, I'd encourage you to watch Steve Rinella's show Meat Eater on Netflix. Season 5 episode 9 is a good intro. ",Belostoma,e9cf7h0,democrats
Throw the clown in jail. Con man douchebag. ,cjheaney,e9c4nqf,democrats
"The Florida GOP's bag of fuckery is just too extensive.  They basically roll up Democratic votes as cigarette paper and smoke them.

That state is not part of a free country.  America visited in the Obama years, but we were tourists.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e9ax90d,democrats
"Oh oh oh I know this one!   
If the number of votes he gets is greater than his opponent's vote count!",FunkyTown313,e9b4927,democrats
[https://twitter.com/KevinCate/status/1060591101613146114](https://twitter.com/KevinCate/status/1060591101613146114),deircr33,e9b8dyz,democrats
"I want it to be true, but this is a stretch.",2HeadedTasmanianBoy,e9bnzl6,democrats
The GOP... the party of projection. ,ChangingFiveHundred,e9c7p73,democrats
Oh my god I thought this meant shun Bernie Sanders and I was like oh god what did I miss,willm1123,e9c72zc,democrats
"She's not wrong, but she sounds like a sore loser. ",wtfbbqon,e9b2v7u,democrats
Mi$$ouri loves it's dark money candidates!,Tmon_of_QonoS,e9bh75d,democrats
I don’t think you should be able to take back concessions.,miketeeeveee,e9br2bw,democrats
ok,VegaThePunisher,e9brh29,democrats
Why not? Shouldn't every vote be counted?,starman09,e9c5kad,democrats
Florida statute requires a recount when the margin is 0.5%.  Gillum is not the primary beneficiary of this law.  The state of Florida serves the public interest with this law.,MecatolHex,e9cchfe,democrats
Because we have a long history of conceding races for the good of democracy.  Stacy Abrams didn’t concede.  Bill Nelson didn’t concede.  Kyrsten Sinema didn’t concede.  But Gillum conceded.  He said he lost and gave the victory to DeSantis.  Don’t concede if you want all the votes counted!,miketeeeveee,e9c7klp,democrats
Which is why he shouldn’t have conceded.  He made a bad decision and shouldn’t be able to renege on it.,miketeeeveee,e9d2fml,democrats
How the hell is anyone proud to be Republican? ,Zelk,e9cajf0,democrats
"Just one more way they can commit voter fraud of their own by disenfranchising voters.  And taking more involvement in the election monitoring process?  You can bet that that will allow for all kinds of shenanigans that they just happen to overlook, not discover in time to keep things fair and free, or otherwise suppress voter turnout, especially for minorities.",takingastep,e9cblyf,democrats
The big win is all the governors we just gained ,isthisforeal,e988tmp,democrats
If you thought he was a lame duck while controlling every branch of government just you wait,BrightonGoose,e987vlw,democrats
Celebrate tonight but gear up for the next fight because 2020 will be a  true test. We have to keep enthusiasm going and young voters engaged. The house isn't nearly enough to turn the country around and with two more years of judicial nominations being rammed through you can bet its going to be a long one.,spqr-king,e989rk8,democrats
Let’s see those tax returns.,KingDorkFTC,e987ifr,democrats
good day for everyone ,TerribleBed,e987hcj,democrats
"This doesn’t make up for the devastating Senate losses in Missouri, Florida, and Texas",barchueetadonai,e98ft6l,democrats
"It's great that we won, but the party has a bad habit of getting complacent really fast. I can already see Pelosi being used as a way to rile up the base for 2020 - a reason why she shouldn't be speaker this time around.  People who've been lifelong dems underestimate the utter hatred that the GOP base and even the hangers on have for Pelosi.  ",Southwest_Warboy,e98gva3,democrats
"I’m from Texas, and it was a big let down when Beto didn’t win the senate seat. I was impressed by how close of a race it was, though, and I’ll take any incremental win at this point! Progress is progress!",thebobbuttons,e98hiwg,democrats
"The Democrats scored a HUGE victory last night taking back control of the House of Representatives. In fact, Democratic candidates received about 4 million more votes than the Republican candidates (about 9 points overall). That is a strong rebuke of Trump and his politics in Urban and Suburban districts. Democrats must show again what responsible leadership looks like. While I am not a member of the House and the Democratic leadership, I think their first priorities should be as follows:

1) Governmental Accountability and Ethics Reform - strong legislation to hold members and appointees to task for abusing the public trust.

2) A New Voting Rights Legislation - improve ballot network security, require paper trails, automatic audits of at least 10% of precincts, automatic recounts at 1% difference, ban with penalties misinformation about election details, penalties for voter suppress (like only putting 3 machines or broken machines in a majority-black precinct), penalties for machines than miscount votes (punish the manufacturer), prevent voter purges, ban robocalls, automatic voter registration at 18, and other good ideas.

3) Reinstate Net Neutrality, strength protections for pre-existing conditions, replace cost-sharing reductions to lower premiums, and I am sure that I am forgetting some major items.

Most importantly, Democrats will take over the leadership of Congressional Committees. No longer will the abuses of the Trump administration be covered up by the Legislative branch. There are certain things that should be investigated - like the response to Puerto Rico or the abuse against migrant children by taking them from their families. Let Mueller do his job and wait for his report. He already has a successful list of convictions, pleas and indictments.",deaconheel,e98qsks,democrats
It's Mueller time.,caspain1397,e98iz28,democrats
Time to run an actual investigation of this criminal president. ,bonjarno65,e98c7cv,democrats
"Great, now lets get a leader whose first instinct isn't to capitulate to the GOP.",Zenith_and_Quasar,e98mo9d,democrats
I wish I could afford a house... ,demagogueffxiv,e98g8o9,democrats
"As a new voter, what does this mean for us? ",ApostleOfAsclepius,e98cmi9,democrats
Yay!! America!!,KneeShee,e98ccax,democrats
"Everyone knows they will never pass the Senate, but Dems need to show the American people what we’re about. Pass the following in this order: Medicare for All, $15 minimum wage, anti corruption legislation, and a Green New Deal. ",Bigleonard,e98xxlc,democrats
And now the deficit is all the Dems fault.,canhead83,e98dyyh,democrats
Lets enjoy today's victory...chipping away is what we need to do!,anoelr1963,e98crkh,democrats
I am new here and getting more into politics. So glad to start to see some big wins for the democrats!! Good momentum to keep being engaged until 2020!,Laszlovich,e98mlre,democrats
Gerrymandering time . Revenge from 2010.,MrSmallANDLoud,e98pgm7,democrats
"My priority list, not in any order:

Expand Medicaid, free school lunch, and did stamps to every American


Tax the rich at 1980 levels

Investigate the financial collapse

Investigate tax dodging by America's corporations

Throw people who exploit immigrant workers into prison and take their shit

Stop attacks on our American democratic institutions",ShelSilverstain,e98joe7,democrats
"Democrats would have won the Senate if they campaigned on justice reform, m4a, recreational weed, breaking up the telecom monopoly, etc. When will the donors let Nancy Pelosi stand up for these no-brainer issues?",occupybostonfriend,e98ia2g,democrats
"You are basically the ""at-least-they-are-not-the-other-party"" party to me, but I'm still glad you won.",Space_Dust120,e98v4w4,democrats
"Anyone wants to celebrate with some music?

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oUSo4WImxdU&t=31s](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oUSo4WImxdU&t=31s)",Roxxagon,e98y21q,democrats
Let’s go! We fought hard as hell and had so many close races. We all just gotta keep this same energy for the next election. ,icyecold,e98y3si,democrats
[removed],,e98dk9f,democrats
"I think that GOP is perfectly fine with last night's outcome:

They get to keep Senate to confirm all super-conservative judges you want. Just look at Clarence Thomas resigning soon, to get something even worse than Kavanaugh on the bench. Also, they can confirm any Trump replacements in the cabinet (as it seems that he is about to fire generals... and Zinke)

They cannot get any _laws_ passed now, but that's fine -- they got tax cuts (which House cannot repeal either, because Senate will block it), and they are generally not interested in governing. They do not need any new laws passed. They can sabotage Obamacare without any actual repeal laws...",anotherblue,e98h3ib,democrats
Republicans are excited. Why? Because Congress went from doing nothing with them in charge to doing nothing with Democrats in charge. The only difference is in two years Republicans will be running against Democrats for driving up the deficits and getting nothing done. The short term memory of their supporters will allow them to get away with campaigning against two things they created themselves. ,atducker,e98o39k,democrats
now lets put trump in jail! but for real...,speakeasy_slim,e98o4xm,democrats
"As a Brazilian, I want to say congratulations! This is not only a win for the Democratic Party, but also for democracy as a whole. 😊",SopaDeMolhoShoyu,e996rwj,democrats
[removed],,e9889eq,democrats
time to gum up the works ,HylianHikikomori,e985evo,democrats
Suck on that Conservicowards,evenspezCANTstopme,e98zx8u,democrats
"It's great and all, but I predict Nancy and Schumer will be useless as usual and won't go after what we all want. They're just as bad as Hillary... Republican Lite. ",EchoRadius,e994c15,democrats
But dems lost the night. I guess you have to take the small victories where you can get them,MyNotTrollAccount,e98y0rm,democrats
Think we will see a revival of Pelosi since we now all owe her our life for her help in really pulling this off. Its no small feat. I wasn't huge fan but I have to hand it to her. Her villianization within the party is over I  believe.,xxdaftmonkxx,e996xyk,democrats
Now we gotta get that Senate and we can start making real change.,deutschlanding,e99jcdr,democrats
"This was a very monumental election in history. It will be interesting to see the effect on the 2020 elections!

&#x200B;",Miriam_R1,e9auzti,democrats
But at what cost? Losing 2 seats in the senate?,Sneezer2013,e998911,democrats
"""Win"" like this is a fucking game to these people. You didn't win shit.. you were chosen by the people to represent us so don't fuck it up like you have been doing for the past 10 years.",Waitingfor131,e98uzkr,democrats
republicans still won the senate,5wolfie55,e98rdmu,democrats
[removed],,e98ctk5,democrats
Florida and Georgia literally killing me here... ,spqr-king,e989tnl,democrats
They're both important.,killxswitch,e989f33,democrats
Michigan here!,nevergomainstream,e98cj6w,democrats
"I know, how hilarious that he had 100% control of everything and his policy was... What?  What vision did he have for the country?  What was his key goal?  SCOTUS nominees? That's it? ",ArlidansSon,e9886a9,democrats
"FYI, I'm stealing this line.",not_that_planet,e988v2a,democrats
I'm so sick of governmental gridlock being acceptable by both parties. We need compromise not two years of nothing. ,BootyUnlimited,e98bvsk,democrats
"You hit it on the head - need to keep youth engaged, and need to make it easier to vote.  Two and three hours lines at polling places is ridiculous. ",weluckyfew,e98d5jm,democrats
We also need to push for populist policies like single payer healthcare and the like. People won't be enthusiastic to vote in 2020 if we don't.,Joe_mojo,e98l1gp,democrats
"Pardon my ignorance, I'm not American so I don't fully understand. I thought this now meant that Trump could be impeached. Does it not? I see all this talk about his 2020 election. Wouldn't he be long gone before then? I remember back in the 90's they tried to hang Clinton because he lied about a blowjob. Trump lies a few dozen times every day. I don't know where investigations currently stand, but it does seem like he's done a ton of illegal shit. If he were just any other joe blow, I'm sure he'd already be serving a life sentence. Again, sorry for my ignorance, I just thought it was obvious he's a crook and that it wouldn't take long for the Americans to figure him out and lock him up.",hobosasu,e98rwqb,democrats
"Join us at /r/VoteBlue

We're pushing downballot until the end of time.",screen317,e9943nk,democrats
"As much as I would love to see that, it should be the last thing on our agenda. Independent voters don't give a fuck about tax returns. They want affordable healthcare, a livable wage, etc. We need the help of independent voters too if we're gonna win in 2020.",Joe_mojo,e98legt,democrats
"Who cares ? 

He doesn’t have the money he says he did. 

His base doesn’t care. 

",KenEatsBarbie,e989y32,democrats
Even for those who don't think so. They don't even realize how bad things have been. ,794613825,e98hq91,democrats
"I’m from Texas, and it was a big let down when Beto didn’t win the senate seat. I was impressed by how close of a race it was, though, and I’ll take any incremental win at this point! Progress is progress!",thebobbuttons,e98hofl,democrats
Controlling one chamber is a lot better than none,Rinneval,e98hcz7,democrats
It sort of does.,Zeno84,e98gw08,democrats
Pretty sure theres gonna be a recount in Florida,KingTy_423,e99no7l,democrats
She should announce her retirement in 1 year ,Boomslangalang,e98ix5a,democrats
They hate her because she’s good.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e98nqml,democrats
Still got a lame duck congress to get through...,mad_poet_navarth,e98rwvg,democrats
Sadly it seems that even if he is actively commiting treason the Senate will never impeach him and his base won't care as long as theyre sticking it to the liberals. ,isthisforeal,e98fa6g,democrats
[removed],,e98igu5,democrats
"Generally, it means a check on Trump's recklessness, and runaway Republican spending.

Specifically, it means the ability to have a *real* investigation (edit: from within Congress) into his administration's blatant corruption and his family's acts of treason.",greentreesbreezy,e98czsa,democrats
"Reminds me of all those Obama v. Trump statistics infographics.

The only caveat is they compare each presidency when they're still very new. Obama was still in the shadow of Bush's recession and Trump riding the coattails of Obama's recovery.",TVK777,e98hbb8,democrats
No they wouldn’t. Missouri and rural Texas and northern Florida vote on abortion and Jesus. ,Rubberbabybuggybum,e98of0l,democrats
Winning seems unlikely. 50-50 tie could've happened with actual blue wave though.,JonWood007,e98x6v7,democrats
No matter who they put up they will be hated and demonized. Look at it this way people already don't like her so dragging some other person through the mud would only give them more ammo then they have now. She's not popular but she's not dirty and she gets stuff done. I would rather see someone new as well but it's doubtful.,spqr-king,e98eriq,democrats
"Eventually, yes.  But ""next"" needs to be reining in the Trump administration and pushing back on the GOP.  And actually accomplishing the goals they were elected to pursue.",killxswitch,e989i2d,democrats
"I'm sure that's the consensus of your echo chamber,  but not only did 

Dems win the house, but they flipped several governorships as well.
",godlesspinko,e99jws2,democrats
Are you really so upset that you're going to other parties subs and talking shit?,YGFDT,e98db1i,democrats
"Florida hurt, Georgia was an emotional loss. ",swaharaT,e98bwlc,democrats
Iowa too. ,skizzyskabang,e99mtlr,democrats
"Well, Florida's going to have a brown wave in 2020 when 2 million convicted felons get to vote (mostly black and latino).",SquirrelHumper,e99hirv,democrats
"Agreed but the governorships will help going into 2020, will limit some of the GOPs ability to gerrymander and voter suppress. With races so tight it could be what pushes us over the edge ",isthisforeal,e98f68b,democrats
"And a self serving tax cut for his owners, that's basically it. ",BrightonGoose,e988fs8,democrats
"Domestically: tax cut for the rich, take away healthcare for all but the rich, stoke racism and xenophobia. 

&#x200B;

Internationally - destabilize the west and the world overall, praise dictators. 

&#x200B;

Personally - steal all the money, get all the bribes, satisfy Vladimir 

&#x200B;

... what did I miss? ",fake_belmondo,e989c2a,democrats
"People like him, and his supporters do not have any real vision for the country's future, except retaining their social and cultural relevancy.",gelinrefira,e989uuv,democrats
"You're saying SCOTUS like it's a throwaway, though. With his two nominees put in place, I think we'll likely see a harder 5-4 vote.

Don't forget the fact that the R's played such insidious hardball with Obama's judicial picks that they left nearly 100 vacancies open. They basically stopped any confirmations in 2016, after slow playing previously.

I don't think Dems hammer the fact home enough that judicial seats are really crucial in having our guy pick the appointments.

&#x200B;",MediocreHeroine,e98c8hc,democrats
Well honestly - the SCOTUS is a big fucking deal and will outlast about anything else he does.  ,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e98mz9t,democrats
"Well there was also the border wall.

To echo a certain sentiment about health-care I don't really like MY tax dollars being used for something I don't consent to.",kurisu7885,e98n77z,democrats
"Trump's goal was never about policy.  Bannon clearly articulated what this presidency's mission is:  ""Deconstruction of the administrative state"".  And Trump has been *wildly successful* on that front.  Every single federal department has had a critical loss of talented workers, experienced leaders, momentum, and strategy.

The very best example is one that's going to affect our nation for decades to come:  The State Department.  

>Almost Half the Top Jobs in Trump’s State Department Are Still Empty  
In 18 countries, the White House has yet to designate a U.S. ambassador. That includes Australia, a close ally to America that is beginning to look to China instead.

[https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2018/11/state-department-empty-ambassador-to-australi/574831/](https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2018/11/state-department-empty-ambassador-to-australi/574831/)",FallenAerials,e98i7n0,democrats
Advancing the Trump brand. ,blackguardly,e98nhh8,democrats
He’s keeping all his campaign promises! He said so! ,petal14,e99jrrl,democrats
Can't compromise with someone who denies your rights. No half measures. ,BrightonGoose,e98bz8n,democrats
No compromises with Nazis.,Webby915,e98omm5,democrats
Fuck that we need to bury these traitors,WeaponexT,e98ec5e,democrats
I have a feeling the majority of the youth will remain engaged. And there will be more to come as they turn 18. But YES we must keep them engaged! ,SpelCleave,e98zyup,democrats
Not just that we need to push the right candidate for the right place. Don't be upset with Manchin when we can get our shit together enough to win by one or two votes. Let the blue dogs vote how they have to on some issues so they can be with is on these major ones. We can't keep coming close if we are going to fix things like voter suppression and gerrymandering.,spqr-king,e98mx9r,democrats
"Trump can be impeached, but impeaching (in the House) needs to be confirmed by the Senate, which wont happen.",screen317,e994595,democrats
"To tack on, when the republicans impeached Clinton, it backfired on their political party. If democrats do decide to push to impeach Trump, it's better if it's a slow, methodical uphill climb, especially given how feverent some Trump supporters are. If we rush to impeach too quickly, we risk seeing a sea  of red in 2020.",sadcoffee,e99lngh,democrats
"If it shows money laundering, or straight up tax evasion- I think most people would care.",ithinkitwasmygrandma,e98nh1d,democrats
"We can't pass any of those things, and wont be able to for the better part of a decade. People can and will run on that, but we can subpoena the tax returns now. ""Independent voters"" are not a monolithic voting group by any stretch.",screen317,e994l91,democrats
"Crimes potentially? Its how they got al capone
",CanderousBossk,e98a1y6,democrats
You really think that is why we want to see his tax returns? To stamp out one fragment of his ego?,TJames6210,e98b6r6,democrats
"Possible money laundering - would be a security risk - Also, if it turns out there is nothing there then we can move the fuck on.",ithinkitwasmygrandma,e98neht,democrats
I care. It’s sort of the principle of the matter. I. Can’t stand his tendency towards non-disclosure,Zeno84,e98gsxb,democrats
Of course you should care. How has he financed himself without US banks? This goes to the heart of corruption. And what we learn may be disqualifying. It’s not only about his base...,Boomslangalang,e98jx13,democrats
"Last time Cruz won by 16 points. 

Last night he won by 4.  

That’s a victory. ",Rubberbabybuggybum,e98odni,democrats
I agree- the fact that TEXAS was that close is a huge accomplishment.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e98njc2,democrats
I voted Beto. I cried my eyes out last night. ,TCherikKillmonger,e99rune,democrats
You’re damn right about that,barchueetadonai,e98hoe3,democrats
"Seriously. 

Trump’s approval rating is in the 40’s and that’s DIRECTLY BECAUSE CONGRESS REFUSED TO INVESTIGATE THAT. 

If we can cut 20% of that this party is toast forever. ",Rubberbabybuggybum,e98oc7n,democrats
"The Senate is far, far more important. A loss there also means 6 years instead of 2.",barchueetadonai,e98hnvn,democrats
She's earned it. The crap she's had to put up with for decades in ridiculous. ,Southwest_Warboy,e98s956,democrats
"If it turns out he’s as criminal as we all suspect, we could disqualify him for 2020",Zeno84,e98gv0y,democrats
Don Jr doesn’t have executive protection. ,Rubberbabybuggybum,e98oil3,democrats
Absolutely no reason not to go after him.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e98nnsy,democrats
"There is much more to this than these bodies IF there is a report, terrible revelations, indictments, etc. all quite possible. Things can change fast. It always seems impossible until it’s done. 

Trump is the definition of an empty suit, failed upward with his ‘small’ loan of $400 million. His political support will crater quickly when the revelations come",Boomslangalang,e98jjt0,democrats
"They did investigate Hillary. 

11 times. ",Rubberbabybuggybum,e98ojjk,democrats
BUT BOTH SIDES 😤😤,LeoSaysNO,e98mpyg,democrats
Take your apathetic ‘both sides’ bs somewhere else,Boomslangalang,e98jd3o,democrats
"Mueller is not a ""real investigation""? ",ScubaSteve58001,e98lumg,democrats
And has been a total graceless prick about ‘the mess’ he inherited. I swear Americans have memories of fucking goldfish. Are we really that stupid. Don’t answer...,Boomslangalang,e98j1xk,democrats
"I'm just saying as of January ""fox news"" and all the other propaganda machines will blame the Dems for the deficit.  The last two years we have grown it by a staggering rate and all the blame is going to be shoveled onto the Dems. ",canhead83,e99eeoy,democrats
"And guns, can't forget about guns!",Walker5482,e99ilzr,democrats
Which is effectively still losing because of Pence.,FuriousGreenTNTRL,e995gwv,democrats
"It’s not just “them Republicans” that don’t like her. It’s a lot of Democrats. 

She’s not dirty? 
Confronting Pelosi on insider trading
https://www.cbsnews.com/news/confronting-pelosi-on-insider-trading/",jvd0928,e98gtxm,democrats
[removed],,e98il47,democrats
I'd be content with Barbara Lee,maahhkus,e98ezxr,democrats
No I’m always subbed here. I like to get out of the echo chamber but sometimes I get angry and comment. ,Radius50,e98dcfi,democrats
"Just saw that Stacy Abrams is not conceeding that race and it's still too close to call, possibly going into a runoff so be prepared for more emotions ",lil_sebastian_1000,e997cuo,democrats
" I can't say much for Georgia though, although voter suppression is pretty big over there.",FlamingAshley,e98cj7y,democrats
It was the closest race in 62 years at only a 3% loss. I really hope the next election is better. ,ricovo,e9aenvy,democrats
[removed],,e98i6ph,democrats
He didn’t actually manage to take away healthcare. That was just a major goal. ,TheThomaswastaken,e98brzq,democrats
You missed the part where his daughter has secured a shitload of chinese trademarks and has a very rich future planned... ,batshitcrazy5150,e98eesc,democrats
Apparently commit multiple crimes requiring a multi-year FBI investigation. Although that could have been a side quest.,getridofwires,e98tqed,democrats
"Now that the Senate is no longer so close, confirmations will slide right through like a diet of coffee and Taco Bell.",Texas_FTW,e98cn0h,democrats
"But that's not a thing.  That's like saying building buildings is my goal.  What's in them?  What purpose?

Forcing a conservative agenda on a nation for decades?  That's it? ",ArlidansSon,e98z2vl,democrats
"Me too!  I really wish my money wasn't funnelled into a war machine that constantly destabilizes developing nations, resulting in their people having to flee here!  I wish our precious tax dollars went towards caring for our sick and our young, not on bombs aimed at goat herders and people who aren't friendly to the petrodollar.",unrefinedburmecian,e996ae4,democrats
"I agree that President Trump has done some outrageous things, but it seems absurd that the two sides just cannot find common ground. It is more sad than anything else. ",BootyUnlimited,e98d8fk,democrats
"As a Jewish person who lost family in the holocaust, I do not agree with calling Trump a Nazi. He is an asshole and likely a criminal, but the Nazis were an evil almost unmatched in history. ",BootyUnlimited,e98re2u,democrats
"Also to add, gaining 7 governorship will make it easier for dems to pass laws that make it eaiser to vote, and some areas might be able to remapped. All which will help. ",TheFatMan2200,e991c90,democrats
"I wish I could upvote this a million times.

I like Gillum and I voted for him, but I think his stance on gun issues really hurt him with NPAs. If he had stuck to healthcare and the environment (issues important to literally everyone I talked to canvassing, be they Dem, rep, or NPA) I believe that he would have won.",Quietus42,e99im9m,democrats
"ah, I see. Then yeah, that won't happen.",hobosasu,e99azmz,democrats
His followers would just shout fake news.  Why do you think so many people didn't believe Ford over kavanagh,zeldermanrvt,e98q5yr,democrats
"Mueller has anything if there is anything. 

The taxes don’t matter. New York Times put out all that fraud his family did and it made no noise. Not even the front of Reddit. 

Let’s get him for all the other stuff. ",KenEatsBarbie,e98ab65,democrats
"I mean sure go get em. It won’t change anything. 

But she if it makes trump sweat go get them. ",KenEatsBarbie,e98k0l2,democrats
"Senate losses suck, but I wouldn’t trade control of a chamber for anything",Zeno84,e98kyn0,democrats
Agreed. She’s also well versed enough and effective an operator to set up the next wave of leadership. ,Boomslangalang,e999tmf,democrats
I meant from Congress.,greentreesbreezy,e98mxjn,democrats
"Holding congress means his investigation is protected. 

That’s HUGE. ",Rubberbabybuggybum,e98oh0o,democrats
He hasn’t been allowed to hold hearings or release documents.  That all changes today.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e98nlty,democrats
Would still bode better for 2020 and allow easier dislodging of the GOP in the long term. ,JonWood007,e995xi3,democrats
Did you read the article you linked... I mean do you have anything saying she was actually accused of anything? A lot of Democrats have soured on her after a decade of republicans using her as the boogieman.,spqr-king,e98ma0s,democrats
Go ahead and post facts if you have something other than rhetoric.,spqr-king,e98me6b,democrats
I'm sure many people would be but the other 45-50% of the country would still be told she's a godless liberal demon.,spqr-king,e98fyh3,democrats
"Hahahaha... you’re so full of shit. 

Just because you’re susceptible to bullshit doesn’t mean everyone is. ",Flaccid_Leper,e98fuxe,democrats
Gerrymandering doesn't really effect statewide elections though. They're effectively popular vote.,Texas_FTW,e98crr9,democrats
"Wisconsin here,

Gerrymandering is a bitch, but there's hope. We booted out Walker regardless. ",Bluetooth_Sandwich,e993hbs,democrats
Go away.,Webby915,e98oqh0,democrats
Agreed we need real reform of corruption in the US,isthisforeal,e98jyb2,democrats
It needs to stop on both sides for sure.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e98n9gv,democrats
"The individual mandate is gone, which effectively suffocates the ACA.",Texas_FTW,e98cigw,democrats
That is just a side effect of stupid laws standing in the way of his maximum enrichment trajectory. ,fake_belmondo,e98wgwk,democrats
and produce something similar ,BrightonGoose,e98e4vx,democrats
"Come on, I’m trying to make it a good day.",ithinkitwasmygrandma,e98n36p,democrats
[removed],,e9a2nis,democrats
"There are artillery shells that cost more apiece than my house/

Oh yeah, that's what we need, single use devices that cost more than a small home /s

Even worse is buying a ton of equipment they don't need that sits around rusting.",kurisu7885,e9979ji,democrats
"It is sad, but when he regards people from Mexico as ""bad hombres"" what kind of compromise can be achieved? We declare them ""kinda bad hombres""?",BrightonGoose,e98e1f1,democrats
Did you pay attention to Obama's presidentcy?  He tried and tried to compromise but they said no.,zeldermanrvt,e98q16i,democrats
"Trump is more than just an asshole, Trump is fash. Trump wanted to have a weekly publication of [crimes committed by illegal immigrants](https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.independent.co.uk/news/world/americas/donald-trump-publish-weekly-list-crimes-immigrants-commit-refugees-aliens-executive-order-us-a7546826.html%3famp) which is something Hitler did with Jewish crimes. Trump wants cops to be rougher with suspects. Trump wants his political opponents locked up. Trump wants people to hate the out-group. Trump wants more frequent use of the death penalty.  Trump wants to limit freedom of the press. 

I get that he’s not literally as bad as Nazis, but we are certainly in need of a stronger and more descriptive word than “asshole”.  ",ThirdMostAverage,e98xbx0,democrats
"Cool, I'm still gonna call them Nazis though. ",Webby915,e98s715,democrats
It doesn’t mean we should stop.  Find the truth - investigate - and let people decide.  ,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e98rv23,democrats
"His followers wont care if he murdered someone right now.

It's not for his followers.",screen317,e994nlv,democrats
">I have a feeling the majority of the youth will remain engaged. And there will be more to come as they turn 18. But YES we must keep them engaged!

People believe in evidence. There wasn't much evidence against Kavanagh. There isn't much evidence against Trump... yet. If the tax evasion gives more evidence, that would be good for 2020",Jaibamon,e9b9a2e,democrats
Mueller and Sessions will be fired right after the new congress is sworn in. The senate will confirm whichever yesman replaces Sessions.,eric987235,e98e0tv,democrats
"Let's get him for Literally everything
",CanderousBossk,e98gyo2,democrats
Trump is already sweating as are the rest of them ,Boomslangalang,e99a6cr,democrats
I would trade control of the House for the Senate any day.,barchueetadonai,e98sdtk,democrats
"I'd like to believe that, but are you sure? Jeff Sessions just resigned. The House could impeach the president if the new AG fires Mueller, but the Senate would have to do the trial and choose to punish him. ",halberdierbowman,e995ziz,democrats
"I remember the segment on 60 minutes. She ran from the reporter after a hint of her insider trading and self dealing. 

No this is not guilt by association. This is guilt and derision she’s earned fair and square.  She’s one of the reasons for the 2016 debacle. 

When she talks it becomes apparent she’s out of touch. 

She does nothing to unite the party or bring in independents. 

",jvd0928,e98nko6,democrats
"Yeah,  Republicans,  who cares what they think",maahhkus,e98jiy3,democrats
lol I don’t care if he believe me. I’ve been subbed here for like a year I think. ,Radius50,e98lwyg,democrats
"But gerrymandering goes hand-in-hand with other voter suppression tactics. Of course, you're right that governors are elected by popular vote, though.",chilaxinman,e990jaq,democrats
"Ahhh okay, thanks for the correction.",FlamingAshley,e98cwet,democrats
"Gerrymandering isnt the issue in GA, its their outright plain in site attempts to keep brown people from voting thats the real problem. And I don't see it getting better with Brian Kemp as Gov.",SquirrelHumper,e99j3y3,democrats
Congrats to you folks. Scott Walker was a blight. ,swaharaT,e9987lx,democrats
"As much as I want healthcare for all, my family just can’t afford health insurance most months. May be I don’t know enough about federal options, but if there’s a free to little cost option, I don’t know about it. 

Right now, I’m personally getting cheap cheap cheap insurance by working for a healthcare business. So I have that going for me. Could I realistically get insurance for under 30 a month when I’m making 35k gross a year. ",Jemiller,e98grcn,democrats
You. I like you.,Texas_FTW,e98eenk,democrats
"My health insurance will be $2000 more expensive next year.  My tax cut was $800.  My business deals with metal imports so we've had to manage that which has caused some lay offs.

Your fucking president has hurt my life in a lot of measurable ways. My friends family in PR suffered for over a year, still suffer!  And we have 15000 troops for a caravan of asylum seekers fleeing a war were funding?   Anyone who supports this piece of shit administration is a piece of shit themselves.  I hope you wake up, or at the very least fuck off.  If you wanted to live in a fascist shit hole, just move to one, stop ruining this country. ",ArlidansSon,e9aaoml,democrats
That hyperbole is going to bite us in the ass. Trump and his administration have given us enough to criticize without having to exaggerate.,maikuxblade,e98wycw,democrats
"I agree.  We need the truth.  Sane, rational people need the truth",zeldermanrvt,e98uyu7,democrats
His followers are a cult.,zeldermanrvt,e994yua,democrats
Lindsey Graham,AlaskanPotatoSlap,e98r69l,democrats
Sessions resigned today ,IncredulousStraddle,e9912wx,democrats
"So your answer is no. You have no facts or evidence we are just supposed to go off your memory from a decade ago... Why are you even on this sub?

She hasn't had a gavel in almost a decade and yet what she says which is basically party talking point is not uniting? Well hell if our talking points aren't uniting we have bigger things to worry about. She's old and most older people are out of touch with people almost half a century younger than they are but that didn't stop Paul Ryan from being an incompetent knob.

Would I like someone new? Sure of course but I don't expect it and if it was someone knew they would become the new pelosi no matter what in two years time.",spqr-king,e98ol7d,democrats
"Why would the Democratic party take into account the wants of the opposition when choosing a party leader... You think Paul Fucking Ryan and Mitch McConnell are bipartisan golden boys lmfao 

Again you could pick the most vanilla candidate out there and they would be hated after a month as speaker.",spqr-king,e98mh9r,democrats
Pelosi and Schumer do for some reason.,Zenith_and_Quasar,e98mtmh,democrats
"Yes you do. Otherwise why would you lie about it?

Your comment is verbatim the headline of another post. 

You read it and scurried over here to post it to try to get a rise out of people. 

So not only are you gullible and incapable of coming up with an original thought of your own but you are also incredibly transparent while doing it. ",Flaccid_Leper,e9at6ek,democrats
You could argue that there would be more House seats occupied by Dems if it weren't for gerrymandering.,Texas_FTW,e98ehhf,democrats
[removed],,e98gsmb,democrats
"Hmm weird, the original comment I replied to changed.",Texas_FTW,e99jz48,democrats
"This why we needed an actual progressive plan, not just Romney-care on a federal level (which the ACA actually is). 
Medicare for all is the best answer. ",joszma,e98ihh3,democrats
"Healthcare at a federal level would be exorbitantly cheaper, the main reason American health care spending is through the roof compared to other countries is how our insurance pools affect the price of premiums. If you know anything about the law of large numbers is that the larger your sample size the more trends normalize. What this means for healthcare is that if you have say 10 people under 1 insurance plan, and one year only 1 person has lots of medical expenses (say cancer), the price per person is incredibly high and the premiums for that group has to reflect that risk. On the other hand if you have a group of 100 than the premium will be much lower because there's much less risk that 10% of your pool will have exorbitant medical fees. Add in the fact that most people only get health insurance when they need it (so premiums obviously are higher since healthy [read: young] people often don't bother with health Insurance) obviously that's going to skew your pools to trend higher. In fact insurers did not want ACA passed because they were afraid that someone will just wait until they're sick and get insurance. The only reason they accepted it was because the individual mandate promised more young people would join pools and drive down premiums.",Sistersofcool,e98uwv4,democrats
"Medicaid, mate.. Depending on household size you may qualify for medicaid",screen317,e994d0n,democrats
[removed],,e9ajsst,democrats
What's your model?,Webby915,e98xplz,democrats
"Oh right. Yeah, him.",eric987235,e98thg4,democrats
Yeah I wrote that before I saw.  fuckfuckfuckfuckfuck,eric987235,e9926rj,democrats
"I’m on this sub to help save the Democratic Party from its base, corporate instincts. 

Why are you on this sub?  Simply to declare acceptance of the status quo?

She’s clinging to power with no consciousness of the division she brings. 

If you keep your low expectations you will get what you are expecting. Aim higher for Christ’s sake. 

",jvd0928,e98sfaj,democrats
I did get the idea from another post. I didn’t scurry over here. I’m subbed here and the posts show up on my feed,Radius50,e9at90h,democrats
I even occasionally post here asking questions because the conservative subreddits I follow wont explain the whole situation so I come here to get some more deets from the other side,Radius50,e9aterz,democrats
[removed],,e98h5dy,democrats
"What?  Were not struggling to find metal, were struggling to compete with foreign companies who can under cut us now on the foreign market.

""hurry up and fail"" is that the new MAGA?  Is that what Trump is offering?",ArlidansSon,e9arfts,democrats
"Centrists witness liberals calling Trump and Co. literal Nazis, they realize that's at least partially disingenuous, and then disregard what we have to say after that.

They're definitely nationalists and arguably fascists, but we don't need the Nazi parallel to dismantle those positions.",maikuxblade,e98xx6h,democrats
[removed],,e98hs6h,democrats
"Silence is violence -> Centrists are Nazis too. 

And pragmatically, they don't read r/democrats, so go clutch your pearls somewhere else. ",Webby915,e9976ps,democrats
">Centrists are Nazis too

Well if I was an independent I would say this makes your side look awfully childish. So thanks for making the rest of us look bad.",maikuxblade,e99hw7m,democrats
"I would describe myself as a centrist, and I'm here because listening to opinions I don't 100% agree with is valuable and important.",anonymous_rocketeer,e99f0lh,democrats
Who'd you vote for yesterday?,Webby915,e99gw1m,democrats
"Republican governor, Democratic Rep, no senate race in my state.",anonymous_rocketeer,e99h0p8,democrats
"The only state voting R for governor would be okay is Mass and that doesn't fit the other requirements. 

You're a bad person my guy. ",Webby915,e99iysl,democrats
"New Hampshire's Sununu isn't actually terrible in my opinion, and I understand that I'm in /r/Democrats.

He's pro LGBT (signed the ban on ""conversion therapy"" among others), pro choice, refused to send the national guard for Trump's family separations, and perhaps most importantly was an MIT environmental engineer by trade for a decade, and was at least partially responsible for leading the state level charge against leaving the Paris agreement.

Unlike lots of Republicans who push the ""mental health"" issue whenever mass shootings come up and then ignore it entirely, he's pushed for fairly large increases in funding for crisis units and almost doubled transitional housing.

He's admittedly rather fiscally conservative, but that's highly representative of new Hampshire as a whole, and by and large it's a stance I agree with. I'm not sure how marginally preferring him to the also fairly likeable Democratic candidate makes me a bad person as opposed to someone with reasonable political differences, but ...",anonymous_rocketeer,e99qf9q,democrats
[Here's](http://teestune.info/democrats-make-better-lovers) one I found. But only front print.,LeadingPiano,e9coa35,democrats
"Here's something close to it:


* https://www.funnyshirts.org/design/927/Democrats+Better+Lovers?gclid=Cj0KCQiA2o_fBRC8ARIsAIOyQ-nYH_407KWQVdNrXkuBHYaVEPw6R6bbB-ch9z1oDll3quFMKBVIKuwaAsJxEALw_wcB",backpackwayne,e9bzk8s,democrats
 Whitaker's recusal must be our loudest message tomorrow at the Rapid Response protests. ,Equestriaguy,e99rwjc,democrats
[removed],,e99y97f,democrats
Rapid response protest lol.  You’re about 2 days too late.  Trump and Republicans laugh at protestors.  WE NEEDED MORE PEOPLE TO VOTE,chesterburger,e9aehya,democrats
"I totally get it, but Sessions was a piece of shit. We’re probably better off without him lol.",TheMarketLiberal93,e99wu0d,democrats
"Yup. Im ready to rock, but I almost wonder if just the threat of the protest will be enough to force a recusal. ",KellyJoyCuntBunny,e99x4fu,democrats
Because trump is a dumber Mussolini and this is a state headed for fascism,CanderousBossk,e9a937c,democrats
This has nothing to do with sessions sucking or not. At least he was following the law and recusing himself from the investigation. This is all about Mueller. ,ace9127,e9a06xp,democrats
[removed],,e99xpnz,democrats
"Oh I know. That’s why I said I totally got it, lol",TheMarketLiberal93,e9aes1d,democrats
[removed],,e9a2phf,democrats
Then why is trump trying so fucking hard to bury anyone looking into it? Hmmmmmmmmmmmmmmm,CanderousBossk,e9a90u2,democrats
"Mueller was appointed 1.5 years ago, not 2. The watergate investigation lasted over 2 years and was fairly simple by comparison. Also, Mueller has already had convictions and plea deals. Oh, and trump jr and kushner met with a russian agent to discuss coordinating.

> Not a chance. Its been two years. If you dont have the evidence by now, it doesnt exist

-Says increasingly nervous man",Bay1Bri,e9ahc89,democrats
"""I get it, but i really don't""

-you",Bay1Bri,e9ahdq7,democrats
"Hahaha okay Mr. No evidence. When did the FBI hire you? Maybe let someone who does this for a living take care of it. For a witch Hunt, sure is finding a lot of fucking witches",CanderousBossk,e9a92f8,democrats
Whatever you have to tell yourself so you can sleep at night little snowflake.,Fr33zy_B3ast,e9a9678,democrats
"A witch hunt that keeps finding and charging witches.

&#x200B;

edit: and convicting",gheradel,e9aeo7e,democrats
"Find a grown up and have them read these to you:

https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2017/07/11/us/politics/donald-trump-jr-email-text.html

https://www.nytimes.com/2018/08/05/us/politics/trump-tower-meeting-donald-jr.html",Bay1Bri,e9ahgc2,democrats
I do get it though. I’m just making light of a clearly corrupt situation.,TheMarketLiberal93,e9ai8t9,democrats
"Don't say ""well i said I got it so i got it"" when you're joke is the opposite of getting it.",Bay1Bri,e9ao97r,democrats
It literally isn’t though.,TheMarketLiberal93,e9b6etw,democrats
"Yes, it was probably a poor ballot design. The Supervisor of Elections (Brenda Snipes) did not follow federal ballot design guidelines and in a heavily African American precinct the senate race was buried under instructions. It's very possible many people missed it. So ultimately Snipes, a Democrat, may have blown it for Nelson. Gives credence to the saying if there is a way to blow an election Democrats will find it.",starman09,e9c5uun,democrats
Broward County 2018 will become a case study on how not to administer an election. I'm fairly confident that many on whichever side loses this race will feel that the Broward SOE cheated them out of a fairly won election.,ILikeBigButtss,e9cccsf,democrats
Great satire piece!,TrueOrleans,e99z76b,democrats
Well just gonna have to annex them /s,Nebachadrezzer,e9aba4a,democrats
Holy shit...that was hilarious. You made my day.,Tommyn718,e9ank47,democrats
"Wait, what?",botanistedward,e9a0h87,democrats
"Sigh, Borowitz is so lame. No idea how he ended up at the esteemed New Yorker.",SayNoToCargoShorts,e9b2ed4,democrats
Satire? It's real,GeorgeCostanzaTBone,e99zo9e,democrats
It’s a joke mannn,Admira1Jackbar,e9aka9m,democrats
">The president has served up to Democrats their first investigation on a silver platter. The dismissal of Attonrey General Jeff Sessions has sparked a fury of behind-the-scenes activity, as Democrats look to understand what the Trump administration was thinking by booting the nation’s top law enforcement officer.
>
>This is literally perfect investigative fodder for Hill Democrats. Republicans can’t really say this is overreach. It would seem if Democrats could handpick an investigation to kick off next Congress, this would be it.",wenchette,e9aifbi,democrats
"To hell with the GOP, Traitors to the American people every last onr.. except for Mueller",HawlSera,e9alsxc,democrats
Mueller may yet betray us. When Trump comes for his files he must turn them over to the Democrats. If he turns them over to be destroyed then all his work is for naught and is reduced to a sham show.,AkiTendo,e9anmmm,democrats
"Gerrymandering is horrible, and allowed the GOP to pass undemocratic laws, but it doesn't directly influence Senate races.

And this article isn't about gerrymandering. It's about the outsized influence of small states resulting from each state getting two senators.",surface_book,e9ajttc,democrats
"So Gerrymander is terrible. It’s been a problem since it was invented and it needs to be fixed. 

But this is absolutely stupid. Gerrymandering has 0 to do with the Senate or Governor races. Connecting the two is embarrassingly ignorant. They are both statewide popular vote elections, there’s no district drawing to determine the winner. The article shows a complete misunderstanding of how the US government works. ",_manoftheyear_,e9am7cz,democrats
We need to end gerrymandering.,red_carpet_hero,e9afo0s,democrats
You can’t redraw a state.,AmbulanceChaser12,e9aqbyx,democrats
This is *exactly* it in regards to the Senate. It is absurd that Wyoming (the least populated state) has the same number of Senators as California (the most populated state).,AwakenTheDemon,e9arwb6,democrats
But voter suppression does influence both governor and senate races. Here’s the connection. Gerrymandering is a form of voter suppression. The other comments in the comment above are accurate.,iamoldenough2013,e9b4uq4,democrats
Third party may cost the Democrat Senate race in Arizona.  ,walter1950,e9b75z5,democrats
"Twelve million more votes, yet we lost Senate seats.  Two years ago, three million more popular votes and we lost the presidency.  What's going to happen in 2020?",kerryfinchelhillary,e9c2r17,democrats
"*fractured  *three ribs

But yeah. Wishing for a full speedy recovery for the Notorious RGB! ",bumbiddlytake2,e9awcz9,democrats
Fractured = broken. Three ribs = still her ribs? lol,arbu0017,e9ax18m,democrats
"I've been saying this for a week. That after the election, the caravan would not even be mentioned. Trump is so predictable. What isn't is how people eat this up so easily. ",backpackwayne,e99mz0w,democrats
Yet trumps base won’t think that’s odd...,Thatythat,e9a05hi,democrats
"Fear is power.

Roy Cohn was Cheeto’s mentor.

",VegaThePunisher,e99n4og,democrats
"Fear and projection is all they got. And willing people to just eat it up. If they  told them how evil liberals are screwing grrfumblenuts, they would be everywhere demanding action for grrfumblenuts. 

And I do not say this as a joke. There is no doubt in my mind they would be in an uproar.

* https://i.imgur.com/tn9Mp2H.png",backpackwayne,e99nx9u,democrats
"It works, though. ",VegaThePunisher,e99q5jz,democrats
I know. That is what is so unbelievable. They will eat the shit up and say it tastes good.,backpackwayne,e99q8zb,democrats
Fuck Jeff Sessions. Let the executive implode.,white_n_mild,e99w72h,democrats
So Republican trolls have shown up to downvote. Heh heh,AkiTendo,e9bl9vp,democrats
"At the press conference today Donnie Two Scoops looked like he  binge-purged McDonalds Big Mac® and Filet-O-Fish® Extra Value Meals half the night, and his makeup artist came back from the trap house just in time to grind up the Cheetoes®.",Kenmoreland,e9a0ync,democrats
I just hope Mueller doesn't get fired or the investigation ordered shut by the Senate or.. any shenanigans before the house is officially ours,HawlSera,e9al7y2,democrats
"^The linked tweet was tweeted by [@davidfrum](https://twitter.com/davidfrum) on Nov 07, 2018 05:50:44 UTC (7077 Retweets | 23735 Favorites)

-------------------------------------------------

Democrats have elected 6x as many women to House as GOP, but GOP maintaining a strong lead with the Indicted-American community [https://twitter.com/mikememoli/status/1060044587966828545](https://twitter.com/mikememoli/status/1060044587966828545)

-------------------------------------------------

^^• Beep boop I'm a bot • Find out more about me at /r/tweettranscriberbot/ •",tweettranscriberbot,e99njra,democrats
Beto/Gillum 2020! ,jalahlah,e9ax10w,democrats
"Ask him how he can now support Donald Trump, given the many criticisms he made about him in the past.",wenchette,e9an8ui,democrats
Ask him why he considers his wife to in fact be so ugly. ,ParkerIndustries616,e9ap4r1,democrats
"What’s it like being disliked personally by the entire country, even people who voted for you?

",VegaThePunisher,e9aqi5e,democrats
Ask him why his position has changed on birthright citizenship. ,doyoueven-no,e9b0bc2,democrats
You're over-analyzing this. She lost for one reason and one reason alone: the Kavanaugh vote.,wenchette,e9b96vv,democrats
"I wonder if her RNC ""Nazi salute"" was real. I don't like to conspiracy-monger, but it was such an inauthentic hand motion that I can't help but have that in my mind when I read this... if you've never seen it, watch it, and I wanna know what you think lol.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e9a0fjm,democrats
"I've always said when someone in your family speaks out against you, you know you're doing something wrong.

Hearing about how they grew up, it gives me an idea of why she is what she's like.",kerryfinchelhillary,e9ajqd0,democrats
"Oh, that was absolutely intentional. Not one normal person in history has turned sideways and lifted their arm leaving the palm at that same angle to wave to a crowd. ",starbearer92,e9b1ef3,democrats
"The other two people were 2 of 6 siblings speaking out against their brother Paul Gosar. He had 6 siblings run an attack ad because they thought he went off the deep end.

6!",Jeffylew77,e9b2pow,democrats
He knows he's guilty.,kerryfinchelhillary,e9ak6uj,democrats
I thought scare mongering by the GOP over Obamacare (Australian so might have that wrong) cost Dem/s 96 seats and the House in Obama’s second year.  If I’m wrong what did cause the Democrats to get demolished like that.,Bandits101,e9a226o,democrats
Basically they reacted to criticisms of Obama by branding themselves as Diet Republican.,HawlSera,e9aitx6,democrats
"Not one word about this in Arizona, haven’t seen it in the news I would think this would be national news story. ",walter1950,e9abesj,democrats
And the coward two faced Republicans will bitch to high heaven as they continue to suck trumpies pecker. Lol,rockcandymtns,e99m02l,democrats
"The one scenario where I can see the investigations backfiring on Dems is if the economy slows down sometime within the next two years as some economists have been predicting and Dems have passed no legislation and done nothing other than investigate the administration. I think they absolutely should flood the administration with investigations, but also need to be passing some economic related bills even if they don’t make it through the Senate. ",mbkthrowaway,e99p6sf,democrats
That’s very debatable.  If they pass something than the recession can be pinned to them.  If they can’t than it falls on the republicans ,spzcb10,e99tzo5,democrats
True💙blue,white_n_mild,e99w88g,democrats
Brilliant!,Oldskooler76,e983lky,democrats
Ann Coulter should be blasted into the Sun.,clownunist,e98jc2e,democrats
😂,jkl215876,e98bxvq,democrats
I hate her. Thank you for this! ,Spacemanross,e98o5p1,democrats
lol 😂😂😂😂😂,tinydrumpf,e98usfv,democrats
Knowing republicans this may be a terrorist threat,ozuguru,e98po42,democrats
This is interesting because pelosi and the new committee chairs will have much more investigative power than the executive branch in Jan.,kmurph72,e99f8qq,democrats
"I didn't think Sessions would recuse himself, but knowing about this guy's past, I have less hope for him doing it.",kerryfinchelhillary,e99im8t,democrats
"Wait until they get ahold of the ungerrymandered maps in North Carolina, Michigan, and Wisconsin. That's a good 6 seats.",The_Central_Brawler,e99kfo0,democrats
Literally let that sink in. Dems gained more seats this time than they did at the height of the Iraq War when soldiers were getting killed in big numbers every week. Trump is more unpopular and has cost his party more seats than the War in Iraq.,mbkthrowaway,e99lvbx,democrats
In a more gerrymandered set of districts.,therecordcorrected,e99nqnb,democrats
With the economy doing as well as it is.,BarbecueGod,e9a1fck,democrats
">A day after the midterm elections, democrats are playing the softest of softball: already the new democratic leadership is signaling they won’t impeach, it’s not good politics to upset potential voters.  The democrats need to stop worrying about the next election, and start worrying about the lives of all the future people on this planet

The senate would have to approve an impeachment, so this wouldn’t mean much unless he did something truly out of bounds that would swing them over. And when Newt tried impeachment and failed because of the senate, his party lost seats in the subsequent election.

",Bioman9,e9c009z,democrats
"Lol, needed to put a comma after the ‘voted’. Pretty sure he voted all left.",nonotreadit,e97serw,democrats
[removed],,e97zy1x,democrats
Except we just won the House...,killxswitch,e9845zx,democrats
Wrong ,Webby915,e98xtl7,democrats
"which was demographically a gimme. we not only failed to pick up any seats in the senate, we actually LOST seats so repubs have even more of a majority to do whatever they want. god forbid another SCOTUS dies or retires, i don't even want to think about it. to say nothing of the fuckery that happened in GA and FL...",NachoUnisom,e98nmcp,democrats
[removed],,e9867m0,democrats
"It wasn't a gimme. The GOP gerrymandered the shit out of every district possible to stay in power. Controlling the house means the Trump administration no longer has unchecked power and congressional complicity. Taking back the house was critical, and it's done.

We also gained multiple governorships. This and state legislature seats will be critical for redistricting in the future.

Functionally speaking, what does it matter that they gained Senate seats? No, it isn't good. But how much worse is it? They already had a majority and they've already used it to do terrible things while shutting out democrats. It sucks, but the seats up for reelection were just bad luck. It massively favored the GOP, and it'll massively favor Democrats in 2020.",killxswitch,e98tms0,democrats
You make no sense.,killxswitch,e986j4v,democrats
With the way the districts have been drawn yesterday's shift was an insane accomplishment.,angryvetguy,e99n2v7,democrats
But the Dems gained less than the avg number of seats lost during midterms of new presidents first terms and lost multiple seats in the Senate. There was no blue wave...maybe a ripple?,ATC_JEDI,e9ahg5f,democrats
"Yeah that’s called orange logic.


The blowout in the House was the worst for Republicans since Watergate.


",VegaThePunisher,e9ahz5k,democrats
"I don't know man, with the GOP gaining in the Senate I don't see how this could be counted as a ""Huge"" win. I mean Obama had a Much higher approval yet lost a significant amount more of seats. Not to mention in 2020 only 2 or 3 Senate seats are even considered vulnerable for the GOP based on 2016 election statistics. Senate races also fall more in line with presidential race outcomes as well and vice versa. If I was the DNC I'd be we extremely worried about 2020 after these results. ",ATC_JEDI,e9am752,democrats
"The gop had an extemely favorable map and still lost the house. 

You do all the worrying you want for the dems. Feel free. ",Gsteel11,e9ap5a3,democrats
"That’s a load of horseshit.


9 million more people voted Democrat over Republican on Tuesday.

",VegaThePunisher,e9apmrq,democrats
According to wiki only 3million more Dems voted than Republicans ...not a blue wave ,ATC_JEDI,e9au6r3,democrats
Source?,VegaThePunisher,e9ax6qk,democrats
"Brilliant.

&#x200B;

Wouldn't it be fun to see Grassley try his nonsense on Mueller?  I know he's a Senator, but one can dream.",evolutionfan,e996h8a,democrats
Trump can do what he wants now as far as I'm concerned. It's up to a Democratic Congress what will be done with him. It won't be pretty.,kmurph72,e99dly0,democrats
I hope they go through with that if Trump fires him.,kerryfinchelhillary,e99iusr,democrats
"Same

Stopping Chump is for our survival ",HawlSera,e9ala02,democrats
Most employees are not OT eligible anymore. ,VegaThePunisher,e99qnw4,democrats
"This encourages the working class to lead lives with more work than would be enjoyable. The working class should not have to put in that many hours of effort into a job so they can comfortably eat. Of course they should work hard, everyone should, but life must be enjoyed. Life is difficult to enjoy when working minimum wage jobs for the majority of your week. ",jacob32224,e9akl1a,democrats
"The deficit is soaring as it is. More tax cuts would be a hard thing to really look at realistically.  

I mean we could just cut all taxes to zero and everyone would cheer for about 6 months until the system completely breaks. ",Gsteel11,e9aoyoj,democrats
So the solution is to pay them less so they won't overwork themselves?  If anything this would decrease the number of Overtime hours they would need to work to get by.,Serpenthrope,e9aksa7,democrats
"Yeah, but if the Republicans are going to do it anyway...",Serpenthrope,e9ap2vp,democrats
"Example: I make $11/hr, normal paycheck is around $340.  


Put in 84 hours, paycheck is $600.  


So 44 hours at $16.50/hr is $726.... but I only get about 260 of it.  


And it's mandatory overtime.",xUnzero,e9b2cat,democrats
"If the gop passed a tax cut on JUST overtime, the dems would probably pass it. 

I seriously doubt they would ONLY pass a bill for just overtime. They would tack on a ton more of tax cuts for the rich. And dems wouldnt do that. ",Gsteel11,e9apo8r,democrats
"Okay, so wages are too low. I dont see how that contradicts my point.",Serpenthrope,e9bajdi,democrats
So the House Dems can propose it. What's the Senate going to do? Vote against it?,Serpenthrope,e9apt27,democrats
"Like I said, the Senate would add a shit ton of tax cuts for the rich and then look at the house and go ""you want to vote against that tax cut 'for the working class' now?""",Gsteel11,e9aq3mp,democrats
"Ah, our classic problem: we care about reality, they care about talking points.

Maybe I'm a cynic, but I'm starting to feel that two can play at that game. Hire Cenk Uygar, or some other ideologue,  to basically be our Steve Banon for 2020 and he'd make sure they were sand-bagged for that kind of move.",Serpenthrope,e9asf9y,democrats
Thank you for exposing defects with the vote voting machine,red_carpet_hero,e9auu7b,democrats
Someone needs to be held accountable for this. It's beyond me why there aren't investigations on this.,Asking4Afren,e9bqfme,democrats
I really hope the Donald Trump Jr rumors are true.,kerryfinchelhillary,e99j2fr,democrats
If this was a normal mid-term Democrats would have lost several more Senate seats. We were defending 26 seats while the GOP had only 9 to defend. We did very well and we are set up to take the Senate possibly in 2022. Depending on the political climate when that comes.,kmurph72,e99f1xk,democrats
The age of the Nazi must never come to pass the age of Enlightenment must occur instead,HawlSera,e9au59u,democrats
"My state really disappointed me, but seeing as it's gerrymandered as fuck, I wasn't surprised.  We didn't flip a single district.",kerryfinchelhillary,e993wli,democrats
If we had the advantage this story wouldn't exist,i_deserve_less,e9aot6c,democrats
Because her speech writer is trash,messiestbessie,e99lvar,democrats
"""Forced"" you mean resigned?",MKatze,e996e7t,democrats
"I do not, no. ",adamtwosleeves,e999y3c,democrats
Read his letter. ,LinusWiger,e998dvy,democrats
Well you're wrong.,MKatze,e99afrr,democrats
"Here I'll even quote it for you.

 ""Dear Mr. President,

At your request, I am submitting my resignation.""

That's the opening sentence. Notice how it says ""resignation"" that's because he resigned.
Yes it was at the presidents request, but the funny thing about a request is, it's not an order. Sessions just did the respectable thing and resigned.",MKatze,e998tfh,democrats
Ok. Take it back to the_donald. ,adamtwosleeves,e99assv,democrats
“Resignation at your request”,Doodoocabinet,e999kc0,democrats
I already did actually <3,MKatze,e99au89,democrats
Can you fucking read?,MKatze,e999l87,democrats
Oh I know. Right after you shit on the one post in the subreddit promoting unity. ,adamtwosleeves,e99b59d,democrats
Strong armed essentially. He got ousted asap. He wanted to stay till the end of the week. ,LinusWiger,e99a8tp,democrats
"Gee, if I lied to Federal investigators I guess I'd be expecting to be indicted, too. 

Not to mention money laundering, wire fraud, tax evasion, conspiracy to defraud the US...

(Wow. Jr is fucked...)",supergreen26,e98hr56,democrats
My pants will dance.,VegaThePunisher,e98xqvc,democrats
Get him! Their him in jail,Asking4Afren,e9bqh82,democrats
So is Sr.  I'm guessing his cell will be a padded one. The (rotten) apple didn't fall far from the tree... ,shockwave_therapist,e98srdp,democrats
At least he is dating hottie Kim G. for the time being - banging that GILF who will be abandoning ship soon enough ,supercali45,e99req5,democrats
"I believe the proper saying goes ""the shit apple doesn't fall far from the shit tree"" - Jim Lahey ",i_deserve_less,e9aoqk9,democrats
"North Carolina, my state, lost its GOP super majority. We went from 74-35 to 65-54! And a few seats gained for Dems in the NC Senate too! Also two constitutional amendments to limit our Democratic Governor failed!

This is where a lot of decisions are made folks, at the State level. Absolutely great news. 

Edit: General Assembly was 74-45 actually! ",KamikazeKricket,e98syc8,democrats
"Also seeing how many districts moved left.  I think in 2020, we can take the Senate back.",kerryfinchelhillary,e992w2a,democrats
Not Broward County again...oh puhleeze!,squarepeg0000,e99td6c,democrats
I’m Australian and amazed by some of the weird shapes of county’s. Is that the result of gerrymandering? Might explain some of the strange results.,Bandits101,e9a2l3z,democrats
"This is a serious question because I’m scared. What do Democrats do now?

The new House doesn’t start until January. It’s early November. Trump is very clearly going after Mueller RIGHT NOW. 

What actions can Democrat officials take?",thefirststoryteller,e98y8tr,democrats
Can someone tell me what this means?,OpalHawk,e98v7d6,democrats
"Firing Sessions has the feel of the Watergate investigation, getting to close, asking the right questions, people turning to save themselves, as Nixion new so does Trump the Dam is breaking now. ",walter1950,e993uud,democrats
Pelosi will be in charge in Jan. So I wouldn't worry to much about this and that. The investigative power of the house of reps is far more powerful than anything the executive branch can do.,kmurph72,e99e1qp,democrats
It's too late for trump. It's been too late for a while. He can fire whomever he wants. The wheels of justice are already in motion.,Stupidiseverywhere,e98xlcf,democrats
Is he trying to stop Muller or put someone in who is going to go after the Clintons? ,-Splash-,e98whed,democrats
"Dems have already said that if he fires Mueller, they will be calling Mueller to testify publicly.

",VegaThePunisher,e98yu62,democrats
I'm hoping Mueller is enough of a patriot to turn over everything he has to Adam Schiff even if he has to do it illegally.,AkiTendo,e98z5wy,democrats
It's too late for trump. It's been too late for a while. He can fire whomever he wants. The wheels of justice are already in motion.,Stupidiseverywhere,e992jqf,democrats
"Good question.
",HamsterSandwich,e99i9y2,democrats
Trump is trying to stop the investigation. ,GregSirico,e98voq3,democrats
"There's a strong Watergate parallel to the night Nixon forced the AG to resign, then the Deputy AG, when both refused to halt the investigation.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saturday_Night_Massacre",TapTheForwardAssist,e99pi2l,democrats
I really hope the people take to the streets rather than politely voicing their whispers online. Dems always takin. The high road is getting us nowhere,Skeetronic,e99izeg,democrats
Be more specific,HawlSera,e99krpo,democrats
Stopping Mueller is a must for Trump at this point following the Dems flipping the House last night.,xerxes20,e98x6dn,democrats
I really hope you're right ,KingMe091,e996yo4,democrats
"You say that, but with a Republican controlled senate impeachment is off the table. Mueller can indict people around Trump, he can made recommendations about obstruction of justice, but the senate will never vote for it. It would destroy the GOP.",Finite187,e9a9j4e,democrats
"How effectively can he stop the investigation?  For all Schumer’s tough talk, my understanding is *pretty effectively* if the republicans keep bending over for him.

So is this it?  The orange freak wins and literally becomes a dictator?",Postcrapitalism,e99ek8l,democrats
That was faster than I expected!,Oldskooler76,e98w7ga,democrats
Ditto,HawlSera,e99kqyj,democrats
He might have the new AG fire Mueller. Which would be earth shattering. ,GregSirico,e9aphr6,democrats
Let's do both,Ferfuxache,e988mbz,democrats
How about focusing on positive policies and a vision for the future of our country? ,waynestevens,e98oq8a,democrats
"It's so clear there was something fishy going on there.  We heard stories leading up to it.  I'm so mad I have to see fat old Ted Cruz in the Senate for six more years, that a man who suppressed so many voters as SOS is a governor and that a man who moderated a racist Facebook group is also a governor.",kerryfinchelhillary,e98aac5,democrats
"Beto conceded too quickly and my only thinking on this was so he could set up a bid towards president or vp. 

But we needed Cruz out of here, god dammit.

I’d like to see an investigation since early on we did have reports of switched votes on machines.",KavaNaughZi,e987hyf,democrats
Plus that dead guy in Nevada who won,squeakim,e98nusq,democrats
Maybe but the Russian thing is hard to believe and let's Republicans off the hook. ,data2dave,e988v7f,democrats
"Both, but you haven't noticed that strategy failed and failed time and again. You have to be negative and positive-- we need to try harder and win all branches of electoral politics-- sadly the Senate has free reign with Judge appointments. Kissing up to Republicans will not do!",data2dave,e99dyze,democrats
"Not sure if the Stacey campaign is over yet. A lot of votes need to be counted and if the ""winner"" is under 50 % a automatic revote is in action for later in the month. ",data2dave,e98ddzf,democrats
Exactly! Beto outperformed polls by a lot so there's that. But he didn't have a huge message that I could discern so not sure how he'd do nationally. Isn't he still a Congressman?? ,data2dave,e988rxc,democrats
"The Republicans didn't let Hillary off the hook for Benghazi, and this is an actual thing with criminal charges and convictions.

> That group is composed of four former Trump advisers, 26 Russian nationals, three Russian companies, one California man, and one London-based lawyer. Six of these people (including now all four former Trump aides) have pleaded guilty.

https://www.vox.com/policy-and-politics/2018/2/20/17031772/mueller-indictments-grand-jury",TravisLabs,e98c3ga,democrats
"I disagree. If they colluded with Russians to win an election and it can be proven. I don't see them getting off the hook. 

With this voter suppression thing, I can see them saying ""hey what? We were just following the laws.  The ones we put in place. To keep people from voting. Both of these have merit. ",Ferfuxache,e9894xr,democrats
">Maybe but the Russian thing is hard to believe

https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2018/07/16/us/elections/russian-interference-statements-comments.html

I guess they are just deep state.",mrsmegz,e98hnu0,democrats
"Are you a Republican? Because the Russia thing isn't just some ""thing."" Nor is it hard to believe. Get your trashy ass out of here.",clownunist,e98gg3i,democrats
"Nah, but it's just an excuse to run Hillary again. That's not the reason why she lost.

It's like when Lee's Confederate General Longstreet was asked why Lee lost at Gettysburg, ""Something about the Yankees being in our way!"" 

Get real, Republicans won by being more focused, unscrupulous and just plain lying and cheating. Meanwhile Hillary was praising Reagan and trying to convince Republican women to vote for her. ",data2dave,e99dqfm,democrats
"The people have a funny way of voting if they really want more liberal ideas? 

Why didn't gillum or Abrams win? Doesn't make sense? 

The example from the article is fdr...  but that was in a MASSIVE depression. 

It's a lot easier to convince people they need big changes when the whole economy around them is pure shit. ",Gsteel11,e9aonl9,democrats
Trying to combat irrational ignorance with rational thought is like trying to convince an insane person to just stop being insane. Good luck.,beenyweenies,e99nawf,democrats
"I thought ""Demercrates"" was a Greek philosopher for a second",purplishlight,e99s9tx,democrats
"If it were me, I would just not bother responding to that.",Medcait,e9a1vk0,democrats
This thread made me very happy.,kerryfinchelhillary,e993n39,democrats
Perhaps it just means Florida is full of garbage humans.,beenyweenies,e99t4a6,democrats
"The Trump enigma has been whether his racist, sexist, belligerent nationalism represents an emerging nationwide political tendency, or whether he is a sui generis figure who is able to exist outside the norms of American politics, even as his most ardent allies in government must at least nominally remain inside them. Last night’s results suggest the former.

In the longer term, the presence of a Republican governor in Florida will be a boon to the Republican nominee—presumably, Trump—in seeking Florida’s twenty-nine Electoral College votes in 2020. Elections are overseen by the secretary of state, who serves at the pleasure of the governor. Most acutely, the results mean that the idealistic, upbeat candidacy of the man who would have been Florida’s first black governor foundered on the shoals of division and racism. ",therecordcorrected,e99sclm,democrats
"Look, I think race always plays a role, but Gillum had some issues. He wasn’t a perfect candidate. ",mbkthrowaway,e9al97r,democrats
"That is what he is saying and not just Florida. Trump has managed to turn Virginia hard blue. Virginia had a black governor in 1990. Here in the urban areas and suburbs, the skunks that come at night and dig up the grub worms in our front yards to eat and spray whenever someone comes out are way more popular than Trump.",therecordcorrected,e99tg43,democrats
"Neither was Rick Scott by a long ways. Floridians that voted for him said that they voted for ""the crook."" So saying he had problems in Florida is nonsense. Florida is one of the most racist states in the country still. Last state to have a lynching? Florida. Only stopped them because it was starting to impact tourism. First state to bring back slavery after the Civil War? Florida. They made things like vagrancy a felony so they could arrest blacks and have them work for plantations that once had slaves but now they could actually work them to death. So vagrancy became a death sentence. Why were they so hot to eliminate the Seminoles even though they lived in places not fit to farm? Because they allowed escaped slaves to become members of the tribe. I am sure there are whites over 40 that are born in Florida that aren't racists that still live there. I haven't met any and that includes my relatives still there.",therecordcorrected,e9cbpte,democrats
They also elected Obama twice and repealed the racially tinged ban on ex-felon voting. We all know democrats are held to a tougher standard than Republicans when it comes to corruption. If we had run someone who did not have to answer questions about being under federal investigation they might have been able to take that race. Too much going on with this dude to say race was the only thing. ,mbkthrowaway,e9cvv7r,democrats
All he’s gonna do is ask Whittaker to recuse himself. ,usposeso,e991njm,democrats
"Unlike Trump's other daily violations of the Constitution?

Who is Schumer kidding that he would even try to do anything?  

He won't even *talk* about the crimes Trump has already committed.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e9918io,democrats
Sorry if this doesn't fit here. No clue what sub is best for something like this. ,yahtzee24,e994x0k,democrats
"I heard ""midturn""",evolutionfan,e996yu4,democrats
"100% heard mid-town when I was listening to this live earlier today, I remember being like ""this dude cannot stop thinking about Manhattan real estate.""",UnderwaterLibrarian,e99dqc4,democrats
"That entire press conference was a blame and shame game. It's pretty clear he is nervous about the Mueller investigation.

",asilverwillow,e99jg91,democrats
"For the first one? Or for the ""and \_\_\_ "" part? Also, what the heck was he supposed to be saying that made sense? ""For the \_\_\_ and \_\_\_ year"".",yahtzee24,e997v03,democrats
"I meant the first time.  I turned it off after a few minutes of shuffling through it to see if he was going to do more than expalin why it wasn't his fault etc.  It didn't appear to be going that way.  I've heard enough drivel from him, and will undoubtedly hear more, that I choose other voices once I get the gist of whatever he's peddling today.",evolutionfan,e99948p,democrats
"Christ I would certainly hope so. Kind of a big deal when the POTUS sells out the nation to a hostile foreign power to gain office, ya think?",usposeso,e98f0vv,democrats
I don’t care how far fetched it is.  Pat Roberts R-KS needs to go!!  Wish us luck in finding a viable candidate.,marmaladestripes725,e99xfvs,democrats
"I'd have to look at it more in depth to get specific, but man there's such a big opportunity to sweep into the WH again, with majorities everywhere at the federal level.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e99lv4v,democrats
"I think Maine, NC, Colorado, Iowa and Georgia are the most likely flips, in that order.  (Maybe Colorado more than NC.)",kerryfinchelhillary,e9ajfhb,democrats
🎉 🎉 ,ParkerIndustries616,e974gpq,democrats
Sayonara!,bumbiddlytake2,e9764xo,democrats
Her job ran away faster than her hairline.,Mr_Jersey,e97b8cm,democrats
HA HA!!! ,davy51x,e976ymw,democrats
Don’t let the door hit you on the way out!,Fr33zy_B3ast,e97akfc,democrats
It took this long?!,ImpossibleWonder,e97g7lw,democrats
Was it even close? I mean aside from political partisanship you still have to abide by state and federal laws as an officer of the court...surely even the GoP could see that. ,bottyliscious,e976cxf,democrats
https://vignette.wikia.nocookie.net/pbesantivirusisterrible/images/0/0c/AWW_TOO_BAD.png/revision/latest?cb=20160814003658,backpackwayne,e9747m6,democrats
"Although, she should have been shown the door after the incident.. it’s good to see she’s out now though",arianbates,e97mh1e,democrats
"Good bye, Kim. Go fuck yourself.",Cheerio13,e983o5c,democrats
"When that happened, a million clueless commenters asked “Can’t they just fire her?”

Now the people of Kentucky have done so.",CaptainJAmazing,e981iot,democrats
The best part is that she lost to the man she denied a license to.,kerryfinchelhillary,e98an7q,democrats
Body shaming?,bigbluemonkey,e98a0ea,democrats
Unfortunately there are some corrupt states out there.,rahsftw,e97iv30,democrats
This was the first time she was up for reelection since....the incident.,Druidshift,e97kk67,democrats
[removed],,e982kyd,democrats
">The best part is that she lost to the man she denied a license to.

Not exactly, that guy ran in the Democratic primary and lost.",randomaccessvagaries,e98tzpa,democrats
I didn't know a county clerk could hold office for that many years.,ImpossibleWonder,e97kxav,democrats
It was 2015 when it happened.  Seems like it was longer than that.  ,mhoner,e989acm,democrats
We have an electoral system and don’t let the large states just because they have more people decide what other states should do. ,Ismokeshatter92,e997mi7,democrats
It's like the popular and electoral vote :(,kerryfinchelhillary,e99jaol,democrats
"Yup, our current electoral system values land more than people. It ought to change.

Half of the US population lives in just 9 states, but in the Senate, for instance, 80% of the Senators represent just 20% of the population. ",bumbiddlytake2,e997u12,democrats
">one of the largest reasons for the '16 election results was the divisiveness of the Democrat party

The GOP had a very bloody primary and a large number of ""never Trumpers"" who were a drag on their race once they selected a con artist as their candidate.

Divisiveness is never good but I don't think that's what harmed Democrats the most in 2016.",wenchette,e98tp5d,democrats
"This isn't an unpopular opinion that you're giving, though I do wonder how many of the people who actually say they want unity are practicing what they preach. Many aren't saying ""we need to unite"" so much as they are really saying ""grow up progressives and be more pragmatic, or else you're complicit in everything bad ever"". But that's just it: I reject the entire premise that it IS more pragmatic to have a party platform that is so brazenly big-tent at the expense of a piercing, tangible economic message. I believe that mindset actually suppresses the tent, particularly the tent that shows up to the polls.

The problem I have is not just that moderate candidates are Republican-lite. It's that they're not actually the way to go from an electoral standpoint. The default inside-the-beltway answer always seems to be that candidates that won, won because they leaned into balance, and that candidates that lose just didn't go far enough to the right. I think that's taking the wrong lesson away from the events we've seen, and that's amplified further with national races. Sanders cleaned up in the battleground states in the primaries. Some of that was anti-Hillary, but most of it was his positions on trade and economic justice. At least in this present moment, no matter where you stand on free trade, we cannot ignore protectionism's proven political viability in the big manufacturing states.

The oft-derided ""aspirational"" candidates who can energize turnout and bring new people into the fold are important. Voter shaming doesn't work, but doing what's in our power to get people interested in voting does work.

As a last point, it's not about getting rid of old PEOPLE from politics in my mind, it's about getting rid of some specific old IDEAS. Conor Lamb is like 33. I would never want him to be our nominee for president. Sanders is pushing 80. Warren is 70. I'd take either of them over any moderate.

Despite all of this, I agree with you, by the way: the impact Trump has had is so damaging that they MUST be stopped at all costs. I urged tons of people to hold their nose and vote for Democrats this year. The issue is building a sustainable left-wing identity, one that can actually thrive post-Trump (and get rid of him 4 years sooner) instead of an incrementalist approach that has cost us 1000+ seats nationwide since Obama's election. I know you and others will disagree and I welcome that, but these conversations are worth having.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e98wemg,democrats
"I rather lose than become a spineless coward who backs the party at all costs. 

Isn’t that what we’re so offended by these republicans like Cruz doing ? ",ParkerIndustries616,e98u96u,democrats
I'm dreading that the Democratic primary in 2020 will be too crowded and there will be feuds that make 2016's look like nothing :(,kerryfinchelhillary,e993adp,democrats
[removed],,e98y6l5,democrats
"> ""never Trumpers"" who were a drag on their race once they selected a con artist as their candidate.

I'm curious as to the empirical data on this; there was a load of mud flinging among the 57 or so candidates (Only slightly exaggerating) the GOP put out in '16, plenty of nastiness exchanged, but once Trump got the nomination you still had voter turnout in '16 that was second only to '08 in highest rates since 1968. That doesn't really indicate the ""Never Trumpers"" ended up staying home on election day. ",cavscout43,e98y4gl,democrats
"You're not wrong. I appreciate the response and counter-points, believe it or not. ",cavscout43,e98wlyf,democrats
"Yeah. The Democratic Party needs to be a vehicle by which we improve the country, not something we blindly follow (not accusing anyone of that, I'm just saying we have to be careful about acting like the sole current alternative to Republicans can do no wrong).",OmarIsaiahBetts,e98wkm2,democrats
"“I rather lose”


Spoken like a true phony with little at stake.


All those migrant kids and people’s healthcare doesn’t mean shit to you, huh?

You just proved the point of the OP.

",VegaThePunisher,e98xcjs,democrats
"> Nancy Pelosi just spewed about a bunch of bipartisan nonsense.

Saw that, and I don't agree with her on that. That being said, coming out with a narrow majority and both arms flailing isn't necessarily the best bet; time to craft strategy behind the scenes rather than making empty promises. 

There's already [an extensive wish list of Democrat-desired investigations](https://www.motherjones.com/politics/2018/10/midterm-elections-democrats-investigations/) that we may start seeing as they make plans and fund the resources for them. 

You don't have to be a demagogue like Trump, and to a lesser degree Sanders, to be a strong leader. 

""Speak softly, but carry a big stick.""",cavscout43,e98yqer,democrats
"> That doesn't really indicate the ""Never Trumpers"" ended up staying home on election day.

Trump had a lot of support from older first-time voters or those who had not voted in a long time.",wenchette,e98yj44,democrats
"And for what it's worth, I agree and hope that people on all sides of this liberal infighting can be more civil about it this time. Clearly I prefer that more populist approach, but we all know that plenty of Sanders supporters and anti-Hillary people on the left did a lot to perpetuate the ""Bernie Bro"" stereotype. So I'm not just blaming moderates at all, the Bernie or Bust shit certainly had it's fair share of quasi-sexist undertones to it, we all know that.

Hopefully it's much more civil this time around, because like you said... getting rid of this garbage Trump GOP is by far the most important thing, and I never want anyone to lose sight of that.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e98x51h,democrats
"No one said the Dems can do no wrong.

That’s a horseshit strawman to excuse laziness and self-entitlement.

",VegaThePunisher,e98xg9o,democrats
"The problem I've run into is that, ironically, since highly politically motivated/educated types tend to drift more Democrat, there's far more room for nuance, ergo the infighting. 

You can rile up a large minority on the Right with single (non) issues like Target bathrooms, women's reproductive rights, scary brown immigrants, the virtually non-existent risk of Muslim terrorism within US borders, etc. 

Trying to manage the larger chunk of the population that lean Democrat is like herding cats at a level that makes the EU debates in Brussels look simple and orderly. 

You have single issue *non*-voters instead on the Left: ""But___ wasn't strong enough on single-payer/gun control/free education to be my ideal candidate, some I'm just not going to vote, or throw in a protest vote to spite them!""",cavscout43,e98xtmg,democrats
"Which is the same exact logic that these never trump guys have now that they are defending the president. The party is more important than our own beliefs so just go along with whatever. 

It must be sad to have zero integrity in your beliefs. ",ParkerIndustries616,e9910mn,democrats
"Noooooonononono. Never allow Democrats to craft policy behind the scenes. If its left up to leadership, it will be hogwash. 

Determine policy at a grassroots level by demanding it of your candidates and calling into their offices to pressure them to back the right decisions. 

Obviously there will be specifics worked out in the background, but for the love of god the policy argument NEEDS to be public, as it was and qill continue to be with Medicare for all. 

I wish there was more of this in the obama years and maybe we wouldnt be trying to fix a Republican health plan. ",AutobahnVismarck,e98z07t,democrats
"Fair point, had forgotten about that. ",cavscout43,e98yx18,democrats
"No one says it outright of course, but it seems to me that it's baked into the mindset of some people.

I don't excuse the laziness of non-voters. In fact my blood was fucking BOILING yesterday as I talked to people who had no plans on voting, with the polling booth minutes from where they live. Millennials AND non-millennials alike. I simply think that giving up on them or shaming them is an ineffective approach. We need even the laziest and the most self-entitled to get off their asses and vote if we're going to consistently win elections.

As frustrating as it is trying to reach some people, we can't just throw in the towel and say they're all hopeless. I don't think that's true. And we need to find ways to ignite them and make them become passionate about their own futures, however we can accomplish it.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e98xtet,democrats
"Stop projecting, please.

The party is supposed to be a reflection of our beliefs.

That is, when we are not lazy and self-entitled.

So yeah, if you walk away from caring about healthcare because someone hurt your feels because they said vote Democrat, then maybe healthcare isn’t as important to you as your ego is. 

",VegaThePunisher,e992cgg,democrats
"With this current leadership, at least. ",AutobahnVismarck,e98ziox,democrats
"Can’t baby them either.

We need to coalesce around one party and yes vote for it, even if they are not meeting all of our demands or specific policy demands.

All of this talk about “corporate” Dems sounds just absolutely stupid. 

",VegaThePunisher,e98xzte,democrats
"Literally no one is saying that. We’re saying that there is room for debate and differing views in our party, and that if you’re just voting to tell people you’re a democrat they you’re no better than Ted Cruz who thinks he’s doing the best thing for his party by being a sheep to trump. It’s the opposite of democracy to tell people they’re right for voting who they want to. It’s what we’re suppose to be saving. 

It’s almost like you should have your own thoughts and beliefs and find a party and people who support them as opposed to picking a party and working backwards 🤔",ParkerIndustries616,e993dy7,democrats
"I get why you and others hate when progressives talk about ""purging corporatists"" (or establishment shills, or the other ones lol), because sometimes it feels like people who spend so much time on that are missing another huge point: that the Republicans are far worse, no matter how true I believe the corporate Democrat label is. 

I hate the false equivalencies often drawn by people, where they'll say the Dems and Reps are the same. Not even close. On so many issues, Democrats are better. People do need to understand that in order to have a serious convo about any of this.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e98z3e2,democrats
"No one said any of that, so you just pulled at least two strawmen out of your ass.

What we are saying is that Bernie Broism  is gone. There is no “or bust”.

Anyone who takes that view is an egoist. Not progressive. 

",VegaThePunisher,e995b6z,democrats
"Yes, most Americans work for corporations.

So when I hear any progressive speak like that, it automatically sounds absolutely stupid.

And Bernie is one of the most established politicians in US History. 

So whenever someone refers to Bernie as not establishment, again it sounds absolutely stupid.",VegaThePunisher,e98zoak,democrats
"Clearly there’s no way to be a democrat unless you sign off on it first and you tell us who were allowed to vote for. 

I’m sure trump approves. Be proud. ",ParkerIndustries616,e9990ro,democrats
Wow you have a lot of room in your ass for all those strawmen. 🤣 ,VegaThePunisher,e99932f,democrats
I’m starting to suspect you don’t know what strawman means. ,ParkerIndustries616,e99q440,democrats
Keep trying. ,VegaThePunisher,e99q6pd,democrats
Trying to teach you what strawman means ? ,ParkerIndustries616,e99r0uw,democrats
dance,VegaThePunisher,e99rnsu,democrats
"A. There are reasons that companies move to these areas. Infrastructure, educated workforce, and the ability to recruit new people. 

Demand drives prices up and people want to move to cities. 

B. The gop will give away millions to any company that wants to move to a red state. If that's not enough incentive, I don't know what we could do. 

C. Those cities are moving more liberal and are attracting more people, but one city doesn't change a whole state. Atlanta is growing, but the gop keeps winning.

D. If these companies move to those areas the gop will IMMEDIATELY take credit and say ""we did it, look at those bad liberals that couldn't!"" And zero people will care if you say ""well we supported it too!"" 

And then they will go and cut more taxes and weaken infrastructure and education. 

E. So... what's the solution? I don't know. Red states don seem to care that they have to give away millions to get even small, low wage factories to move to their areas. 

Edit: to add... how is this good for my and san fran? Fewer jobs? Less demand? I'm not seeing the appeal? ",Gsteel11,e9ao59s,democrats
">  So... what's the solution? I don't know.

Exactly.... you have no solution. The Democrats picked up at least one House seat and maybe two in the Atlanta suburbs on Tuesday. Colorado, Nevada, and Virginia prove that entire states can turn blue when they economically thrive. ",gadgetcool5,e9av1p3,democrats
"Didn't stay in the lines, throw it out. - Texas probably",rellimeel9,e95rdin,democrats
"Careful, what you did is illegal in Texas. ""persons are not allowed to use wireless communications devices within 100 feet of the voting stations. Additionally, persons are not allowed to use mechanical or electronic devices to record sound or images within 100 feet of the voting stations."" [Statute](https://www.sos.state.tx.us/elections/laws/advisory2018-11.shtml)",jvlpdillon,e95u5c0,democrats
Taking a photo of your vote is illegal.,dan_kase,e95whmr,democrats
"Now that results are coming in, this post just makes me sad...",EternalSeraphim,e97eoy9,democrats
Very best of luck from the UK :),BelleAriel,e95r8nb,democrats
Sorry friend. You did your part.,sleuth0,e97k5yv,democrats
Go Texas! - Get rid of that cancerous piece a crap.,backpackwayne,e95pq2u,democrats
"Good luck America. 
🇨🇦 ",lord-derricicus,e964zxv,democrats
Fuck Ted Cruz all the way from Maryland. ,_derx,e95xrau,democrats
Rip,SheeplessLord,e97i27f,democrats
"Hey this is illegal, be careful",apollo4567,e969xi3,democrats
Go beto!! ,kebifc9,e95wlf0,democrats
Ooooo. Beto luck next time hahahaha,Nova8404,e97mfd0,democrats
"Good luck, former tx24 ready to see Marchant on his ass. ",keyree,e962jmk,democrats
"I can't remember for sure, but isn't there some law against taking a picture of your ballot?",PTMoney18,e95w330,democrats
Great to see from Arizona ,walter1950,e95xtst,democrats
"You anti Neil Dikeman bastard!!!
/s",zetaphi938,e96m90a,democrats
AWESOME!!!!!!,nasatveng,e96os6v,democrats
Illegal?? They could never prosecute this. If they tried the story would be about them wasting money. ,McGician,e96rhnw,democrats
"Wishing you good luck, from New York!",SweetHollow,e96sfs5,democrats
The way you fill in your bubble makes me want to vomit ,ForgotPasswordAgain-,e96vhap,democrats
Maybe next time.,darkwatersinking,e97cbub,democrats
"Why is it translated to Spanish? Are there people who can vote that dont speak English? Wtf? (I'm from Europe, never set foot on USA) ",Lezonidas,e97v22s,democrats
On my ballot there was one state office contested between a Republican and a libertarian. I left that one blank. ,mbkthrowaway,e95qvhr,democrats
"👏👏👏👏👏
👍👍👍👍👍",red_carpet_hero,e95rtt8,democrats
you arent supposed to take pictures in the booth ,MrBobBuilder,e96bryr,democrats
f,ZeusTheMooose,e97h1gd,democrats
You did good man. Wish the outcome was different.,sexwaffle,e97k22s,democrats
I voted Straight D bitches,sparky76016,e95vr82,democrats
Fuck Ted Cruz - NYC ,Asking4Afren,e96h8h8,democrats
So jelly I wish I could vote for him,minininjatriforceman,e963spg,democrats
now i’m sad :((,kalive7,e97l5b6,democrats
Why are republican candidates always listed 1st? Democratic is first alphabetically. Seems like someone probably shelled out to make sure the first name read in each section would be a Republican's.,Elfzwolf179,e96c9xk,democrats
You answered wrong ,itsabuttplug,e9794xi,democrats
"I plan on voting beto! I’m a student at Texas State University! I have class in 30 minutes and I plan on voting after!!! I plan on voting Beto, Kling  because after college I want to run my own dispensary and save lives, and I would love to do it in literally the best state ever! (Besides you know the shootings and how conservative they are, it’s great besides that! ) this will be my first time voting!!! 
",madventures1,e966r9z,democrats
Fuck Ted Cruz- MI,mobeyg,e96idvo,democrats
Ted winning so far! Let's gooo,kolosaire,e97cjf3,democrats
For a split second there I though that said Neil McDickman and almost burst out laughing,Recovery15,e96v0jk,democrats
Did you really take a picture of your votes,TheEvyEv,e96wedd,democrats
You must live in my parents district if you voted for Jan,DakThatAssUp,e97iyzs,democrats
Well that didn’t work out ,pilotmtb,e98qdks,democrats
You lost 😥,Ismokeshatter92,e997knp,democrats
"Ha, he lost.",levyachevy,e97ig52,democrats
 Dont think ur suppose to post ur ballot my dude,Poopsmith89,e966chw,democrats
Did that this morning!! Beto!!!,Ikoikobythefio,e96ckpv,democrats
Thank god Cruz won,Jayttt98,e97o74c,democrats
This is illegal fyi,cgiall420,e966cnp,democrats
You must be terrible with coloring books.,powerbrows,e96hb3c,democrats
WOMP WOMP THANK GOD YOU LOST,Solis-Maelstrom,e98202k,democrats
Losers ,peterhitchcock,e97te7t,democrats
"Any mark more than .2 mm outside of the oval will be counted as a vote for Cruz!

&#x200B;

\- Texas Republicans controlling the vote tallies, probably",mvarnado,e96cn65,democrats
[deleted],,e96u0mu,democrats
Does he really have a chance? I've heard he's a super longshot.,Insipid_Pedantry,e95wj6f,democrats
"Howdy, neighbor. I also voted in the 24th. ",strikeout34,e96gufg,democrats
"I’m no Texas voter, but I’m really hoping he wins today. Best of luck to your state, my dude.",evanibble,e96npxh,democrats
6 years since last vote. Beto al the way!,Icrows,e96onnz,democrats
"Do not photograph in the polling place. It is a violation of state law. They WILL arrest you. I saw police step in when a voter got belligerent when verbally corrected by the polling staff. 


Also, thank you for not voting straight ticket. We have some very bad candidate for judge from the Democrat party this year. Please do your research. People with a couple years of law experience wanting to fast-track into being an (incompetent judge). Even one of the Texas Supreme Court nominees was a little... green. 

Go research and go vote. ",Machismo01,e9603jp,democrats
SLAY! I voted early but I've seen so many BETO voters turn out today! ,fatamyy,e96iu6q,democrats
"Fuck the Libertarian Party, they only take votes from either party. They need to merge with the green party and make an attempt at a strong 3rd party. We could call the the Green Looney Party (Silly Party).

/r/unexpectedMontyPython 

BTW, good luck in TX. I've got a Republican nephew (and grand nieces) living there and they need to live in a state with a Senator that isn't a lizard person.",SquirrelHumper,e970wue,democrats
what is ip with thpse three choices at the top?  Is that voting straight party? That’s an option?,fluffykerfuffle1,e967435,democrats
"You would let your grandma pick your clothes out for you, go vote so someone that doesn’t represent you and your values gets elected!",lookingforsome1,e96vsi1,democrats
I’m not from Texas but Beto is your man ...Ted is a wet dish rag.,OldGrayMare59,e96wbwm,democrats
"I'm not Texan so I wasn't paying any attention to Beto O'Rourke but I read his Wikipedia page and positions last night and now I want him to Beto my Meato

In all seriousness, I think he'd be really good for Texas.",nowaitstop_,e96y26w,democrats
"I’m curious as to why you have a paper ballot. I’ve voted since 2004 in almost every election (avoided some primary run-offs because I didn’t like either candidate) and have never had a paper ballot in Texas. 

Was this a provisional ballot?",QueenOfTheQuokkas,e97dw2d,democrats
[removed],,e95wkg9,democrats
For Beto or worse. ,erikgratz110,e968ep7,democrats
"If only ""owning the libs"" referred to the asshole Libertarians like it would look on that ballot. ",LukariBRo,e96bgfx,democrats
Why do you have to identify your political party on a ballot in Texas? ,RicoMexico88,e96l2td,democrats
How'd it go for BETO,VesemirsPotionsNLean,e998q0q,democrats
[removed],,e95yzk9,democrats
Do they have ballots with symbols?  What happens with people who can't read?  Party symbols make the candidates easier to identify. ,Tamarindo66,e96ow70,democrats
"You have no idea how worried I was about that. I spent like 20 minutes filling out my ballot, carefully staying within the ovals.",doubleohbond,e95yvdi,democrats
"Oh yea!  Here in MD it basically says if the oval isn’t filled out completely or if it goes over the oval line there is a chance it won’t be read.

I spent time carefully darkening in my oval but a few weren’t perfect.

It’s utterly absurd when you think about it, it’s 2018 and we are still doing arts and crafts to vote hoping our project doesn’t get rejected by a machine or a bureaucrat. ",Atbd23,e96qiwa,democrats
"It was hard for me

I'm a really tall man and the booth was so low. It was uncomfortable to bend over all the way and fill in so many bubbles. There were probably like 40 

I did the best I could. I hope my vote still counts. ",BriceF4llen,e96d61b,democrats
Came here to say that.,ChipAyten,e96ev3a,democrats
Good ole liberal victimhood,Jayttt98,e97o6kp,democrats
https://xkcd.com/2066/  there's always one.,tlivingd,e95vcvv,democrats
Report this post to the Secretary of State and tell his office to bring charges,BriceF4llen,e95u9ic,democrats
"I was not aware of this law, and there was no signage of any kind at the polls. A friend called me while I was checking boxes and after about two minutes of talking, I hear someone yell ""SIR!"" from the volunteer table. It makes sense, but this rule never even crossed my mind before. ",Rho__Delta,e9688js,democrats
*artists rendition,tooours,e96hgod,democrats
I was just thinking this. Turn you devices off when voting. Also no political clothing,beerfist,e95virz,democrats
"I'd like to see a jury of 12 convict someone of that. Everyone uses their phone for a selfie, or to look up more info on a candidate, etc.",ChipAyten,e96f077,democrats
I just found this out!,BriceF4llen,e95x7bz,democrats
Not everywhere it isn't. In Texas however it appears to be.,BigTulsa,e95xev5,democrats
Snitch then ,ChipAyten,e96f3fw,democrats
Good luck from nottingham uk xx,Raincloud09,e95wtw3,democrats
which one??,cardgrad09,e963w7v,democrats
"Oklahoma here! Rooting for Beto!  Cruz is evil vile scum! GO BETO, GO BETO, GO BETO!!",OkieGuy89,e96iiru,democrats
Chiming in from Colorado- Ted Cruz can go fuck himself! Good luck Texas! We're rooting for you and BETO. ,alsoaprettybigdeal,e965p60,democrats
Indiana too,TVK777,e95zlgn,democrats
And Ohio!,packerrn,e95zzxs,democrats
TN HERE! FUCK TED,slackwaresupport,e964suc,democrats
You mean Granpa Munster! His nose is melting into his chin. Lying ass Raphael Eduardo Cruz from Canada!,ffafayfaytfayth,e96b676,democrats
And michigan,Lucifer_Sam_Cyan_Cat,e964pgo,democrats
Florida too. were doing our own ass kicking in here. TURN FLORIDA BLUE..,Under_theTable_cAt,e96nwl9,democrats
Go Dikeman ,fishy_commishy,e96164u,democrats
[removed],,e96uuug,democrats
I didn't know. But I learned that today,BriceF4llen,e96a00a,democrats
Today is the day,BriceF4llen,e962mez,democrats
Apparently,BriceF4llen,e95w3x3,democrats
"[It's legal in about half of the states, ambiguous in a few, and outright illegal in the others.](https://www.washingtonpost.com/technology/2018/11/06/is-your-ballot-selfie-illegal-maybe/)",wenchette,e95y0vl,democrats
Whoops,BriceF4llen,e96ma88,democrats
"I voted for the libertarian. Not because I agree, but because anything that can be done to take a vote away from a Republican is worth doing. ",BriceF4llen,e95qyve,democrats
[removed],,e95sw8v,democrats
I didn't know. but today I learned,BriceF4llen,e96deob,democrats
"Same, but there were rumors that just filling in the ""straight D"" bubble was causing a glitch to choose Ted Cruz...so I filled in every single one of those Democratic bubbles myself. No vote for Cruz from me, glitch or no glitch!",jacquelynjoy,e967s3n,democrats
"Not to be contentious, but the ability to vote based on party is part of what has made the political climate so contentious. Granted you probably did the research, but I know way too many people who don’t care what the candidate represents, as long as they have the R or D next to their name on the ballot. Honestly I think just taking that off the ballots would make elections a lot better, and force people to vote based on a person’s merits, and qualifications. Just a thought. ",jaredwads,e95zelk,democrats
"We agree - Dallas

",BriceF4llen,e96hrbm,democrats
"We spent our heart and soul on this race.

And for good reason. Our guy still made his mark. He proved that the Red Wall in Texas is within striking distance and that it could be breached.

Today just wasn't the day we thought it might be.

So tonight, we celebrate our House victories. We celebrate all the chairmanships and legislative victories that will tfollow.

But we morn the gains we should have made in the Senate
",BriceF4llen,e97lpm9,democrats
I was wondering. Maybe alphabetical by last name? Who are we kidding they probably always list Repubs first. Can anyone from Texas confirm,ciendegrados,e97964v,democrats
"Good work!

And we're happy to have an extra voter participating in the democratic process. Every vote counts. ",BriceF4llen,e966vaa,democrats
Concur,BriceF4llen,e96lwap,democrats
Hmmm. What do you think? Hmmmmm,jrbanks3,e96xrxz,democrats
I didn't know,BriceF4llen,e966g1g,democrats
Today is the day,BriceF4llen,e96ddyk,democrats
I didn't know,BriceF4llen,e966gkj,democrats
"Well...

You're not wrong

Think it'll still count? ",BriceF4llen,e96hf1d,democrats
"It was hard for me... I'm a REALLY tall man and the booth was so low. 

It hurt to bend over all the way so I did the best I could. I hope my vote still counts. ",BriceF4llen,e96d2de,democrats
I'll take the karma it attracts. I'm a newer Redditor so I need the boost 😁,BriceF4llen,e96u5ha,democrats
There's room in the math for a surprise ,BriceF4llen,e95wk5b,democrats
"That's what people said about Trump, don't give up",Darkbyte,e95yi7y,democrats
"There is a lot of speculation that turnout is going to be way different from what traditional polling looks like (i.e. lots of turnout not only amongst young millenials but first time Gen Z voters, which is unheard of in midterms). So, yeah, there is a good chance at an upset. Still trying to brace myself, but...",Great-Egret,e95xnei,democrats
"538 has him at around 20% last I checked. Not great odds, but certainly not enough to call it for Cruz.",sjsr99,e96gbut,democrats
The polls said Ralph Northam was up by one point in Virginia last year and he ended up winning by nine.  The same thing happened with several special elections.  It's hard to estimate the result of an election when the pollsters don't know who's going to show up.  Anything can happen.,megs1120,e96k54q,democrats
Today is the day my friend,BriceF4llen,e96hc72,democrats
"Today is the day

Change is in the air",BriceF4llen,e96nrwr,democrats
I just learned this,BriceF4llen,e9604dh,democrats
Today is the day ,BriceF4llen,e96ivd9,democrats
"Jill Stein is a green party member and Libetarians are more aligned with the republican party (well, the old one before tea party, trump and a few people them hijacked it.)",Fire2box,e9768se,democrats
"Yes. If you choose to vote straight party, in Texas you can just fill in one of those bubbles. 

I'm pretty sure this is the last year we're doing this though",BriceF4llen,e967ebg,democrats
"It's not a felony, it's not even a misdemeanor:
https://statutes.capitol.texas.gov/Docs/EL/htm/EL.61.htm

See ""Sec. 61.014""

>The presiding judge may require a person who violates this section to turn off the device or to leave the polling place.

That's the punishment",Darkbyte,e95z6k9,democrats
You're only the third person to comment this. Very informative. OP has commented he was unaware.,Brendan_f18,e95yb6t,democrats
To be clear taking a photo of your ballot is legal in some states. However in Texas it appears you are correct. ,BigTulsa,e95xczd,democrats
I pick BETO!,BriceF4llen,e968ohd,democrats
"What do you mean? 

The 3 bubbles on the top are for straight party ballot options. 

So instead of filling out 40 bubbles like I did, you only fill out 1.",BriceF4llen,e96lut3,democrats
It’s optional for those who want to just vote the entire ticket.,evanibble,e96nn0y,democrats
I didn't know. But if they really want to come after me they can be my guest ,BriceF4llen,e960zbp,democrats
"I feel like we should be able to put our own ballots through the scantron machine and then e-sign it that the votes are recorded correctly. Then we should be able to submit the paper copy for the paper trail and keep a copy for our own records. 

&#x200B;

Seriously- there's more security around turning in an exam for school than there is for voting.",alsoaprettybigdeal,e965yzj,democrats
Yo didn't fill the entire oval. Denied...,romons,e96pxna,democrats
Seriously. Why risk having your vote thrown out by coloring the bubble sloppily. This is dumb on OP,neuropat,e96025u,democrats
The law is there for a good reason though. Why buy someone’s vote if you can’t prove the cast it how you wanted? ,A_Hendo,e95v1ar,democrats
*ooooooooooo*,brujablanca,e96dvf8,democrats
Let’s just find the one that voted for beto and jan! Gotem!,ExpectedErrorCode,e95wi7t,democrats
[removed],,e95wr3l,democrats
"There’s good reason to protect our elections from vote buying. History is replete with example of democracies learning the hard way that failing to protect he secret ballot harms election integrity. 

For once, it’s time to stop assuming everything you don’t like is stupid or poorly thought out. When voting, put the fucking phone away. ",NeibuhrsWarning,e96ql2a,democrats
"Don't worry it's not actually illegal:

 https://statutes.capitol.texas.gov/Docs/EL/htm/EL.61.htm

See ""Sec. 61.014""

>The presiding judge may require a person who violates this section to turn off the device or to leave the polling place.

That's the punishment.  I take it you're already left so the most that's going to happen is to tell you to double leave.",Darkbyte,e95zbpa,democrats
Of course they don't want you to have any proof of who you voted for.,TVK777,e95zjy9,democrats
Snitches get stitches,dan_kase,e96h8p6,democrats
Just moved back to the states from Nottingham! Just in time to vote!,BigShlongKong,e96cr29,democrats
Vote Mike Collier for LG as well!,portrayaloflife,e95z2bq,democrats
Yes. ,sadcoffee,e97bl6q,democrats
And My Axeio,ChipAyten,e96f4sm,democrats
"Hi, Ohio here again!",katkoa4,e96p0mp,democrats
Fuck you from Washington 😘,pm_ur_dna,e96xm6w,democrats
"No worries, hope you didn’t get in trouble! But thanks for your vote regardless!",apollo4567,e96a9rc,democrats
Huh. Cool. ,PTMoney18,e95w5as,democrats
"An actually reasonable reason to vote libertarian, that’s great ",GateNerd,e95tnkf,democrats
The government is beholden to the electorate unlike private firms. I know the old libertarian schtick “you get to choose which companies you deal with” which simply isn’t the case in so many real world situations.  ,ThirdMostAverage,e961as2,democrats
“I filled in every one of those Democratic bubbles myself” we got a hero here,sparky76016,e9680ho,democrats
"Not really. By having people identify with a party, it doesn’t force people to find out what their beliefs are. By knowing some dude has an R next to their name you know that they have a strong immigration stance, believes in lower taxes, and want less regulations on businesses.
It allows for a smoother environment. If a parties beliefs negatively impacts you, voting straight party helps, giving the voter more information is not a bad idea.

Democratic Party beliefs are what I believe in, so I voted for democratic candidates.",sparky76016,e96251h,democrats
"absolutely right. that race was so close. we’ll learn from our mistakes, campaign harder, and win more seats next time. we might be disappointed, but we should never be discouraged",kalive7,e97lxns,democrats
"No it’s not, Beto spent the most money in the history of senate races and still couldn’t win. Not to mention Abbot won by 1.1 million votes. ",StalinsBFF,e980iz6,democrats
"I don't think it is. This isn't a picture of someone voting or shows proof of who someone voted for, which is what such laws are in place to prevent in order to protect voters. It is in some states, though, and worth checking on. Enforcing anything regarding this photo is next to impossible so you probably have nothing to worry about. ",LukariBRo,e96bld7,democrats
"It'll count, they'll just shake their head in disapproval at your complete lack of respect for that bubble.",powerbrows,e96i1n1,democrats
I hope so. Cruz is such a wart.,Insipid_Pedantry,e95xdh6,democrats
Sure but Texas is a pretty fucking RED state. Just like NY is pretty BLUE.,Insipid_Pedantry,e96qf6r,democrats
I can't believe we'll know within like 8 hours!!!,fatamyy,e96ix0n,democrats
Seems like such an easy thing to abuse.,fluffykerfuffle1,e96a17j,democrats
/s,Brendan_f18,e95z1a1,democrats
I have never heard of that. I live in Illinois so that's not a thing.  ,RicoMexico88,e96nu8x,democrats
"Everything you said was good, EXCEPT the copy for you. That is how old old school voter suppression happens, ""prove you voted for Bob or you're fired!"". A receipt confirming you voted would be fine. But elections have to remain anonymous",Chief_Admiral,e96gbg2,democrats
"> and keep a copy for our own records.

Went off the rails here. Proof of your vote enables vote buying. And history tells us every single time we enable vote buying it happens. The secret ballot is a bedrock of democracy, and we all need to brush up on our history to recognize why it’s so vital, because waaaaay too many young people are ignoring it. ",NeibuhrsWarning,e96p1df,democrats
That’s what we do in MD at least the scantron part,JaggerQ,e977r0m,democrats
"Here in Michigan we have a machine you enter the paper in, and it says once it’s done something in the lines of your vote being collected ",Vittorio47,e97lqwr,democrats
There is probably more cheating at school... At least on the part of voters,romons,e96q0jj,democrats
"Well, I think the point should be that states should be able to accept a sloppily colored-in bubble, as long as the voter’s intent was clear, even if machines can’t read it on first try. Some people might not be physically capable to do it perfectly (people with palsies, missing limbs, etc.). To expect everyone to do it without error would be disenfranchising to those people.  ",phonusQ,e963gym,democrats
Your country is fucked up if this is risking a no-vote. ,BinMonkey,e977f5u,democrats
"The problem is way overstated. Voter fraud like that is so insignificant. Oregon votes by mail, yet coercion and vote buying simply isn't a problem. Someone trying to buy an election is going to need to bribe hundreds of people and at least some of those are going to refuse and report it. It only takes one person to report it to directly prosecute someone giving a bribe. Yet there is the very real reality of people not being able to take enough time off work to spend hours in line, gerrymandering, and other forms of election fraud. It's a solution looking for a problem when there are real problems which need to be delt with.",IAmRoot,e960ht3,democrats
"How is it fair that corporations and the rich can buy votes from politicians, but the rest of us can’t buy votes from other people. /s (slightly)",GateNerd,e96780p,democrats
What’s that good reason?,315ante_meridiem,e95ywh2,democrats
"Election fraud is fraud committed by the people *running* the election.  You'd want to report this to a *voter* fraud hotline if anything, though I'm not sure that even applies",Darkbyte,e95yfjs,democrats
Is this fraud?,mothersuckel,e95y9qs,democrats
"Nah, they’ll just send OP a letter saying to turn off their phone ",_Noah271,e97fyy3,democrats
Exactly. Because that leads to vote buying. And vote buying/coercion is bad. Read your history. ,NeibuhrsWarning,e96qz9j,democrats
Mad im from arnold.,Raincloud09,e96ph6m,democrats
😏😏😏,SoPittedBro,e96zw95,democrats
Wondervoter! :P,jacquelynjoy,e968pdw,democrats
"For the most part I agree, and it is definitely a convenience thing. but I would argue that we shouldn’t vote for people we only know the political affiliation of. most people don’t align 100% with their political party, and this hides the misalignment. 

The main reason I don't like it though is that it encourages uninformed voting. Which is part of the reason we have the circus of a government we have today. I shouldn't be able to ""run the ticket"" I should have to know something about the people I'm voting for.  We can't just blindly trust that because they're in my party that means they're the best person for the job. I grew up in a deep republican state, and I still remember an election for superintendent we had. The democrat had been superintendent for many years elsewhere, had been a principal and teacher for most of his life. He was well educated, and as far as I could tell hadn't really done anything that Republicans disagreed with. Meanwhile the republican candidate had no previous experience. Yet he won. 

We can't simultaneously vote only along party lines and always choose the best individual for the position. Sometimes the republican is the right choice other times the Democrat is better, and other times its the third party candidate. Blindly following a party only serves to breed hatred and an us vs them policy. Again I'm not saying you should never only vote for members of a single party, if they're objectively better by all means please vote for them. I'm simply asking that we put more thought into our voting and allowing people to mark one bubble that Blindly votes for all members of one party (or the equivalent, putting a letter next to their name) allows voting to be casual and thoughtless. ",jaredwads,e96a743,democrats
Fair enough,BriceF4llen,e96ifdz,democrats
So was Virginia.,megs1120,e96qt7x,democrats
"Good point. I was just thinking that if there was a recount that people could prove who they voted for if the numbers were off, but I wasn’t thinking about voter bullying. ",alsoaprettybigdeal,e97lien,democrats
Ah but voting was never about fairness....,WeRtheBork,e963rus,democrats
I doubt Texas makes that accommodation. Just fucking do it right if you can- this shit is too important to make a statement about how life is so unfair. ,neuropat,e966jfd,democrats
"It is fucked up but you know, machines read these things. We have more than 10 fucking people voting you know. ",neuropat,e977ize,democrats
"Stop. History has demonstrated any time you enable vote buying, it occurs. Mail in voting isn’t great for vote buying because you can’t lrove you turned that ballot in.  But democracies around the world have learned the hard way that vote buying is a real problem when you enable it. Stop spreading misinformation, and support effort to dissuade such practices. ",NeibuhrsWarning,e96plmp,democrats
They voted Democrat in a republican state,astroboy1997,e95z2lk,democrats
"Yeah in the last election (maybe it was the primaries actually? I think it was the primaries for the 2016 one) I noticed there were a couple of people running as Republicans who had switched from Democrat to Republican like very before the primaries . It was in some of the lower state positions I think? 

There's some weird juggling/jogging around that goes on in politics that ya have to pay attention to. 

There was one especially obvious one; I can't recall their name, who had switched parties apparently to edge out someone. Wish I could remember. Your comment jogged my memory. ",Zoot-just_zoot,e96g89n,democrats
"Yes but superintendent is NOT a political position. I agree, completely, nonpartisan elections should be the norm for jobs that have no political impact.
But for political positions, that R or D is massively important .",sparky76016,e96dfvs,democrats
I know right. How dare they not consider all 11 of us. ,beer_n_britts,e97gmtk,democrats
Human counts are not difficult feats and allow greater transparency. ,PirateMud,e991evx,democrats
"So with there being more than 10 people the risk of an obvious vote being read as a no-vote decreases? You clearly love your country, although your point is anything but clear. Can you elaborate?",BinMonkey,e99grd1,democrats
"Places and times where vote buying happens didn't do a good job of prosecuting people offering to buy votes. In places like Oregon, vote buyers could just have people video themselves dropping the ballot in a ballot box. They don't because they'd be easily prosecuted.

Meanwhile, thousands of people are disenfranchised because of scaremongering about voter fraud when election fraud is the real problem.",IAmRoot,e96qudl,democrats
"\> Mail in voting isn’t great for vote buying because you can’t prove you turned that ballot in

They could literally buy your ballot and drop it off for you.  They could watch you put it into the mailbox at the point of pay or coercion.  It's mail, not magic.

&#x200B;

I was with you till you hand-waved mail-in ballots away.  If vote buying was such a huge and looming problem why isn't it happening in OR/WA?",camgnostic,e974ggr,democrats
"Ya, it's pretty crazy. 

a lot of third party candidates also switch parties to run under one of the big parties all because people care too much about what party is listed next to their name rather than their actual beliefs",jaredwads,e96isbp,democrats
"So all rebublicans should vote trump in the 2020 election simply because he has a R next to his name? Or Ted Cruz in this one? Just because a candidate is from the political party I subscribe to, that doesn't mean that the opponent isn't a better choice. ",jaredwads,e96fnnq,democrats
"Pretty simple. Machine reads votes. Idiot colors outside the line, causing machine error, backwards state says “doesn’t count.” Could also be Georgia where the guy counting the votes is the guy running. Point is- why risk it. How hard is it to color in the fucking line. This is like kindergarden 101.",neuropat,e99gvmz,democrats
"They already do. 90% of republicans support trump.
Yes, they would do the same with Ted Cruz.
You’re right, but “better choice” is subjective.
For republicans, social issues have to be big issues, like guns and abortion etc.
So they will vote in candidates that exemplify these issues.
",sparky76016,e96fw6h,democrats
"So did my 93 year old mother in law, she voted against Trump and today she voted  Democratic for congress. ",walter1950,e96tj5i,democrats
Care to tell us why?,beenyweenies,e96sqng,democrats
Thank you! We got the House!,pasarina,e97i9nm,democrats
"Welcome to the team. I hope you find it more to your taste. We are a squabbling, eclectic bunch but we have room for everyone.",mmsood99,e97gjrw,democrats
👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼,n00b1990,e96savd,democrats
Welcome to humanity! Thank you for voting!,sirjamesbond,e96rkh6,democrats
Me too,TheNightOwl,e97bkhz,democrats
"I would love for my mother to experience this change! She divorced my father and destroyed my family. She did so much damage that I would rather pretend she’s dead than that she actually did what she did. To make it worse, she thought I was a “dumb millennial child” for voting against trump. She has always been an angry and hostile person and I attribute it to the fact that she has watched FOX religiously since before I was born.

Please, tell me what secrets brought you to this realization so I can help my mother become a kind person again. Because all I can see her as now is as the woman who voted a rapist to lead the country her daughter resides in. She voted in a climate change denier in a time where my generation will be one of the last on earth at this rate. It makes me sad",Lahrboy,e97v3yw,democrats
"I feel you.

I live in a Conservative community and despite our political differences I respect their opinions and views on things, but Trump was a bridge too far.

Trump brought out the absolute worst in the people who harbored silent, extreme views. He created a lot of problems. There are people I am afraid to talk to about politics because of Trump specifically. Trump has pretty much taught people that ""if they don't agree with you, threaten them."" He's never disavowed it.

He's still creating problems even now, and some communities will never be the same because of the old wounds he's opened up. I hope we can live in an America where we're not at each other's throats all the time.

It's just wrong.",RadioMelon,e97urul,democrats
I guess it's never too late to become a decent human being.  Just don't pat yourself on the back too much.,hackel,e97eiu4,democrats
Welcome aboard! How's it feel to start with a strong win? ,ADirtyThrowaway1,e97o240,democrats
It’s true! Little by little. Paso a paso. America got some creeps out of the house and senate. No easy feat in Texas. I’m proud of our effort.,pasarina,e988u0a,democrats
So you voted for trump.... voting democrat now is the least you could do.,jayhawx86,e97s4yw,democrats
"Yes. I realize a large portion of the party I thought I knew has been either hijacked by racist nationalists or it was that all along and has been thinly veiled. When I saw how so many was going nuts for Trump a couple years ago I was standing back with my jaw open in disbelief. So many people I thought I knew finally had an out let for their racism and biases and call me blind but I was floored. Honestly, I’m angry! Especially after the last two years I don’t see how any rational thinking person can’t see the GOP for what it really is. ",LivingWithEyesClosed,e96thx0,democrats
"A step in the right direction, for sure!",Karithea,e97lsha,democrats
"Both my parents were lifelong republicans. This is not the republican party I grew up knowing. I went from independent to Democrat under this President/Congress. I used to say to myself ""I'll vote for the better candidate regardless of Party."" I'm done with that, the Republican party is a cancer in our society, and voting D down the whole ticket is the only way to put it in remission.",cerebralspinaldruid,e96yhkd,democrats
It's ok to be angry when the situation dictates it. Recent history seems to suggest now is the time.,angryvetguy,e96u35d,democrats
"Congratulations on admitting your mistake it takes a big person to do that, it's nice to see not everyone is crazy and has to double down on the crazy instead of being sensible and admitting they voted for the wrong person",Jimbojauder,e96yzr9,democrats
"I hear you. I was shocked as hell to see people in my own family circle embrace Trump for these reasons. 

I will say this, probably better that this all get out in the open where we can see it for what it is, rather than hiding in the shadows. The question is, what now? You can't shout down racism. We need to figure out how to heal this madness.",beenyweenies,e96xd73,democrats
"Same here. Raised truly supporting the republican party, and I didn't wanna stop. I wanted to believe trump was just a fluke, but with how it's been going, the GOP of balanced budgets, convention, dignity, respect, and the GOP that worked with Bill Clinton to make a great time for our history, that's truly dead now. Idk if it can be resuscitated. ",WheresSmokey,e987jb2,democrats
"Some trump loving racist sent me this today. I literally broke down - they’re using terror tactics.

Almost 4 million jobs created since election.

More Americans are now employed than ever recorded before in our history.

created more than 400,000 manufacturing jobs since his election.

Manufacturing jobs growing at the fastest rate in more than THREE DECADES.

Economic growth last quarter hit 4.2 percent.

New unemployment claims recently hit a 49-year low.

Median household income has hit highest level ever recorded.

African-American unemployment has recently achieved the lowest rate ever recorded.

Hispanic-American unemployment is at the lowest rate ever recorded.

Asian-American unemployment recently achieved the lowest rate ever recorded.

Women’s unemployment recently reached the lowest rate in 65 years.

Youth unemployment has recently hit the lowest rate in nearly half a century.

Lowest unemployment rate ever recorded for Americans without a high school diploma.

Under his Administration, veterans’ unemployment recently reached its lowest rate in nearly 20 years.

Almost 3.9 million Americans have been lifted off food stamps since the election.

The Pledge to America’s Workers has resulted in employers committing to train more than 4 million Americans. We are committed to VOCATIONAL education.

95 percent of U.S. manufacturers are optimistic about the future—the highest ever.

Retail sales surged last month, up another 6 percent over last year.

Signed the biggest package of tax cuts and reforms in history. After tax cuts, over $300 billion poured back in to the U.S. in the first quarter alone.

As a result of the tax bill, small businesses will have the lowest top marginal tax rate in more than 80 years.

Helped win U.S. bid for the 2028 Summer Olympics in Los Angeles.

Helped win U.S.-Mexico-Canada’s united bid for 2026 World Cup.

Opened ANWR and approved Keystone XL and Dakota Access Pipelines.

Record number of regulations eliminated.

Enacted regulatory relief for community banks and credit unions.

Obamacare individual mandate penalty GONE.

Administration is providing more affordable healthcare options for Americans through association health plans and short-term duration plans.

Last month, the FDA approved more affordable generic drugs than ever before in history. And thanks to our efforts, many drug companies are freezing or reversing planned price increases.

Reformed the Medicare program to stop hospitals from overcharging low-income seniors on their drugs—saving seniors hundreds of millions of dollars this year alone.

Signed Right-To-Try legislation.

Secured $6 billion in NEW funding to fight the opioid epidemic.

Reduced high-dose opioid prescriptions by 16 percent during my first year in office.

Signed VA Choice Act and VA Accountability Act, expanded VA telehealth services, walk-in-clinics, and same-day urgent primary and mental health care.

Increased our coal exports by 60 percent; U.S. oil production recently reached all-time high.

United States is a net natural gas exporter for the first time since 1957.

Withdrew the United States from the job-killing Paris Climate Accord.

Cancelled the illegal, anti-coal, so-called Clean Power Plan.

Secured record $700 billion in military funding; $716 billion next year.

NATO allies are spending $69 billion more on defense since 2016.

Process has begun to make the Space Force the 6th branch of the Armed Forces.

Confirmed more circuit court judges than any other new administration.

Confirmed Supreme Court Justice Neil Gorsuch and nominated Judge Brett Kavanaugh.

Withdrew from the horrible, one-sided Iran Deal.

Moved U.S. Embassy to Jerusalem.

Protecting Americans from terrorists with the Travel Ban, upheld by Supreme Court.

Issued Executive Order to keep open Guantanamo Bay.

Concluded a historic U.S.-Mexico Trade Deal to replace NAFTA. And negotiations with Canada are underway as we speak.

Reached a breakthrough agreement with the E.U. to increase U.S. exports.

Imposed tariffs on foreign steel and aluminum to protect our national security.

Imposed tariffs on China in response to China’s forced technology transfer, intellectual property theft, and their chronically abusive trade practices.

Net exports are on track to increase by $59 billion this year.

Improved vetting and screening for refugees, and switched focus to overseas resettlement.

We have begun BUILDING THE WALL. Republicans want STRONG BORDERS and NO CRIME. Democrats want OPEN BORDERS which equals MASSIVE CRIME.",Roderigue-Hortalez,e97leb1,democrats
[removed],,e96xu8a,democrats
We have very similar stories. ,LivingWithEyesClosed,e96zz89,democrats
"I'm independent, but I will absolutely vote all blue if it cuts the cancer out fast. Once that happens, I can go through parties deserving reguardless of affiliation. ",Karithea,e97lpeb,democrats
"Pulled us out of Paris agreement. 

All unemployment data is a direct result of the Obama administration. In fact, unemployment is decreasing SLOWER than it did during the Obama administration. 

""Lifted off food stamps"" is misleading, to say the least. 

Tax cuts put the US even deeper in debt, which military spending didn't help with. 

Coal industry employs less people than just JC Penney did, so stop jacking off about it, it's a dying industry. 

America is now behind China (fucking China) in climate change measures. The next generation is fucked. 

Drug prices are actually increasing, especially as healthy people are avoiding government healthcare. 

Retweeted known white supremacist. 

Refused to criticise self declared Nazis. 

Unnecessary military funding has reversed much of the progress made in dealing with national debt by the Obama administration. We have the strongest military in the world, and overspend- it's wasting money. 

The space force does not exist, is not being created, what the fucking fuck are you talking about, Einstein?!

The wall won't do anything. 91% of your favorite bogeymen, undocumented immigrants, come here legally and overstay. And they're statistically less likely to commit crimes. So you're more dangerous then the average illegal immigrant. ",_mindcat_,e97nka7,democrats
wow thats one massive dump of bullshit,jayhawx86,e97s7n7,democrats
Just because you haven’t seen it doesn’t mean it’s not there. I have seen my own family members on Facebook talking about how they will be locking arms with each other in the coming race wars. This isn’t just about illegal immigration. These people feel comfortable enough to discuss these things in a public forum. Trump and the GOP have given them that comfort. I’m sorry you can’t see it.,LivingWithEyesClosed,e96y7wb,democrats
"Being anti-immigrstion is just the socially acceptable way of being racist. Ever notice when immigrants come up, it's always the ones with brown skin?",sadcoffee,e97c5fi,democrats
[removed],,e96yl94,democrats
[removed],,e97dseu,democrats
You can doubt all you want that they used the term race wars but I saw it. Just the fact that you’re promoting r/The_Donald as proof that Trump supporters aren’t racist tells me I’m wasting brain cells on you. ,LivingWithEyesClosed,e96zvi8,democrats
"Is there a better way to talk about race when we're talking about people who do not have white skin? The anti-immigration campaign is against Muslim, Indian, Pakistan, Mexican, Middle Eastern, etc. immigrants. It's the main reason we have done NOTHING to help Puerto Rico and Flint. 

How else would you classify these groups? ",sadcoffee,e97emss,democrats
[removed],,e97fe27,democrats
"You are saying we are closing our borders to illegal immigrants from Mexico. Understood. Keep in mind, this is our labor force for cheap fruit picking labor. Keep in mind, our actual goal is to keep out criminals, and the easier way of keeping track of them is by using intelligence and ensuring everyone who crosses our borders is documented. 

We are also closing our borders to refugees who have brown skin. How is that not anti-immigrant? I'm sure we have illegal immigrants from Europe as well. We never talk about them. Instead, it's always Mexico. Why? Because they aren't white.

Immigeation and diversity is what makes this country so great. Refusing to allow people safe passage into our country, refusing to let people immigrate for a better life is how you make terrorists who hate our county, since there isn't any other option for folks' future. ",sadcoffee,e97g3n8,democrats
What happened to equal representation?,AlphaMuggle,e98jc0t,democrats
"Yeah, but I'd say the larger issue is how money interests promote shitty candidates which white rural voters aren't excited to vote for.",H-E-L-L-M-O,e985uj4,democrats
"We've never had it.

Wyoming: 579,315 people
California: 39.54 million people

2 senators for each.

Each voter in Wyoming is 3.6x as powerful as a voter in California.

#Abolish The Senate

",Kazan,e98nsxi,democrats
[deleted],,e987hw7,democrats
 But we have the house for popular vote,AlphaMuggle,e98nwn3,democrats
"it takes the democrats winning the popular vote by 6 percentage points to take the house.  That's how badly it's jerrymandered.

And you're not taking into account the effect of senate seats.

Ideallity (population/seats) 1 house seat would represent approximately 700k people.  So Wyoming has 1 house seat and 2 senators for a single undersized house seat in population.  California has California has 53 seats + 2 senators.

580,000/3 =   176,666
39,540,000/55 = 718,909

hence the per-voter electoral college power of Wyoming is about 3.6x as much as california.",Kazan,e98o8wl,democrats
"He began with bragging about winning while insulting Obama. Then moved on to not so veiled threat against the Republicans that we're not interested in the Trump ""embrace"". Sprinkle in a bunch more ego stroking and he's on to bashing media and Democrats again. How can anyone take the ramblings from a person who is clearly not in his right mind seriously? 
",asilverwillow,e99jubo,democrats
Everything was the media’s fault. He makes me sick but don’t forget we live in a “hot country”. ,political-wonk,e98pmwa,democrats
"That CNN reporter was an ass and set the mood for the rest of the conference. That may be a hot take, but that’s my opinion. 

",KamikazeKricket,e997ukv,democrats
"To put it in perspective, Trump attacked, not only a white house correspondent doing his job (among many others), but an American Citizen.  That to me, is, un-American.

I'm sincerely worried about what's to come for my friends south of the border between now, and 2020.",shockwave_therapist,e98scia,democrats
"Serious question: what do the news organizations get out of these news conferences? All they’re told are lies, or they spend the whole time getting attacked. Then they broadcast those lies and attacks. Wouldn’t it be better to just say, we’re not going anymore? Preach to Fox News, we’ll be busy covering actual stories. ",sokpuppet1,e99a4ts,democrats
"I would love that personally. Like have the reporters show up to press conferences with Hucka-Sands for real news stuff, but when the president makes a speech just nobody show up. That would make him so mad. ",goodstorydan,e99jt4j,democrats
"Arrington beat out Sanford with Trump’s backing and ran hard as his stooge. This is YUGE, even though a big part of Joe’s win was his opposition to offshore drilling. ",tdkelly,e985ssf,democrats
"There were so many incredible wins tonight for the left.

This is my favorite. It's not the best story or even all that surprising, but I've been waiting for Walker to fall for years. About damn time. Get off the stage, you anti-worker cretin.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e97reke,democrats
Scott Walker is a slimebag. He can goto hell. Should have impeached him for good when we had the chance!,noienoah,e97spog,democrats
This makes me very happy. ,Bookmanfilm,e97tcq1,democrats
*Starts playing “Ding dong the witch is dead” after Walker loses*,Thagomixer,e97waea,democrats
"Buh-byeeee!

Droopy Dog iz sad. 😢 ",VegaThePunisher,e984tqw,democrats
"Since so many Senate races were disappointments, this was a great surprise.  He was definitely someone I wanted to get rid of.",kerryfinchelhillary,e98axph,democrats
This and the takeover of the House helped me cope with the losses here in Florida. ,_night_cat,e984fwm,democrats
Beautifully said. ,ParkerIndustries616,e986sj0,democrats
Freaking nice!  That was great.,takingastep,e988rmk,democrats
"I love it. The loss couldn't have happened in a better way too, wish I'd have been a fly on the wall in that room when he realized he lost...",OmarIsaiahBetts,e98cj8i,democrats
"""Scott Walker is a national disgrace""

*mic drop*",tinydrumpf,e98uwlv,democrats
UPDATE: SESSIONS JUST ASKED BY TRUMP TO RESIGN. Here we go....,champdafister,e98uqja,democrats
I'm sure the SC is prepared ,Stupidiseverywhere,e988rpz,democrats
Kav just put the brewskis in the cooler.,LebirtandJuztiz,e989noj,democrats
"Beto? He's currently a sitting member of Congress, so he's totally up to speed on the rules.",wenchette,e97j6dw,democrats
boy would that make blood shoot out of a lot of republicans' noses.,superfucky,e981ku8,democrats
James Comey?,ThunderBucket970,e97yvdf,democrats
Great idea!,marsglow,e9832sq,democrats
"Pick someone eligible to be president 

&#x200B;

(just in case)",DrNoPants,e98565q,democrats
You steal that dumb hot take from Mark Cuban?,LiquidSnape,e97lb0s,democrats
"No thanks. He should have done way, way, way more to stop Russian meddling and Trump.",clownunist,e97jp20,democrats
Al Gore?,ZonkErryday,e97iza0,democrats
My recommendation: Hillary Clinton for maximum freakout.,dolphins3,e986q3l,democrats
"Agree, NOT Pelosi again plus it would piss Trump off. ",UserN-me,e97waib,democrats
"NO! Why not Ro Khanna, AOC, Tulsi Gabbard, Nina Turner, or someone who is actually progressive and not just a pretty face.",H-E-L-L-M-O,e986jne,democrats
"That's a terrible idea. HE can't become president after Trump and Pence are removed.

There is only one democratic choice: Clinton, and not Bill",surface_book,e9895nu,democrats
"Yes, this. ",MrGnarkill87,e97j8cy,democrats
"I would love this. However, the establishment will make sure it’s Pelosi",rmourz,e97jk99,democrats
"I'm kind of confused could you please explain?
If he lost the senate race then what's his job title now? ",dogteem,e98brcf,democrats
"Man, a lot would have to happen for that to be a factor. I mean, it's not unprecedented, but I can't imagine that President Pence wouldn't quickly name a VP.",StatWhines,e985sqz,democrats
Nope. This dumb idea was posted here before he posted this dumb idea on twitter. ,StatWhines,e97qv1c,democrats
He tried to. McConnell threatened to politicize it if he did. He was damned if he did and damned if he didn’t. ,rmourz,e97l39k,democrats
he should have done more to protect the goddamn public option in the ACA.,superfucky,e981ltd,democrats
"He a fucking traitor.  He just rolled over and played dead, allowing GW TO STEAL THE ELECTION, because he didn’t want to cause trouble.",marsglow,e9835oz,democrats
"Because none of them are known as effective parliamentary leaders, which is what the job actually requires. Nina Turner has never even served in Congress.",dolphins3,e986vkr,democrats
She's said she's only going to be a caretaker Speaker for a short period.,wenchette,e97jn7z,democrats
He is the representative of Texas 16th,ScaryLapis,e98fbm2,democrats
The speakership has nothing to do with his Senate run. The House Speaker does not have to be a sitting House member. Beto will be available come January 3.,wenchette,e98foth,democrats
"Read up on Spiro Agnew, and then read up on Pence and Flynn. The DOJ isn't going to let Pence become president. 

Functionally, both are to be removed at the same time if a non-criminal VP can't be put in place.

How? Just specify that in the verdict of the impeachment trial, that both are to be removed at the same time.",surface_book,e989c11,democrats
Maybe he stole this dumb hot take from me?,StatWhines,e97r3ia,democrats
"I don't accept that premise, sorry. Then he should have gone after McConnell as well.",clownunist,e97lt4b,democrats
"Like what, specifically?",dolphins3,e986te0,democrats
Meaning what? Until 2020 when there’s another election? ,rmourz,e97lwdw,democrats
Ohh I see! Thanks!!,dogteem,e98g759,democrats
"I mean, I get what you’re saying and actually agree. I just think we should give the man a little bit of slack considering hindsight is 20/20 and also because as a politician he has to consider the political risks of everything he does. ",rmourz,e97m16i,democrats
how the hell is this getting down voted?,whynot_me,e98i2la,democrats
"If I remember correctly from the interview I read with her, she would step down in the middle of next year.",wenchette,e97mfrx,democrats
"No, it was really his only fuck up, but it was monsterus. Just holy shit. His inaction almost destroyed the United States.",clownunist,e97mbno,democrats
Republican trash brigading ,clownunist,e98i7lc,democrats
"Not firing Holder after Fast and Furious was pretty stupid, too. Also re-signing the Patriot Act and ramping up the drone program which resulted in a lot of civilian deaths was pretty shitty. Giving feds the ability to detain US citizens without trial was fucked, too.

All that, and he was still the best president of the last 35 years.",MaesterPraetor,e98r02b,democrats
Fast and Furious? OK Republitrash...move along.,clownunist,e98rzhm,democrats
"Shut your fucking weak ass up with that shit. You have to be honest with this shit. Eric Holder was the head of that, he fucked up, and people died. He should have been fired. You're just blinded by ignorance and stupidity. You know nothing of people and politics and support who you're told to support. 

I just voted a straight party ticket to get away from the Christian conservative Sharia law, and you have the audacity to call me out?!?! Get the absolute fuck out of here. I suppose you're fine with Billy Clinton lying under oath? You're the problem with this country. You're just like all the blind and brainwashed Republicans. 

Do as your told and let the adults with brains make the decisions.",MaesterPraetor,e9bgpny,democrats
"Happy about the pick ups but, man Florida stings.  Don't know how the polls missed this one. Again.",TheKnightWhoLaughs,e98fdal,democrats
"Good for your grandmother! It's weird though, if Nixon were alive and active today he'd probably be a Democrat - that's how far Republicans have shifted right since his time. The two most hated forms of ""government overreach"" - the EPA and ACA - were created by Republicans - the former by Nixon himself. ",Mysterions,e981r5d,democrats
"I've heard that the parties had different leanings, but didn't realize that about Nixon. Thanks for the info. ",D33PS3ASTATION,e99bzf0,democrats
"Yep, the [EPA was started by Nixon](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_Environmental_Protection_Agency). As far as the ACA that was formulated by the Heritage Foundation in the 90s as a marketplace response to the single-payer system under consideration at the time, and before it was called Obama-care it was called Romney-care. What I don't think a lot of people understand is that the Republican party has been consistently moving to the right since they embraced Goldwater's ideology in the 60s. Goldwater is famous for his ""[extremism in the defense of liberty speech](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TFQHf16VcWo&t)"" and since then Republicans have been trying to out conservative each other. It used to mean conservatives stood for the status quo, but now it means they stand for regression. This gives the artificial impression that Democrats are on the left, but they really aren't - they're really a center party. Other than social issues nothing they advocate is terribly progressive (and even social issues are really status quo so not even progressive). The closet thing in the US to a mainstream left party is the Green party. ",Mysterions,e99exdu,democrats
Pretty sure Democrat in California aren’t getting their news from Fox anyway.,Medcait,e97i6jp,democrats
"^The linked tweet was tweeted by [@MalcolmNance](https://twitter.com/MalcolmNance) on Nov 07, 2018 02:46:07 UTC (6298 Retweets | 10032 Favorites)

-------------------------------------------------

WARNING: 👇🏽👇🏽👇🏽👇🏽 THIS IS A TRICK TO DEPRESS WESTERN AND CALIFORNIA VOTE. IGNORE FOX NEWS!!! [https://twitter.com/jenniferjjacobs/status/1060000102494932993](https://twitter.com/jenniferjjacobs/status/1060000102494932993)

-------------------------------------------------

^^• Beep boop I'm a bot • Find out more about me at /r/tweettranscriberbot/ •",tweettranscriberbot,e97fnq5,democrats
:-),skepticalspectacle1,e97ijil,democrats
I sure as fuck ain’t. If anything this will just make retardpublicans think they’ve won and not vote anyway.,rahsftw,e97j7r9,democrats
"I say 1 district = 1 senator, 2+ districts = 2 senators. 

The senate is supposed to be a check on the House and vice versa. That’s why it is less representative, however I think doing this, in addition to giving one senator and at least one representative to each Guam, Puerto Rico, and the US Virgin Islands, will ensure a better Congress. ",codegreen_,e99e7gl,democrats
What a Fucking moron. They did waste it.,Stupidiseverywhere,e983uav,democrats
Not voting is essentially the same as voting Republican.,DanteMGalileo,e98bdqt,democrats
"Jesus fucking christ! He won by only 30,000 votes! 

13 million people are eligible to vote in Florida and only 8 million did.

This guy. This fucking guy. Ugh.  ",bumbiddlytake2,e98hqww,democrats
Yep. Just imagine how many other brainless folk had the same mentality ,FirstManLostOnMars,e98isp9,democrats
I believe that there is a recount as it is within 1%. ,codegreen_,e99e0dy,democrats
Dana belongs in prison,Stupidiseverywhere,e98njtl,democrats
Always go for your values. Never sacrifice those for a letter. That goes for both us Democrats and you as Republicans. Glad to see people voting their values. ,Anthonym82,e97ykcc,democrats
"Don't listen to the other guy. We truly appreciate your vote, and hope to earn your support again going forward. Thank you for your contribution! ",rimonino,e97tq2i,democrats
Thank you so much my friend!!!,gargoyleking,e981381,democrats
"Welcome man, even if it is just temporarily.  I do miss the days where as much as I thought the republican party had it's head up their ass on economics i didn't think they were outright evil.  However what they've become... I paid attention in my history classes, it scares me what they've become.  It should scare every patriotic american.   We do need to have disagreement in politics, but I really wish it was between two parties that both were well grounded in reality.  Not one what is well grounded 95% of the time and one that is completely off the deep end in another universe peddling fear racism homophobic sexism and ethnonationalism.",Kazan,e98n5k2,democrats
[removed],,e97q8or,democrats
"Hey, at least Hillary isn't a rapist.",throwthisshitawayacc,e97w6mv,democrats
"And Trump is?

&#x200B;

Meanwhile Hillary is just a homophobe...",some_guy1e,e994i5y,democrats
"Yeah, he is. Admitted to grabbing women's junks",throwthisshitawayacc,e9b60zt,democrats
"He didn't actually admit to that... He said that if you are famous women would let you do that. 

Why are you ignoring the fact that Hillary is a homophobe? ",some_guy1e,e9b7dm3,democrats
"Any sources to back up that info? Also, really really doubt a Trump supporter ACTUALLY cares about Hillary being homophobic, just saying",throwthisshitawayacc,e9b8ro9,democrats
"[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6I1-r1YgK9I](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6I1-r1YgK9I)

&#x200B;

You probably think all Trump supporters a racists, nazis, homophobes and a whole bunch of other -ists and -isms. Let me tell you something, some of my friends are gay. There is a reason why I support Trump's travel ban on muslim countries, do you know what they do to gays in the middle east? They throw them off of buildings. And I don't want my friends getting killed in the name of tolerance and inclusiveness.",some_guy1e,e9bbe4j,democrats
"When you support a person who is actively trying to make discriminatory laws against LGBT people, and at one point called the LGBT community a terrorist group, and you STILL support him, I think you're anti-lgbt or just really ignorant",throwthisshitawayacc,e9bgfzj,democrats
"\>and at one point called the LGBT community a terrorist group

&#x200B;

Source?",some_guy1e,e9bgyb8,democrats
Thank GOD !! Sometimes living in Kentucky isn’t so bad. ,ParkerIndustries616,e973p79,democrats
"Good news already!
",coffeepi,e973ree,democrats
Beotch karma,Btravelen,e979ik9,democrats
"This hasn't been getting enough attention. Almost certainly, the 2020 race will again be decided by the Rust Belt (you didn't mention Ohio but I think it can be had) + Florida. It's about putting up the best possible candidate to do that. 

Trade is deeply important in that part of the country, and I don't think that putting up a TPP-pushing Joe Biden is going to have the effect that some Democratic strategists hope it will. Trump will continue doing damage all across the US, but if he's still marketing his phony protectionism in a way that resonates in key states, and our candidate doesn't give a credible counter that shows he/she will address how the middle class is hurting so badly there... it could be curtains for the Dems.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e98yitb,democrats
I am Jack’s complete lack of enthusiasm. ,UpwardsNotForwards,e973cs0,democrats
Congratulations Jack you look super enthusiastic (I'm guessing that's from Dad wanting to take a picture),Jimbojauder,e969czb,democrats
"Tell him congratulations. Feels good.  Now if it doesn't go the way you/he voted, you are allowed to complain.",itsnotworthit41,e969nrg,democrats
He will always remember his 18th birthday! 👍,JazziTazzi,e967m0b,democrats
Yay Jack!!!!,Sopressata,e9724am,democrats
"What a great way to celebrate your 18th birthday!  I have a summer birthday, but I registered on my 18th birthday :)",kerryfinchelhillary,e96reju,democrats
Congrats Jack!  ,krrush1,e96o66u,democrats
Lets go Jack!,jabunkie,e96pcrm,democrats
"Thank you Jack!  Btw, I have that same pair of Vans too. ;)",Bungie,e96l30g,democrats
I’m so sorry your son is wearing a Hard Rock shirt. ,firmup,e96kn4g,democrats
That's pretty fucking awesome for day 1 of adulthood.,-dank-matter-,e97l6ko,democrats
"is it such a big deal to vote in USA ? i mean , taking pictures of your son and puting on the internet like he did something superior. No hate here , its just i dont get it",xmrxx,e97ulub,democrats
Did you get his permission to plaster his mug all over reddit? Parents. 🙄,GrouchyMcGrouch,e96wz6h,democrats
Kid looks like a fuckin dweeb. I could easily kick his ass.,BraxtonThePorcupine,e973cm4,democrats
Nobody’s perfect. ,tdkelly,e96nb82,democrats
"Have you seen what it's like here?  And young voter turnout is almost nonexistent, especially in midterms.  So young voters expressing themselves this year is very, very important.  ",trunerd127001,e986pkk,democrats
r/iamverybadass,rwch1904,e976bto,democrats
Ed9y m8,Karithea,e97lz2g,democrats
"Aha , well here where I am from voting is not such big deal that is why I am asking . Thanks ",xmrxx,e98gncq,democrats
It’s a start. ,ParkerIndustries616,e97exck,democrats
"So now that dems have the house, What things are Trump/Republicans still able to get away with? For instance, does that put a check on executive orders at all?",Lahrboy,e98atbl,democrats
My thoughts exactly. ,mbkthrowaway,e983k93,democrats
I don't get it,B1GMo1sT69,e96zh14,democrats
If I would have voted any angrier/harder I would have broken the machine.,Karithea,e97m0uw,democrats
[removed],,e973i80,democrats
"I love a good right to life response that ignores the lives lost from gun violence, political oppression and lack of fair healthcare. ",picklejewce,e97i7dr,democrats
"Vote like men are raping everyone reguardless of gender... I mean, uhh...  no, no.  I meant that.",Karithea,e97m2yp,democrats
I think we both infiltrated the dems subreddit.,MrTrollyBoi,e97zg1j,democrats
[removed],,e97wymp,democrats
"Vote like how minorities in America are being racist to white people... OHHH NOO, I MEAN... EQUALITY FOR ALL ",MrTrollyBoi,e97zhu3,democrats
I don't really think it's called infiltrating if you just have to type the url into your browser.,Obamasmanpurse,e988mn8,democrats
"they arent even living, and abortion is important to prevent both the parents AND child from having a shitty life. If a girl accidentally got pregnant in high school, her life is ruined by having to drop out and take care of that child. Not only that, the baby wont be able to live a normal life and will be miserable.",smiteredditisdumb,e98i66z,democrats
"""racist to white people"" lmao. I can't wait until Trump is out and more women and minorities take office. I understand, you're concerned about that shift of power. But let me allow you to be in on a secret...

Women and minorities aren't power hungry murderers who oppress people, because they're aware that particular structure is toxic since they've been on the bottom since the beginning. No one will be killing off white people, men, straight or cis people. We're not you. ",Karithea,e99kfar,democrats
"""HACKED""

He made a free profile on a free website and typed in a public URL and uses the word ""infiltrated"", lol.",Karithea,e99kkcx,democrats
"Everything that he says is dumbfounding. His sentence structure is awful, he only talks about how he influences something. That man has never uttered anything profound.",i-touched-morrissey,e98u8bk,democrats
"On his tax returns - ""Well, look, as I’ve told you, they’re under audit. They have been for a long time. They’re extremely complex. People wouldn’t understand them. They’re done by among the biggest and best law firms in the country. Same thing with the accounting firms. The accountants are a very, very large, powerful firm from the standpoint of respect—they’re highly respected. Big firm. A great law firm; you know it very well.""

I mean he is so obviously lying, how does anyone fall for this?",Finite187,e9akt8g,democrats
"This subreddit is devoted to WA politics:

https://www.reddit.com/r/WAlitics/

",wenchette,e98sk4d,democrats
"Thanks! After a quick look it doesn't seem to be specifically focused on promoting a democratic agenda (which is fine!), but I think a sub for that would be useful.",jmadlena,e98ssrb,democrats
"You could start by posting pro-Democrat material there on a regular basis and then building up rapport and profile.

It's easy to start a subreddit but very hard to grow one once started.",wenchette,e98tb0p,democrats
"That’s a great point. It will be difficult to grow a new sub.

By posting here and other subs I was hoping to gain some others who are interested in joining as well.",jmadlena,e98tk9f,democrats
Republicans keep getting to appoint right wing judges and Dems can start a new investigation into the trump administration every day. ,azurejedi,e97dzws,democrats
Honestly I won't believe it until all the dust has settled. Don't want to get my hopes up again. ,DrMaxUrban,e979y28,democrats
"The Senate was a tough map regardless but with NBC News calling this,  it looks like we won the house ",Anthonym82,e978ris,democrats
"What are the implications of losing senate but gaining house majority?

Does it help Mueller?",thebensupremacy,e97abiw,democrats
Senate cannot pass anything without the House. It's a major must have,Anthonym82,e97bxxs,democrats
"Dens can block any GOP legislation and launch House special committee investigations into corruption  and such. They also get to write the budget though it'll  require Senate and Presidential approval to be passed.

They can't  stop any judicial  or cabinet agency appointments any more than they could before, though ",iamthegraham,e97b3v1,democrats
"Also, a Democrat will take the third position in the Presidential line of succession, not that it really counts for much without the Senate majority needed to impeach Trump and Pence.",dolphins3,e97d0cw,democrats
"Can they investigate corruption without support from the Supreme Court? I read an article in which Newt Gingrich feels confident that the court will protect Trump concerning keeping his tax returns a secret; how else can they protect him?

http://nymag.com/intelligencer/2018/10/newt-gingrich-supreme-court-trump-tax-returns-secret.html#comments ",3rdGenChickenChaser,e97scn2,democrats
"I'd fully expect Kavanaugh to support that sort of nonsensical legal reasoning, and maybe even Gorsuch and Thomas. But I have a hard time believing Roberts or even Alito are extreme enough to go along with that. Maybe I'm just being optimistic, though. ",iamthegraham,e97ta83,democrats
Thanks! I guess we'll see soon enough. ,3rdGenChickenChaser,e98szyv,democrats
Hurricane O’Rourke came tantalizingly close too.,benjome,e982u0o,democrats
Is this something from Texas that makes me happy that isn't beef-related or my cousins?,DanteMGalileo,e98bfkv,democrats
Proud of him,Stupidiseverywhere,e983sqi,democrats
Snowflake republican brigadiers down voting my posts and comments that's so cute.,FlamingAshley,e98buuq,democrats
It's a start.,DanteMGalileo,e97hw5z,democrats
"Maybe I'm missing something, but it's the only thing that matters.  Sure, would have been nice to make some gains in the senate to make it easier to take control in 2020, but really it's all about having subpoena power to investigate Trump",weluckyfew,e97k9og,democrats
"Exactly. It may have not been a ""blue wave"" but we have a majority in something.",FlamingAshley,e97md8v,democrats
"Not just 'something', but a majority in a house on congress that can investigate the executive branch - that is huge",weluckyfew,e97nnpm,democrats
Don’t count for a whole lot when there’s 2 other branches of government to shut it down when that happens.,ZombieFriedChicken,e97w3ui,democrats
Yep. That is true.,FlamingAshley,e97npul,democrats
"They can't shut it down - the House can investigate and release findings, which can chip away at Trump's support.  No, it won't change the mind of the true believers, but it will hopefully sway enough to make a difference.  

Also, it means no new legislation unless it's bipartisan.  Sadly, he still has free reign for appointing judges",weluckyfew,e98cwxf,democrats
"so fucking what, nothing will happen. ""HOUSE IMPEACHES TRUMP! ...SENATE ACQUITS ON ALL CHARGES! TRUMP REFUSES TO RESIGN! TRUMP WINS RE-ELECTION!""",superfucky,e981ntm,democrats
I doubt it.  It's a waste of time if dems don't control the Senate.  ,KevnBacn,e97gq4v,democrats
"No it's not, Republicans gained seats in the Senate lol.",TheFluzzy,e97iouy,democrats
0% chance of it,Brysynner,e97p0ol,democrats
[removed],,e97nl6d,democrats
[removed],,e97z03e,democrats
[removed],,e988d50,democrats
"That last one is a bit of a leap there chief. Independents and suburban voters ran for the hills last night. Trump will have two more years of gridlock, and will have to use executive orders to do anything (which can easily be reversed), then will be run out of town. It’s over. 

He will continue to shift rightward to drum up his shrinking base instead of expanding his base by appealing to moderates. The only people that are left to support him are hillbillies and ignorants. 

We require immigrants to take a Citizenship test, yet the dumb fucks who were born in pennsyltucky couldn’t answer half of those questions... but they see the flag and follow their pied piper. ",neuropat,e98dsrq,democrats
"But if there's any Republicans who don't like Trump but were worried about going against their party, it could give them the spine to do so now.",aykyle,e97hl9k,democrats
Having the house will help. ,ScentedShark,e97grl3,democrats
Impeachment is done by the house. Senate confirms (or not). You can still be impeached and not removed. ,neuropat,e98d3ry,democrats
Impeachment is done by the house. Senate confirms (or not). Trump can still be impeached and not removed. ,neuropat,e98d5dh,democrats
Impeachment is done by the house. Senate confirms (or not). Trump can still be impeached and not removed. ,neuropat,e98d4td,democrats
[removed],,e980fwd,democrats
"he actually is doing a pretty horrific job but fun fact, you can be doing a ""good job"" while also being guilty of committing crimes! ",superfucky,e981uap,democrats
Please list your examples of what you think is “good.” ,neuropat,e98dg21,democrats
"> We require immigrants to take a Citizenship test, yet the dumb fucks who were born in pennsyltucky couldn’t answer half of those questions

that's what makes me mad. i don't see why people who were born here shouldn't be held to the same civic knowledge standards as people applying for citizenship after the fact.",superfucky,e98itcy,democrats
I just don't see it.  Trump is very popular with the Republican base.  Republicans are becoming the party of Trumpism.  Old school Republicans should just join the Democrats at this point.  ,KevnBacn,e97hxpb,democrats
You need 2/3rds of the Senate to remove the president. So you'd have to have over half of Republicans flip. ,brokensinc,e97i7ml,democrats
"no such thing. republicans are willing to make a show of going against *trump,* but not their party. republicans will never in a million years go against their party. so long as trump is cutting taxes for the rich, axing the social safety net, signing off on fat military contracts and stomping on the rights of blacks, hispanics & LGBT, republicans have no issue with him.",superfucky,e981pmm,democrats
You need the Senate to impeach a president.  The house should just focus on his taxes.,KevnBacn,e97gvti,democrats
"Impeachment without the possibility of removal from office turns impeachment into a political procedure that one does when they’re not in power. 

If the Dems impeach Trump it’s likely the next time the GOP has the House they will automatically impeach the Democratic President",Brysynner,e98f3s0,democrats
[removed],,e980jpl,democrats
[removed],,e981vah,democrats
"The house should investigate the shit out of everything and not allow one piece of legislation to pass.  

Wasting political capital on an impeachement that can't happen just to make Liberals feel good and get hate boners is a terrible idea Guys.  Let it go.",Druidshift,e97ko13,democrats
Please tell me on what grounds a GOP controlled house would have impeached Obama? You assume all presidents will be criminals - guess that’s the norm for the GOP.,neuropat,e98f8iy,democrats
[removed],,e980tc0,democrats
"well those are 2 different lists.

what he's done that's horrific:

* reinstituted the gag rule
* muslim ban
* family separation
* tax cuts for the rich
* revoking mandatory coverage of pre-existing conditions (EO)
* defining 1.4 million transgender americans out of existence
* revoking protections for transgender students in school
* revoking protections for LGBT federal employees
* rolling back environmental protections and selling off national parks to developers
* tariffs & trade wars with our allies
* repeatedly revoking sanctions on russia for human rights abuses
* defending saudi arabia's human rights abuses and slaughtering a journalist who was a permanent US resident because ""he wasn't a citizen, right?""
* encouraging violence against his political opponents and protestors
* so many attacks on the constitution, and our political norms as a whole, i don't even know where to start

what he's done that's a crime:

* tax evasion/fraud
* obstruction of justice
* violated emoluments clause
* nepotism
* colluding with a foreign enemy of the US to influence elections via disinformation campaigns and cyber warfare",superfucky,e982aqi,democrats
I’m talking about the next President. They can just claim that whatever she does it is an impeachable offense. So let’s say by some miracle she gets Medicare for All passed. The House GOP could say that by passing such legislation she bypassed some protocol and that is now an impeachable offense. ,Brysynner,e98fixq,democrats
"Dude there are literally 0 issues that the two sides will work together on, outside of maybe Infrastructure spending. But Trump will muck that up by insisting the wall is included or he vetoes.

This will be like Obama’s 2nd term - gridlock. Trump will have to use executive orders to do anything at all, which can easily be reversed by the next Democratic administration. This is a YUGE fucking win for Dems, and people who value civil liberties.",neuropat,e98dc8q,democrats
"I personally would also include a link to the website that tracks all of the lies he’s told as President. Last I checked a month ago, it was at over 5,000 verifiable lies since he took office. You can even read each individual statement with a side note telling the real story. For anyone that may be reading, look it up",Lahrboy,e98bt7p,democrats
"Don’t forget the biggest one, and hardcore constitutionalists should be all over this one, attacking freedom of the press and the first amendment. ",neuropat,e98dkbz,democrats
"there's a pretty high standard to impeach. you have to actually break laws, which is what Trump has done. You can't do it whilly nilly. your example is horrible; the president can't pass legislation on his/her own, and you can't impeach a president for signing legislation that your own body writes and puts in front of him to sign. just stop - you have no clue what you're talking about.",neuropat,e98hnec,democrats
[removed],,e98ed0l,democrats
"don't worry, i didn't:

> so many attacks on the constitution, and our political norms as a whole, i don't even know where to start

",superfucky,e98ipik,democrats
"They don't call everyone racists; they call the racists ""racists,"" which they are. Mueller finally has a governing body in DC to listen to, and actually request, his investigative work. The House has subpoena power. There have already been numerous indictments, under a totally hostile government controlling all 3 branches. Where there is smoke, there is fire, and the House under Dem control will sure as fuck expose these criminals who have taken over the GOP. They are not fucking republicans; they are wolves in sheeps clothing and moderate republicans/independents have finally had enough. 2020 is going to be a landslide.",neuropat,e98i0qr,democrats
Didn’t work,elduderino197,e97cwi3,democrats
"Tonight on FOX: satanic worshipping black singer Beyoncé, endorses Beto.",NotoriousJB,e96yvow,democrats
"Verification:

https://www.instagram.com/p/Bp2ua8uH3iS/",wenchette,e96spix,democrats
Betonce,Ronson18,e96stbc,democrats
"Wow... You know though, I checked her Facebook profile out. Your typical Grandma. Wtf is wrong with this country, that we get so fucking erratic and polarized about two political parties that, let's be honest, are full of shit a lot of the time. I'll bet if I bumped into her in real life I'd think she was a sweet lady. Shit like this makes me really fucking torn. One minute I'm buying into the mentality that ""this is the enemy"", then the next minute I'm thinking ""this is humanity"". Wtf? None of this bodes well for the future of this country. Abso-fucking-lutely none of it. It's depressing. ",smileyj78,e97na0i,democrats
"That was a wild ride.

&#x200B;

Proof that some people just aren't worth the effort, their brains are too damaged.",evolutionfan,e97ltp8,democrats
We won get over it😂😂,guitarsnake18,e97qtgx,democrats
"> I'll bet if I bumped into her in real life I'd think she was a sweet lady.

No, probably not.  Take a good look at her facebook and her comments in the sample that was posted.  She seems to actually hold the views that you would likely find objectionable.  ",cybexg,e97npbz,democrats
"I feel like most of the time growing so erratic and polarized over differing views is really illogical, but at the same time JUST from a transgender person's perspective, a lot of the stuff that Trump has been trying to do is honestly dehumanizing for our group, and LGBT people in general.  I think it becomes a lot more difficult to stay rational when you have to argue to someone your own humanity and validity as who you are. That's just my perspective.",throwthisshitawayacc,e97w5bn,democrats
"It’s sad because there are a lot of people like her.  I blame Fox News.  Chipping away at people’s grasp of reality, every night.",nscherneck,e97pj06,democrats
"I think she perfectly represented what the Republicans would identify as one of their intellectuals

Edit: better wording",cybexg,e97n88c,democrats
"I generally don't talk politics with strangers, so I probably wouldn't realize it. What a weirdo though! Glad she's not my Grandma, my Republican Grandma is hard enough to deal with..... 😂",smileyj78,e97ontd,democrats
Exploiting the weak-minded.,evolutionfan,e97r16a,democrats
Nothing,Geuse_,e98mvr8,democrats
That’s not how the House of Representatives works...,fasehed,e99gf09,democrats
Explain to me what racism was shown I’m intrigued and uninformed ,Geuse_,e98wtbt,democrats
"-	the racist robocalls in Georgia
-	the racist trump tv ad even banned by Fox News
-	trump is a birther so is racisr
-	steve king who lost endorsements due to his support for white nationalism


Anymore questions?
",VegaThePunisher,e98xmoo,democrats
Ugh please let the House go to Democrats. 5 in 9 chances according to 538 now. This election again makes me glad I left Indiana at least!,lotusbloom74,e978zsn,democrats
God... fuck Florida. Goddamnit,neuropat,e97csh4,democrats
"So far here in Texas,  Democrats are leading in SIX Republican seats that weren't even on their list of pickups ",Anthonym82,e979hsz,democrats
I hope this isn’t another 2016. I can’t handle that disappointment again. ,trinitymonkey,e976fwn,democrats
Let's put it this way. We were projected to lose the Senate race and win the house.  That's exactly how it's going.  Would winning the Senate be nice? Definitely. Winning the House?  A must,Anthonym82,e97aj81,democrats
Georgia GOV race is the most fucked up thing I've witnessed. ,GregSirico,e97e2it,democrats
Wtf! Florida cmon ,ObiWannaDoYou74,e975b6e,democrats
Over 100 women have been elected to the house for the first time!!!,Anthonym82,e97h8s1,democrats
"Tonight was a win for the country, but a huge loss for my state.

Florida: I expect nothing and I’m still let down.",throwmeaway_1317,e97lg6s,democrats
NJ2 just went from red to blue. Hasn't been blue in my lifetime. Key flip there. Keep watching.,therecordcorrected,e97bthg,democrats
"I've never been hopeful for the Senate coming in at all...... but in the House, it's trending our way",Anthonym82,e9775n5,democrats
Fuck you Florida man,,e97g456,democrats
"With us winning the House, a branch of Congress will FINALLY have oversight of Trump. Plus just in time for Mullers findings to come in and hold hearings based off those in the Trump administration ",Anthonym82,e97ec10,democrats
"If a blue wave happens, it will first hit Virginia, where Democrat Jennifer Wexton beat incumbent Rep. Barbara Comstock in the suburban D.C. 10th District, and Sen. Tim Kaine easily defeated GOP challenger Corey Stewart.

This happened. So far Democrats haven't lost a seat they need to win. The mob is still stuffing ballot boxes in NJ. New York only has two districts even reporting. If Collins goes down, that is another flip. ",therecordcorrected,e979sdc,democrats
Democrats going to flip Staten Island. Collins the crook going to lose. Walker is going to lose. Michigan has Democratic governor now. NJ2 looks like a flip now. Looks like the district Teachout lost will flip to blue. Keep on rolling. And we still don't have California.,therecordcorrected,e97e5f2,democrats
NBC just announced that the new possible Ways and Means Committee Chairman just announced that they are going to officially request Trump's Tax returns,Anthonym82,e97evwl,democrats
4 more guys! I'm proud of my home state Colorado. We got Pollis in. First openly gay Governor in our states history. A guy for medicaid for all and a guy that wants to preserve our water rights and stop fracking! Good job Colorado! Go Nuggets!!!,DatAEK971,e97fmo6,democrats
"Looking at the #'s in TX and GA, white women voted for Cruz & Kemp. That's the difference right there as both races were razor thin.",GregSirico,e97khya,democrats
Barbara Comshit went down by 8:00 in VA10. Northern Virginia is all blue. Women brought it in. A bell weather sign. Bring it on in now Jeff Bezos. ,therecordcorrected,e975344,democrats
"For fuck sake people chill out, this isn’t over yet! ",Ahab1851,e9795py,democrats
NBC now calculates Democrats have a 95% chance of taking House all you nervous Nellies and all the polls still aren't closed.,therecordcorrected,e97c3k3,democrats
Seeing the suburbs becoming more democratic is very great news down the road. ,Anthonym82,e97e299,democrats
238 seats is the possible forecast for Dems in the House,Anthonym82,e97efjm,democrats
"Van Jones said it best.  ""May not be a blue wave but it's a rainbow wave""",Anthonym82,e97g1oo,democrats
"Very upset with the way Jealous was treated in MD. On the plus side, Marc Elrich with the blowout in MoCo.",thisisbasil,e97hfx4,democrats
WOO HOO DEMS WIN HOUSE,bonjarno65,e97i2dt,democrats
"That was too stressful lol. I'm disappointed Beto didn't win, I'm not a Texan but I was rooting for him. Very pleased with the house victory. The Senate would've been nice but I knew that was a very long stretch. These next two years are going to be very interesting and I hope that we have a new president in two years.

&#x200B;",Naedeslus,e97ln6a,democrats
Just need 11 more seats!!!!,Anthonym82,e97c2qs,democrats
Democrats going to win OK5! Holy Shit. Beating an incumbent Republican.,therecordcorrected,e97ebcn,democrats
Going to flip Love's seat in Utah 3 too.,therecordcorrected,e97f0oe,democrats
God damn. Collins now leading in NY. He gave up his seat. He has been indicted and most likely going to jail. He can't take his seat most likely if he wins. WTF is wrong with those people in upstate NY?,therecordcorrected,e97fbpv,democrats
We have 230 seats officially right now!!!,Anthonym82,e97g52y,democrats
"Literally everyone and everything I voted for in this red state lost. People here are so fucking stupid. Even the blatantly unconstitutional amendment to the state constitution for putting 10 Commandments on public property and ""affirming the sanctity of unborn life"" passed.

I'm just so frustrated because I just moved here, and the quality of services, infrastructure, schooling, and pretty much everything is clearly inferior to the blue state I'm from and it just fucking astounds me that people *choose* to be governed by such corrupt, incompetent morons.",dolphins3,e97bqrb,democrats
There WAS definitely a blue wave in TX but the Beto people should have chilled with all the phone apps and Texts. I know for a fact that made republicans come out in force.,moop_n_shmow,e97ctbl,democrats
Trump is finally on uncharted territory where he's going to run into people that will actually  say no.  We coming Trump!!,Anthonym82,e97fw0j,democrats
Amy Klobuchar wins. ~~Brat is going to pull it out.~~ NJ still stuffing the ballot boxes.,therecordcorrected,e978v6z,democrats
I'm going to toast to our pickup of Issas seat later in California :-),Anthonym82,e97c70r,democrats
SLAUGHTER FUCKING GANG right now in the House ,Ihit3bowls,e97gwr2,democrats
Kansas here.  Just wanted to state that for once we didn’t fuck up.  The first time in a long time I’m not embarrassed to be from here. ,Jesuisunpomplemousse,e97nzkf,democrats
"s/o to black women, they don't get recognized enough by the party, but are by far our most reliable and rational constituency. ",Webby915,e98yvz3,democrats
"First black woman governor, first Muslim woman in Congress, first openly gay governor. This is what America looks like. Only one party reflects that. Blue wave baby",theguyfromuncle420,e97ecf3,democrats
Virginia may flip another district! and Brat is leading by only 1% so getting close to mandatory recount.,therecordcorrected,e977vy8,democrats
"OK, this is messed up, CNN has the crook barely winning in VA 2 and Brat losing while CNN has the opposite at the same percentage of votes counted. Time to check the VA election site and edit this.

OK, both are wrong, here is the official VA site: https://results.elections.virginia.gov/vaelections/2018%20November%20General/Site/Congress.html

Good news. The Democrat Luria is up with less than 9% to go in VA2 and Brat is losing the district that has been Republican since like 1974 with less than 9% to go and not within mandatory recount! This could be two unexpected flips!

In case you don't recall, Brat upset Eric Cantor four years ago in the primaries. Cantor was the heir apparent for House Majority Leader, #2 to Paul Ryan.",therecordcorrected,e97aazv,democrats
[Literally me right now.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OdNNjCHGixE),dolphins3,e97c0mw,democrats
"Senate called for the Republicans.

Not too big of a surprise cause I've been expecting this for a while now and it would have required pretty much everything going in our favor to have a shot at winning, but it still stings to hear it confirmed.",trinitymonkey,e97d5p1,democrats
NJ down to 2 Republicans in the House and Iowa 1!,therecordcorrected,e97gbjm,democrats
Anything good being said over...there?,mb1772,e97hzd8,democrats
"Kobach lost in Kansas. Now he can go away forever. Mills won in Maine, another flip. Whitmer in Michigan, flip. Grisham in New Mexico, flip. Looks like Walker is going down but Trump must of helped. Forget about Wisconsin in 2020. Pritzker won in Illinois, another flip. So not a bad night so far and still waiting on Nevada.",therecordcorrected,e97k8vm,democrats
GA7 flipped!,GregSirico,e97lav8,democrats
"The senate, even with the tough map, was a disaster because there aren't enough opportunities in 2020 to flip it.

It looks like sinema will fail. CHS will win the runoff in mississippi so it looks like it'll be a 54-46 senate.

&#x200B;

This is the 2020 class:

&#x200B;

[https://fivethirtyeight.com/features/senate-update-how-this-years-race-sets-up-2020/](https://fivethirtyeight.com/features/senate-update-how-this-years-race-sets-up-2020/)

&#x200B;

Maybe we can net 2 or 3 pickups. not nearly enough. We'll be in the minority in the senate for some time.",labormarket,e98f1c1,democrats
"For the Senate, first results out of Texas looking good!

Florida looked good up until one minute ago... lol. Fingers crossed! 

Edit: WTF is wrong with Florida!?? 70% reporting and it's razor thin - but how is that jackass Rick Scott razor thin winning against the Democrat incumbent!? ",bumbiddlytake2,e974jxh,democrats
Dems won the house and kicked out alot of Republican Governors tonight.  All Repubs did was keep the Senate like they were projected to anyways. Dems won tonight.  Republicans lost. That's the way I see it. ,Anthonym82,e97dr1q,democrats
As a Texan I'm so pissed right now. I live in a state full of idiots,PunkZdoc,e97h309,democrats
Just imagine if we didn't have the worst Senate electoral map in decades (history?),Brysynner,e97o10s,democrats
"Disappointed about the Beto loss. I don’t think that was a blue wave, just a Beto wave. He really didn’t seem like he was there to put republicans against democrats,  but trying to work together with all Texans. Hope to see him in 2020, because he would be a huge upgrade from Kamala or Booker, as long as dems don’t try and turn him into Bernie and make him look crazy ",FinnBear512,e97f7g4,democrats
Can we impeach this orange fucktard tomorrow now,neuropat,e97fbr1,democrats
We basically pwnd the *Guardians Of Putin* in the house. But the *Guardians Of Putin* won a lot of Governor's. The G.O.P also retained the Senate in a fundamental way. So we still have a lot work to do. But we've avoided a complete Dictatorship and USSR coup. ,DatAEK971,e97hfz4,democrats
"I can't see Nancy Pelosi lasting much longer as house speaker. So many new progressive congressmen an women coming to Washington in January, we won't take kindly to the bi-partisanship Nancy is calling for, we've been slapped around too much for the last 6 yrs by republicans who have zero desire to reach across the aisle or even be civil in chambers.

We can no longer be the push over party, being civil with our opponents for civilities sake , we have seen where that gets us..fighting to just have a seat at the table.",ScottyKNJ,e97u8q2,democrats
This is literally 2016 pt.2,jharden10,e977715,democrats
"I'm upset about the Senate, as I'm sure many of you are.  I'm upset about Beto, Andrew Gillum and Stacey Abrams in particular, and I'm upset that my home state didn't elect any Dems to statewide offices (governor, AG, SOS all went GOP).  But I am glad my favorite Senator got re-elected, we took back the House, that we picked up seven governor seats and that lots of milestones were reached for women, LGBT, Muslim, Natives, etc.  ",kerryfinchelhillary,e98b93p,democrats
What the literal fuck we lost Texas?! 😑 what is going on?! ,Awesometjgreen,e97cmw0,democrats
Tomorrows gonna be a rough day,ApprenticePuppet,e977rsa,democrats
[removed],,e97fm9o,democrats
[removed],,e97fkw6,democrats
11 out of 12 now. Still not confident enough to stop worrying but at least I'm not freaking out anymore.,trinitymonkey,e97byw0,democrats
Got it!,Rad_Association,e97k1fi,democrats
It's Florida. No surprise there,Anthonym82,e97dwkz,democrats
"Yep, from Florida. The geriatric population and the barren hillbilly counties wanted this shit. But at least we passed the 4th amendment, there's always next election with those new votes.",Nocturne7280,e97o8np,democrats
Sorry bros. Legit did not meet one person who was pro-Desantis,flansmakeherdance,e97s69i,democrats
From Florida. Can confirm this place is a geriatric wasteland.,LulaElizabethe,e97p65k,democrats
[removed],,e97yyqp,democrats
That's neat.,bottyliscious,e97ark5,democrats
"Hate to say it, but damn if it doesn’t feel like 2016. 

Edit: was touch and go but we pulled out what we needed to. Thank the gods. ",IggyBonkers,e976z89,democrats
The Senate race for the Democrats is the worse scenario for them by just bad luck since 1914. But you know that means the next several won't be good for the Republicans.,therecordcorrected,e97b68m,democrats
And we didn't win either fucking one. What a damn joke ,danielsuarez369,e97xq3p,democrats
Yep. Abrams was robbed,Anthonym82,e97e45q,democrats
Genuinely curious: how so?,phluxeternus,e97g4kd,democrats
"72% reporting and 23,000 vote spread. People who say their vote doesn't matter are nuts! That race is so so close!! ",bumbiddlytake2,e975h81,democrats
I wonder if more Republicans showed up because they were worried about Parkdale/their guns. ,sadcoffee,e97bsql,democrats
I saw a meme an holy fuck it was true. Florida could be voting on either : Free ice cream or a kick to the face an the result would be 50.5% to 49.5%,ScottyKNJ,e97u9gp,democrats
"Same for me, except I live in Columbus, OH. I have zero expectations yet somehow end up disappointed in this state nearly every election. We’re not even a swing state at this point. 

At least we held onto Sherrod Brown. ",kwilliams489,e987ljx,democrats
"I used to live in SI, that place is GOP hardcore. ",GregSirico,e97eykt,democrats
[removed],,e98e7bj,democrats
"No, it isn't, but the facts that an election that seemed like a likely victory in the House now looks like a coin flip and any (admittedly low) chance of taking the Senate has been taken behind the barn and shot are in themselves causes for concern.",trinitymonkey,e979zpk,democrats
It shouldnt have been close. Your country scares me.,mrtomjones,e97an4r,democrats
"He never had a chance. Democrats in DC suburbs didn't vote in primaries. The moment you saw a candidate for governor coming out of Baltimore, you knew that. There will never be another Democratic governor from Baltimore again. O'Malley was it. The DC suburbs will decide who the next Democratic governor is. Right now there is a Republican that knows if he says anything good about Trump, they'll impeach him and they can do it.",therecordcorrected,e97jqem,democrats
"Jealous was a shitty campaigner who ignored A LOT of the state, didn't even attempt ads until October. He had a lot of optic problems where he's cursing at reporters asking him if he's a socialist, says he's a venture capitalist while continuing to campaign with Bernie Sanders and Dave Chappelle. 

The MD Democratic Party needs to have a ""Come to Jesus"" moment where they figure out WTF happened in 2014 and 2018 on how bad candidates are making it through the primary process. 2022 is far away and hopefully someone will emerge but right now I can only see Krish running again from those who lost in 2018,",Brysynner,e97oap0,democrats
Woo hoo! ,Awesometjgreen,e97c8fw,democrats
NY 22 flipped to the Democrats from an incumbent! And we still don't have anything from California. ,therecordcorrected,e97fhlr,democrats
I'm in Upstate NY and I ask that same question. I think it's because people here are salty about the Excelsior Scholarship and the paid family leave. How dare downstate help vote to make our lives better and invest in our future?! What jerks. 🙄,sadcoffee,e97ggk3,democrats
"Alabama?

Same.",RigleyAB,e97haj4,democrats
"Literally no one, who has lived in AL. for all of their life, knows what it's like to have nice things like great infrastructure, superior educational systems or bipartisan compromise so they will continue to vote for the small minded world they know. Speaking as a native to Al. ",plus10dB,e97v2p8,democrats
"No, if Hispanics voted, there wouldn't be too many Republicans elected in Texas.",therecordcorrected,e97d8e2,democrats
"I don't think there was anything Beto could do to pull this one. He had a good run, but Texas is just too conservative at this point for Cruz to get unseated. He definitely may have pulled a bunch of House candidates over the top there though, and Texas may very well be shifting thanks to a growing Hispanic population.",overthinker356,e97eaof,democrats
What are you talking about?  We lost Georgia and Florida,Awesometjgreen,e97emz9,democrats
You heard right here first. VA is going to flip 2 more seats people! Near the end of the count. And no mandatory recounts. They will have to pay if they want one. Three seats in the Old Dominion. Only one was in the 23 count. Down to 19. You like that?,therecordcorrected,e97b1r9,democrats
Calm down. We fucked up with these governerships somehow but we still got the house ,Awesometjgreen,e97c9vp,democrats
"This was expected, same as NY’s given the anger about changes to SALT in GOP Tax Plan. ",DavidNexus7,e97j8fz,democrats
We pulled it out in Wisconsin ! ,ScottyKNJ,e97ua0p,democrats
Because the governor's race that was suppose to pull him to victory is not because the Democrat is going to lose to the unqualified racist.,therecordcorrected,e977n7k,democrats
Not done yet. Two unexpected women in Virginia. Staten Island. Walker gone. And OK5 beating an incumbent. That wasn't even one being counted for control either.,therecordcorrected,e97eh71,democrats
I feel you.  I'm out here in West Texas in San Angelo.  It's ignorance but it's changing though.  Especially the suburbs ,Anthonym82,e97hcy7,democrats
At least everyone can rest easy knowing the Zodiac Killer will be back in Washington and not on the loose. ,DavidNexus7,e97j6l9,democrats
"If I remember right it's similarly bad for the GOP in 2020.  Solid chances we'll be talking about a Democratic-controlled US government in 2021.

Until then the House needs to investigate the shit out of Trump and his cabinet, protect Mueller, re-open the investigation into the Russian attack on our country, campaign finance, the environment and regulatory reform, the list is long.  There's lots of work to be done.",killxswitch,e984gbc,democrats
Wouldn't pence take over? Id rather just stay with fucktard another 2 years.,PunkZdoc,e97gjoz,democrats
We have to be strategic. The republicans rushed into impeaching Clinton and it came back to bite them. We can't afford to make the same mistake. Too much is at stake here. ,sadcoffee,e97g8h6,democrats
Not just yet,Stupidiseverywhere,e97fhrg,democrats
What governerships did we even win?  We lost georgia and Florida,Awesometjgreen,e97hljt,democrats
Bullshit.,therecordcorrected,e977nsm,democrats
I've been a Beto fanboy since Day 1 but let's not pretend he was a sure thing here.,trinitymonkey,e97dguu,democrats
"I'm out here in Texas and even I was realistic about Beto...... but it's not over yet.  But there's another good surprise, Democrats are in the lead in SIX surprise districts here that were not even on their radar. So even if Beto loses,  his effect has helped us pick up seats.  PLUS I think Beto has built his national profile for his run in 2020",Anthonym82,e97d2pa,democrats
Never had a real chance. Republicans in Texas would vote for Hitler. Hispanics won't vote. I posted that a long time ago. Should have put the money in Nevada in a race that could have been won.,therecordcorrected,e97d3ts,democrats
You really thought he had a chance in hell in this dumbass state?,Jaxsan1,e97d1iz,democrats
We’ve likely won the house. Gotta keep moving forward. ,ScentedShark,e97cs1s,democrats
Why is that?,therecordcorrected,e97854c,democrats
Took the house already,Stupidiseverywhere,e97fxry,democrats
Uh the house is in dem control ,Stupidiseverywhere,e97fyt8,democrats
"Yes, NBC says 95%.",therecordcorrected,e97casi,democrats
"Yeah, I saw that now, that's great! At least Democrats can have some marginal power now. Still not great but hopefully the next election we get a new President. ",lotusbloom74,e97ced7,democrats
FloriDUH,concreteblue,e97h4po,democrats
"I don’t know, I don’t see desantis or scott pushing to having more voters at the polls by 2020. They’ll install a program that allows ex-cons by 2022, count on it.",Shirowoh,e980hwb,democrats
"Go squeal your projection somewhere else, pig.",killxswitch,e985mlt,democrats
"The signs in the House are fine. Settle yourself. Only the progressives deluded everyone about Florida governor. So far, the Democrats have flipped the two they needed to flip. Wait for NJ. We have 0% in one district there, 6% in another.",therecordcorrected,e977krm,democrats
"It looks like we'll have a divided congress. Not perfect, but I'll take it. And at least more districts turned back to blue in various states (as opposed to when they went red in 2016). Even if the state was still red, it's nice to see the pockets of blue. ",sadcoffee,e97bqkb,democrats
"still feels like 2016 to me. a few local races went the way i wanted but the overall legislative makeup hasn't changed and i still won't get healthcare. even if a dem-majority house impeaches trump, the senate has even MORE votes to bulldoze with - christ i don't even want to think about any more SCOTUS justices dying or retiring. we can't remove trump and he'll never resign. we can't get anything passed, at best all we can hope to do is block some bills which trump will just EO anyway. we'll have to shut down the government to stop his insane budgets and then we'll be the bad guys AGAIN come 2020. the whole country is irredeemably fucked.",NachoUnisom,e9809yj,democrats
"And just remember that the next round,  Republicans are having to defend more than Democrats. So we concentrate on fixing the house when we win and that'll translate to Senate wins later",Anthonym82,e97bqih,democrats
"not ""just bad luck."" cheating. there was known cheating in texas, known cheating in ND, known cheating in GA, who knows where else. and what are dems going to do about yet another round of open republican cheating? what CAN we do about it? fucking nothing.",NachoUnisom,e980142,democrats
Dems won the house,Bicit,e97y4na,democrats
Yep It's seriously criminal.,GregSirico,e97e5zv,democrats
"GA's governor-elect wiped the data from 2016 voting machines after they were subpoena'd for inconsistencies. he served as secretary of state, which is the person who oversees elections, which means he handled registrations and the final vote count. he purged hundreds of thousands of predominantly black democrat voters from the rolls, enforced a voter ID law regarding exact name matches that overwhelmingly disenfranchised black voters, any electoral misconduct on his part would obviously have gone ignored and ultimately he's the one whose word we have to accept as to whether he won his own race. he shouldn't have even been allowed to run without resigning his position first - otherwise it's like a tennis match where the referee is also one of the players.",NachoUnisom,e982kud,democrats
Oh man where do I begin? Some of the craziest cases of voter suppression.,GregSirico,e97h0xa,democrats
"I wonder if at the end of this midterm American redditors will still spout stuff about the 3million vote difference to act like half the country doesnt support Trump. It is time to accept that people who have seen who he is and know who he is, will still vote for him and the Dems need to figure something out to get some working class voters to look at them.",mrtomjones,e97aluo,democrats
The only good news is the big counties are still only reporting 50%+ so still hope,ObiWannaDoYou74,e976iw9,democrats
"Florida will elect an unqualified racist over a qualified black man because just as when Jeb Bush said when he ran, ""you have to run away from the black man to win."" Was born there, still have relatives there, and almost all are god damn racists. ",therecordcorrected,e976xre,democrats
"Dude, independents would not go black. Both my grandfathers in Florida died believing their would be a black/white civil war. Here I am like 12 or so looking at them and thinking about it and not going towards a future trumper but thinking, ""why and the hell would that ever happen?""",therecordcorrected,e97c97u,democrats
Assume you mean 50.5% is for the kick in the face.,killxswitch,e984i0c,democrats
 I think the Ohio Democratic party is lost... Why recycle Strickland (2016) and Cordray ???... Need new candidates with energy...,ShaunSJ85,e993jzo,democrats
Its so disgusting living there. The idiots who think mexican lawncutters are the reason they cant pay their mortgage ,schweeppe,e97ufyz,democrats
"Yes, remember Michael ""I will break you"" Grimm?",therecordcorrected,e97jivk,democrats
"/r/democrats does not allow the direct linking to external subreddits without the use of ""np"".  Please use http://np.reddit.com/r/<subreddit> when linking into external subreddits. 

The quickest way to have your content seen is to delete and repost with a corrected link.  

*I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/democrats) if you have any questions or concerns.*",AutoModerator,e98e7cs,democrats
"2 out of the 3 largest states don't have most or any results in, both heavily Democratic and you are talking about how close it is. Democrats are talking getting 13 out of the 23 in California.",therecordcorrected,e97au8y,democrats
"Chillax, we got this. ",Ahab1851,e97atf3,democrats
This.  It shouldn't have been this close.  ,StealthRUs,e97av1w,democrats
"Theres a difference between abandoning someone vs ""Democrats for Hogan"". The op-ed piece by Landow in the Sun was straight treasonous. 

This nugget is doing everything in his power to cripple our schools. These dummies don't realize that resolution a was in there because of fund misappropriation on his part. He is a wolf in sheep's clothing. 

This is why I have a real hard time convincing myself to register Dem.  If the state party doesn't come down on Floreen and her cohorts for this stunt, there goes all respect.  I am finally given candidates I am excited to vote for and they're left hanging. Thank God Elrich dominated.",thisisbasil,e97l390,democrats
"Don't be to sure.  I know a single Hispanic mother of 6, on welfare, who voted red.  I don't fucking get it",Jaxsan1,e97ebs1,democrats
"He came very very close though. That in itself in Texas is impressive. That it was a competitive race rather than a blow out is fantastic. Next time.

When can we officially call Texas purple? Now? Soon? Either way, it goes from red to purple to blue. Not straight red to blue. So I'm hopeful for the future of Texas. ",bumbiddlytake2,e97eyde,democrats
"I mean if he ran as a more moderate who didn’t oppose semi auto weapons (a death sentence in Texas) and if he had a more realistic view on illegal immigration, and the rapid demographics changes of TX in the past 25 years. Then he could have won. But the “let them in, and give us your guns” attitude is not a real stance in Texas.",moop_n_shmow,e97ev8t,democrats
"Texas voters are too conservative. If the same percentage of Hispanics voted as non-Hispanic, instead of the 20% turnout, Republicans would be getting their asses kicked.",therecordcorrected,e97ellp,democrats
No yet,Stupidiseverywhere,e97f856,democrats
"Here is your new Congresswoman from Virginia that beat the right-wing nut, David the Brat: https://abigailspanberger.com/

Here is your new Congresswoman from Virginia that won a district that has been red forever: https://elaineforcongress.com/

That's two more women in the House! Kick ass.",therecordcorrected,e97cub0,democrats
"Ugh, you're right. Mostly I'm frustrated because I just saw my state race results and I live in AL.",dolphins3,e97cwt5,democrats
I knew he had zero chance of winning.  To many dumbasses in this state,Jaxsan1,e97hk6q,democrats
If we impeach and remove Trump/Pence then we could have President Pelosi ,Brysynner,e97odx2,democrats
We shouldn't worry about impeaching drumpf because then we end with fucking pence 😷. We need to focus on finding a 2020 contender and blocking trumps racist policies..... Which is only slightly less difficult after tonight  😢,Awesometjgreen,e97g6o2,democrats
"Illinois, Michigan, Kansas, New Mexico were flipped blue",terminator_1264,e97iluq,democrats
"Colorado, Kansas. I think that might be it 😢",DatAEK971,e97hvmg,democrats
We're getting killed right now. Seems like 2016 all over again.,jharden10,e977sq2,democrats
"Yeah, I've seen people more energized about Beto than people in my own state when he's halfway across the country. I wasn't expecting him to win but I don't think this is the last we're ever going to hear of him.",trinitymonkey,e97djmx,democrats
I think even in losing Beto's campaign was worth it.  His high tide raised a lot of other democratic boats.,killxswitch,e985rfx,democrats
NBC says it's over and California not even counted.,therecordcorrected,e97d6dy,democrats
ITS DONE BOYS,LiteShowDaAgent,e97g2ia,democrats
Can confirm Florida is full of fucking morons. The only reason I loved to this humid hellhole from Massachusetts was because I had no money and thus had to stay with relatives.,DanteMGalileo,e97hmwm,democrats
"> Only the progressives deluded everyone about Florida governor.

i didn't think ""don't vote for the guy supported by neo-nazis"" was that delusional in a swing state, but okay. what about GA? that guy basically appointed himself governor, was it ""delusional"" to hope that the state that sent doug jones to the senate less than a year ago could stop an obvious conflict of interest and disenfranchisement?",NachoUnisom,e9810i0,democrats
"Sorry, I'm from Canada and not quite getting this. Google shows Republican as about 50% of the house votes, and Democrat as 44%, and then 23 votes undecided. Can you explain please?",hungrydruid,e97z2gd,democrats
"Because of the hurricane, the redneck riviera may have a low turnout.",therecordcorrected,e9784cr,democrats
"I hope so. This is truly ridiculous.
It's amazing to me how incompetent people are ",Awesometjgreen,e97821l,democrats
they think it would happen because they want it to happen.,NachoUnisom,e98niuf,democrats
I always LOL at that.,GregSirico,e984rv9,democrats
"Last time I heard that, we ended up with Trump.

I'll chillax when/if we flip a 23rd house seat.",trinitymonkey,e97b1ix,democrats
You might be eating the word close before the night is over.,therecordcorrected,e97e6uj,democrats
Single mother of 6 means she’s probably not too smart and prone to making poor decisions. That would explain it.,JimTokle,e97r6x4,democrats
"Agreed. I personally don't think it's quite at the purple stage yet, I'm withholding that label until Democrats actually start winning statewide races there.",overthinker356,e97fmmk,democrats
"Not really familiar with his stance on gun control, but I think his attitudes on immigration we're pretty critical in generating the Hispanic enthusiasm that carried him so far. I'm skeptical as to whether Texas is at a point where Democrats can actually gain significant wins in statewide contests though, the conservative base is just too strong. Beto definitely paved the way for that to change though, so we may see some interesting transitions there in the next set of elections.",overthinker356,e97g1tu,democrats
"So you want him to be just another spineless right/center-right appeaser?  That shit doesn't work.  It turns off Dem voters and Republicans just go ahead and vote for the Republican unless the challenger is a complete nutcase.

""Vote for me, I'm basically a Republican!"" is bullshit.  The only reason Beto got so close in ass-backwards Texas is because he inspired a ton of people with his progressive platform.",killxswitch,e985kg1,democrats
"Gillum Conceded, it's over there. As we move west things will get interesting",TheAmericanQ,e97gok7,democrats
You live in the state that Trump is 2nd most popular next to West Virginia. Manchin did win WV. That is why his vote for Kavanaugh was important once it was clear the Democrats couldn't get 2 Republicans. That is why he waited to the last minute to decide.,therecordcorrected,e97dcog,democrats
Louisiana isn't the best either,overthinker356,e97e2yh,democrats
Sounds good to me ,PunkZdoc,e97z8vs,democrats
Yeah hope is restored ,Stupidiseverywhere,e97gijd,democrats
Never mind then 😂. Well I'm just happy we have the house. Democrats need a new strategy though because it's clear that Republicans can do anything and their base will still support them,Awesometjgreen,e97jdqe,democrats
"Yes, the vote suppressor lost in Kansas. Won in Maine and Oregon too. Maine was a flip. Took the Senate in NY.",therecordcorrected,e97junw,democrats
Killed where?,therecordcorrected,e9785s8,democrats
Great stuff. I know everyone wanted the senate but I think we made decent progress tonight and be ready to go on the offense in 2020 when we’ll have an advantage.,ScentedShark,e97dty6,democrats
"Well done. Just flipped 2 in NJ, one in NY, 2 in Iowa, only lost 2 (as in flipped) all night so far.",therecordcorrected,e97g82q,democrats
Boys and girls. Men and women.,bumbiddlytake2,e97oro8,democrats
"I have been fortunate to play music for a couple weeks at a time in several parts. Love the land and atmosphere, and when you're a musician people are pretty friendly. But cheesus, when it comes to politics people in my home state look smart.",concreteblue,e97n6d1,democrats
You mixed them. Dems are at 50%+ votes,Bicit,e97z5vm,democrats
God forbid you think muslim people are people period. At least the homophobia has simmered down,schweeppe,e98bhdb,democrats
"Uh, that wasn't as the results were coming in.",therecordcorrected,e97cc42,democrats
"No he got Latinos to actually vote, but he made a ton of republicans vote because they saw he was a legitimate challenger. That’s not the same thing as winning over Texas voters. And it’s not ass backwards if its what the whole state believes has beloved and will belive in the future. A Democrat as a Texas senator would have been a huge win that could have helped shape the countries future. But who cares what the actual voters of the state want Texas Democrats better get in line with Washington and tow the company line regardless of if it’s shooting our party and nation in the foot. ",moop_n_shmow,e9868i1,democrats
Yep spoke way too soon. I wo der why though. It was close.,Stupidiseverywhere,e97gw0j,democrats
Oh I agree. It's just still really infuriating is all that voters here blindly support the government that makes this place so shitty.,dolphins3,e97dgqe,democrats
"No, if not for New Orleans...",therecordcorrected,e97fk99,democrats
"Agreed but they were still very close races, hopefully a candidate like Biden will be the difference in the tight races next election",terminator_1264,e97jmfq,democrats
"Indiana, Missouri, Florida",AlbertDalbertGore,e978ewb,democrats
What state are you from?,DanteMGalileo,e98a2qk,democrats
"Oh awesome =D Thank you, I'm an idiot!

I'm really happy for you guys. That's an awesome win, and thanks for the correction.",hungrydruid,e97z7bx,democrats
Has it?,GregSirico,e98bkgn,democrats
Texas voted for and elected Ted Cruz twice.  It's ass backwards by default.,killxswitch,e986hxf,democrats
"Dude republicans willingly support a party that fucks them over everyday. It's just mind blowing to me how incompetent 50% of our population is if someone could explain to me why universal health care, free public university, and social Security is bad I'll listen",Awesometjgreen,e97e2k2,democrats
"I see the 10 Commandments probably only won because state money  can't be used to defend it. So unless there is one hell of a go fund me or a sugar daddy, that will be the easiest case the ACLU will win. Shit, no money, no lawyer even. Summary judgement. That's risky because a judge could make the jurisdiction make them pay for the plaintiff's legal fees.",therecordcorrected,e97futp,democrats
"Florida? Shalala won. If you think Gillum was going to win, that is because you bought into the progressive's bullshit. If you know the day of the primaries in Florida, I can dig out my comment saying nominating a black candidate pretty much doomed the Democrats unless things changed in Florida in the last year. They haven't, no surprise. Missouri was a lost cause from go. If you people think blacks are going to win statewide unless they are appointed Republicans like Tim Scott, you are on drugs. ",therecordcorrected,e978p4s,democrats
Add Georgia to that list,jharden10,e978i3h,democrats
And Indiana? Who told you the Democrats had a snowball's chance in hell with Pence as VP?,therecordcorrected,e9795pt,democrats
"It's unfortunate though. Florida became a double Republican senate state, when it's always voting equally split. The other Republican pickups and are like ""how were there Dems there as incumbents?"" It sucks, but they're gone. 2020 will be a senatorial blood bath on Republicans. ",Bicit,e97zcs7,democrats
Yeah. Enough people have relatives climbing out of closets that its calmed down. Its hard to foster homophobia. Muslims though. You think thay each one singlehandedly caused 911. Too many street signs named in memory of people killed in the towers for that to fade out anytime soon ,schweeppe,e98bwwd,democrats
"I don’t care for Cruz either but slinging insults is not going to help. He was elected because 200,000 more people wanted his policies over Beto’s. That’s not that much, and it certainly could have been accomplished if he had run on platforms that were more realistic for Texans. Texas in not the north east, Texas is not California, it has it’s own issues and it deserves its own approach. Talking about gun control in a state with so many gun owners, and talking about more open immigration when democrat is are changing so much is just turning a blind eye to real voting issues. In Texas over the past 25 years Latino students have grown from 1.2 million to 2.8 million while the number of students of other races has not changed. Meanwhile Hispanics are now on track to be the largest racial group in Texas by 2022, but there are only 49,000 Hispanic teachers vs 250,000 white teachers. It’s important that we address this disparity in racial representation not only because as the left would say more diversity is better, but also because as the right would say, Hispanics should be contributing more to the education of Texas students. But to just say we should let more people in so they can strain our already at capacity education system is just not right, and it’s not going to win over people who live in Texas. Unless your strategy is honestly, let’s let so many Hispanics in that they will all vote Democratic, those tactics will not win Texas. And honestly if you do that it’s not Texas anymore. ",moop_n_shmow,e987k2s,democrats
"Um, Obama won Florida twice.  It wasn't out of the realm of possibility. But I supported Phillip Levine for that very reason.  He would've won this race.  ",StealthRUs,e97b254,democrats
Of course. You think people admit to being racist in polls? Not usually. Gillum is bringing Nelson to victory? He is going to cost him the race.,therecordcorrected,e97935s,democrats
"Honestly, would not be surprised to hear about voting fraud in the next few weeks. =/ Good luck in 2020, at least.",hungrydruid,e97zeqa,democrats
The halal guy making your food HAS NOTHING to do with those guys.,GregSirico,e98bzij,democrats
Obama wasn't going to be sitting in Tallahassee. ,therecordcorrected,e97bq60,democrats
been hearing about it already for months. didn't matter.,NachoUnisom,e98033c,democrats
Time to start some real investigations. ,Gsteel11,e97f99l,democrats
We're projected to win. We haven't won yet.,crystaltorta,e97fdsh,democrats
"Good. I'm happy, if a little disappointed we didn't do better tonight. This was a decisive win in the House, and it's time to stop the bleeding.

Next step is not letting them ram through endless bullshit in the lame duck.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e97kjcz,democrats
We've already won!,MonsterIt,e97jmdy,democrats
I was hoping O'Rourke would win. But it's nice to see Cruz sweat ,WillCle216,e97n0vg,democrats
No just No,LiquidSnape,e97l7jz,democrats
"if he couldn't win as a senator, what makes them think he could win as POTUS?",superfucky,e980vzc,democrats
Nice win?,RaiderDawg,e97v81e,democrats
Texas politics isn't indicative of national politics. ,noralily23,e982sgy,democrats
"Lincoln won the presidency two years after losing a senate race, anything is possible.",DatGameGuy,e98ai67,democrats
"1. Photos From Space + Maps: Territory of Guam, United States of America (USA), and Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands (CNMI), USA

    (a) http://chamorrobible.org/images/chamorrobibleproject/map-west-pacific-islands-1998.jpg 

    (b)  http://chamorrobible.org/images/chamorrobibleproject/map-guam-1991.jpg

    (c)  http://chamorrobible.org/images/chamorrobibleproject/map-commonwealth-of-the-northern-mariana-islands-1989.jpg

    (d)  http://chamorrobible.org/images/chamorrobibleproject/map-federated-states-of-micronesia-1999.jpg

    (e)  http://chamorrobible.org/images/chamorrobibleproject/map-oceania-2002.jpg

    (f)  Guam, USA, photographed from outer space on 30 December 2011: [4014 x 6021 pixels](http://chamorrobible.org/images/photos/gpw-201304-NASA-Philippine-Sea-Pacific-Ocean-Guam-20111230-huge.jpg)

    Source + Additional resolutions: http://chamorrobible.org/gpw/gpw-201304.htm

    (g)  Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, USA, photographed from outer space: http://chamorrobible.org/gpw/gpw-20040622.htm

    Source for #1: http://chamorrobible.org and http://chamorrobible.org/gpw/gpw.htm

2. Visit 

    https://np.reddit.com/r/worldpolitics/comments/6nnhnl/one_of_just_17_remaining_colonies_worldwide_guam/dkasdpl
",trot-trot,e970myz,democrats
YES!!! ,bella_sexual,e970sgz,democrats
"Mirror for the original submitted article: https://web.archive.org/web/20181106235125/www.postguam.com/news/local/guam-elects-first-female-governor/article_6486dd1c-e20d-11e8-b4d4-77f69f5763ef.html
",trot-trot,e98chfp,democrats
Beautiful as it is. ,usposeso,e96woi5,democrats
"I've got that flag as a bumper sticker.

I'm not a bumper sticker person.

I generally think they are overly reductive.

Impeach Trump.",Rakajj,e97i0zx,democrats
"This is how I spent my day, in between voting. I was driving past voting locations and honking the horn for several hours. 

I has a lot of people honk and thumbs up in support. I had one person give me a thumbs down. A few asked me to take a picture here and there. The citizens are woke",piaband,e96wwg4,democrats
"To be fair, I guess he does have to fuck America up completely before he can make it great again.",rahsftw,e97j37j,democrats
"Yeah you don't what to do that, you would probably get an STI. ",intelligentfolly,e9826gg,democrats
"Nice truck you got there. I remember getting flak from a certain conservative about how I can't continue to hold liberal views because they'll ban old cars for environmental reasons, and that I ""couldn't have it both ways"". In a past life, I swallowed a lot of GOP bullshit because I wanted to own a classic car in the future.",muh_v8,e98ndb2,democrats
"So much hate by a party that denounces hate, racism against whites from a party that is anti racism.  The real problems are inside the ones saying hateful things, no matter who is the recipient.  Saying Fuck Trump makes that person no better. ",qwerty123456uiop,e97ccxq,democrats
"Ya. It’s kind of true. The owner before me removed the catalytic converters. The thing stinks like it’s from 1988 (because it is). 

But it’s a lot of fun to drive and work on. I don’t put a lot of miles on it either so that’s how I justify it I guess. 

Thanks for the message. ",piaband,e98nn9q,democrats
Riiiiight. Just like your savior Trump. Shit on everyone and whine like a baby when they call you on it. ,piaband,e97cfbd,democrats
"Actually, saying Fuck Trump draws a clear line on where you stand in regards to society. One can safely assume that someone who says that is not in line with Trumps views. And since trump’s views towards women, minorities, and lgbtq citizens is one full of hate, it’s pretty easy to conclude the opposite from someone condemning him.",Lahrboy,e98clak,democrats
"Yeah, I couldn't imagine commuting with one. I don't know what you think about this, but I tend to justify my interest by the idea that cara that are over 30 years old make up a vanishingly small amount of vehicles on the road, and that I wouldn't be adding much in emissions by occasionally driving something that old. My perception might be skewed since I live in the rust belt, however. I am dedinitely open to owning a plug-in hybrid or battery EV as a commuter when I finally have the means.",muh_v8,e98p52q,democrats
"I totally agree. And I do own a hybrid that gets 40mpg. That's our commuter. 

I had a second hybrid but needed to trade that for a minivan. Kids, ya know? So I am conscious of my impact and I do try to err on the side of doing my best. ",piaband,e98paka,democrats
"The best solution is to draw the district lines without regard to the state boundaries, and assign that task to a computer.",AkiTendo,e98q0qb,democrats
right but who has the power to implement that? Is it a state by state thing that can be done at any time by the controlling party? ,Angusstewart14,e98t4xu,democrats
"It would require a constitutional amendment. It isn't happening. I said it was the best solution, not a possible solution.",AkiTendo,e98z1tw,democrats
"+1 for it’s a good start. I think a lot of people learned their lesson from 2016 about how important voting is. Democrats winning 30+ congressional seats and 7 governorships (Trump won Pennsylvania, Michigan and Wisconsin but they all elected democratic governors) is pretty significant considering their losses in ‘10, ‘14 and ‘16, low unemployment and the extent of the gerrymandering. The last 8 years it was looking like Dems would never regain the House. The senate was never realistic considering they had to defend 20+ seats compared to only a handful for the Republicans. It’ll be the opposite in two years. The point is if you wanted oversight  over Trump and the end of one party rule, you now have that. We’ll spend the next two years flooding the administration with investigations and look for a candidate who can win in 2020.",mbkthrowaway,e98cni0,democrats
A good start. ,ParkerIndustries616,e98bckk,democrats
"Dont ignore the state and local elections. It may not be the majority of governors, but we picked up a lot of governor seats from red states (even Kansas went for a Democratic governor)",begonetoxicpeople,e98bp92,democrats
"In a way I’m glad that Heitkamp, McCaskill, Tester, etc lost or are losing because they couldn’t stand with the Democratic Party as much for fear of losing their seats. On the other hand, I am extremely disappointed by the complete outcomes in Ohio and Florida and I think they are troubling omens. I’m glad we won Wisconsin and Michigan but I think Kansas will end up flipping back in four years so in my mind it doesn’t really say a lot. I’m most troubled by the Republican gains in the Senate as they now have full license to jam the courts with republican and religious sycophants that will undermine our entire policy agenda for the next 40+ years. Also, I think the Democratic House majority needs to be very careful about how they proceed with Trump, investigations, etc as people never give Democrats the same leeway they do with Republicans to grand stand using events like Benghazi, immigration, etc. I fear we are now in a position where our actions can create public opinions that guarantee a Trump victory in 2020 along with significant losses in the House and further losses in the Senate. ",notorious_p_a_b,e98f173,democrats
I think now it gets interesting. We are at the equivalent of the beginning of Watergate... which took two years. ,Autodidact2,e98gbfc,democrats
"I think we need more young blood. I feel like a lot of the close or lost senate races were with older, more rino dems. Perhaps more progressive candidates would have invigorated younger and unidentified (independent) voters. 

I know Beto was probably that dem, but that was a hard fought race regardless. The few senate races up for the grabs really were. There are probably a lot of ways to skin this cat. ",agentscarnation,e98q8gt,democrats
"I mean who knows, but that would be going even farther down a very dark road for the gop. ",Gsteel11,e98n014,democrats
"Dangerous precedent to set, but I worry about the lame duck period too. McConnell and the others have shown that there's really no depth they won't sink to if they feel they can get away with it politically.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e98lnaq,democrats
"Exactly, they're desperate, they know Trump's guilty as hell, and they don't care how blatantly evil they are.. I'm quite concerned with what diabolical schemes they can concoct. I know I'm talking about the Right like they're a Saturday Morning Cartoon villain, but they kind of... are at this point.

I mean shit Paul Ryan's probably scheming to dump oil in the Grand Canyon for the evulz at this very moment.",HawlSera,e98tog8,democrats
"The way they handled the Kavanaugh situation and the tone they've struck regarding the momentum the hearings gave Republicans are nothing short of parody. I'm not saying they're ALL doing shit just for the evulz in their own minds, but any reasonable person interprets their actions that way.

That SNL GOP locker room skit couldn't be more accurate.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e98ul7z,democrats
Well we got something. I just don't understand how we lost these governerships,Awesometjgreen,e97eihg,democrats
But we gained some so it's balanced pretty much,Anthonym82,e97fh2x,democrats
Not lost yet,Stupidiseverywhere,e97ff37,democrats
"Yes. The Senate, Beto and FL were always long shots. Overall results are good.

Oh, and the state pickups were really important. Locking in voter rights all over the country is how we fix things going forward.",brycebgood,e9848i9,democrats
"I HATE this chick! She is a prime example of how narcissistic people will always dodge and never answer a question that they know is making a point that they can’t argue with. She “doesn’t protest” because she “isn’t a victim.” Well, what if all our fore-sisters hadn’t protested for the right to vote? Or speak up? THEN would she have these rights now? No! But she doesn’t even think or care about about that...She is fed lines that any protester ever is a liberal snowflake that should stop 🙄 and parrots them without an ounce of thought. Well what if our forefathers had never protested against a country that many thought was great, Britain? Would we have an America that she holds so dearly now? No! This country was built on what she calls “whiners and temper tantrums and people that should just get over it.” What if the men that started the revolution had stopped whining and just got over it and accepted the taxation without representation because of all the great things Britain did offer and do? To me this just shows a very large lack of insight or critical thinking. Trevor did a great job of trolling her with it going over her head half the time 😂",She1Flies2Free3,e97rcyk,democrats
Outraged? Fucking quit you gutless cowards. But no. ,usposeso,e96wrck,democrats
Sure their are. ,red_carpet_hero,e973y6w,democrats
Is Pirro that nutcase that shouts at you from the news desk? ,cleatsurfer,e98nrg5,democrats
Yep,jamalwhite70,e98q95n,democrats
Honestly all we need is a young voter turnout. Only 12% of the total votes casted were casted by voters 18-30. Meanwhile 65% of votes casted were people above the age of 45. ,Doodoocabinet,e98nxo2,democrats
"Yes the fact that 100% of those under 30 didn't turn out is sickening, if you're under 30 and didn't vote yesterday you are a real piece of shit.",rapidski,e98ozr5,democrats
Russia needs to learn about time zones,bergerac121,e96lp90,democrats
"One of the scariest things is, they know how to make these things look realistic.",kerryfinchelhillary,e96rso1,democrats
Yeah um. We are not the ones who burn flags.,Medcait,e97i2lt,democrats
This is why you dont get as many replies from them after 2pm CST. they're not paid enough to work 2nd shift.,tacklebox,e96o8ba,democrats
"I would prefer they didn't. ;)

",BlankVerse,e96vme4,democrats
"You sure about that?

[https://redice.tv/a/c/n/15/33733flag\_burning\_large.ab94b306.jpg](https://redice.tv/a/c/n/15/33733flag_burning_large.ab94b306.jpg)",some_guy1e,e97qmmf,democrats
"Lol, finds a picture of a burning flag, says it’s the dems. It’s like these people have never gone to school or something. Let me go find a picture of a white man beating a black man and tell you the white is a republican. You see how dumb that sounds?",Lahrboy,e98cx2g,democrats
"Literally search up ""antifa burning american flag"" and you will find plenty more examples of leftists hatred towards America.",some_guy1e,e993jfe,democrats
">If the House tries to investigate people like Kavenaugh and Trump, could the Senate block that?

No.

>If Trump tries to fire Mueller or Rosenstein, is the House powerful enough to stop that?

Possibly. They can hold hearings and subpoena witnesses to air the issue in public.

>is the House enough to impeach

Impeachment begins in the House. The House votes on articles of impeachment. The Senate holds the impeachment trial, with the case prosecuted by House members.",wenchette,e98g2ek,democrats
"Cool, gatcha. Thanks!",EARink0,e98gbg6,democrats
Well it is talked about. I think there was a recent study and bernie discussed it quite a bit. ,Gsteel11,e98k402,democrats
[deleted],,e94te74,democrats
Make sure your ballot says Beto too when voting straight ticket!,ytman,e94wb5k,democrats
"Done!
",hippie_chic_jen,e955cy9,democrats
I think you should vote for any and all democratic candidates anywhere in US. The corrupt and racist  GOP needs to be routed at all levels.,captnspock,e94r43n,democrats
Going first thing tomorrow!!,Nerobus,e94zo6y,democrats
I guarantee there isn't a single Texan on this subreddit who needed a reminder that Beto is running :),weluckyfew,e954xvi,democrats
Did! Whole fam did!,Stupidiseverywhere,e94vj1a,democrats
Already did!,thetexasunicorn,e94uti7,democrats
"I did! First day of early voting. And for MJ, Lupe, Justin, and a slew of others!",Buddhagrrl13,e955etk,democrats
"Texas 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

[Check Your Voter Registration Status](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do)

",election_info_bot,e94zr01,democrats
"I am in Brazil. But if I could, I would vote for Beto.",SopaDeMolhoShoyu,e9533nd,democrats
Already done.,tele-caster-blast3r,e94y3ka,democrats
I did! And Colin Allred too! ,kthrynnnn,e94yk5l,democrats
"I did already. I can but hope that many, many others did, as well.",buchliebhaberin,e9519la,democrats
I’m in Texas! Just visiting though. I wish I could vote Beto. ,SmooveTaste,e955jgw,democrats
"Would if I was there, I'll just help get rid of Bruce Rauner in Illinois. He doesn't stand a chance against JB. ",Headstar24,e95b80b,democrats
"Not in Texas, but I just saw one of his campaign ads for the first time and realized it's pronounced bet-oh and not bay-toh... I would still vote for him if I could, though.",Belostoma,e94yvw1,democrats
Done! ✅🗳 Blue up and down the ballot! 🔵,georgecastillo9,e9530v3,democrats
I live in Indiana and I would vote Beto if I could,OldGrayMare59,e9526x0,democrats
Thank you Texas for voting blue. Hope it pays off. ,Dustin_Bromain,e95e46a,democrats
"I live in TX, not old enough yet to vote but convinced as many people as I could",1-800-meem,e95p790,democrats
I Voted for Beto (and all the democrats for that matter)! LETS GO TEXAS!,Feeling_Saucy,e95px60,democrats
Just voted for him ,fartwithmypantsdown,e95ql2q,democrats
I voted last week!! ,HotdogHTX,e95uk98,democrats
I live in Indiana.  I wish I lived in Texas so I could vote for Beto.,kdryan1,e95ho1l,democrats
Vote for Lindsey Fagan too if you live in Denton county,DakThatAssUp,e95hgkb,democrats
[removed],,e971ryy,democrats
Didn't register in time but my coworker let me know there was a chance I was still registered so I checked and sure enough I am. So as soon as I get out of work I'm going straight to the voting place and voting for Beto. Fuck Ted Cruz.. ,PunkZdoc,e95r0hp,democrats
Already have!,djjohse,e95kq5p,democrats
"Not only did I vote for him 2 weeks ago, I also got to MEET him at the poll 2 weeks ago :)",aidanc_,e95mzll,democrats
Make sure to Make America Great Again and vote for Ted Cruz,gayfrogs69,e96regx,democrats
[removed],,e959tns,democrats
[removed],,e959q9z,democrats
VOTE CRUZ,cheerioz1,e96m4y1,democrats
[removed],,e95iorf,democrats
[removed],,e95bo6a,democrats
[removed],,e94yre6,democrats
#Good Job!,backpackwayne,e94tmwt,democrats
Whoa and Mike Collier please,portrayaloflife,e95bmoq,democrats
"To be fair, you can't blame certain people for voting Republican. Take Bob Menendez in New Jersey, for example. The public is rightfully wary of reelecting him.",Tempus_Wolf,e951ox7,democrats
[removed],,e94x903,democrats
[removed],,e94ts1x,democrats
"Pete Sessions must be spooked, he has been running nonstop ads against him. ""Colin Allred is All Wrong!""",DakThatAssUp,e95hfx0,democrats
I thought it was BEE-toh haha,WorldController,e952z9y,democrats
"The Spanish T is like a soft D. Sometimes using a TH sound is close, too. 

When you’re making a T or D sound, make the tip of your tongue flat. Like a baby saying DADA or TATA. 

The Homer Simpson “D’oh!” is close to the syllable of Beto.

I’m a Tejana and grew up speaking both Spanish and English. ",QueenOfTheQuokkas,e95fc7q,democrats
"Too bad you don't apply the same standards as a reason for voting for Cruz.

The guy is lies left and right, but that  better than a ""lie of omission?""

One year he says Trump is a pig and now he is practically sucking his dick. So quit pretending your vote came out of some noble rationalization. We are not buying it for a second.

",backpackwayne,e9729tx,democrats
Don't cry please. ,Aedeus,e95c3le,democrats
Bad bot. ,Aedeus,e95c2gm,democrats
"You’re not wrong, but unfortunately party politics tends to corner people’s opinions no matter how reasonable they are. No one is going to accomplish anything singlehandedly in Congress. Sometimes you have to bite the bullet and vote for the dickhead who is opposing the worse dickhead. Yours is just not an optimal voting strategy in our “first past the post” system.",nofaprecommender,e95yo8c,democrats
Bad bot.,Aedeus,e95c2c2,democrats
"Good one, comrade.",Belostoma,e94yy07,democrats
Fake news brah,DerekStu,e94zc4o,democrats
https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/beto-o-rourke-campaign-funds-migrants/,hollidays24,e9526p1,democrats
What's wrong with helping the needy? ,WorldController,e9530vd,democrats
"Luckily,  ppl have figured out that Hugin is worse",Fiery1Phoenix,e95gxju,democrats
"It’s sad that in our current environment democrats can’t also be held accountable, but that’s just how it works when your fighting against corrupt fascists. Primary out the wrong democrats but there’s no moral victory in not voting for the dem in the general, no matter who it is. Right now really the only option is supporting a dem or being complicit with fascism. That’s it.",backtoreality00,e968nbc,democrats
He’s still better than any Repuke ,RecallRethuglicans,e964v16,democrats
"It's got to be party line this time and the next time at the very least. Any republican win adds to GOP's control and strangle hold. You think the current republicans will appoint better judges than Democrats? lol

Reminder Trump called a sitting US judge unfit and Mexican because of his skin color.

Reminder they support people like Joe Arpaio and kavanaugh

Edit: Guys, I get it you guys vote for judges. It was something in response to the comment above but worded awkwardly. ",captnspock,e94z0t9,democrats
What kind of balance do you think the GOP in its current iteration is capable of providing?,Blocked_ID,e94uu86,democrats
So you prefer a certain amount of racism and corruption??  How is that a positive thing for America?,MostSensualPrimate,e94u6y0,democrats
"[Jfc](https://i.imgur.com/m28Ybdp.jpg)


/r/enlightenedcentrism",Lucifer_Sam_Cyan_Cat,e957iga,democrats
Yep! It brings me immense joy :),kthrynnnn,e95hgtz,democrats
I'm not a bot ;),TheConnvictV2,e9cgm7c,democrats
"Are you sure about that? Because I am 99.97317% sure that TheConnvictV2 is not a bot.

---

^(I am a neural network being trained to detect spammers | Summon me with !isbot <username> |) ^(/r/spambotdetector |) [^(Optout)](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=whynotcollegeboard&subject=!optout&message=!optout) ^(|) [^(Original Github)](https://github.com/SM-Wistful/BotDetection-Algorithm)",WhyNotCollegeBoard,e95c36i,democrats
"Worse than a child molester? That's too far even for me, man. ",Grandmaspelunking,e96r5rg,democrats
We don’t appoint judges in Texas. You vote the judges in. ,Machismo01,e9535l7,democrats
You don’t know how judges work apparently. ,Eric_Partman,e95qidi,democrats
"None. 

The answer is none...",PraxisLD,e94vlj2,democrats
Thats bs,Fiery1Phoenix,e96vkpd,democrats
"https://www.nj.com/opinion/index.ssf/2017/11/the_bob_menendez_case_a_double_standard_for_dems.html

Your party affiliation is impairing your judgement. ",Grandmaspelunking,e96wl8p,democrats
"They do that based on what areas have/haven’t reported. 1% of the vote was counted there, I imagine it was not likely to be a close race",BobTheBarbarian,e97qqr1,democrats
"There was a couple old men in line behind me talking about how Fox News is the only real news and just repeating the same old stuff when I looked back I seen a lot of people shaking their heads and chuckling I'm hoping that was a good sign, my fingers are crossed",Jimbojauder,e961vxm,democrats
"My polling place had no I Voted stickers. I'm irrationally upset about that, but I DID VOTE!",speedycat2014,e962z4e,democrats
"Well they do, republicans have tried increasingly to take away voting rights of minority’s ",nickzahn0212,e96167s,democrats
"sorry no sticker no vote that's just the way it works 😂😂, joking aside I'm very sorry they didn't have stickers at your polling place my disappointment for you is immeasurable and my day is ruined",Jimbojauder,e963e2p,democrats
That’s probably a good thing.  They ran out so higher than normal expected turnout,spzcb10,e972tlx,democrats
[removed],,e968nfa,democrats
"THAT'S WHAT I SAID! Forget the voting irregularities man, if I don't get a sticker I'm pretty sure my vote never went in. 😞😎 

Thank you kindly for your immeasurable disappointment on my behalf.",speedycat2014,e963rpd,democrats
Nope minority’s ,nickzahn0212,e96932h,democrats
"Not to rub it in your face but I got two stickers, I'm a gosh darn voting dynamo I voted the hell out of this election",Jimbojauder,e96421m,democrats
"Work on trying to find a solution to election issues such as the machines, security, disenfranchisement and surperssion ",bergerac121,e98i5le,democrats
"Duckworth sure, Gabbard no.",randomaccessvagaries,e98t7qx,democrats
"Gabbard is a fraud. 
",VegaThePunisher,e98xnlq,democrats
Why no on Gabbard?,dbcaliman,e98uty3,democrats
"Inconsistent history on LGBT and abortion rights, Assad and Putin apologist, fundamentally an opportunist.",randomaccessvagaries,e98vxed,democrats
"Kansas and Wisconsin governorships. 
",VegaThePunisher,e984qgd,democrats
Why those?,skorpian1029,e98c02g,democrats
"We all hope he wins, Texas needs a change in Senate ",Blondyisit,e96i3xx,democrats
"Wrong. 

They won't turn on Trump until someone else starts making them even more angry by placing more blame on others. ",MaritimeOliver,e96besm,democrats
"His policies already personally affect them, though.  They just don't care as long as they get things they care about in exchange.",gothmog,e96e7kd,democrats
"Makes sense, because that mindset is all about “me me me”.",Medcait,e97inwr,democrats
People don't care about being oppressed as long as they retain the ability to oppress others HARDER. ,doyoueven-no,e96way9,democrats
"Well yeah, it’s called a lack of empathy. 
",VegaThePunisher,e96d4d7,democrats
This is partially true.,red_carpet_hero,e96bslg,democrats
They need a few more gunmen chasing down their kids and the housing market/stock market to crash. ,neuropat,e97d5eg,democrats
"I just voted for the first time at 33. It felt incredible. My situation was a little different, I spent a lifetime in a cult that preached neutrality in elections, but it still felt great to cast a vote against the GOP and actually take my place in society for the first time. The Dems will have a life long voter in me until the GOP is crushed and burned to the ground for treason and we get an actual left wing party in the USA with a chance. ",CrispySkin_1,e96gv0o,democrats
"Great job getting out there. 

Do you foresee yourself continuing to vote after this or the next election?",MaritimeOliver,e962dqo,democrats
👏👏👏👏👏👍👍👍👍👍💙💙💙💙💙,red_carpet_hero,e96c17c,democrats
👏👏👏👏👏👍👍👍👍👍💙💙💙💙💙,red_carpet_hero,e96c1gn,democrats
Better late than never!!,miketeeeveee,e96jywp,democrats
Tennessee has a great sticker!,kerryfinchelhillary,e96r64k,democrats
"Let this not be your last time, friend. 🖖",SavageCandie,e972tpe,democrats
"Definitely. With Trump I seen how quickly democracy, and values that the majority of Americans hold dear, can quickly unravel. 

I fear for the direction my country is heading into now, and I hope to help it turn in a positive direction. ",Obandigo,e9631lo,democrats
"Cool. Well, welcome to the world of voting! ",MaritimeOliver,e963ngp,democrats
"Good job, stay voting. We need all the first time voters to come at it with this mindset. Once you vote, you always wanna vote again forever. It feels good!",OmarIsaiahBetts,e97l3dj,democrats
There is no one yet. Better to try to form legislation and whip up votes. ,VegaThePunisher,e984ofz,democrats
"We should give the reigns to someone young and bold. Maybe AOC, or Ro Khana. Someone bold.",H-E-L-L-M-O,e9860u2,democrats
"Broadly speaking, yes, I think it's time for Pelosi, Hoyer, and Clyburn to pass the torch.

Not this instant, though. Give them a couple years to make the transition.",randomaccessvagaries,e98tn2q,democrats
Nope let Nancy lead for another 2 years,LiquidSnape,e989kul,democrats
I'd rather not - but I don't know who else is qualified. Whoever does it will be a demonized by Faux News within 3 months.,AkiTendo,e98azq3,democrats
Name a speaker from the cable news era who was not demonized from one side or the other ,LiquidSnape,e98swa5,democrats
#NOW!!!!!,backpackwayne,e96u1sh,democrats
"Cautiously optimistic with the exit polling, but EVERYONE needs to get the fuck out there before polls close. Even people who may not be as passionate as we all are, trust us, it's worth your while...",OmarIsaiahBetts,e96ui6t,democrats
Damn right. We need to put a stop to this unbridled attack on our democracy. It is imperative! ,backpackwayne,e96ul3n,democrats
Russian trolls are always posting memes about this on subreddit.,wenchette,e9636bo,democrats
Mexico has it,castleberry12,e9765xf,democrats
[removed],,e96o027,democrats
"I don't either as long as it's phased in slowly, as in over the course of ten years.

I also strongly support having a true national ID card with #. Your Social Security Number is your de facto national ID # and it was never designed for such, so it's rather stupid and a huge security risk as we saw with the equifax hack.",AkiTendo,e96r9i7,democrats
[removed],,e96r6qz,democrats
God damn third party fucked it up,ForeverTheNo1se,e97qu67,democrats
This is why you don't vote third party when one major party is completely off its rocker. Shit like this happens.,DanteMGalileo,e98b6qj,democrats
"Man, I want a multi party system but it just isn’t possible right now. No amount of throwing candidates at the wall and having 1-5% of voters vote for them will change that. If you’re going to vote green, please strongly reconsider and understand that these candidates are costing us elections left and right. 

If Jill Stein wasn’t on the ballot in 2016, Clinton would’ve won the rust belt. It just fucking sucks because even the Green Party isn’t getting anything out of being the spoiler party. They’re fucking themselves and the democrats, handing the election to the republicans on a silver platter.",davinator401,e98n6hs,democrats
Thanks Green Party.,evolutionfan,e982wgt,democrats
Their efforts must have worked on me. I voted for Democrats for the first time in my life and I’m proud to have done so. ,iwascompromised,e95xqjt,democrats
No wonder I got such a crap raise.,jlhouse36,e95rmca,democrats
These old fucks need to go.,Stupidiseverywhere,e95pyhx,democrats
Facebook has 99%,Worsebetter,e95wnp4,democrats
"Their bull doesn't impact me. Republicans can't tell a truth to save their dark, evil souls. I would die before I cast a vote for this vile party.",MurphysDream,e95unli,democrats
Are these assholes the reason my mailbox has been filling up with Republican propaganda the past few months?,reereejugs,e96wz6c,democrats
"I wonder if they are aware of the part of my personality that makes me say ""FUCK YOU, YOU SHRIVELED COCKSUCKERS!"".",12rjc12,e972tff,democrats
"Wouldn't surprise me one bit, actually.  This shit could easily be used for a private version of China's totalitarian ""social credit"" system.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e95rr0i,democrats
"What need to go are the profiles they've built.  Somehow that information needs to disappear, and the methods they used to develop it need to be blocked off.

If those profiles aren't already in the hands of this country's enemies, they inevitably will be.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e95r5tf,democrats
"Facebook's algorithms blindly target value-maximization for the company.  Which is destructive enough as it is.

But this is apparently aimed by the Kochs' personal agenda at achieving *political* objectives.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e95y3rw,democrats
"Ah, but ""micro-targeting"" works in subtle ways too.  It can insinuate messages to Democrats that discourage action and encourage surrender, promote weak words over strong ones, convince us to focus on a less potent issue over a more potent one.

Micro-targeting is very effective, because it's cumulative.  Even if nobody personally surrenders, if everyone adds a tiny bit of backstep, it adds up to a desperate retreat by the time it adds up over millions.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e95uyh9,democrats
Agreed,Stupidiseverywhere,e95rvos,democrats
"It can also be used to divide us in multiple ways. Politically, racially, socially. Division and chaos is what our enemies want. ",beerfist,e95xcq1,democrats
"I know this is old news from 2017, but I just heard that she passed away last year. I think she's a shining example of human determination and why it's important to vote. ",Bemuzed,e96nzqu,democrats
He didn't know she voted Republican. ,Northernrebel56,e96phse,democrats
"He still won twice. 

Made trumpies cry. ",VegaThePunisher,e96r30x,democrats
"There were no ""trumpies"" at the time.",Northernrebel56,e96w9dy,democrats
Same thing. They were called wingnuts. ,VegaThePunisher,e96xshu,democrats
You got the tds bad buddy.,Northernrebel56,e9775r4,democrats
"No, that’s just wingnut projection.
",VegaThePunisher,e977evy,democrats
"No. He may be VP material, but he's just not qualified to be President nor deal with Trump.",clownunist,e97jfqs,democrats
Not at all ,LiquidSnape,e97l8gl,democrats
"No, but we haven't seen the last of him.",-dank-matter-,e97lgtn,democrats
i don’t know if he can or will run. All I know is I hope he does.,rmourz,e97jbmh,democrats
no. ,labormarket,e97m69f,democrats
It's too soon. He needs to build his national profile even more first,Anthonym82,e97ymqz,democrats
In my opinion it makes it a lot less likely since he can’t win his own state.,Doodoocabinet,e97iz3q,democrats
"He'd do in a pinch, but there are better options out there.",randomaccessvagaries,e98tw8c,democrats
"Beto is not someone  I would be as excited to support as someone on the more progressive side. I was very disappointed by Beto's debates against Ted Cruz. The guy just isn't tough enough to push back against Republicans. Ro Khana, Liz Warren, Bernie Sanders, Nina Turner, and Tulsi Gabbard know how to beat Republicans' shitty debate tactics. Beto was a pretty face with some decent policies. I'd take the real deal over Beto any day. Still devastated he lost Texas tho D=",H-E-L-L-M-O,e986h4v,democrats
What makes Trump qualified to be President? That quality in a Presidential candidate sailed two years ago when Trump won. ,mycondishuns,e987yt7,democrats
"since when does this country care about POTUS actually being qualified? it's not that beto's not qualified, it's that he won't fucking win.",superfucky,e980zab,democrats
To be fair if he's not qualified to be President then he's not qualified to be VP either. A VP must be ready to take over at a moments notice.,-dank-matter-,e97liht,democrats
"Uhm, what? 

At this point anyone could be president. ",blackguardly,e98o104,democrats
"To be fair, I don’t even think 2008 Obama could have won Texas. He did better than anyone would have thought possible a year ago",rmourz,e97jar5,democrats
"He lost Texas by 2.6 points. Cruz won last time by 16. Just because he didn't win deep red Texas doesn't mean he can't win on a national stage. Dems need an uplifting, *YOUNGER*, person to step up. Biden and Bernie are too old, Elizabeth is too far left, and the rest of the field doesn't have the name recognition Beto has. Jesus, this subreddit is negative, and I just found it.",mycondishuns,e988443,democrats
He cheated. Period. ,clownunist,e98d8mr,democrats
Slow him down.  Investigate.,evolutionfan,e97hceo,democrats
How is Cruz the winner is all votes are not in yet?,Stupidiseverywhere,e97hljr,democrats
"Do exactly what the Republicans did to Clinton in the 90s minus impeachment talk. Just wear down the administration with investigations, subpoenas and hearings.",mbkthrowaway,e97jg05,democrats
Will they still be able to build the wall? ,Doodoocabinet,e97i23a,democrats
"All they can do is investigate, but this will just jazz up his base even more for a Trump landslide victory in 2020.",starman09,e97hg2c,democrats
Apparently because its not mathematically possible for him to catch up now according to my coworker but i still hope he gets it somehow,Roseandwolf,e97ho77,democrats
Around trump sure,Roseandwolf,e97i2qz,democrats
Riiiight,ScentedShark,e97lh16,democrats
Same,Stupidiseverywhere,e97hyzv,democrats
Will this hault boarder walls? ,Doodoocabinet,e97i5pq,democrats
Yes there was never going to be any border wall,Roseandwolf,e97i8ap,democrats
"Yeah, I was totally amazed at how the media went along with that inflammatory language. Are all pur journalists really that craven?",GrouchyMcGrouch,e96xoht,democrats
Is this an out-of-season april fools joke?,ajqualix,e98fbug,democrats
Even then they won’t do it. There was a piece about how Midwestern farmers are getting their asses handed to them because of trump’s trade war and the farmers interviewed in that article said they still support him. ,mbkthrowaway,e96wghr,democrats
This is incorrect. Even if they are impacted personally by Trump's policies they simply will bend over and take it in the rear and say more please. ,red_carpet_hero,e9741fw,democrats
It is affecting them they are just too brain dead stupid to realize they are getting shafted.,rapidski,e96xl7g,democrats
"https://www.washingtonpost.com/business/economy/senate-passes-sweeping-farm-bill-setting-up-fight-with-house/2018/06/28/0007d532-7aff-11e8-80be-6d32e182a3bc_story.html

Sure Farmers will because they will receive subsidies, 
But just wait until they cut Social Security, Medicare and Medicaid, 9 of the heaviest poor Republican states which consume the most of these, will they feel the same? ",walter1950,e96xhf5,democrats
Fraid so. ,jamalwhite70,e98jwyg,democrats
"I'm trans.

The turnip can go fuck himself.",DanteMGalileo,e98bb5l,democrats
Looool turnip,throwthisshitawayacc,e98qlrp,democrats
Muslim here. I stand with you,Stupidiseverywhere,e97fcef,democrats
"Scott Walker, Mia Love, and Dave Brat are also losing. Races not yet called though.",wenchette,e97h7w7,democrats
“no person shall be convicted without the Concurrence of two-thirds of the Members present”. Article 1 section 3,Doodoocabinet,e97iuki,democrats
He's winning?,Stupidiseverywhere,e97kurl,democrats
"Tonight is proving to be a good night. Not great (Florida, senatorial seats, some governorships) but definitely good. My favorite part: we have subpoena power!!!",AlexKingstonsGigolo,e97hgqd,democrats
Thrilling. Impeachment =/= conviction. I never said otherwise.,AlexKingstonsGigolo,e97jggr,democrats
You still need senate majority to impeach trump.,Doodoocabinet,e97hzgw,democrats
"Incorrect; the United States Constitution provides that the House of Representatives ""shall have the sole Power of Impeachment"" (Article I, section 2).",AlexKingstonsGigolo,e97i4gf,democrats
"They have the power to impeach- but impeachment is just the accusation. The Senate wod then basically act as a jury, with the Supreme Court (or maybe just the chief justice, I dont remember) presiding over the trial.",begonetoxicpeople,e97j3fe,democrats
"While you are correct, I never said otherwise.",AlexKingstonsGigolo,e97jfpd,democrats
[removed],,e9509kp,democrats
They should rename the presidential unit of the super-max federal penitentiary where Donald Trump ends up in after President Barrack Hussein Obama.,jackredrum,e94triv,democrats
"No president is perfect, but damn if Trump isn't one of the worst I've ever seen in my history of being alive.",RadioMelon,e95ng8t,democrats
[removed],,e95wplx,democrats
[removed],,e97726l,democrats
History is not going to look kindly on the cruelty this administration is perpetrating against migrants. It is unbelievable that there are people who are willing to go along with this. It's like we've learned nothing from the  horrors of the 20th century. The apathy is mind-boggling.,GrouchyMcGrouch,e94zujl,democrats
"This is true. 
Yes Obama made some mistakes, like any human being.

However, most of the blame goes towards Mitch McConnell. Since McConnell made the comment to not work with Obama. See Merrick Garland. 

Trump will be viewed as the worst, most vile person to have been elected as President of United States of America. 

",red_carpet_hero,e96dsak,democrats
Truth!!!,SverigeEllerByst,e9560xp,democrats
What legacy has Obama left behind?? What did he actually do for America besides destroy it beyond repair? ,KingNothing78,e99na6g,democrats
[removed],,e959k0s,democrats
[removed],,e94u30t,democrats
"I don't think anyone here agrees with everything Obama did, but I think he did more good than bad.",kerryfinchelhillary,e95o9gn,democrats
Agreed. The executive branch has way too much power.,Tempus_Wolf,e953vlv,democrats
"Wow!! Did he really??? 

Was this ever reported on?? How did you hear about it??",VegaThePunisher,e950vm6,democrats
[deleted],,e95wu72,democrats
More harm than good? You must be smoking that good shit. ,VegaThePunisher,e977gk4,democrats
History will not look kindly on how Drumpf store the White House ,RecallRethuglicans,e96511h,democrats
"Certainly in the past 100 years or so. 
",VegaThePunisher,e96dydh,democrats
Are you on medication?,VegaThePunisher,e99nbcn,democrats
"psst... more people are droned now... get a clue... 

",VegaThePunisher,e959udv,democrats
"Bank bailout was under Bush, son.

Learn history before you speak. 

Obama saved the economy. 

",VegaThePunisher,e94ua59,democrats
"The bank bailout was necessary to stabilize the economy. No one really wanted to pass that bill, but they had to. Perhaps you should study the history behind that bill before criticizing it.",Tempus_Wolf,e953q8b,democrats
[removed],,e951un3,democrats
[removed],,e95x210,democrats
No more than you are ,KingNothing78,e9b07l9,democrats
[removed],,e959y8r,democrats
"Correct, he onlysigned on to the bailout as a senator.

Also:

IRS targets Obama’s enemies
Benghazi
Spying on the AP
The ATF “Fast and Furious” scheme
Sebelius demands payment
The Pigford Agriculture Department Scandal
The General Services Administration Las Vegas Spending Spree.
Veterans Affairs in Disney World and neglecting vets
Solyndra
New Black Panthers Voter Intimidation
The hacking of Sharyl Attkisson’s computer
Obama’s LIES about the Affordable Care Act
“I’ll Pass My Own Laws”
NSA Spying on American People
Lack of solidarity with Israel
Disaster with the Arab Spring
Crimea
Leaving Iraq too soon and letting ISIS take over
Handling of Syrian Red Line
Calling ISIS “JV”
Failing to Recognize ISIS as a Radical (or Devout) Muslim Movement
Returning the bust of Churchill to the Brits
Lack of Confidence by NATO nations
Signing a Disastrous Nuclear Deal with the Mullahs of Iran
 Paid $5 Billion & Released 5 Taliban Prisoners For Deserter Bergdahl
Waging war by attacking Libya without Congressional approval
Allowed the building of Chinese bases in the South China Sea and off the coast of Somalia at the entrance to the gulf of Aden
Paying ransom to Iranian for hostages- and using foreign currency in unmarked plane
Housing policies failed to stop foreclosures
Price of healthcare has drastically risen for those purchasing it
Education policies failed to curb college costs
Highest percentage of Americans on Food Stamps and Medicaid, ever.
",mudlarker84,e94uy8x,democrats
[removed],,e9541c4,democrats
Holy shit!!! Dude!! You figured it all out!!,VegaThePunisher,e95215m,democrats
[deleted],,e95y1ys,democrats
"So who are you political thought leaders?



",VegaThePunisher,e95a0ql,democrats
"All of that is rightwing brain diarrhea, you poor fool.

We promise to get you idiots some better education once we rip out this current shit government. 😝 ",VegaThePunisher,e94wnrw,democrats
This is extremely hard to read. Have you heard of punctuation and formating?,Stun_Tzu,e952j05,democrats
"Interesting thing about that ""$5 Billion paid to Iran."" We froze their bank account. It was their money. With the signing of the Iran Deal we unfroze their money. So you can argue in the worst way that we paid them. ",Stun_Tzu,e952rbo,democrats
"Do you know how long Trumps version of this would be? It would be four times as long in a quarter of the time. 

I’m surprised you didn’t add Dijon mustard on there or brown suit. ",underbridge,e94z01r,democrats
Bailout was under Bush.  You country must have shitty mechatronic degrees. ,VegaThePunisher,e954ket,democrats
[removed],,e955o62,democrats
[removed],,e95y71q,democrats
[removed],,e95y9by,democrats
[removed],,e95a49n,democrats
I like how you just keep trying to insult people who have a different opinion of you. ,jonlaw1990,e9512un,democrats
"Mechatronics engineer, so yeah...I'll pass. Someone else would be better served by it.",mudlarker84,e94x0of,democrats
[removed],,e952qxi,democrats
[removed],,e954uqs,democrats
"Whoa!!! Mind —-> Blown!!

Are you immortal???
",VegaThePunisher,e955v6x,democrats
[deleted],,e95yfe9,democrats
[deleted],,e95ye86,democrats
"Tulsi Gabbard has never accomplished anything. And you can squeal about drone attacks and then like Nicki Haley. Ron Paul at least stood by his ideals, which were fantastical and absurd. His son is a straight up fraud.

You should just say you are not sure what you believe.

Obama demonstrated real leadership and accomplishment.


You people you cited are hypocrites and do-nothings.

",VegaThePunisher,e95a7qh,democrats
"It’s not a “different opinion”, dear.

It’s a steaming pile of horseshit.

So no, that deserves no quarter.
",VegaThePunisher,e9523ya,democrats
"Sure you are, trumpie. 

Just like your orange baboon messiah is a “man of the people”.

",VegaThePunisher,e94x4e3,democrats
"Blocking criticism by dismissal? So I shouldn't believe anything in there, since it can be easily dismissed as a shitpost?",Stun_Tzu,e952vo4,democrats
"It means if you are this simple, you shouldn’t be trusted in design or execution. 
",VegaThePunisher,e954y3t,democrats
[removed],,e95ytxj,democrats
[removed],,e95ykp3,democrats
[removed],,e95a9z9,democrats
What’s with the “son” and “dear” comments? Does it really make you feel big to be so obviously belittling? ,HarpoMarks,e9562ld,democrats
"I’m sure any opinion except yours is probably horse shit. I bet anyone who disagrees with you it’s probably hateful, hostile, and a racist.  ",jonlaw1990,e9563k9,democrats
"Not a Trumpie, not even American. Just tired of sycophantic bipartisanship really. Don't you ever get bored of it? I'm a flip-flop voter in my own country. I hate all of them currently, so I'll probably donkey vote for the piano tuner's union or something this year.

Whether you want to believe it or not, Obama was a wall street guy. Oh and thanks Bush Jnr; I made a tonne on the FOREX off the sub-prime crisis.",mudlarker84,e94xda1,democrats
[removed],,e952xa7,democrats
[removed],,e9555le,democrats
[deleted],,e95z1hm,democrats
[deleted],,e95yqen,democrats
"Don’t deflect.

Obama accomplished more in a few years than all the people you cited, combined.
",VegaThePunisher,e95abxz,democrats
"Why do you ask, sparky?",VegaThePunisher,e956i26,democrats
Why do you make such broad assumptions?,VegaThePunisher,e958f7z,democrats
"No, you are a trumpie. You are carrying his water in your comment history, son. Accept your orangeness. 

Knew automatically you weren’t American because we don’t have “mechatronics” here. 



And no one gives a shite what you are tired of. 

You can just leave or delete your account if a meme hurts your delicate sensibilities.

Not our fault that you don’t believe in anything. 
",VegaThePunisher,e94ynd0,democrats
Ew. No wonder you don't like the meme. You don't understand the human being part.,duskrat,e94xrp9,democrats
You took time to find and copy this copypasta and that's how you respond? Have you even read it?,Stun_Tzu,e95315r,democrats
"Sure it did. Just to me, though.

Because again... 
",VegaThePunisher,e9558rk,democrats
[removed],,e95yz0m,democrats
[removed],,e95afvc,democrats
why do you think there isn’t mechatronics in the states lol,paperrug12,e9523eh,democrats
[removed],,e9537gs,democrats
"Um, the economy is trending at the same rate. 

Even the gains in the market keep getting lost because of the trade war. And job creation is down.

You simply don’t know what you’re talking about. 

Obama created more jobs in the last two years than trump did in his first two. Obama also doubled the Dow Jones.

Any changes to the Affordable Care Act were due to the Republicans, who after 10 years still have not offered the better alternative that they promised.

You demonstrated a huge amount of ignorance of history and then you make demands. It’s quite hilarious. 

",VegaThePunisher,e95awac,democrats
Wouldn’t it be mechanical engineering??,VegaThePunisher,e9529p1,democrats
So why are you bothering to visit a political subreddit? You don't present facts and openly admit to not reading a copypasta in its entirety before posting it. You could also argue that Obama has virtue. But your blanket statement does stifle conversation.,Stun_Tzu,e953qce,democrats
So you posted a bunch of lies like a bloviating idiot and took zero responsibility?,VegaThePunisher,e954ho4,democrats
[removed],,e95plmi,democrats
"mechanical engineering is such a broad area of study that there are several specialties, one being mechatronics.",paperrug12,e9555ap,democrats
[removed],,e95437s,democrats
[removed],,e954mgf,democrats
Can you back that claim up with anything at all? Just one source? Anything other than belittling comments? ,HarpoMarks,e9565xy,democrats
"Um, the Stimulus, the ACA, Immigration policy (DACA) are just a few.

Not much there? Most of the ACA is still in effect because it’s law.

Again, you are proving you have no fucking clue what you are talking about.

You are definitely young because you just proved you have never purchased your own health insurance.

",VegaThePunisher,e95q125,democrats
cool,VegaThePunisher,e9557z0,democrats
"No, you are trumpie too cowardly to admit it and believe in nothing. ",VegaThePunisher,e954in6,democrats
"But you pointed out earlier that some of your information may be false, so you're creating a false narrative to equate both sides as equal. That's not pointing out hypocrisy, that's creating a false narrative to get a rise out of people.
So I guess you accomplished your goal?",Stun_Tzu,e954jpp,democrats
"This is not a legal proceeding. 

You are admitting you are an idiot that stands for nothing. 
",VegaThePunisher,e954tc7,democrats
"What claim? I didn’t make a claim. He made the claims.

So I await you asking for his sources. 

",VegaThePunisher,e956h67,democrats
[removed],,e954sku,democrats
[removed],,e9551pf,democrats
"No, you have already proven yourself to be an idiot that can’t tell facts from fiction and don’t really care to. 

A literal idiot.

I wouldn’t trust you to toast bread. 
",VegaThePunisher,e954wrg,democrats
"Logic doesn't seem to be your strong suit, kid.

You're saying that a man is bad because you lobbed a bunch of allegations at him, some of which you have stated may be false. It doesn't matter if he did good things, he did these bad things (some of which you admitted may be false) so he must not have any virtue. Any negative action he committed obviously outweighs any possibility that he has done good things or had good intentions.

He is bad because he is a politician, and paraphrasing what you said, all politicians are bad. Therefore he is bad by following a self fulfilling prophecy.",Stun_Tzu,e955nrx,democrats
[removed],,e9557aa,democrats
"Sure, you are.",VegaThePunisher,e9559ft,democrats
"Talking to my maltipoo before, he was shook that he missed the deadline. Puppy suppression tactics run amok.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e97rw8h,democrats
Sorry but if he can't beat Cruz there is NO way he can beat Trump. ,starman09,e97hbgt,democrats
"Bull. Optimism is just a nice word for complacency. Some gains were made last night for us in the house and I'm glad for it, but this certainly wasn't the blue wave we were hoping for. This aww shucks we'll get em next time routine is getting old and is already flavoring the 2020 outlook with its particular brand of baseless optimism. I like Beto, but we need to stop hanging our hats on 'buzz', know that the media tends to screw these things up, and start playing the smart game instead of the loud game. You know the one where we win by numbers and not by likes, retweets, and upvotes? The democratic party can have my vote every time, but miss me with this endless optimism crap. It'll all be ok, yeah, but only if we organize to MAKE it ok. ",doyoueven-no,e981r52,democrats
"He can't beat Tea Party Cruz in red texas. He lost by around 3 percent as a Democrat, IN TEXAS. He has gained national appeal and name recognition, he is young and charismatic with a good consistent platform. I wouldn't necessarily say I support him running in 2020, but to say he couldn't perform nationally based off of this performance is pre-mature.",TheAmericanQ,e97mtyw,democrats
Tbh it's Kentucky. It's the definitive backwards GOP state. Coal and pick up trucks,WienerNuggetLog,e971s8r,democrats
Fat lady and such,Stupidiseverywhere,e9734va,democrats
How so?,backpackwayne,e971oec,democrats
I’m from Kentucky and co-sign this. ,ParkerIndustries616,e971ukf,democrats
MOAR,eric987235,e967emu,democrats
But don't be complacent and assume Team Blue has this in the bag! Remember what happened in 2016. Vote today if you haven't voted already!,wenchette,e96438t,democrats
"Why not more? 

Time to dogpile. 

Run the table. ",VegaThePunisher,e967k92,democrats
#VOTE,sirjamesbond,e964m2w,democrats
I'm from Missouri. ,AkiTendo,e96ap1c,democrats
Of course. They are guided by their fanatical Christian Taliban leaders.,red_carpet_hero,e96by9h,democrats
"Those are the eyes of a man that hates what he himself is. I guess his philosophy is if he doesn't get to suck any guys off, no one does? ",doyoueven-no,e981x9f,democrats
"Hey, Volusia county here.

It's just fucking stupid is what.",DanteMGalileo,e98b3z7,democrats
For sure but sometimes I feel there has to be more to it like something in the water,YouniqueYouser777,e98idl6,democrats
"You have to put it in terms of “what’s in it for me”? Of course we want to raise taxes. We have to in order to pay for public education and keep Medicare, Medicaid and Social Security alive. But we want a progressive tax system where the wealthy and corporations pay the most because they can afford to and are not paying their fair share. ",mbkthrowaway,e96wzhe,democrats
Why are the tax cuts PERMANENT for the wealthiest and why are the tax cuts TEMPORARY for the middle class? ,walter1950,e96xups,democrats
"My taxes seem to go up every year, regardless of who is in power. The difference is that one party uses those taxes to improve social services, the other gives it back to people that already have more than they can spend.",rogue203,e973s1v,democrats
Because fuck the middle class - Republicans ,Stupidiseverywhere,e96y4li,democrats
"That's a nice hat, where'd you get it? ",puffrr,e9690ki,democrats
Thank you.,red_carpet_hero,e96bugx,democrats
[removed],,e96ounj,democrats
"sure sure you did, vlad. ",VegaThePunisher,e96r7wb,democrats
"Sure you did with your brand new account!

Btw you are such a low level troll 1/10",Stupidiseverywhere,e96qnn2,democrats
Fuck that guy,Brysynner,e96ovqg,democrats
"Not looking good
",Doodoocabinet,e978un3,democrats
How has Ted won if not all votes are counted? ,Stupidiseverywhere,e97hs7t,democrats
only 30? those are rookie numbers.,Herald_of_Cthulu,e93iaeo,democrats
"Every Democrat, Liberal and Independent and those who know what This Republican congress and administration is capable of doing must get out and vote to provide a check on Trump and Congress if not we may not recover for over a decade.  ",walter1950,e93onqo,democrats
Imagine how bad this will be in two years. ,boiler_dude,e93xpkc,democrats
"“No I’m not, you are.” Trump resorts to playground-logic as he always does. ",kyjlm2,e93ouwc,democrats
Of course he is...,aglagw,e93kjby,democrats
"The swooning knuckle draggers in his cult couldn't possibly care less, the more he lies the better they like it. It's the same thing with being a racist, the more racist and homophobic he gets the better.",WeTrudgeOn,e93miwi,democrats
"I'm open to having my mind changed, but my opinion is that we Democrats have taken a long time to realize the game that is being played. No doubt in the 30s in England people were writing outraged articles about the number of lies being told by the wave of fascist leaders. The Trumpist GOP cares only about absolute power: words are just a means to this end. Trump knows that words don't need to be true to get the desired results. In fact, words get better results when they're false. And the rest of the GOP, hungry for power, has fallen in line.

Consequently, if you told me that Trump is lying 30, 300, or 3000 times/day, I would shrug and say, ""What did you expect?"" You can't fight neo-fascists like Trump by itemizing lies, as the Post and Times love to do in one outraged article after another. Did this truth-telling strategy work against the 30s fascists? Remember appeasement?

The only thing that works is appealing to voter values (i.e., asking voters who they want to be), donating, using the court system to fight gerrymandering and voter suppression, and above all voting. Trumpists, and Trump-enabling Republicans, cannot be debated or reasoned with. They can only be forced out. Hard.",zoonami,e941i1i,democrats
Why am I not surprised?,BobaTheFett123,e94dqqt,democrats
"Last week the Washington Post said the very stable genius had told 6420 lies in 649 days, or just under 10 a day over his entire term.


The lies per day has been increasing at an increasing rate, so I can imagine Dopey Donnie  easily hitting 30,000 lies before the 2020 election.
",Kenmoreland,e94kwq7,democrats
">If you tell a big enough lie and tell it frequently enough, it will be believed.

adolf hitler

",SwegSmeg,e94rvxv,democrats
Seems like the fact-checker is low-balling that statistic.  There's no way the average amount of Trump's daily lies is less than three digits.,TrashJack42,e956pca,democrats
And his fan base doesn't care. ,RocasThePenguin,e94a130,democrats
"I know I said this before. Trumps lies are far from a problem, it's the people who believe his lies and have no critical thinking that are the problem. ",Awesometjgreen,e94l1it,democrats
[removed],,e93rl2x,democrats
"Saying a politician lies is weak messaging. Saying he is owned by Russia is too abstract. But making Trump’s name synonymous with cancer is far more effective. Trump is cancer.

I wish Democrats would get better at messaging. People that are running the party right now are out of their league.",raulbloodwurth,e94zvd8,democrats
What a greasy shitbag he is,ffafayfaytfayth,e94kvl5,democrats
[removed],,e948wxg,democrats
"Only the 30 we have on record.

Imagine all the ones during meetings and private conversations and phone calls that the press doesn’t have access to",ShivaSkunk777,e93qgba,democrats
i voted for the first time ever i couldnt vote in 2016 because i was 16 but im glad to be able to participate,sandunespacecat,e945lxv,democrats
People like to be lied to. And they love bullies. ,NewYorkJewbag,e93u9a2,democrats
"Trump is on some hitler power trip shit

“For those who wish to become citizens we should require them to pay a penalty, pay taxes, learn English, go to the back of the line behind those who played by the rules”",khalifornia420,e94dovr,democrats
imagine youre having sex with ben shapiro and hes just choking you and pounding you into the bed whilst screaming 'you like that you fucking libtard? you gonna tell your feminist friends what daddy ben does to lefties?',frankPierce95,e94plt6,democrats
"/r/democrats does not allow the direct linking to external subreddits without the use of ""np"".  Please use http://np.reddit.com/r/<subreddit> when linking into external subreddits. 

The quickest way to have your content seen is to delete and repost with a corrected link.  

*I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/democrats) if you have any questions or concerns.*",AutoModerator,e93rlh7,democrats
Apparently a lot of them do. I'll never understand it. ,WeTrudgeOn,e93v2pr,democrats
"Hopefully, there will be some adult supervision in Congress right here directly.",WeTrudgeOn,e94gi8a,democrats
"[Obama's quote was:](https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/president-obama-discusses-his-proposals-for-immigration-reform-transcript/2013/01/29/73074f9c-6a3c-11e2-af53-7b2b2a7510a8_story.html?noredirect=on&utm_term=.b1fa360b179e)

>We gotta -- we gotta lay out a path, a process that includes passing a background check, paying taxes, paying a penalty, learning English, and then going to the back of the line behind all the folks who are trying to come here legally. That’s only fair. All right.

The key words being ""lay out a path"" because right now there is no realistic path to citizenship. And if you become a citizen, yeah, you pay taxes. Learning English is something I don't fully agree with as a requirement to obtain citizenship, but he also didn't say it was a requirement to become fluent in order to obtain citizenship - he just said it's part of the path/process. ",bumbiddlytake2,e964v8m,democrats
"Yeah hopefully, the funny thing is I’m totally fucking around that’s actually an Obama quote",khalifornia420,e94kba1,democrats
No it isn't,ClarenceJBoddicker,e94ldw1,democrats
"No way, unless he was making fun of republicans ",WeTrudgeOn,e94lnji,democrats
"Yeah it literally is, word for word.

Does that change your outlook on things?

Just tryna do my part and get people woke this midterm season",khalifornia420,e94ll30,democrats
"Nope, it was part of his immigration reform policies from 2009. Just tryna do my part and keep people woke this midterm season

https://youtu.be/2-Q-uNhYJbc

Damn easy to make anything sound good or bad these days just based on how ya spin it, the only reason you disagreed with it is because I compared trump to hitler directly before it. Pretty basic marketing tactics. If before the quote I had said “here is how Obama, a real class act, handled immigration reform” you would have had the exact opposite opinion about it.

Amazing how quickly people forget things isn’t it? You can thank modern media for that.
",khalifornia420,e94lol7,democrats
I checked.  This quote is fabricated.  Unless you can provide a source.,ClarenceJBoddicker,e94m9xv,democrats
"Is that 24 hour news cycle that makes people forget things like this. Good I you for doing your part to ensure that people can see past their preconceptions, their biases, etc.  

I get that people here don't like Trump. But to immediately pivot to anyone who voted for trump is a racist, bigot, homophobe, etc is a gross mischaracterization of a very large group of people.

Once you start thinking this guy is Hitler you can no longer see any of the good that is coming from them. Quit calling the outcome of the game from the start. Do the play by play impartially. At least then it's intellectually honest if you still hate the guy.",Arcliight,e94oxjy,democrats
https://youtu.be/2-Q-uNhYJbc,khalifornia420,e94maak,democrats
About 1:10 into the vid,khalifornia420,e94mcy9,democrats
I stand corrected.  What do I think?  I think it's a strange way to make a point by misleading people.  I think finding a random quote which is benign and slapping onto our current controversial president is a good way to confirm your own biases.  I think you wasted my time but provided me with an excellent lesson about narrative manipulation.,ClarenceJBoddicker,e94ovps,democrats
"I personally don’t actually think it’s “some hitler power trip shit at all”

I think it’s perfectly logical to acknowledge a problem at our southern border. What do you think?",khalifornia420,e94mjms,democrats
"Very true. I actually thought I would get more biased answers, but some people were definitely triggered as hell and some in complete denial, even after providing the source.

Just interesting, though I won’t pretend to be immune from the manipulation tactics",khalifornia420,e94pazi,democrats
"Then I’ve done all I set out to do :D

Didn’t really have a point, I just got super high and wanted to see what people thought",khalifornia420,e94qa90,democrats
I long for tolerance and decorum.,kerryfinchelhillary,e95o41b,democrats
Simply amazing that his supporters lack empathy. ,red_carpet_hero,e96cp1r,democrats
Sounds terrible. All that respect and consideration! How could anyone stand it!!,Medcait,e95czd1,democrats
"Sure sounds like The Onion. 
God forbid we attempt to conduct ourselves as human beings with dignity and respect for others. ",usposeso,e95buo7,democrats
Pity Trump never attended a parochial school with nuns dedicated to the proposition that salvation requires suffering.,hrlngrv,e95gcim,democrats
"Seconded from the UK - We're all in this battle against fascism, it's happening all over the world. Good luck.",Finite187,e95w0q9,democrats
Thank you!  We hope to do so but the republicans are using every tactic they can to destroy the US. Good luck with BREXIT...,MurphysDream,e95vya8,democrats
You have no idea how scared I am...,HawlSera,e96ze84,democrats
Thank you!  We hope to do so but the republicans are using every tactic they can to destroy the US. Good luck with BREXIT...,MurphysDream,e95vyjh,democrats
"Hoping we can, need to prevent Russia from interfering with our elections shame that republicans don’t want to acknowledge it",nickzahn0212,e9618rx,democrats
"Thirdeded from The UK. Even if nothing changes, I acknowledge you’re not all thunder cunts as portrayed by Trump. ",UFDSA,e96vzqs,democrats
"In this scenario, his vote only count towards..... Himself.

He must be registered to have his vote counted towards a candidate, amendment or proposal. He should feel good about performing his Civic duty. Most importantly, he should use this as a learning experience. Because he failed to register, he failed to prepare. Sometimes, life is brutal in it's lessons we learn from. Good luck to him in the future.",stonekrab1,e972r46,democrats
The Republican party wants to lock up Jesus for crossing the border.,mad-n-fla,e966vg4,democrats
"I enjoyed reading your views and values.

It all sounds very reasonable to me. I think we should all look outside of partisanship and think about what makes sense and seems right and wrong. I really feel like around this particular time period the Republican party is on the wrong side of history.

I hope that when the blue wave happens, the Republican party will stop standing by trump and start thinking for themselves.",JohnTran94,e95p50g,democrats
"Shakes your hand, gives you a hug. Solid work, lovely post. ",SimioNegro,e95zn0t,democrats
"I grew up with Christian parents and they were die-hard bleeding-heart liberals. God made the earth; Democrats want to protect the earth. Jesus said help each other; Democrats want to help each other. Jesus said love each other; Democrats want to ""love"" each other (treat others with respect and equal rights for all). It never made sense to me how Republicans got such a claim on Christianity. They're the opposite of it. Democrats are the ones who embody the morals that Jesus taught. ",bumbiddlytake2,e96hg4h,democrats
"I'm going to say this; regarding most of your comments, I agree with you. No hate on my part towards you based on most of the values you have stated. 

",red_carpet_hero,e96cgsy,democrats
And his mother Maria.,these_three_things,e96976s,democrats
"Thanks. I hope that too. However, I really don't like the trend Republicanism has taken in the last couple decades, and I think it will likely take that long to recover. 

So much of Republican governance revolves around being anti-Democrat, and their voting record winds up lacking any integrity to principle. Add to that the ridiculous ""Moral Majority/Christian Values"" idea, which winds up promoting all sorts of backward and oppressive legislation. Add to that the tons of corporate money that have entrenched them in defending ""free markets"" that don't exist anymore.

Trump and the Russians have been able to play them like a fiddle. And now, in order to try to consolidate the ""Party of Christian Values,"" Trump is rallying all the racists, homophobes, science deniers, entitled elites, conspiracy theorists, and sexual abusers to the cause. Just think if Obama were taking the same internal and external policy decisions, with a scandal of Russian collusion hanging over his head... Republicans would have him shot. But here they sit by.

It would take a complete collapse of the party before they could return to values, I think. But then again I think the two party system is a joke. Eh that's enough for now, I appreciate your comment and I hope you're voting today.",these_three_things,e95rs95,democrats
Cheers brother. Now get out there and vote :),these_three_things,e964m9f,democrats
"I mostly agree with that stance. If you start looking into Jerry Falwell and the Moral Majority of the 80s, that was in my opinion the real turning point where Christianity and Republicanism locked arms.

I definitely agree that the social vision of Democrats more closely aligns with the teaching of Jesus... But I believe that the flaw is in the assumption that the government is the proper instrument of bringing about change. It is so hopelessly inefficient, and since it is run by men, it is bound to be used by those who seek to enrich themselves.

Not to say that the government should not take care of the people in certain ways, but I believe that a combination of regulation and incentives for individuals and companies can help create a society that desires to help those in need.

After all, if we are talking about Christian love, there is no way a government can approximate it... It could only be a strong tool for the safeguarding of its citizens' well-being. And that is where I agree with you: **in current day America, Democrats seem to have a much better understanding of what constitutes the ""well-being"" of the American citizenry**. My hope is that anyone who claims to follow Jesus would care for those in need to a much greater extent than the government could ever reach.

EDIT: Not trying to throw shade on your parents or anything.",these_three_things,e96k5dd,democrats
"Appreciated. If I wish one thing about how we as citizens approach government, it's that we could move away from identity politics and populism. How wonderful it would be to see ideas discussed on their merits, rather than their messaging and optics... I love talking to people who can disagree without hostility, and who are open to changing their views. Thanks for responding! And see you at the polls. 

",these_three_things,e96dzn5,democrats
"> But I believe that the flaw is in the assumption that the government is the proper instrument of bringing about change.

But that is just your opinion, and it's fine, but it has no basis in the Christian religion, unlike the other things. So it isn't any more or less Christian to agree to disagree with that. 

And regardless, even if the government isn't the instrument of change, it still ought to not be an instrument used *against* the goals of Christianity, such as how the current-day Republicans seem to be using it. 

>And that is where I agree with you: in current day America, Democrats seem to have a much better understanding of what constitutes the ""well-being"" of the American citizenry.

Agreed! ",bumbiddlytake2,e96kh9l,democrats
"Word. I agree with you as well, but for the sake of discussion I'd like to address this statement:

> But that is just your opinion, and it's fine, but it has no basis in the Christian religion, unlike the other things. So it isn't any more or less Christian to agree to disagree with that.

I understand that way of thinking, and perhaps we just have differing ideas of Christianity. Nonetheless, here's why I believe what I believe, if you're interested! I intend only to address the idea that Jesus would have condoned government as the proper tool for addressing people's needs, and nothing more. (By the way, neither my point or yours is explicitly stated or denied by the text; all this comes from specific examples that I believe illustrate the intent of Jesus' ministry in this regard.)

First, nowhere in the Bible did Jesus or his followers set about to change laws of countries. Jesus didn't petition governments to care for the needy; he commanded his followers to do it. And his followers definitely did that; in the Book of Acts, the early church was very much an organization that functioned to care for widows, orphans, and the lame... but in that scenario, the believers in that organization sold everything they had so that the church could reach and help more people. They did not request anything of unbelievers to accomplish that task. Everything from funding to service was provided through the complete dedication of those who believed in Jesus.

Second, in John 6, Jesus realized that his followers were going to force him to be a king. By accepting, he could have established laws to abolish slavery, restrict cruelty, require non-believing citizens to give their incomes to help the less fortunate, etc.—but instead he ran into the mountains. And in John 18, he says that ""My kingdom is not of this world."" He had no interest in changing laws, and was even willing to die by them. He sought to reach people regardless of laws or governments.

These specific examples, and others, are illustrative of the true point of Jesus' ministry: to convict the world of its sin so that all might repent and be saved through his sacrifice. If Christians give humanitarian service to the needy WITHOUT helping them see Jesus as Savior (regardless of whether they accept it, since most won't), then they have failed to address man's worst problem—for if they do not accept forgiveness for their sins, they are left to death in their own nature. Jesus said this explicitly in Matt 9, when he said that even his miraculous healings were only a way to point people to the fact that he had the power to forgive sins.

So that's my point: the government cannot forgive sins. It can be charitable, equitable, protective, transparent, and powerful for good... but in the eyes of Christ, all these positive attributes pale in comparison with the power of God to convict us of our sins, and absolve them, so that we might have new life. In my view, Christ would have cared much less about a nation's government or how it treated its people, than about who in that nation needs God's forgiveness, and how they could be reached. Christ preached, and died and rose again, to bring us the free gift of redemption, which means it is available to be found by anyone who desires it, in every situation—slave or master, prostitute or prince. 

Christians are supposed to give this gift freely, with no expectation of reward. Additionally, we are not to require non-believers to adhere to our rules (re:my original post), or to force them to commit their resources to carrying out God's calling. We can only give of ourselves, out of what we are given by God. ",these_three_things,e96qnoc,democrats
"I voted by absentee ballot about a month ago, so I got no sticker.  I feel left out, anyone want to send me one?",Bird_Lawyerman,e9693ar,democrats
He was so young!,eric987235,e95zh4y,democrats
"God, I miss him. At least he had dignity and class.",ULRB90,e962yfh,democrats
"It was the day his grandmother passed away, the day before he was elected POTUS.  

He ran a magnificent campain in 2008, the political E ticket ride of my lifetime. ",SisterCommie,e97uyt9,democrats
"My bold prediction is that Beto wins, Abrams wins a plurality, but a runoff is forced in December.

All three of the individuals OP mentions deserve praise for their character, but Abrams and Beto are the future of the party.

I’m originally from Georgia and if you told me we would seriously be talking about a black woman from Georgia who is pro gun control and is an iconoclast of confederate symbols, I would have laughed you out of the room. But what’s amazing is her candor and honesty about every smear thrown her way. She handles herself with grace and that is permeating all the way down through Georgia voters. Same thing with Beto. Horrible attacks on him but yet, he hasn’t joined Cruz in the mud.

But with both candidates, unlike many others, including my new states gubernatorial nominee, they are energetic and that radiates from them. They aren’t the shady old men emerging from smoke filled rooms that have dominated the power centers of the party that seem so disconnected from people. Beto feels like he would have been my best friend in high school, and Abrams reminds me of a childhood teacher that understood me and my potential. To me, that’s amazing, and if the party can get more candidates such as these, then a turnaround in this country is possible.",begemot90,e94jv7o,democrats
"In a real election, absolutely.

Don't expect one.  But don't tolerate the absence of one either.

Republicans are not law-abiding citizens.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e94pmyu,democrats
"The one that worries me the most is Abrams in GA, the amount of corruption is insane.",GregSirico,e94qrnb,democrats
My intestinal system can not handle Ted Cruz winning.,Raspberries-Are-Evil,e94y73d,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e94n9n1,democrats
"""suburban revolt"" is a beautiful oxymoron.",societysarmpit,e95szje,democrats
And a good name for a band.,eric987235,e968935,democrats
I was also thinking that! Nice,societysarmpit,e96dsc4,democrats
It does. ,Doodoocabinet,e95qysa,democrats
"So it is written.

So it will be done.",VegaThePunisher,e95rqtq,democrats
I already voted for Democrat in my state. ,red_carpet_hero,e96c4f9,democrats
Damn right!,backpackwayne,e96th7b,democrats
Yea Baby!,backpackwayne,e96tm9s,democrats
#WOO HOO!,backpackwayne,e96tsar,democrats
"I had more foul language I wanted to use but I want to be decent.

",VegaThePunisher,e96xuj5,democrats
"Voting rights do not exist where Republicans are in control.

And therefore, neither does lawful authority.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e957985,democrats
"Because they only want their people to vote.  In fact, they try to keep some people from voting.",kerryfinchelhillary,e95ohhf,democrats
Can we stop calling it apathy and start calling it stupidity ,messiestbessie,e95pd93,democrats
GO VOTE TODAY!!!!,OnlyMyOpinion,e95jtq4,democrats
"I'm a democrat. I have always been and will always be a democrat. I volunteered for Sanders AND Clinton.

And still I say: Though we work hard to ensure access to the polls for everyone, I think it is wildly dangerous in many ways to categorically dismiss the election results conditional on their favoring a specific party.",Arahad2,e957eoc,democrats
"By reducing the number of polling locations in minority districts (Dodge, Kansas) or enforcing a perfect match of registration info with state records (Georgia).",nscherneck,e95776e,democrats
They probably had help from a foreign country.,starman09,e97hjhg,democrats
Is that what we have to say if we lose? I really hope we win btw. ,Pm_me_relevant_xkcd,e95ffgb,democrats
How?,SkullKidViolence,e956mjy,democrats
"Closing polling locations is primarily Democrat areas, ending early voting, purging voter rolls with horseshit criteria, using ID as a hindrance, trying to make real estate count more in state legislatures than people, opening fraudulent investigations, having conflicts of interests as candidates and being Secretaries of State.


Why do you ask??",VegaThePunisher,e957wep,democrats
[removed],,e95tg1m,democrats
"No not like removing dead people. Those types of purges don’t get stopped via lawsuits by state judges.

And notice you didn’t address ending early voting and closing polling places in Democrat heavy areas.

Only one party actively tries to get voting rates down. 

Republicans.



",VegaThePunisher,e95ts42,democrats
[removed],,e95xpyu,democrats
"Look at you on your knees crawling to defend your rotting corrupt party. 😂 
",VegaThePunisher,e95xxfu,democrats
"I'd be curious where you do agree with Dems. 

Per #1, asking for asylum is perfectly legal. This issue is being used as a wedge of fear. 

Think of the people in the caravan as the equivalent to women who were beaten and desperately need safety thus ask the courts for restraining orders.

These human beings desperately need safety from massive gang and drug violence. No one hikes 1,400 miles unless they're absolutely desperate.",g33klibrarian,e973dz2,democrats
OP might be Libertarian. ,jorsiem,e97abgo,democrats
Wow !! We can win over non democrats by not being Democrats !!?? Thank you for this political breakthrough!!!!,ParkerIndustries616,e9733ac,democrats
"1- No one wants every single person to be able to become a citizen. But with some groups, like the dreamers, theres no reason not to. The majority of dreamers were so young when they were brought here that I dont see how we can justify punishing them. It's like giving a speeding ticket to a 5 year old whose dad was speeding, and then asking ""Well why didnt they protest their parent speeding? Clearly they're a criminal.""

As for the caravan- what do you mean by dangerous precedent? All it is is a group of asylum seekers- most of whom will not be granted asylum.

2- I highly doubt someone living off of food stamps lives a better life than you with a 6 figure salary. This is a debunked myth that is spouted because politicians know no one ever fact checks in this country (https://www.cbpp.org/research/food-assistance/snap-provides-needed-food-assistance-to-millions-of-people-with just one example of how SNAP is not nearly as 'amazing' as you think it is)

3- The richest Americans earn over 400000 a year. If them getting taxed on that much is too much of a burden for them to live what they consider a reasonable life, they're the ones with the problem here.",begonetoxicpeople,e97fyfu,democrats
"Issue 1- so in your view the pilgrims were legal immigrants? Humans have a right to migrate. Period.

Issue 2- if you really do make six figures and people on SNAP live better than you do then you are doing life wrong. Period. 

Issue 3- the biggest drain on our budget are the 320 million dollar toy airplanes the military buys from corrupt defense contractors and the entire welfare program known as the military.  ",southernfriedbrains,e97gof7,democrats
"Taxes don’t go up because of programs that help fellow Americans. They go up because we are in a state of perpetual war all over the world building an empire. 

War is freaking expensive. ",azurejedi,e975w47,democrats
" 1. Most of our forefathers came over it America under EXTEMELY more lienent immigration policies. Now you basically have to be wealthy to immigrate to American from another nation. I don't think that's right. And the gop wants to make.it harder and harder to leagal immigrate. 

2. The gop passed massive bills in the 90s to tighten welfare. And the majority are still in place and ""welfare queens"" are very rare. No one getting welfare lives a better life than you do. That's a fucking huge blatant and overt lie with intent to deceive. That's just a straight troll? 

3. The deficit is huge. And what would you cut or change? 

To be honest, this is just PURE complete bullshit and blindly repeating total and absolute lies. 

There's nothing I can say to change your mind when you just don't give a shit and repeat pure gop lies. ",Gsteel11,e977mqi,democrats
"You’d be surprised what people can do for greed. Not saying that these people don’t need help at all but there’s another side to the story as well. 

I do agree with them on other societal issues such as healthcare, abortion rights, fiscal discipline, etc. ",wheremypizza109,e9747dx,democrats
"Yes. Has that self-absorbed,  arrogant tilt",erminegarde27,e97dj2h,democrats
"1 - dreamers. This is a grey area that I don’t fully have a solution to. Giving existing dreamers citizenships means people will just cross border with kids thinking their kids will be fine. 
Caravan - if you allow one. There will be many more caravans forming in the future. Sets a dangerous precedent. 

2- well they do. 

3 - not talking about richest here. Middle class. My parents make 40-50k per year before taxes. After Obamacare, they had to pay 500$ per month on insurance. That’s ridiculous amount of money to pay. If they wouldn’t then it’d be taken off their tax refunds. I’m lucky to have insurance through employer but not everyone is as lucky. ",wheremypizza109,e97xu4a,democrats
"1 - what happened hundreds of years ago doesn’t apply today. World values haven’t been stagnant over time. A lot has changed and this has to be one of the things that changes. 

2 - Well I’m one person. They’re a family of 4 getting social security and Medicaid. I’m financially responsible I know what I can spend and I know how much they can. 

3 - You have no idea how much technological advancements has pushed this country forward. Hating on this because they’re defense contractors is a low argument. Education should be funded I agree but biggest expense is Medicare and social security programs. ",wheremypizza109,e97xnvr,democrats
"Biggest expense in the govt budget is these programs, not DoD spending. Besides DoD spending really helps push technological advancement so not all of that money is waste. These technological developments give rise to new industries. ",wheremypizza109,e976kjy,democrats
"1. Right times were different when the forefathers came to this country. With changing times, policies should change accordingly imo. 

2. Didn’t know about gop passing laws to restrict welfare. I am saying based on what I see right now. Not trolling, I do see people taking advantage of the system. 

3. Deficit can be controlled by regulating medical industry. Medical costs are enormous here compared to any other developed country. I’m sure govt can do something to lower the cost from medical and pharmaceutical industries.

It’s not bullshit. Just saying based on what I see. I don’t have to go to a gop supporter to know this. If you see from a different perspective, may be you’ll see it too. I certainly agree with gop on that particular issue. I don’t agree with gop on a lot more issues. ",wheremypizza109,e9796y3,democrats
"1- DACA only kids broughht in before a certain year (dont remember it off the top of my head). Also, repeating that it sets a dangerous precenedent still doesn't explain how exactly its dangerous in the first place to have asylum seekers come here seeking asylum,

2- Nice counter argument.",begonetoxicpeople,e984xo2,democrats
You know what else could be great tech advances? Supporting education- the budget for which was slashed by Trump and Republicans all over the country,begonetoxicpeople,e97g1d7,democrats
"What exactly is out of control? 

The stats dont show it. The laws dont show it. 

What exactly are you seeing? 

I think you're seeing what you want to see and A LOT of it is just pure making shit up. 

A LOT of people just say they see shit and it's just them lying to themselves. ",Gsteel11,e97eptv,democrats
"1 - what is to say that going forward with DACA recipients will stop illegal migration of kids in the future? If the answer is it won’t then it’s basically saying that bring your kids illegally and we’ll provide them legal status. 

2 - ok let me elaborate. Family of 4: husband, wife, 2 kids. Husband works a job earning 50-60k. Wife works for cash - 0 taxable income. Gets govt benefits for wife and kids. Family rarely pays for groceries. Wife’s income pays for house mortgage. Husbands income is essentially used to pay other bills and support lifestyle. ",wheremypizza109,e986l1y,democrats
Education doesn't make cronies any money ,southernfriedbrains,e97gtgc,democrats
Right. Agree with you there. Education should be funded as much as sports if not more. ,wheremypizza109,e97xol3,democrats
You talking about medical costs?,wheremypizza109,e97xv4u,democrats
"DACA specifically had a cut off year. Could we possibly make it easier for kids- who again, have no say in the matter- to become legal citizens? Maybe. But DACA itself cannot do this, it's in the writing of the law.

A family of 4 making that much money a month wouldnt get SNAP (https://mydss.mo.gov/food-assistance/food-stamp-program/income-limits).

Also the myth that SNAP beneficiaries are happy to be on it is just that- a myth. Most people receiving such benefits are ashamed and want to get off them as quickly as possible (https://www.incharge.org/debt-relief/snap-food-stamps-how-to-qualify-apply-and-how-much-benefit/).",begonetoxicpeople,e987exh,democrats
"So whats the cutoff year going to do? Nothing. As I said before, this problem has no easy solution. Cannot just give legal status. Law should not change to give them legal status either imo. There’s hundreds of thousands of people waiting to come to country legally, they should get higher preference if anything. 

Right I see the table and I don’t know what specific aids they’re getting. They have parents who are US citizens and travel between home country and the US. May be they consider them in income too as the definition is people who live and share the food. All I’m saying is the system is easily being abused. ",wheremypizza109,e98aezx,democrats
"1- People come here illegally, but DACA only directly helps those before the cutoff year. I dont know why you think I'm arguing otherwise. And again, why punish the kids who had no choice in the matter? Should we give speeding tickets to a passenger in a speeding car as well, or just the one who actually did the speeding?

2- Very easily abused=/=people living a better life than someone on a 6 figure salary because they have food stamps. ",begonetoxicpeople,e98aqf9,democrats
"1 - As I said, it’s not a easy solution. The kids are parents responsibility - it is not for the US govt or taxpayers to support them. When the parents decide to bring kids illegally, it is on to them. That’s how I see it. If the dad was speeding with a kid in his car, it’s dads fault. If the car got into an accident and someone got killed, it was dads fault. If the kid dies, it is dads fault. Besides, why even have a cutoff year if it’s not going stop parents from bringing in kids. 

2 - Oh they live a good life. I certainly think it’s unfair to someone like me who works hard to earn as much as I do and someone can just game the system to earn free money. ",wheremypizza109,e98c6ex,democrats
[removed],,e960y14,democrats
"Well their voters share in that responsibility.
",VegaThePunisher,e9615z0,democrats
[removed],,e961qgz,democrats
[deleted],,e962b70,democrats
He didn't win the popular vote.,shadySd2,e945xof,democrats
"These are thoughts I've had.  I used to think that overall, there were more good people than bad people in this country.  Ever since the Trump campaign, I've been questioning that.",kerryfinchelhillary,e94atek,democrats
And he won’t win tomorrow ,pawnking2,e947920,democrats
"True, but it should have never been that close. 

We have to go above and beyond. ",Gsteel11,e94avww,democrats
" 

## [Republican Voters Won’t Turn On Trump Until His Policies Personally Affect Them](https://www.reddit.com/r/democrats/comments/9uqwv9/republican_voters_wont_turn_on_trump_until_his/)",evolutionfan,e96bb94,democrats
"Guh, that sounds pretty painful. 

I've just not been impressed at all by the times lately. Feels like they're working overtime to appear ""unbiased"" by giving way too much time to gop... well, lies. Actual pushing GOP lies. 

Both sides is one thing. But it just feels like overkill and has for a while. 

https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/new-york-times-bret-stephens-subscriptions_us_5904171ce4b02655f83db230",Gsteel11,e96h5x5,democrats
"*If he wins, what does he care?*",hrlngrv,e959uh2,democrats
[removed],,e977n94,democrats
You post in the racist/white supremacist TD and support the racist/white supremacist. You don't get a say in this matter unless you are here to apologize for your sins.,therecordcorrected,e99jdi3,democrats
[removed],,e9anvm7,democrats
I live in Ga. & am bombarded by his ads on TV.  Have to hope Stacey wins tomorrow.,spartan_forlife,e94yan6,democrats
He definitely is corrupt. ,red_carpet_hero,e96dus2,democrats
Cons are corrupt,Btravelen,e94wdcy,democrats
I second this.,AgentBarton,e9509ra,democrats
Are you voting tomorrow?  I voted early.,GregSirico,e955l33,democrats
He's so corrupt it could be a Hollywood film.,GregSirico,e96g7x8,democrats
Voting in a bit,spartan_forlife,e966qrz,democrats
"Good! Let your voice be heard. Also make sure you check the machine, some have incorrectly marked votes for Kemp.",GregSirico,e967yym,democrats
fucking pissed today..,spartan_forlife,e982q5m,democrats
So are a lot of people in Georgia.,GregSirico,e984qv1,democrats
Shocking that this came grom Bloomberg ,Doyle337,e94zsjg,democrats
Bloomberg is a Democrat. ,VegaThePunisher,e955zd1,democrats
I know I was being sarcastic ,Doyle337,e95kvkg,democrats
"Call the VA Dems (phone number at bottom) - https://vademocrats.org

Or the general election protection line at 1-833-DEM-VOTE",Annonas,e95y2li,democrats
Fox News also rejected it. ,VegaThePunisher,e958tuc,democrats
"Now that’s just not true. 


The NFL limits active rosters to 52 players. The GOP would be penalized for having too large of a team. ",rmourz,e92zkra,democrats
"I really like tell-it-like-it-is Obama. 

Obama 2020!",PraxisLD,e92vxsv,democrats
"Could you imagine the plays a Republican Congressional football team would use?!  “Uh, hey!  Look over there -it’s a ufo!”  *runs the other way...*",smhanna,e93hqyt,democrats
More like a whole league by the time it's all said & done. ,Beenherebefore12345,e936909,democrats
"But Obama, a Republican HAS drained the swamp.  


Robert Mueller III.",RustySpencerCohle,e94u4rf,democrats
"I'm in UK & been following the election mid terms. It's hard to get a full picture from both camps so I'm on the fence on who wins. 

Trump is staying many things about Muslim brotherhood, Uranium one, Clinton foundation. MS13 being used for wet work. 

Does any of his comments have weight. Do you think trump will not gain the Senate. What happens after the mid terms for the dems. ",geordiehotline,e93atu0,democrats
They can create a second NFL.,kerryfinchelhillary,e949umh,democrats
Lol ,Dust906,e939aqo,democrats
"Trump is on some hitler power trip shit

“For those who wish to become citizens we should require them to pay a penalty, pay taxes, learn English, go to the back of the line behind those who played by the rules”",khalifornia420,e94dqbl,democrats
"Your short history, negative karma, and posts in favor of Trump make it hard not to question that this post is in good faith. But just in case it is, here's the answer:

None of those so-called scandals have any evidence of criminal activity whatsoever. I'm quite positive of this, because if they did have truth, Trump would have asked the FBI to investigate Clinton. Locking Clinton up would have been a massive feather in his cap, and he's had almost two years without managing to do this, or even bring charges against people in Clinton's circle.

Also, I haven't heard any of those things as being popular to talk about this election season, while they were way more popular two years ago, back when Clinton was a relevant opponent, not just a scary boogeyman for ruling up the base by reenacting Trump's Greatest Hits Comedy Tour. So no, none of those have any weight.

Odds are around 10-20% that Trump will lose the Senate, but they're about 10-20% that he will retain the House. He's been an abyssmal legislative failure, passing almost nothing even with his team in control of all branches of government, so it's even less likely that he'll enact any new laws if he loses the House and has to actually work alongside some Democrats. ",halberdierbowman,e93cksr,democrats
"Even after the Trump family and much of the GOP is impeached, indicted, and imprisoned, it’s gonna take years or even decades to clean up this whole shitshow...",PraxisLD,e951s91,democrats
Maybe even centuries,khalifornia420,e952t69,democrats
"Nah, not even Trump himself has that kind of chaotic power...",PraxisLD,e957mo5,democrats
Noam has actually contributed to their rise to power with his false equivalencies  making college kids tap their apathetic fedoras for years. ,VegaThePunisher,e957sql,democrats
One of the best reasons for Republicans to vote is because Democrats dont want them to...,HA5396,e94c0hv,democrats
Keep the blue wave rolling! DO 🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊YOUR🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊 PART SO THEY CANT DO THEIRS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!VOTE BLUE!!!!🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊,pawnking2,e947it6,democrats
I posted the voter protection line number on my social media.,kerryfinchelhillary,e95nvvi,democrats
"If you have to cast a provisional ballot, please make sure that your local Democratic Party knows and has your contact information. They typically will monitor the processing of the ballots and if more information is needed from you - they will contact you. Do not count on your local government to do the same. ",Annonas,e95kogq,democrats
"> please make sure that your local Democratic Party knows and has your contact information. 

Chances are there is a Democratic poll watcher on site at the polling place. Tell that person, as he/she will be keeping a running list of all provisionals.",wenchette,e95yejt,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://registration.elections.myflorida.com/CheckVoterStatus): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e95pvn3,democrats
Snake knows what’s up.,eric987235,e94u9ys,democrats
"I really don’t think you have any room to be calling someone Un-American by trying to suppress people from voting when you’re saying you don’t want to report it until after the midterms. You’re no better than them, you (allegedly) know and have proof, yet want your party to win, so you'll hold onto it and maybe report it after. Whats your personal line? Since you want Republicans to win so badly in 2018, that you'd withhold proof of voter suppression, why would you report it and potentially affect 2020?

 Man, and people wonder why the Republican Party is accused of cheating to win elections. At this time of the day, there's nothing your reporting can probably do (?) to change tomorrow, but it certainly could be a help for voter turnout in 2020.

And that's ignoring the Trumpian bologna at the end of the post. ",AwakenTheDemon,e94h9lj,democrats
"Report this to a national and a local newspaper, they would love to have this story and can get it run before the election.",Thisbymaster,e93sumo,democrats
"Do you know that requesting asylum at our border means they are legal immigrants pending determination of their asylum request?

What part of the Bible or Book of Mormon says that children should be put in cages because they weren’t lucky enough to be born in America?",whitmanpioneers,e94on5u,democrats
"I would say that it is wrong to knowingly sit on what might be systemic and illegal voter suppression, because you are denying people their right to have a say in the governance of this country. It is a democracy, and that means that if you are in the minority you might just have to accept things not going your way. That being said, I doubt the Republican party is in any real danger in Utah, so you should take this information to relevant authority figures as soon as possible. ",auditoryeden,e940kux,democrats
"You don't want to report it because you want Republicans to win? That makes you complicit. Plain and simple. You are part of the problem. Whether you like it or not, these people have a constitutional right to vote. Nothing should stand in their way. Ever. ",katgib13,e94emi8,democrats
That is very disturbing.  I agree that you should reach out to a local newspaper.,kerryfinchelhillary,e94oyue,democrats
"I want to engage you and ask why on Earth you would feel like not reporting this before the election? It's hard to see why you despise other children of God so much that you would participate in their disenfranchisement. You have a chance to go and be your brother's keeper, I suggest you do so. You will know the tree by the fruit it bares, what spiritual fruit do you suppose you are reaping?",F1refighter17,e94hxx0,democrats
Don’t boo....VOTE!!!!!,pawnking2,e947s6z,democrats
This is a terrible idea that would hurt a lot of people if put into practice. Red state Dems already moderate their stances on abortion. ,GrouchyMcGrouch,e95nyou,democrats
"How so? In practice nothing would change, and the effect would (hopefully) be that Dems are once again in control of Congress and perhaps the presidency. ",yankeerich,e97tian,democrats
"First of all, no one is going to fall for that ploy (why vote Dem when you can vote for the real thing?), and banning abortions would be terrible for people who would need to get an abortion during the duration it was banned. And no, we can't just whisk people from red states to blue states whenever they please. That's going to cost money, and getting that money is going to be hard. ",GrouchyMcGrouch,e99mhmk,democrats
"Yup, let's see what you got. You're the ones that will have to live with the results for years. ",Gsteel11,e93n6jx,democrats
I've seen many people I know in my age group get more and more politically engaged.,kerryfinchelhillary,e94ae3w,democrats
Anybody that participated in any protest shall vote.  It's the only true way to assure you are heard.,sgfwong,e94wy0s,democrats
"I work with said millennials, we have an open discussion with them. But family ties and influence perpetuate their thought process. I hope to change their thought process. But family conversation will win out over reason Most of the time.",unknownclient78,e9518z4,democrats
"Agreed. My message to disenchanted younger people who may be reading this, not sure whether you want to vote:

I get that sometimes you may not like the candidate. I get that Manchin votes with Trump the overwhelming majority of the time. I get that McCaskill and Heitkamp and many others are as close to awful as they are to perfect. I know some of you may even think ""what's the point?"" I get that the Democratic Party is deeply and fundamentally flawed, and must be utterly revamped. I know third party votes have value, and that voter shaming is idiotic.

But this time at least, please just fucking vote and reject Trump. Your vote is your choice of course, but that's what I'd recommend. No matter how bad certain Dems are, they are still much better than just about every Republican. Two sides of the same coin? Maybe. But we can't pretend D's and R's are the same. They simply aren't, particularly on social issues. Trump and his acolytes within their party are way too destructive to the fabric of this country to cast protest votes in key close races, to me. If it was Romney or Jeb Bush in the White House, honestly I would understand that approach. This is significantly different.

So... go vote for Bob Menendez and then take a long shower afterwards and rinse it off...",OmarIsaiahBetts,e94d8zr,democrats
What's amazing is that wave is only with 1 out of 3 millennials voting. imagine if the other 2 got off the couch. ,cerebralspinaldruid,e94ggv3,democrats
"I'm a millennial and I work at a young company with many other millennials.

At work today, somebody asked me the date, so I said in front of everyone- ""It's November 5th, tomorrow is Election Day!!"" Almost half of them responded with ""Really? I forgot."" One guy even said ""Elections for who? For Trump?""

That's when I lost a big chunk of hope. I live in a strongly blue state but I feel like I'm surrounded by mostly young people who just don't care, or are republicans because their parents are.

I really hope we can come through too.",fkinRotter,e94f31h,democrats
I hope you're a millenial!,high_larry_us,e94c4ql,democrats
"Love it. Your point about D vs. R is great. They aren't the same. That's why I get fired up when people tell me ""So what, was I supposed to vote for Hillary?"" as if Trump & Hillary were on the same plane of evil.   

&#x200B;

Anyways, thanks for your input! C'mon, blue wave!",high_larry_us,e94e2rm,democrats
You could make an awesome difference if you started a convo with them about the importance of voting!,high_larry_us,e94guuw,democrats
I am!,kerryfinchelhillary,e94omv4,democrats
"Trust me, I tried",fkinRotter,e96pap8,democrats
Vote no on that asinine fuel tax!!,sgfwong,e94x4b4,democrats
"What district are you in? What issues do you consider most important? 

Living in Missouri, your vote is one of the most important votes in the country. Your senate race will decide who controls the senate. If you are a democrat, you definitely want to be voting for McCaskill. ",d-bake,e94raye,democrats
"I would ask the same about St Louis County. I checked here [STL Dem](https://missouridemocrats.org/locality/st-louis-county-democrats/) but there is absolutely no write ups on the site concerning candidates or issues/amendments/propositions. 
Particularly its important to me to find out the Dem position on Amendment 1. ",usposeso,e94u9lk,democrats
Don’t count on having the sample ballot on your phone because they may not let you use it in the voting booth. Print it out or write it down if you think you might forget.,Annonas,e9537d9,democrats
Straight Republican ticket,trick1074,e952v5k,democrats
District 6. Jackson county. I just don’t want to make the rich richer and me poorer if that makes sense. I’m also all for medical marijuana and I don’t understand why there are three things on it. ,Greening101,e94rspo,democrats
^ must be orange,VegaThePunisher,e958wlw,democrats
"Because I don’t have all of your personal info I can only be of so much help. 

Check out this link: 
https://www.jcebmo.org/election-information/on-the-ballot/

It should spit out a sample ballot and allow you to spend some time looking through it and googling who all is running for what.

Supreme Court justices are nominated by parties, so although they are “non-partisan”, they are partisan. 

Check out this link:
https://ballotpedia.org/Missouri_Supreme_Court_elections,_2018

This shows you which two are up and who they were both nominated by. The two up are Russell(D) and Powell(R). In Missouri, Supreme Court justices are appointed by a governor (Russel was by a democrat and Powell by a republican) and then run for retention, meaning you vote them in or out. 

You will also vote on a number of circuit court  judges, although I am not sure how that is broken up because I don’t have a sample ballot for you specifically. It really isn’t very difficult to figure out what party they align with. If you want “rule of law” “tough on crime” judges, vote R. If you want criminal justice reform, vote D

Amendment 1: ends gerrymandering and sets limit on how much people can donate to a campaign. I strongly suggest voting yes for that.

Amendment 2: medical marijuana; tax revenue will go to veteran programs and to local governments. 

Amendment 3: medical marijuana; tax revenue generated goes to research for cancer and other incurable diseases 

These are both medical initiatives, you need to decide what cause you find most important. I personally would chose amendment 3 (it seems to put money back into Missouri’s economy and cuts out a lot of big business from getting a lot more of the gains). 

Also on the ballot is Proposition C, which is another medical marijuana scheme

Whichever of these three has the most affirmative votes wins. Amendments cannot be changed by state politicians, propositions can. 

This is a tough call. Voting the other two down would give more possibility for the one you want to win, but all of them need to at least get 50%+ to pass. So, do you care more about where the money goes or more about having the most chances to get medical pot passed? 

Either way, I would vote down prop C. Politicians are going to screw it up all to hell, and then it will be difficult to make changes to the law for the better. 

Amendment 4: removes limitations on bingo advertisement. 

Prop b: increase the min wage. 

Prop d: gas tax to fund road repairs 

You will also have questions based on your county. I don’t know what those are, so this is as far as I can help you friend.
 
Get a sample ballot and do some research on the questions. Those are local initiatives, so they are the most relevant to you as an individual.

Happy voting! 😁 ",d-bake,e94u24u,democrats
"Here is the Jackson County Democratic slate: 

http://www.jacksoncountydemocraticcommittee.org/voting-resources",Kersplit,e94trsq,democrats
Thanks a lot! This really helps. ,Greening101,e94v1k2,democrats
Time to burn it all down. ,VegaThePunisher,e957rhz,democrats
Note the lack of trump trolls like in the past demanding evidence that he is racist. That is now in the same bucket as being the most LGBT president ever and look at the debt under Obama.,therecordcorrected,e9583dp,democrats
"They never had the integrity in the first place. 

We need to prepare for what happens afterwards. 

We see how much violence and pain they caused after they won an election. 

Imagine if they lose.

",VegaThePunisher,e958i5t,democrats
Agreed,aglagw,e93kkln,democrats
"3k or 10k people seeking asylum is not that big a deal. 100k, 500k people is. Already voted straight Dem. Also researched each judge running and voted accordingly. The systemic problem of mass caravans is the government they are coming from. While big business influences the United States to step into countries to promote their profit. We let our neighbors suffer.",unknownclient78,e94qehk,democrats
The Caravan thing was a conspiracy theory to fear monger.  Just like many things he does.,kerryfinchelhillary,e94a4th,democrats
Everything is predicated on liberals showing up to vote. ,mbkthrowaway,e93jjcc,democrats
"too late, Repubs. ",tinydrumpf,e94xnfk,democrats
"Oh fucking well. Vote a putrid liar into office, you get what you wanted, and then you have the nerve to bitch when he shows your parties true colors? Fuck off!",sirjamesbond,e94g5yw,democrats
"Oh fuck I hope they/we do.  I know enough people are tired of his shit but will they show up. 

Again, oh fuck I hope so... ",batshitcrazy5150,e93ps1r,democrats
"Not just liberals, but moderates, progressives, and even the apathetic are stepping up to vote with enthusiasm. 

It’s gonna be a blue tsunami!",PraxisLD,e93q5iy,democrats
You can do it!,VegaThePunisher,e93lot1,democrats
Does it seem like the senate has been moving quickly in our direction over the past week?,eric987235,e941rit,democrats
F****ing VOTE!!!!!!,pawnking2,e947lr8,democrats
"Yes, but I'm going to wait for the polls to close before I get too excited.",Stupidiseverywhere,e94i1v9,democrats
I'm starting to think that the people who run NBC are fucking dumb as rocks.,megs1120,e93zzcc,democrats
I would have said “Try  it” ,walter1950,e93sld7,democrats
"They are, they’ve had republicans on 85% of their political panels. Disgraceful! Vote BLUE🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊",pawnking2,e947pu2,democrats
I half-thought they'd have John McCain embalmed and put on display on the set of Meet the Press.,megs1120,e947x97,democrats
"John McCain does deserve tremendous cred and respect, NBC and ESPECIALLY meet the press don’t- they’re almost FOX bad",pawnking2,e9488ku,democrats
"Because if you don't vote you are sacrificing you're only chance to have a say in our democracy, and that democracy might end pretty soon.",FrenchFriesrBelgian,e95ggay,democrats
Girl so what I vote for lol,xoxoxo19,e9602fw,democrats
The second two are seriously weak examples ,Pm_me_relevant_xkcd,e95fpem,democrats
Most times you can find at least 3 examples a day,bergerac121,e94ybw2,democrats
Trump dislikes anyone that is non-white.,red_carpet_hero,e94mh35,democrats
"Just ignore all the analysis, polls, predictions, etc. and vote. This election is huge, esp in regard to drawing districts for the next ten years. Currently Dems have to outperform Republicans by 5.7% to gain control of the House all due to the way the districts are drawn. ",EzBonds,e94kbcr,democrats
But history says no. ,SchismSEO,e947cmi,democrats
"Wow!  Republicans outright said Black candidates are theives monkeys and rapists, and that woman are little girls? My friends that say ""both parties"" are freaking blind.  Republicans aren't  even trying to be coded racists and sexists at this point. I'm curious who said this and when.  Do you got links for both?",SarquisDeSade,e94q95t,democrats
"Good thoughts. I would add, the gop is all about deregulation. Ignoring the lesons of the past, from the great depression to lead and mercury poisoning. 

These are very real threats to both our economy and our very health. 

Anyone can Google ""epa mercury"" and see what they are trying to do. ",Gsteel11,e94gpwp,democrats
"1. [DeSantis Warns Florida Not to ‘Monkey This Up,’](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/08/29/us/politics/desantis-monkey-up-gillum.html)
2. [Trump calling Gillum a 'thief' reflects a desperate electoral strategy](https://www.cnn.com/2018/11/01/opinions/trump-gillum-thief-desperate-strategy-opinion-love/index.html)
3. [New NRCC ad calls black New York Dem candidate ‘Big City Rapper’]
(https://thehill.com/homenews/campaign/408978-new-nrcc-ad-calls-ny-19-candidate-big-city-rapper)
4. [Trump’s racist campaign ad.](https://www.vox.com/policy-and-politics/2018/11/5/18065880/nbc-racist-trump-ad-sunday-night-football)
5. [Trump spreads the Soros/Jew/Migrant Caravan lie AFTER 11 people died because of it.](https://www.vanityfair.com/news/2018/10/donald-trump-george-soros-caravan)
",deaconheel,e94slct,democrats
"Oh that's insidious.  Reminds me of when Trump referred to the Space force as                                                  \[Separate but Equal\]([https://www.cnn.com/2018/06/18/politics/trump-space-force-air-force/index.html](https://www.cnn.com/2018/06/18/politics/trump-space-force-air-force/index.html)) a clear signalling to racists that want ""the good ol' days"".",SarquisDeSade,e95w59h,democrats
Thanks for telling us this now. Asshole,WillCle216,e96psfj,democrats
Showed more balls than ABC who caved to a threat which in no way shape or form could be carried out. ,walter1950,e93tmfh,democrats
"Iowa 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://sos.iowa.gov/elections/pdf/absenteeballotapp.pdf): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e92i57v,democrats
One of the advantages of having a first and last name people always have trouble either spelling or pronouncing is that I don't have to worry about being confused with someone like that.,kerryfinchelhillary,e94p68f,democrats
"I obviously agree about voting him out, but I'm afraid if that happens he'll just end up on Fox News and get even more frequently confused with Stephen King. :(",Belostoma,e9302o1,democrats
"Years ago, Fox news people were complaining loudly about LED bulbs and being forced to use them since incandescent bulbs were to be phased out. 

That's when I realized they had no real purpose in news. ",wheezergeezer,e91ewax,democrats
" She defended President Donald Trump’s assault on the free press by saying:

“He’s saying if you don’t want to be called the enemy, then get the story right, be accurate and report the story the way I want it reported.”

",radialmonster,e929rgr,democrats
The truth is not the truth...thanks Rudy.,cfgsteak,e91h62y,democrats
Which one is this? I have a hard time keeping track. ,VegaThePunisher,e91lbcx,democrats
Well Sean Hannity is out touring with the president so fox gave up the pretending to be unbiased thing a long while ago ,Hawthorne_Wilson,e92hhrw,democrats
"I love that her name is Ainsley, that's hilarious. *Republican sex kitten intensifies.*",AgentReynardMuldrake,e92yalz,democrats
"One thing is for sure, they do have the market cornered for good-looking anchors.  
That's about it though.",FunkyTown313,e91hkft,democrats
"Media whores.

&#x200B;",PuzzleheadedTest,e91ipw2,democrats
[deleted],,e91h7gk,democrats
"TIL American news outlets are influenced by the people who fund them, thanks for enlightening me Reddit ",onikukki,e92gk32,democrats
"Stopped reading at ""fembot"". We get nowhere with reductive low blows like that. ",cool_ranch_devito,e92wncu,democrats
"“I like my bulbs the ol’fashioned way!”

It’s because anything that has to do with “technological development” such as electric cars etc.  is seen as a way of saving the environment from a environmental catastrophe, global warming, etc.  which they see as an entire hoax.  ",UserN-me,e91lddo,democrats
I remember Tucker Carlson doing a segment about that. Hoping Ron Paul would save him from the tyranny of efficient light bulbs. ,bike_tyson,e91h8g0,democrats
I remember that. And people were going out and stockpiling incandescent bulbs like energy inefficient doomsday preppers 🤦🏼‍♀️,emilylime27,e91nys0,democrats
"The real kicker is that the whole ""phasing out of incandescent lights"" was also 100% bullshit. Tell me, can you still go buy an incandescent light? You sure as fuck can because they were *never* going to be phased out. They just had to meet new energy requirements.

I had friends that bought this bullshit hook line and sinker. ",SkunkMonkey,e91rwky,democrats
"My crazy right wing aunt still complains about that.  Apparently the old lightbulbs were better, and how dare things change.",TheWhitestOrca,e91mwc1,democrats
"That was Bush that did that, too. If I remember it right. That was their boy that did away with incandescents. ",SuperModes,e91kko3,democrats
"While there are some legit reasons for needing regular clear bulbs (like for reptiles), they're quite popular with the meth smoking crowd.",reereejugs,e91wtne,democrats
"The way i want it reported, lol. At least they're honest",my_beer_spilled_,e931pn5,democrats
She's on Fox and Friends,jamalwhite70,e91y5ub,democrats
Trevor Noah is both better looking and a better anchor. ,DaringSteel,e91km19,democrats
It's well-packaged BS. ,jamalwhite70,e928bck,democrats
We prefer to leave that kind of talk to T_D folks. ,iwascompromised,e91r17q,democrats
No need to call them whores just because we disagree with their views.,ohheyitsdeejay,e91lps6,democrats
I’ve noticed that the whole “Climate Change is all just a stupid mass conspiracy!” may have been the first of the modern mainstream conspiracy theories and kicked off all the insane shit like the “Deep State.”,CaptainJAmazing,e91lt4t,democrats
*Which they are paid to say is a hoax,young-and-mild,e92d8dq,democrats
"I agree that the right  has trouble  accepting tl technological changes. But, over all the left are the worst when it comes  to everything else.  California  for example is a complete dump. Every project takes forever  because of regulations. It's one big social project that cost the tax payers lots of money..",Elephante2018,e91nvgm,democrats
Dollar Tree has them lol. Definitely never got completely phased out.,reereejugs,e91xyjn,democrats
"At the time led bulbs were pretty expensive and shitty, but now they are better in pretty much every way except for minimum dimming performance. ",zieger,e91nljf,democrats
If Trevor was a fraction of Jon Stewart I would tune in but God damn..he just doesn’t have it. ,bmd1499,e91toj9,democrats
The daily show isn’t news.,FunkyTown313,e91odor,democrats
[removed],,e91thp5,democrats
"I don't know about that. I think ""9/11 was an inside job"" had more to do with starting ""Deep State"" conspiracies, but ""Climate change isn't happening!!!"" probably convinced people not to listen to actual experts on things like vaccines or chemtrails and the like. ",zubatman4,e91nl73,democrats
"I replaced all of my bulbs with the coils when they first came out & pretty much instantly regretted it. They were certainly expensive & shitty back then lol. Mine kept burning out after like 3 months max, usually around one month. They're much better now.",reereejugs,e91xvgj,democrats
"Honestly Trevor Noah is what Jon Stewart claimed to be; a comedian riffing on the news. Unfortunately because our news was and is broken, he spontaneously developed gravitas and journalistic standards and devoted his program to pointing out inconsistencies and inanity in politics. He did that because he found it funny, not because he was trying to make anything happen. It just so happens that it kept our news somewhat honest while he was on the beat, because his audience was large enough and his spear sharp enough that news organizations and politicians feared him. Trevor Noah doesn't have that because he's not aiming for it. It's not a knock on him, it's more sad that we relied on a self-described clown to keep our politics honest for a few years. ",SamuraiRafiki,e92dxup,democrats
"I suggest listening to the audiobook for ""born a crime"" it's his stories about growing up in South Africa and he narrates it.  I didn't care much about daily show before listening to it.  The book was so good, it made me want to watch and I pick up some episodes here and there now",GingerCurlz,e92oe6v,democrats
"Agreed, loved Jon but I can’t stand Trevor. I want to blame the writers, not him, but I honestly just don’t like his delivery. ",onikukki,e92gn1a,democrats
He’s gotten better. When’s the last time you watched?,NaturesPositive,e92tbfx,democrats
Neither is Fox. They had to admit to being an “entertainment” program (or whatever it was) to avoid getting slammed for false reporting. The Daily Show is both more informative and more accurate than Fox. ,DaringSteel,e91ok5r,democrats
lol at you getting downvoted. It's literally a comedy show,theincrediblegulk,e92gsoc,democrats
"> What trash stop joint do they find these Republiwhores in? I mean, fucking fuck, all of them are just incredibly vapid, male pandering, fucking clueless Pollyanna moronicas. It's fucking disgusting.


Don’t try to polish what OP meant. This is straight misogyny and something I would expect from Trump. ",ohheyitsdeejay,e91vpw9,democrats
"I feel like the 9/11 conspiracy theories were never mainstream in the was that the climate change denial stuff was/is. Like I can’t name a single Congresscritter who ever agreed with them, but there are plenty calling climate change a “hoax.”",CaptainJAmazing,e91p2bn,democrats
I watch him a little bit. I just don’t see his vision. Never seemed to have a big picture view like Jon. ,bmd1499,e92porj,democrats
The difference is the daily show doesn’t lie about what they are. But using TDS as a primary source is not the right way to consume news. ,FunkyTown313,e91p8cx,democrats
"I just watched Alexander Pelosi's latest doc, where she talked to people in red states. Those people are fucking, delusional idiots. They showed these coal miners who said they voted for Trump because he promised to save their jobs. He didn't and they still support him. Also, they showed people who were affected by flooding in Texas. Most of them said they didn't believe in global warming. ",jamalwhite70,e928net,democrats
"The fucking president of the united states went on stage in a national, televised RNC debate and said that Bill Clinton was responsible for 9/11 because he didn’t kill Osama Bin Laden.

Sure, that isn’t quite “The government did it!” but it’s super dangerous to be playing that game. ",zubatman4,e91tn5n,democrats
"Congresscritter, that's honestly hilarious.",maikuxblade,e91rprz,democrats
"Debatable. But also not the point. If Fox News talking heads count as “news anchors,” then so does Trevor Noah, so Fox doesn’t have the most attractive news anchors. If TDS isn’t news, then neither is Fox, so it doesn’t have news anchors at all. ",DaringSteel,e91pvm6,democrats
Trump did that?,reereejugs,e91xos6,democrats
"It’s not at all new, but I love it. It gives them just the right level of disrespect. It also has the added benefit of being gender-neutral, giving it more ease of use.",CaptainJAmazing,e91t342,democrats
"I’m not arguing the attractiveness of Trevor Noah. I’m saying it’s not an apt comparison because one is comedy about the news, and the other markets itself as a news organization, but whose legitimacy is a joke. 
",FunkyTown313,e91qus9,democrats
"https://www.politico.com/blogs/south-carolina-primary-2016-live-updates-and-results/2016/02/gop-debate-2016-trump-911-219260

It was a big deal when it happened, but now after another 2 and a half years of Trump doing stupid shit, people kinda forgot about it. 

But yeah: The President of the United States blamed 9/11 on one of his predecessors ",zubatman4,e91zt84,democrats
"I mean, it was on account of the administration of one of his predecessors that 9/11 happened, just not the one he said. Just gotta aim a little higher next time, Dernald.

I'm not saying there was a conspiracy, unless you consider borderline criminal negligence a conspiracy.",AgentReynardMuldrake,e92y891,democrats
Who the hell are the 18% of Dems who approve of Trump?!?,lazyironman,e92ong2,democrats
"Yup, his approval is sky-high. No need to bother voting if you’re a supporter.",eric987235,e93gusr,democrats
"How many lies does it take to get to the center of Trumpy Pop?

Apparently all of them.",backpackwayne,e928dra,democrats
Reminds me of his yearly review bullshit when you couldn't select any negative options.,Hiccaries,e92vdm2,democrats
The fake ones.,rogue203,e9413nz,democrats
None that I know of.,therecordcorrected,e92utlb,democrats
"Ngl there's nothing wrong with the way this is talking about amending the constitution. Sure it's never been done, but it's explicitly mentioned in the constitution as an option. For the country's sake though I hope they are not able to do it.",Bedivere17,e93hgnw,democrats
Now why would a congress that always claims to represent the majority want to remove Senators being elected by the people?,begonetoxicpeople,e93i8gk,democrats
We need more interracial couples to have more bi racial babies.... That's quickest way to end racism.or just to make this country less racist. ,WillCle216,e96q3f9,democrats
Why doesn't their privilege protect them? Uh go figure,trick1074,e95364b,democrats
Well that's a fine slap on pigs that they hardly deserve.,therecordcorrected,e931d18,democrats
Well she’s right...   why they continue to have these stupid GOP shills on has made me turn the channel every time one speaks.  Nothing but lies and spins. The orange sociopathic racist can do no wrong.  They can’t admit to anything that goes against trump.  So not worth listening to anymore.  There’s no constructive conversation with people like that anymore.  ,ChangingFiveHundred,e92txm4,democrats
"Right, so we gotta VOTE THEM OUT!!!!🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊🌊",pawnking2,e947ui5,democrats
"Just vote, everyone vote for Dems/Sanity ",allyourbase1975,e926tyc,democrats
"Unless you work for a political organization, that sounds illegal.  I'd definitely investigate this, maybe reach out to those that are higher up.  Most organizations are supposed to maintain nonpartisan political stands.",kerryfinchelhillary,e94phlg,democrats
You can call the Democratic Party voter hotline and give them the information - 1-833-336-8683.,Annonas,e95ntil,democrats
"Post to r/legaladvice. See what more knowledgeable people have to say. 
But yeah, that sounds illegal a f. ",usposeso,e94unqy,democrats
Sounds like a campaign finance violation,Btravelen,e94whdl,democrats
They say they’re taking “surveys” it a company that calls people to return internet and television equipment ,yamhamster,e94pr21,democrats
Thanks! ,yamhamster,e9580ob,democrats
Yeah that doesn't sound legal.,Stupidiseverywhere,e94qzko,democrats
"Any questions or comments, let me know!",emmetpdx,e94kros,democrats
Trump is a lying scumbag and it is disturbing that his supporters do not care.  ,BelleAriel,e91ovc8,democrats
"“DoEsn’T maTTeR OwnEd the LiBs,” MAGAts",orderofGreenZombies,e92nyv9,democrats
Pathological liar.,caligirl2287,e9210z0,democrats
Lol,TychusFinley,e91ri1q,democrats
I think his base is just too fuckin lazy to do any research on his BS claims!,12rjc12,e91rnp0,democrats
This is the cheapest approach.,Thisbymaster,e92avar,democrats
"You would think that some of them would get offended at SOME point. 

There are people out there that think Trump secured 5 billion dollars grom congress for the border wall. How long can they believe that for? What do they do when they’re finally confronted with the truth? 

“Well I’m sure he had a good reason to tell an untruth about the border wall”",LilianPumpernickel,e91z6m5,democrats
"""It's the Democrats fault he lied to us!""",TheFatMan2200,e92c0mi,democrats
He always tweets a week before Election Day. This tweet wasn’t as bad as 2016 ,KenEatsBarbie,e926wuh,democrats
"Oh, James, you seem so stand up, but why did you do what you did?",lordperiwinkle,e923cr8,democrats
holy fuck the twitter comments are an absolute cesspool of propaganda ,Elyon113,e92p7wh,democrats
"Trump IS ""the Republicans""...""The Republicans"" ARE Trump.  Do you think the racism and hate will magically disappear when he croaks from his last Big Mac?",wwabc,e92ffc4,democrats
Wow.  Fuck you Comey.  Trump is the symptom...Republicans like you are the disease.,Secomav420,e92anmv,democrats
He’s trying to redeem himself. Who can blame him?,eric987235,e924ac3,democrats
What did he do? ,donttellthissecret,e92dv9m,democrats
"Many are Russian bots. They have been attached to his twitter for awhile. If you reply to them with something that should get a reply, either you don't get a reply back almost always, or it is something not related to your reply.",therecordcorrected,e92uxan,democrats
He is no longer a Republican.,therecordcorrected,e92apsu,democrats
He ain’t a typical Republican and is not one anymore. ,pasarina,e92btl4,democrats
"He is somewhat redeeming himself.  I don't blame him for trying, but, he made a huge mistake.  If that is what it was.",lordperiwinkle,e924f3b,democrats
No he’s not.,miketeeeveee,e928bz3,democrats
Remember the “October surprise” when he restarted that stupid “email investigation?”,pawnking2,e947zxi,democrats
"Yeah I got permabanned from twitter in March, my 9 yr old account gone because 2A bots targeted me after parkland ",Elyon113,e938l5s,democrats
"Yes he did but let's not lose sight of the fact that Hillary Clinton made a much bigger mistake by giving him, Trump and the Republicans the opportunities they should never had. It may not have been illegal, but it still broke State Department rules and should have never happened. Her and everyone that facilitated had security clearance training and evidently slept through it.",therecordcorrected,e9292h4,democrats
"Even as a low level State government employee, I was told on the day one to use only email provided to do official business. I am not sure how Hillary can blame anyone but herself to cause the problems for her. I supported her but she cannot absolve herself for complaining failing all of us through her actions. Benghazi was real witch-hunt by GOP. ",ManchiBoy,e92czpv,democrats
"Mmm this feels just like Nov 6th 2016.  Feeling good, nothing could possiblie go wrong.

Dont meme, fucking vote.",ArlidansSon,e91jhqk,democrats
"Unfortunately, there will be floaters",bill0042,e922w3w,democrats
"""Courtesy flush.""  That's great.",kerryfinchelhillary,e91juo6,democrats
"As with all ""cloggers"" it may take a three flushes !

(The federal government is composed of three distinct branches: legislative, executive, and judicial, whose powers are vested by the U.S. Constitution in the Congress, the President, and the federal courts, respectively.)",dognocat,e91nisn,democrats
"When the politicians are so full of shit, it's the only thing you can do.",RadioMelon,e920fcs,democrats
"Yes.

Vote like it’s a hashtag or selfie. 

Vote like it’s like wiping your ass.

Vote, you fools!
",VegaThePunisher,e91kszc,democrats
All credit goes to the creator. I just shitpost it. ,VegaThePunisher,e91kowx,democrats
Tbh I feel safer when he *isn’t* preforming the duties of the president ,rmourz,e92pura,democrats
He's flying around the country on Air Force One at public expense with no other purpose than to campaign for Republicans. Misuse of public funds.,alvarezg,e93etwm,democrats
Trump is doing it better? Well for a Narcissistic Pathological Liar he’s killing it.  ,walter1950,e939eiu,democrats
Obama did too.  you're mad because Trump is doing it better.,Padre3210,e92x64m,democrats
Don’t you have a school shooting to deny? ,walder_fuckin_frey,e94urgh,democrats
"Hell, I'll run in 2020. 

I'm like Bernie Sanders, but younger and with more arthritis.

And I'm all in on cannabis legalization.",DavidFuckingLee,e94x5a4,democrats
"Make everyone pay the same tax % pick a number, say 
15% if you make $100 or $100,000,000,000 you pay the same % if you offshore your money you pay double when you bring it back in.  ",walter1950,e93us6d,democrats
"Trump is a criminal in the unique position that if his cohorts win an election they can potentially stop the wheels of justice, or so they hope.

What we see from Kemp, Trump and the GOP at large is pure desperation. 

Trump uses lies as a weapon, and he's in the fight of his life",surface_book,e92axes,democrats
"Trump and Faux news keeps them that way.  Kinda joking, mostly serious.",90Carat,e91y3co,democrats
"Because they know they *didn't* win.  They know America is against them, and their fury and malice is all they have to keep oppressing this country, because Americans will never agree to their terrorist agenda.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e91ate3,democrats
">“It’s like the con where a door-to-door salesman says you need a security system while his buddy sneaks in the back and steals your stuff,” Obama said, according to the Associated Press. “But it’s not just the practical effect in terms of policy. When words stop meaning anything, when truth doesn’t matter, when people can just lie with abandon, democracy can’t work.”

Trump could literally tell his base that he lies to them daily and they'd cheer, clapping. They've lost touch. ",Towns-a-Million,e91ky6m,democrats
One of his best quotes ,kerryfinchelhillary,e91jkl5,democrats
They are tired of winning? /s,SpaceLemming,e92jqmv,democrats
"Didn't Trump spend years saying that President Obama wasn't really a citizen because his father wasn't a citizen of the USA? But, since his Mama was a citizen, he by definition is also a citizen of the USA and has been since birth (no matter where he might have been born, Hawaii by the way in case you were wondering). The same can be said for all of Trump's children born to an immigrant mother, since their father is a US citizen, so are they! Trump is a hypocrite of the highest order!",gads3,e90kfwz,democrats
Forgot Tiffany........again,Kdj2j2,e90fi1r,democrats
"This post makes no sense to me (before you downvote me to hell, I am NOT a trump supporter). This isn’t what an anchor baby is. 🤔",atomicspacekitty,e90uy9b,democrats
Their father is a citizen right? So not an “anchor baby?”,HunterHearstHemsley,e90e3if,democrats
"an·chor ba·by

noun

used to refer to a child born to a noncitizen mother in a country which has birthright citizenship, especially when viewed as providing an advantage to family members seeking to secure citizenship or legal residency.

",aol208,e9157hi,democrats
Soooo even though none of this is an accurate representation you’re still going with it? ,StarkRavingLunatic,e90sk8s,democrats
"Everyone in trump's family should be treated like trash except for baron.

Pls leave the poor boy alone.

We don't know if he's an asshole like the rest of them.",Hiccaries,e90f417,democrats
maybe he's just trying to get rid of his family,Rayhann,e90tk4p,democrats
"So how did melanias parents become citizens? Chain immigration is it? Trump is, once again, a hypocrite.",CanderousBossk,e910p1e,democrats
"The difference is all of those immigrants had proper visas or other authorization for residency or stay. They are specifically not who would lose out in the proposed attack on the interpretation of the amendment. 

An executive order should be used for this. The just want to get it to the Supreme Court and get a ruling, and they can probably win. 

They should have passed a law and done it that way. Then it would have been at least harder to initiate. The President isn’t a king and Executive Orders can be an abuse of power. ",Machismo01,e915jud,democrats
"Aaah  hypocrisy is Republican universe
Is as a common as their fraudulent practices",HangTrumplers,e90ybdb,democrats
"Just heard on the radio, NPR no less, reporting on concerns about the caravan heading towards Mexico that ""There's concern that they will take Mexican jobs.""

Really?

In the Philippines, if you are not a Philippine citizen, (an expat) you cannot own land, you can run a business, but, it's not yours entirely, profits and employment must be shared with locals.

All this predates leaders from the right.

I believe in the words on the Status of Liberty overseeing the eastern shore off the coast of New York.

But, it's not just an American or a local concern / problem.

And, to listen to the news, maybe it never has been.

&#x200B;",unkerjay,e914w7n,democrats
Don't mind me... European just passing by wondering why you throw babies as anchors... Stupid americans,robofuzzy,e91c3rk,democrats
And Marco Rubio is also an anchor baby. ,kerryfinchelhillary,e91jb40,democrats
[deleted],,e929o9q,democrats
President Trump was always a citizen. Not what anchor baby means 🤦🏻‍♂️,maksdaddy09,e92jz9b,democrats
[removed],,e90lny1,democrats
When you start using Reddit later then everyone because you are questioning your inteligence since reddit is full of intelectuals and then you find reddits frontpage full of this and other nonsense straithforward lying bullshit.,Dundee12b,e90zul5,democrats
Most devout Christians believe that Jesus is coming again... But not under Trumps watch because he won't let him in because he is from a Shithole country. ,Angelwells,e90xsrv,democrats
"The difference is they're attractive and have money, and their anchor babies turned out white lol

Trump just unveiled America's ugliness it has had all along",Hookahwave,e8zzqob,democrats
#idfuckmelaniatrumpintheass,ProfessorPurrrrfect,e90jfs3,democrats
What is an anchor baby? ,LowFatTurkeyBacon,e90z61p,democrats
This is so dumb ,GritsandGrinds901,e919f5g,democrats
"Vega sucks. Trump 2020! 

",dbdb2,e917ya2,democrats
"LOW BLOW! 

::::shaking hands::::

:::hits you in the ribs:::

Your weird uncle who’s always talking about Trump. 
",PM_ME_YOUR_BAN_NAME,e90t3yl,democrats
"You fucking idiot, his first and third wife are legal immigrants, big freaking difference. ",swish658,e9183k0,democrats
"The law is more complicated than that: https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_nationality_law#Birth_abroad_to_one_United_States_citizen

Say in a hypothetical, that you are born in Kenya between the years 1952 and 1986, and your mother is a United States citizen, and your father is Kenyan.

You will only be eligible for US citizenship if:
> [...]

> 3. The citizen parent lived at least ten years in the United States before the child's birth;

> 4. A minimum of 5 of these 10 years in the United States were after the citizen parent's 14th birthday.

If your mother is only 18 years old (as Ann Dunham was when she gave birth to Barack Obama), then she could not have lived for 10 years in the United States after her 14th birthday, since she had not lived to the age of 24 yet.

Of course, if you happen to be born in Hawaii, as Barack Obama actually was, instead of in Kenya, then it doesn’t matter because you are a US citizen by being born on US soil.

However, the above logic is that which was used as part of the birtherism argument.",anextio,e911g9u,democrats
Duh,batmanstuff,e90p338,democrats
"But by his own logic, he himself is not a citizen. His parents never naturalized.",DavidCRolandCPL,e91be5y,democrats
I like beer!,CarverOfPawns,e911buh,democrats
r/trumpcriticizestrump,patton3,e913irt,democrats
In case of anchor babies none of the parents are citizen. And in Trump case his wife even a emigrant became citizen after marrying him. ,wcoast93,e913lp2,democrats
Trump's mom is Scottish. His grandparents are all foreign born with his paternal grandfather had to go to Bavaria to find a wife since like his son and grandson few wanted to date them.,Leftbehindnlovingit,e917rut,democrats
Her mom was a citizen. ,VegaThePunisher,e90h7d6,democrats
Yeah this is a false flag by Tiffany to get them all deported so she can take her rightful place as heir to the trump throne. ,aro327,e90nsit,democrats
"Thanks, can you help explain? ",I_Worship_Brooms,e90z96g,democrats
"Even as a Democrat it's embarrassing to keep seeing this crap. 

The whole point of the term ""anchor baby"" is that it's a kid born on US soul with the intent of keeping the parents in the country. Hence, the word ""anchor""

Their father was a citizen. The kids are citizens. They're not anchor babies.

Can we not be stupid about this? ",mrjackspade,e90mh57,democrats
"Exactly. Thank you. As much as I don’t care for this family, they are legal (rightful) citizens because their father is a citizen. ",atomicspacekitty,e90uv7s,democrats
"Their mother wasn’t a citizen when they were born, so yes an anchor baby.",politicalanalysis,e91imap,democrats
You’re welcome.,VegaThePunisher,e91aswj,democrats
You're*,rollingintheshallow,e92uudo,democrats
What the fuck,Cha_Cha_cho,e91hug9,democrats
"I don't want to assume Barron will turn out like the rest of the family.

I'm really hoping he comes to resent them and find his own identity in life.",RadioMelon,e90ksz6,democrats
That's a trashy thing to say,--shaunoftheliving,e917b20,democrats
Everyone just forgets Tiffany.,question_sunshine,e91g9zl,democrats
"He will be.

Trumps mental illness is 100% caused by bad parenting. You think Orange Jabba is a great father?",panel_laboratory,e90j3yl,democrats
He probably will be. ,Gothboi777,e90kehs,democrats
"Kid started crying because he saw snoop holding a doll with a noose that looked like his dad. Plus he’s being raised by the don and his wife, so you know he’s gonna be a terrible person.",Herald_of_Cthulu,e90fget,democrats
"How can he not be? Both his parents are lying traitor trash. All his siblings (MAYBE excepting Tiffany) are thieving, lying scum. He has all the odds against him for being a decent human being.",_portia_,e91fnsc,democrats
"> all of those immigrants had proper visas or other authorization for residency or stay. 

Wrong.

https://apnews.com/37dc7aef0ce44077930b7436be7bfd0d

https://www.politico.com/story/2016/08/melania-trump-immigration-donald-226648

https://newrepublic.com/minutes/135814/melania-trump-undocumented-immigrant-worked-illegally-us

The penalty for what Melania Trump did was deportation and a lifetime ban on re-entry to the United States.",wenchette,e915vg3,democrats
"He’s a wanker maybe, too. ",VegaThePunisher,e91ku77,democrats
Are you okay?,VegaThePunisher,e92njpt,democrats
No proof of that. ,VegaThePunisher,e92nftf,democrats
Punctuation is your friend. ,oneinchterror,e90m1n2,democrats
Caravan is literally legal. You are allowed to seek asylum. Dip shit alert,CanderousBossk,e910kmo,democrats
Are you ok?,VegaThePunisher,e90lqqi,democrats
"The ""caravan"" wont be ""illegal"" until it crosses onto US soil. No human is illegal.",Sultanoshred,e90os6v,democrats
And then you cried.,VegaThePunisher,e910548,democrats
"""They're attractive.""

&#x200B;

They all look inbred...",Gothboi777,e905cl3,democrats
Dude... Trump's got a dirty dong I wouldnt,CanderousBossk,e910nlq,democrats
Wow! Got eeeeeeem!!,VegaThePunisher,e91aokg,democrats
No proof of that. ,VegaThePunisher,e91ao2a,democrats
"The birther nonsense was always about [John McCain being born in Panama](https://www.nytimes.com/2008/07/11/us/politics/11mccain.html). Throwing shade at Obama was a distraction. 

",PeptoBismark,e916xdj,democrats
"Lmfao I'm all for poking holes in these liars/general POS's, but their really singing to the choir here.",vigilanteoftime,e90rc4k,democrats
All of the kids' dad is a citizen. So they're all citizens,SilentWalrus92,e90jipu,democrats
"Well first of all, the fact that their father is American. An example of an anchor baby is Ted Cruz who was born in Canada to an American mother and Cuban father (who were living there legally at the time). Donald trump is American and therefore his children have a right to citizenship (not to mention they were born on American soil). Just because their mother is foreign doesn’t not make them anchor babies. ",atomicspacekitty,e9100yx,democrats
"The point of the meme is that the mothers were not citizens when the Trump spawn were born. Which is exactly what the MAGAt cult claims to be outraged by. Of course it's stupid, it's about the hypocrisy.",_portia_,e91fw8j,democrats
^ doesn’t understand OP. ,VegaThePunisher,e90nsrt,democrats
No proof. Show us birth certificates. Trump was born in Kenya and doesn't pay taxes until he proves it,CanderousBossk,e910jjc,democrats
Did we just become best friends?,aol208,e92f7wq,democrats
"You guys are just as deranged as the republicans sometimes I swear.

Stop feeling threatened by a 14 year old.",Hiccaries,e91l3gi,democrats
He looks unhappy to exist in virtually every picture of him.,Hiccaries,e90kv8p,democrats
Based on videos of him I've seen and stories I've heard about what he's allowed to have and not have I'd say he's treated poorly by both Melania and Trump. Not only that but he's presumably got autism. ,TheNerdWonder,e90qv5x,democrats
"how is that a trashy thing to say ?

i'm defending a 14 year old's right to be safe from political targeting.",Hiccaries,e9185qx,democrats
"I didn't forget about her, I just don't give a shit about her.",Hiccaries,e91gijn,democrats
"The rest didn’t have a father as President or live in the White House.

Barron is going to be different. Whether better or worse, only time will tell.",TonyzTone,e90ldn8,democrats
"I never said he is a great father but everyone is capable of adapting to their own person outside of parental influence if I did it, so can anyone else... including baron.",Hiccaries,e90jeeg,democrats
"That's a super shitty excuse.

He's young.... I think most people his age would feel a bit bothered by seeing the decapitated head of their father.

And that's also a super shitty and stupid thing to say. My father is a racist but i'm not a racist, anyone is capable of being their own person regardless of parental influence.",Hiccaries,e90fr4s,democrats
"The last caravan had something like 150 people legally apply for asylum when it got to the border.There's nothing that crossing onto US soil would make illegal. In fact, getting onto US soil gives you more rights (which is why the Trump crowd doesn't let them enter a ports of entry into the US). 

But, I think the caravan did break the law crossing into Mexico. ",spinlock,e90p8xq,democrats
[removed],,e90yel5,democrats
"Ivanka had *a lot* of work done.  She went from having a round face with no chin and a big nose to smaller cheeks, pointier chin, and a completely different nose.   It’s why she doesn’t even remotely resemble anyone in her family.  ",illuminutcase,e90iww6,democrats
"Proof against it would be nice, though.",CtrlAltWhale,e924hgw,democrats
Ted Cruz was born in Canada ,adamdesautel,e91dfu5,democrats
Prove it.,VegaThePunisher,e90jrl5,democrats
Exactly. This picture is next level stupid. ,oneinchterror,e90jume,democrats
"The image is about the wives, not the kids.",OwlfaceFrank,e90llyv,democrats
"No the term anchor babies refers to children born in the us to immigrant children. Google it.

“used to refer to a child born to a noncitizen mother in a country which has birthright citizenship, especially when viewed as providing an advantage to family members seeking to secure citizenship or legal residency.”",politicalanalysis,e91itl3,democrats
No proof trump is a citizen either.,VegaThePunisher,e91078u,democrats
"Ok well, I don’t know what you want me to say to that. The taxes thing (though I agree with you) has nothing to do with anchor babies and your other reply is snarky just for the sake of it. When did this side start acting just as childishly as the other? ",atomicspacekitty,e9118oc,democrats
no,VegaThePunisher,e92ni6u,democrats
What the fuck ,Cha_Cha_cho,e91n8bl,democrats
"To be fair, he’s what, 14?",sushicidaltendencies,e90w6ia,democrats
Sources?,deplorabledebb,e91kkk5,democrats
That's pretty accurate of him.,Hiccaries,e9187a6,democrats
"!RemindMe 40 years

",panel_laboratory,e90lo2x,democrats
"The difference is the kid is gonna be rich his whole life. Kid is a spoiled brat already, being rich is gonna make him a stuck up stupid person just like his dad. ",Herald_of_Cthulu,e90ft1r,democrats
You're a terrible judge of character Ivan.,MonsterIt,e90kbvf,democrats
My point is hes calling them Illegal and they arent even here yet.,Sultanoshred,e90pb45,democrats
Applying for asylum is not illegal.,Basalit-an,e90r75v,democrats
Ya it really sucks americans are getting killed by right wing fascist extremists. All terror attacks in the past few years have been by American citizens. Wake the fuck up.,Sultanoshred,e90ykn3,democrats
Biggest threat of violence is right wing nationalists ,CanderousBossk,e910m90,democrats
"Well we know he’s a serial liar, right?",VegaThePunisher,e92nkn9,democrats
"Yes, but the laws at the time Cruz was born in Canada make him a natural born US Citizen.

The law that would have made John McCain a natural born citizen was passed when he was 1 year old. ",PeptoBismark,e91my3f,democrats
Prove that Donald Trump is a US citizen?,SilentWalrus92,e90jsl9,democrats
"It isn’t about the kids, it is about the immigrant wives. ",cerevant,e90k2vy,democrats
The image calls the kids anchor babies,SilentWalrus92,e90lna4,democrats
Ok. ,atomicspacekitty,e9113ms,democrats
Ok. ,atomicspacekitty,e9113yv,democrats
No proof he has ever paid taxes ever,CanderousBossk,e910h7o,democrats
Trump Senior's mother was an immigrant. Was she legal?,wenchette,e91h8ml,democrats
"Its literally that Trump is a hypocrite and nothing he says matters. Why do we not hold these scumbags to the fire
",CanderousBossk,e925alr,democrats
Is that the only thing you can say ?,Hiccaries,e91ns5d,democrats
"It was a news article that basically implied she deprives him of a childhood by not really having toys or little playful sheets like most kids do.

His mannerisms fit what you'd expect someone with Asperger's. He's not really able to make eye contact, he gives off little ""tics"" and seems a tad absent minded. I only know because I have it myself. Could read him. It's why I pity him. ",TheNerdWonder,e91wp6l,democrats
"I will be messaging you on [**2058-11-04 04:22:55 UTC**](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=2058-11-04 04:22:55 UTC To Local Time) to remind you of [**this link.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/democrats/comments/9ty6pe/illegal_caravan/)

[**CLICK THIS LINK**](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[https://www.reddit.com/r/democrats/comments/9ty6pe/illegal_caravan/]%0A%0ARemindMe!  40 years) to send a PM to also be reminded and to reduce spam.

^(Parent commenter can ) [^(delete this message to hide from others.)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Delete Comment&message=Delete! e90loge)

_____

|[^(FAQs)](http://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/24duzp/remindmebot_info/)|[^(Custom)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[LINK INSIDE SQUARE BRACKETS else default to FAQs]%0A%0ANOTE: Don't forget to add the time options after the command.%0A%0ARemindMe!)|[^(Your Reminders)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=List Of Reminders&message=MyReminders!)|[^(Feedback)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBotWrangler&subject=Feedback)|[^(Code)](https://github.com/SIlver--/remindmebot-reddit)|[^(Browser Extensions)](https://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/4kldad/remindmebot_extensions/)
|-|-|-|-|-|-|",RemindMeBot,e90loge,democrats
"Once again... you are being narrow minded.

You know when the republicans attack school shooting victims ? You are doing the same thing with Barron because both you and the republicans seem to feel threatened by kids who you know either very little or jack shit about.",Hiccaries,e90g1c3,democrats
"*sticks up for a innocent child.

YoU MuST Be A RuSsiAn TrOLL !!!!",Hiccaries,e90kege,democrats
This ain’t it chief...,PlanesBlade,e915mzk,democrats
"I know. I'm just pointing out that most of them will never break any US laws (even when they do apply for asylum and legally enter the US). That's what happened with the last caravan.


If you really want to cook your brain, ask the deplorables why they're cool with 300,000 refugees from Puerto Rico but are scared shitless of 1,500 refugees walking through Mexico.",spinlock,e90pj5t,democrats
[removed],,e90yupa,democrats
Yup,VegaThePunisher,e90ju77,democrats
"Okay, what about them?",oneinchterror,e90luds,democrats
"Yeah.

Anchor Baby. 
used to refer to a child born to a noncitizen mother in a country which has birthright citizenship, especially when viewed as providing an advantage to family members seeking to secure citizenship or legal residency.

You responded to a comment about Tiffany. Her mother is a citizen, so she's not an anchor baby. The others are.

The image isnt criticising the kids for being anchor babies. It's criticising the parents for being hypocritical.",OwlfaceFrank,e90ltfu,democrats
Username does not check out.,AgentBarton,e9158k7,democrats
Yup,VegaThePunisher,e911wcm,democrats
"Yeah, but what does that have to do with anchor babies? ",atomicspacekitty,e91136q,democrats
You mean there is proof since his tax returns were leaked. He paid more taxes than the politicians criticizing him (Bernie),JoshuaWalter,e91gm9v,democrats
"No one knows. 

A lot of really educated people say no. ",VegaThePunisher,e91iuwc,democrats
Insulting me for my confusion. Don’t act so tough on the internet when people know who you are ,Cha_Cha_cho,e91o89g,democrats
You’re reading into it way too much because you try to find something wrong/worth pointing out as a negative with literally anything the family does. Relax. ,ufonectar,e92dsok,democrats
"Kid is rich, Eat him with his parents. These fucks will die first in the revolution.",Herald_of_Cthulu,e90g38n,democrats
Puerto Ricans are Americans ,VegaThePunisher,e90prrc,democrats
Quit drinking the coolaid I didnt say shit about drugs puta. Read it again.,Sultanoshred,e90zsii,democrats
You are 2 stupid 4 democracy. ,CanderousBossk,e910n2q,democrats
[deleted],,e90jyeq,democrats
"They used the children to become citizens. Get a clue. 

",VegaThePunisher,e90nu6n,democrats
It's when both parents are noncitizens. If one of the parents are a US citizen then that is a completely different situation ,SilentWalrus92,e90mbpn,democrats
It's when both parents are noncitizens. If one of the parents are a US citizen then that is a completely different situation ,SilentWalrus92,e90mc94,democrats
Link to those official documents? ,LukariBRo,e91gopn,democrats
I see what you did there. ;),wenchette,e91j060,democrats
"Oh ? and who am I  exactly?

You responded ''what the fuck ?'' to my comment like it's absurd to treat a child like a child. Baron Trump is innocent of all of his father's crimes until proven otherwise.
",Hiccaries,e91ocpm,democrats
You guys are screwed up. ,Hiccaries,e90gehk,democrats
"So? Our economy absorbed 300,000 of them into minimum wage jobs and we still have the lowest unemployment in 60 years. 

And, why should I care what country a refugee is from? ",spinlock,e90pyb9,democrats
"Um, that’s not proof.

Show me his long form birth certificate.


",VegaThePunisher,e90luyb,democrats
WiKIpEdiA Is NoT A CrEdiBLe SoURcE !!!!!,Hiccaries,e90klot,democrats
Why the actual hell are you getting so many downvotes ?,Hiccaries,e91gmeo,democrats
"No they could have become Citizens anyway being married to an American. Remember that before Trump immigrants were given the benefit of the doubt and encouraged to come here. 

The point of the OPs post is to use the same non-sensical terms Trump uses towards others.  There is no such thing as an anchor baby!  You can only sponsor a parent if they return home for 10 yrs. Trump might not be intelligent enough to know this but I’m sure people like Stephen Miller and Jeff Sessions know it. They rely on the uneducated bigoted minds to achieve their goals. ",gremus18,e90ysak,democrats
Debatable. If anything they used the children to secure a share of Trump's wealth. They were already on the path to citizenship before getting involved with Trump. ,oneinchterror,e90o4no,democrats
"I can't find any definition that says it only applies when both parents are noncitizens. Every definition only mentions a noncitizen mother. 
If an immigrant woman gets pregnant by a male who is a citizen, and then goes back to her original country to have the child, that child would not be a citizen despite the father being a citizen. 
It's possible that you are correct by some interpretation, but it's still hypocritical.",OwlfaceFrank,e90mur2,democrats
[deleted],,e90mucx,democrats
"I don’t need to go dig them up for you, CNN is the one who published them. You can find them easily. He paid a TON of taxes. Meanwhile Bernie used every trick possible to pay as little as possible. Irony ",JoshuaWalter,e91hysq,democrats
"Jordan Cszines, I'm more fucking surprised that you want the entire Trump family to face shit. Doesn't make you any better by circle jerking how 'good' you are by trashing Trump. Also, don't fucking insult ever again, because everybody knows who you are on the internet you fucking scum. ",Cha_Cha_cho,e931oyv,democrats
"What are you even talking about?

Puerto Ricans aren’t refugees.",VegaThePunisher,e90q03x,democrats
Are you Trump?,SilentWalrus92,e90miim,democrats
"No proof of that.



So the OP stands.
",VegaThePunisher,e90o6xy,democrats
"Yeah that’s true but if the father applies for citizenship on behalf of the child then they will get it. From what I understood it would be when neither parents are citizens but the child is born on US soil. I could be wrong though. But I am an American living abroad and I’ve checked the laws about any children I may have being able to have dual citizenship. Also, my best friend is half Canadian, half American and she has dual citizenship. 🤷🏻‍♀️ so you only need one parent that’s American. ",atomicspacekitty,e90utsv,democrats
"> If an immigrant woman gets pregnant by a male who is a citizen, and then goes back to her original country to have the child, that child would not be a citizen despite the father being a citizen.

According to [this information](https://travel.state.gov/content/travel/en/legal/travel-legal-considerations/us-citizenship/Acquisition-US-Citizenship-Child-Born-Abroad.html), that's not necessarily true. ",oneinchterror,e90okk1,democrats
"Yes, you do.  If you want anyone to believe you.",areyouseriousdotard,e91lsxa,democrats
"I don't know how you know my real name, but you need to fuck off.

I am simply in support of leaving Barron Trump out of his families politics., i'm not ''circle jerking'' how good I am. I just feel that it's basic courtesy not to insult the 14 year old son of the shitty president.

That is not reason for you to doxx me and i'm honestly disgusted that the moderators appear to be on your side.",Hiccaries,e93fjhr,democrats
I'm talking about my country's ability to shelter refugees. What are you even talking about?,spinlock,e90q1s9,democrats
Whoosh ,PM_ME_WEIRD_SMILES,e90rmjq,democrats
I don't think you understand how burden of proof works. ,oneinchterror,e90o89s,democrats
"Just use your internet and look it up, it was national news man! It’s commonly known fact at this point.",JoshuaWalter,e91w5s7,democrats
"More people are disgusted over that you preach hate to the Trump family, because what? You’re still circle jerking how good you are. You insulted me for my confusion. Like again, you told me to “fuck off”. Better be more careful, everybody knows who you are, especially when insulting someone. You can be disgusted as much as you want, but remember this, you insulted me and started this shit- show soy boy ;) stand up to your words or don’t start a fucking shit show. Calling me “deranged as the Republicans” over my confusion. ",Cha_Cha_cho,e93gmhm,democrats
"Puerto Ricans aren’t refugees.

Maybe you should learn what your country is. 
",VegaThePunisher,e90q46v,democrats
"I am using the same standard used by this family.


Keep trying. ",VegaThePunisher,e90o91m,democrats
"I'm going to take it as a lie then and that you are a liar.
Thanks",areyouseriousdotard,e92fpsh,democrats
"That is not going to g to be easy to find.  Search Bernie Sanders and taxes and see what you get.
Anyways, you claim something, you need to back it up not put the burden of proof on the doubter.",areyouseriousdotard,e923uql,democrats
"I didn't insult you for your confusion, you kept replying ''what the fuck ?'' to every single comment I made and it was clearly sarcasm.

If you believe in insulting children over any matter, you are no better than republicans. ",Hiccaries,e93hgu2,democrats
what do you call people seeking refuge because their home was destroyed? they're citizens so they aren't seeking asylum the way the people in the caravan will but they all rely on the same social safety net so why wouldn't we think of them as the same?,spinlock,e90qbm3,democrats
So you hate the guy but you'll happily sink to his level? Pitiful. ,oneinchterror,e90odm2,democrats
"Straw man technique and back tracking. First, you clearly insulted me, anyone with a brain cell can notice that. Second, I never said anything about violence. More fucking shocked that you want Trump’s to get shitted on because ? Otherwise, you’re pretty fucking pathetic to say that was sarcasm and accusing me of violence towards a kid when I never said that. ",Cha_Cha_cho,e93i2i9,democrats
Because they aren’t refugees.,VegaThePunisher,e90qo0n,democrats
"Are you saying I should be held to a higher standard than the POTUS?

Get over yourself.

Turnabout is fair play. 

",VegaThePunisher,e90oiul,democrats
"I was the one being downvoted to oblivion for stating that Baron Trump is innocent, everyone else in this subreddit is preaching for the slaughter of the entire trump family and they are being upvoted.

All you did is make incoherent ramblings against a comment that it was impossible to be confused by and you are threatning to doxx me for what exactly ? Insulting you and your r/iamverybadass attitude ? I can say whatever the hell I want to whoever the hell I want, especially when they are acting like an asshole. 

Good luck doxxing me for no goddamn reason.

",Hiccaries,e93ii55,democrats
of course they are. The same way people who couldn't go back to NO were refugees after Katrina.,spinlock,e90qtxv,democrats
"I think everyone should be held to the same standard when it comes to making a logical argument. There are a million legitimate criticisms of #45 without you creating strawmen. You're saying that it's okay to be disingenuous to further your cause just because someone else does it, and that's pathetic and immature as fuck.  ",oneinchterror,e90or6r,democrats
"Oh, I’m an asshole for my confusion ;) listen here, I don’t give a fuck that you’re being “downvoted to oblivion” when clearly when I saw your comment you had over 100 upvotes. Oh yes, i am very badass Indeed for standing up to your bullying. But hey, I’m sorry your dad beat you instead of cancer.",Cha_Cha_cho,e93ioyl,democrats
https://www.dictionary.com/browse/refugee,dr-josiah,e90qvhl,democrats
"No, like I said turnabout is fairplay.

You can be mad about it if you want. It’s fun to laugh at you.

",VegaThePunisher,e90ousq,democrats
"Haha I'm not mad about it, I just think you're a petulant child (much like the president himself). ",oneinchterror,e90oyqu,democrats
Sure you aren’t.,VegaThePunisher,e90p5pd,democrats
"How much time do you have? Our country is the laughingstock of the whole planet. We have a narcissistic president who spends all of his time tweeting, golfing, and throwing self-indulgent rallies to feed his pathetic need for attention. Republican congress has increased the national debt by 2 trillion (so far) and now want to raid social security and Medicaid programs to cover the tax cuts they voted for which only affected the top 1% of wage earners. Conservatives have a solid majority on the SupremeCourt which will lock in for a generation attitudes towards abortion,women’s rights, immigration, and a myriad of social issues including abortion, which is on its way to being illegal in this country.
There needs to be a political check on the President. This won’t happen as long as both houses of congress are his party’s majority. If you are 18 and can vote, I hope you will vote Democratic in tomorrow’s election.",pinthesky830,e94o8g9,democrats
"For me it's about checking a clearly unqualified president. Even if you aren't a Democrat, it's clear we need a government presence to counter a dangerously unfit executive.",rcraver8,e94o0e8,democrats
"If you don’t know, then you should reassess your entire worldview.

",VegaThePunisher,e94sasm,democrats
"Jesus Christ, dude. Wtf are you doing with your life? Pay attention. Wilfully ignorant is no way to go through life",Btravelen,e94wqkw,democrats
Because misery loves company,trick1074,e952y9u,democrats
The only world I've ever experienced is my closet.,MeLloNXD,e94sf17,democrats
"Is that why there is so much crossover between nazis, incels and trumpies? 🤔 ",VegaThePunisher,e958xzm,democrats
"Even your closet knows more about politics. 
",VegaThePunisher,e94sjrl,democrats
Watch some Colbert. You can trust comedians when it comes to the news because they win either way.,DavidFuckingLee,e94wz20,democrats
"White **supremacist**, not ""nationalist.""  Don't parrot their own propaganda terms for themselves.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e91dqyo,democrats
"Nobody's safe anywhere anymore, are we?",kerryfinchelhillary,e91k904,democrats
"> I've no doubts in my mind that this was one of Trump's violent supporters who went to the Tallahassee Yoga studio and shot 8 people, killing two beside himself.
Now I strongly believe that Trump had a hand in all these killings in the last two weeks even though he didn't tell the gunmen before or this gunman in Florida to choose a spot in Tallahassee in Florida where his nemesis Andrew Gillum is a Mayor.

Umm, what?

Where does it say he was a Trump supporter in any of the news stories? 

The BBC and CNN reports indicated he was just a racist incel guy, but nothing about Trump at all. ",Bioman9,e92hxd5,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e91myuy,democrats
"""Although it's up to our F.B.I.  ... "" It's Trump's FBI now.",BucknDoe,e91bqph,democrats
Edit: one article I read described him as a woman hater so that’s my comment. Now I found some racism stuff. Dude was wack ,Tekshow,e927w8i,democrats
">But since this deceased gunman had chosen a spot in Tallahassee, Florida where Trump's nemesis Andrew Gillum is a Mayor, it clearly shows that Trump's White Nationalist supporter wanted to change the Florida Governor's race by unleashing 20+ bullets from his handgun.

Umm, that's a stretch.

&#x200B;",sforrestw,e91fmnc,democrats
That's So fucked up. A fucking yoga studio? Do all businesses have to lock tbeir doors at all times and have steel doors to protect themselves from the crazies?,my_beer_spilled_,e932gle,democrats
[removed],,e941xuo,democrats
"Wrongo. A very fecal and toxic faction of the left is absolutely veering off into extremism--Frankfurt school hocus pocus and gender politics are NOT traditional features of left-wing politics, they are abrogations. The left side os the aisle has traditionally been exclusively about the rights, wages, and freedoms of working class, blue-collar people. It's roots are Marxist, not Neo-Marxist. Facts.

&#x200B;

And what are the lefties doing in the states? Trashing working class people and going down the rabbit hole of logically irresolvable postmodern gender voodoo. And it's going to cost them. It';s going to cost them Tuesday, and it is going to cost them in 2020.

&#x200B;

The silent majority will not vote for a party that offers them nothing but hypocrisy and air-fairy sociological babble whilst telling them that they're filth if they don't get on board with it. Will not happens. The left isn't returning to its roots, it's galloping away from them. It needs to remember who its true base is, and what it's meant to be be fighting for. ",mudlarker84,e92po82,democrats
"/r/democrats does not allow the direct linking to external subreddits without the use of ""np"".  Please use http://np.reddit.com/r/<subreddit> when linking into external subreddits. 

The quickest way to have your content seen is to delete and repost with a corrected link.  

*I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/democrats) if you have any questions or concerns.*",AutoModerator,e941xxz,democrats
He was the first one to say Trump would win and nobody took him seriously he is right go out and vote don’t listen to polls just go and vote!,ObiWannaDoYou74,e92akiv,democrats
Finally. ,Bookmanfilm,e91sllu,democrats
"California 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/voting-resources/county-elections-offices/): November 3-4, 2018 

[General Election](https://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/polling-place/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e91oa4j,democrats
Exactly.  He even called the states.   People thought he was insane.,90Carat,e92p4z1,democrats
That's me! By those lights!,eric987235,e94202u,democrats
 There's no civil war except in the minds of clickbait article writers. ,mjk1093,e92mzi8,democrats
"Bullshit. With all the talk of these so-called ""pivotal moments"", you still don't vote. You vote in numbers less than half of other age groups. And you don't support the democratic party, you attack it. In the end it is all talk, no walk. Prove me wrong. I would like nothing better.

Get off your asses and vote!",backpackwayne,e92kasl,democrats
"Arizona 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://azsos.gov/elections/voting-election/contact-information-county-election-officials): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e9417oo,democrats
"I'll take it. Truthfully, though, I'm skeptical about O'Rourke winning.",randomaccessvagaries,e91rhbf,democrats
If we all get off our asses and vote it will. :D,backpackwayne,e91ovdf,democrats
I cannot see us taking ND but loosing Missouri to be honest. ,oze385,e91xol3,democrats
"If Texas happens, so does Tennessee. And Missouri doesn’t flip.

Edit: also if Missouri flips so does North Dakota.",eric987235,e924dq8,democrats
"I’m in Indiana and I really have a bad feeling about Donnelly’s odds. He’s cozied up with trump to try to win over a few conservative voters but all it did was piss potential dem voters off. I hope I’m wrong, but I feel the momentum swinging hard towards Braun. ",rmourz,e92zqs5,democrats
This is only possible if every one of us VOTES. ,skepticalspectacle1,e94g6vt,democrats
As a denizen of Indiana.... you were saying?,Atrox_Primus,e99rgdz,democrats
Hopefully. But we need to keep pushing.,Stupidiseverywhere,e91pa5q,democrats
I wouldn't count on WV like that. But we can hope. ,doyoueven-no,e91pbd1,democrats
"1) O’Rourke 49% Cruz 49%
2) Cruz declared by Republican PACs “Under Water”. ",nasatveng,e91uwuf,democrats
"Im with you. Healthy scepticism is good. Keep in mind though, there is a record breaking uptick of young voters in TX.",Stupidiseverywhere,e91s558,democrats
"Texan here. The turnout in Houston is incredible. I've done everything I can to get friends, neighbors, and family to vote Beto.

Deep down, I know it's VERY unlikely, but the *possibility* is there and it's driving me crazy. I'll be a nervous wreck until the results are final. But this time, win or lose, I'm not quitting. We have to stay active, stay visible, and fight for 2020. ",__howzat__,e91wfhk,democrats
If we’ve learned nothing else since 2016 it should be that literally anything can happen in politics.,eric987235,e924jjo,democrats
"Yes!!!! 

(Three in our house--one first-time voter--voting today or Tuesday in Central Ohio!)
",Splattered_Smothered,e91pgto,democrats
MO is bad. Not sure how a Dem got in in the first place. Its a bastion of backward mentality and conservative righteously indignant perceived victimization. I live here and long every day to move back to Minnesota. ,usposeso,e9294an,democrats
"I don't think the first part is quite true, TX and TN have similarly close elections but the environment that would lift Bredesen to a win is completely different from O'Rourke's victory coalition",4smodeu2,e92e9b2,democrats
WV has much better polls for us than TX or ND,4smodeu2,e92ea3l,democrats
"There ya go. Good job!

 I haven't missed an election in 43 years. Not going to miss this one either. ",backpackwayne,e91pn98,democrats
"2008 Obama lost Missouri by a few thousand votes, and before 2006 it was still quite blue. The stae only swung red over the last few decades. McCaskill has been very good at navigating this shift so I think that she's still got a shot. ",oze385,e92a1ja,democrats
"You and me both! (1976 was my first one.) Failed to mention I've also got another first-time voter a few counties away. She voted in 2016, but this is he first mid-term.

My wife never voted until she met me 22 years ago. Now she's an avid Democrat, with her dad being a life-long conservative (living in Georgia) who drank the Trump Koolaid. It's fun listening to her hurl cusswords at the TV in the evenings watching coverage of Trump's circus. 
",Splattered_Smothered,e91r2fw,democrats
Awesome 1975 for me. You da man!,backpackwayne,e91r6oc,democrats
[removed],,e91h916,democrats
Sounds like the Republican party want change the Constitution to favor their radical ideologies. ,red_carpet_hero,e916r2c,democrats
"If they want to open this box, they've got to be careful. If Democrats get control back at some point then they might decide to change some amendments too.",bonestamp,e91tz8s,democrats
Calling them “conservatives” is a damn lie,Millwalky,e91eky0,democrats
I hope people take this and vote opposite of these choices to save this state.,deplorabledebb,e91l7dh,democrats
"The author claims that no one knows what's going to happen, but thinks he knows what's going to happen. ",Stupidiseverywhere,e92qt6c,democrats
Trump supporters- all white people with blonde hair. Just ironic is all.,my_beer_spilled_,e932ruz,democrats
Isn't that great when they do that?,my_beer_spilled_,e932qdb,democrats
Sure is,Stupidiseverywhere,e93a7wg,democrats
He also does not take into account the record breaking uptick in voters this time around.,Stupidiseverywhere,e93f4z8,democrats
"Yes, but it's an uptick across the board. Republicans are voting in record numbers too. Dems better stop being so complacent or they'll lose another one. ",whatsthenameyouwant,e93osbb,democrats
Agreed,Stupidiseverywhere,e93pkvh,democrats
"Racist and full of lies.  You can debate whether it was racist or not, that’s an opinion

You cannot claim that the ad is truthful.  He was released in 2001 by Republican Joe Arpaio’s department, at a time when Republicans held congress AND the Whitehouse.  (And not that it matters but there was a Rep. governor of AZ at the time too).  This was done under Republican control at every step of the way.  And to top it off, it was done with an AR15, a gun the GOP has been fighting to keep legal and plentiful.  

 So even if you could, by the greatest stretch of you imagination, write this off as not racist, you can’t claim it’s anything but completely untruthful.  

CNN, as a news organization, has a duty to not broadcast lies.  They made the right call here, regardless of anyone’s opinions on what is and isn’t racist.  ",illuminutcase,e90k27b,democrats
"The GOP are so silly, we are AMERICA why are we afraid of 5000 homeless people?  

AMERICANS should be insulted that they are stroking the fear over 5000 homeless people. ",sn76477,e90jrdx,democrats
Don Lemon is a racist though,OrwellianLiberty,e90ok0t,democrats
The ad isnt racist ,Gya-CT06614,e906bi4,democrats
https://www.statista.com/statistics/476456/mass-shootings-in-the-us-by-shooter-s-race/,Ziff-A-Dee-Dew-Law,e90sun7,democrats
"Maybe an ad cannot be racist, but the people who storyboarded, scripted, produced, bankrolled, and distributed it certainly can be.",JakOswald,e909d1b,democrats
"And Nazi's were just well intentioned Germans.

And the Confederates were just well intentioned slave owners.",ytman,e90aul5,democrats
Your mom is.,trumpisstillacuck,e9087je,democrats
[removed],,e91uk5e,democrats
Are you insane or just off your meds today?,therecordcorrected,e91vg9o,democrats
"Oh we voted, Red, all the way down the line. Enjoy the midterms Lol",vvlf,e91jkb4,democrats
"This is possibly the lamest political cartoon I’ve ever seen. 

I appreciate the message, but god is it really, really lame.",politicalanalysis,e8za91b,democrats
"Super delegates don’t have constituents, Bernie Sanders had 70% of the popular vote in Hawaii but only 1/4 the electoral vote. This swings the vote for other states. ",HarpoMarks,e8zudvn,democrats
"Yeah, I VOTE:

V - Have

O - Diagnosed

T - Clinical

E - Depression",nowaitstop_,e90x1v5,democrats
"Must be why you are so angry all the time. 😂 

Obama and Hillary were right about you people.
",VegaThePunisher,e91kqj6,democrats
How is it lame? I think it's pretty clever.,sirpenguino,e8zfwr0,democrats
Your triggering has been noted. Thanks. ,VegaThePunisher,e8zc16m,democrats
For Vega this is like cream of the crop.,unclefisty,e8zxvc2,democrats
"Bernie got blown out by almost four million votes and 

lost most states, 

most large states, 

most small states, 

most southern states, 

most northern states, 

most battleground states, 

most closed primaries

 and most open primaries.

Super delegates were never a factor. 


Thanks.
",VegaThePunisher,e8zvy7e,democrats
[removed],,e8zg490,democrats
"It’s not really being triggered, it’s just lame ",the-coolest-loser,e8ziv3b,democrats
Depends on the crop. ,VegaThePunisher,e8zz03j,democrats
"Not to mention that he’s confusing the primary with the actual election. Honestly, I subscribed to this sub because I thought it would be nice to read intelligent discussions from other Democrats in a difficult time; instead, half the comments make me think we deserve to lose.",HowLittleIKnow,e906udu,democrats
^ triggered part 2: the sequel ,VegaThePunisher,e8zgllb,democrats
"Then people would just ignore it and move on, wouldn’t they?",VegaThePunisher,e8zl3b1,democrats
You don’t think primary results affect the election?,HarpoMarks,e90c7rv,democrats
[removed],,e8zic1h,democrats
It did for Bernie. ,VegaThePunisher,e90hcil,democrats
"Sure they do, but this meme is clearly trying to influence people to vote in the general election, where superdelegates don’t play a role. Your original comment was therefore nonsensical.
",HowLittleIKnow,e90ipwx,democrats
Stop what shit? ,VegaThePunisher,e8zjdem,democrats
"Sanders is a Democrat when it’s convenient for him. It shouldn’t surprise anybody that the party had some rules to favor actual Democrats instead of independents who switch their affiliation just in time to run for office and then switch it back again. If the Republican Party had the same rules, we might not be dealing with President Trump right now.",HowLittleIKnow,e90j5xx,democrats
Negatively yes ,HarpoMarks,e90i65v,democrats
I love her,Stupidiseverywhere,e8zhrr2,democrats
And like,T0MR0M,e8zyglg,democrats
That's great.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8zutxd,democrats
Sensational generalizations. ,MilitantSatanist,e8zy40l,democrats
Wait children in camps? Why have i not heard of this? Whats happening?,Hjd22,e8zyw4v,democrats
"Children didn't get out into ""camps"" because they weren't white it's because they are illegal immigrants ",fireboy705,e90f64z,democrats
"I really used to like her. 

Now it’s unabashed love",Evil_Dick_Turder,e8zo2z6,democrats
"Why do white people speak against white people?  I always believed race doesn’t matter.  Doesn’t everyone bleed red?  People aren’t seeing illegal immigrants by their color, they see them as people that are not following our immigration laws.  If they want to come in legally they are welcome.",deplorabledebb,e91ljuk,democrats
https://www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/world/national-security/trump-administration-to-triple-size-of-texas-tent-camp-for-migrant-children/2018/09/11/de980c02-b5ee-11e8-94eb-3bd52dfe917b_story.html,CanderousBossk,e8zzkw0,democrats
Really?,diosmioman,e8zzs7j,democrats
https://www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/world/national-security/trump-administration-to-triple-size-of-texas-tent-camp-for-migrant-children/2018/09/11/de980c02-b5ee-11e8-94eb-3bd52dfe917b_story.html,CanderousBossk,e8zzm55,democrats
"illegal immigrants seeking asylum (which is LEGAL)

the families turn themselves in voluntarily and are treated like criminals and scum.",seoconnor,e90hhp3,democrats
"I hate her
",saltyboi6969,e902xkj,democrats
"""If they want to come in legally""

Seeking asylum is 100% legal and it's what makes this country so great. 

In order to seek asylum, the immagrents have to cross the border at a port of entry and present themselves as such. 

Unfortunately the color of their skin has everything to do with it when it comes to the fear mongering that is going on right now.",Stupidiseverywhere,e91m76d,democrats
Ah i see thabk you,Hjd22,e900ltt,democrats
"Well yea i mean, the way she said camp it was implied in a way that it was some kind of interment camp that we were throwing people into for no reason yk, I misinterpreted it",Hjd22,e900lfk,democrats
"Well yea i mean, the way she said camp it was implied in a way that it was some kind of interment camp that we were throwing people into for no reason yk, I misinterpreted it",Hjd22,e900egu,democrats
Ah thanks my dude,Hjd22,e900n8j,democrats
"Wrong, they attempted to enter the country illegally, as in not by a point of entry and were caught. They only claimed asylum after the fact on hopes of getting in anyway.

Go to a point of entry and claim asylum your case gets reviewed and your can get in.

Try to hop the border and get caught you get arrested and if you have children then they are removed from your custody. Same as would happen if you were an American who had both parents go to jail with no family member to watch you. Only difference is as an illegal yourself as being one of those children they cannot enter you into child protective services.",Arcliight,e90kkmg,democrats
Entitled to your opinion even though it's fucking gay and wrong n_n,moderndaycassiusclay,e90i2ap,democrats
Agreed,fireboy705,e90f2gf,democrats
"Wrong, they don’t have to cross into this country, there are locations in Mexico that would enable them to do so, and would make their transition quicker.  At least 80% are seeking employment, that’s not grounds for seeking asylum.  America doesn’t care about color, we care about our laws being respected.
If you think they should just be able to come in, try going into Mexico or Canada without paperwork and see if you can walk right on in and claim you have rights, see how far that gets you.  We aren’t an open border country, I pray we never are.",deplorabledebb,e93hjud,democrats
"Gotcha. The whole immigration issue has not been handled well, and unfortunately it has split up thousands of families and had an especially negative impact on the children of immigrants. ",diosmioman,e900o79,democrats
"There is no law that states that a refugee  fleeing distress  and seeking asylum must enter through a port of entry. As a matter of fact, it’s legal for them to cross over as refugees unless your President is full of Big Macs and has Orange Skin. ",walder_fuckin_frey,e94zbqc,democrats
"I don't disagree. I will do more research to better educate myself. 

However, I do want to say, Amercan may not care about color, but there are people who call themselves American that do. ",Stupidiseverywhere,e93iq3m,democrats
"Yea theres for sure a better way to do it, not too sure what it is but i agree",Hjd22,e900wd4,democrats
"Yea theres for sure a better way to do it, not too sure what it is but i agree",Hjd22,e9015vw,democrats
"You are right there is no law specifically worded about refugees. But there are laws about legal entry into our country. Those laws apply to ANYONE crossing the border, even a legal US citizen. Why would claiming refugee status to enter our country suddenly make you above the laws of the very country you want to live in?

Our immigration laws are clear, you have to enter through a valid point of entry, via an embassy or with some other LEGAL method of entry.

",Arcliight,e94zrog,democrats
"I do agree and they are in both parties.  We should all be like Lady Justice- blind to all of that.  Without skin we would all be the same.
My argument isn’t about race, it’s about immigration.  I have a daughter-in-law that’s been working on becoming a citizen for over 4 yrs.  Why should she have to go through all the requirements and these people don’t?  Is that fair to her and all the millions doing it the legal way?  She has had to have vaccines, has gone through several interviews, she holds a BS in business so she can contribute to our country.  She speaks fluent English (her service to S Korea was teaching children English).  All of this is why I say that we have immigration laws and they need to be adhered to and respected.  I, personally, have a dog in this fight .",deplorabledebb,e94ucg3,democrats
"We are in agreement. Everyone should do it the legal way. Like my parents and others I know as well.

I apologize, I may have misunderstood in the beginning.",Stupidiseverywhere,e94ulzy,democrats
Thank you.,deplorabledebb,e96nq4o,democrats
:),Stupidiseverywhere,e96ogrb,democrats
They'll stop at nothing to spread their lies and bullshit.,backpackwayne,e91pqkx,democrats
"Right? I get something in this vain every single day & all it does is make me want to vote for her even more. I got another one full of outright lies about the Dems are wanting to steal our paychecks, cut social security, and screw everyone over on healthcare 🤪.",reereejugs,e91sk7x,democrats
I'm gonna vote!,my_beer_spilled_,e932sjg,democrats
Good - worried about the right and their bid to rewrite the Constitution,fletcherkildren,e91s386,democrats
Bitches can try,Stupidiseverywhere,e9236wr,democrats
F L I N T M I C H I G A N,Gothboi777,e904vyv,democrats
"lol, you goofs, this isn't how whataboutism works. An opportunity cost is not a deflection.

The defining feature of whataboutism is deflection to something unrelated. For example, ""you can't criticize the Russian government for killing journalists because \[something unrelated about America\]."" The idea is to make criticism about anything impossible because there will always be something else to deflect to. 

But Puerto Rico and the posturing at the border have a clear relationship: resources. The federal government [denied Puerto Rico tens of billions of dollars of requested aid](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/02/08/us/puerto-rico-disaster-relief.html), resources that would go to containing the humanitarian crisis and inoculate the island from future devastation. Simultaneously, the Trump administration wants to spend hundreds of millions on a midterm photo op so he can play military-man.

Every dollar we spend on this political bullshit is money we're taking away from somebody else, namely the marginalized and the vulnerable. That's a very valid criticism.",doodcool612,e90dg3l,democrats
We should have told trump than the Puerto Ricans were going to build boats and come to the US..  then he would gave sent the whole army. ,Gsteel11,e8zq7xc,democrats
Did i see something that someone is bussing them up to the border? ,ace9127,e90cdhf,democrats
Valid point completely ruined by this DeCaprio pic. ,LA_LA_LAA,e8zpy3e,democrats
To stop American citizens?,damnetcode,e90g0ru,democrats
what about that airstrip filled with pallets of bottled water that went unused in puerto rico? im sure if we just gave them pallets of greenbacks that it would've been empty lol,mortemedes,e94vqjp,democrats
"Well it *was* from facebook after all, what can you expect. Lol. ",bumbiddlytake2,e8zq2u0,democrats
I don't think he would know as long as they aren't white we can't let them in,magpie58,e90gkzh,democrats
"Yup, pretty sure trump doesn't know. ",Gsteel11,e90iz05,democrats
That's Twitter,AquaMorph,e90e1us,democrats
"Even if he did know, more brown people voting is something he just can’t have. ",A_Hendo,e90kv7n,democrats
"I mean, yeah I would expect this. Giving money to those in power helps you with your business ventures by getting policy and policy makers on your side.

Heck, Trump himself even bragged of playing both sides as fools and donating to whichever side made more sense at the time.

These people aren’t betting on Democrats because they all of a sudden are Democrats, they’re doing it for money related reasons.",TheMarketLiberal93,e91vbs2,democrats
"For an ad-free and paywall-free version, see: 

https://outline.com/yjjAAv",BlankVerse,e91p4so,democrats
"I really, really, really don’t want this guy to run in 2020.",nevergomainstream,e90jt6i,democrats
I could see him running again for VP.,BlankVerse,e90p8xl,democrats
"You don’t run for vice president, you’re picked as a running mate.",nevergomainstream,e914wtz,democrats
Too bad pumpkins don’t sexually assault multiple women..,WiKo17,e8zz66m,democrats
"Ok, that was fucking good",2HeadedTasmanianBoy,e90dt9i,democrats
"Just go ahead and downvote this before reading. Save yourself some time.

&#x200B;

I can add something:

&#x200B;

The democratic party is living out a political fever dream if they think they can stop this vile human being from winning again.

&#x200B;

Take a look at the front page of this sub. Literally 80% of posts go after Trump and how bad he is. Where is the support for Democratic candidates? At what point will the DNC be held accountable for their shoddy strategies (pied piper strategy, ousting Bernie). We simply will not win riding off of the fact that Trump is a piece of shit.

&#x200B;

Everyone knows. Nobody cares. His approval rating is going up. Get with it.

&#x200B;

You are all in for a rude awakening when this buffoon snatches another victory out from under your noses.",YupThisIsANewAccount,e905edr,democrats
"UNFAIR!

When has a pumpkin ever lied?",hrlngrv,e90aplu,democrats
"Gotta wait until Wednesday to begin the 2020 presidential campaign.

From my perspective, I'd love to see Mitch Landrieu or a non-Illinois Midwest Democrat make good showing in the primaries. IMO, Warren and Harris have no chance in the general election due to Electoral College mechanics: they'd ensure the middle of the country voted for Trump.

Sadly, what'd be most useful would be a serious primary challenger for Trump on the Republican side, but I can't see any of the current collection of cowards displaying such apostasy against the New Republican Order.",hrlngrv,e90b9e1,democrats
"No downvote from me. I think that is, sadly, pretty accurate. ",krrush1,e91hl6f,democrats
People that like Cruz already will dismiss it away like they do about everything else Trump. ,jondrethegiant,e90jh53,democrats
Perfection.,Stupidiseverywhere,e90ikrg,democrats
His promise is moot; the alt-wingbats are still violent.,mad-n-fla,e90tzef,democrats
I fear that his radical supporters with carry out a domestic terrorist attack that will put Trump in a position to declare martial law thereby allowing him to the declare himself president for life.,red_carpet_hero,e916ver,democrats
"Did I not hear this right or something, but it seems he said the violence would come from groups like ANTIFA, right? These headlines make it seem like he said the opposite. Click bait right here.",TheMarketLiberal93,e91l9pe,democrats
He speaks with forked tongue.,therecordcorrected,e91qtfz,democrats
"Steve Jobs was said to possess a reality distortion field which affected others, especially members of the tech press.

Trump has a reality distortion field which affects himself mostly.",hrlngrv,e90r7qb,democrats
This headline is bad. It should be something like **Chronic Liar Claims He Knows What Women Want.**,rogue203,e94358j,democrats
Moron,caligirl2287,e91jdoo,democrats
That’s not terrible.  The women who voted for him probably agree with all this.,miketeeeveee,e91ovb1,democrats
"Let me guess, the list came from Trumpski's new head of the CIA?

&#x200B;

Just how much other classified data is being sold by our first family?",mad-n-fla,e90ucwc,democrats
@joebidon,Marswithlife,e934mmf,democrats
"Virginia 2018 General Election 

[General Election](http://www.elections.virginia.gov/voter-outreach/where-to-vote.html): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e922ug1,democrats
Why aren’t more people walking around with tape recorders.  Imagine the money they could make selling a tape of these thieves in action ,ChangingFiveHundred,e8zxv30,democrats
Wow politicians lie?! I'm shocked.,damnetcode,e91tti7,democrats
"Virginia 2018 General Election 

[General Election](http://www.elections.virginia.gov/voter-outreach/where-to-vote.html): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e922u32,democrats
"We all know this, and they continue to get away with it. Scumbags.",cjheaney,e8zyduw,democrats
What in the name of the upside down?,Stupidiseverywhere,e91kwbj,democrats
It's a last minute smear campaign by Kemp to scare racist rubes into voting.,evdacf,e91okyk,democrats
Man I hope Kemp gets what's coming to him,Stupidiseverywhere,e91p74o,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e90iqdk,democrats
But Hillary can say “They all look alike don’t they”,kooodeal,e90q2os,democrats
"I mean, Hillary said it in a sarcastic way, towards the interviewer who got Cory Booker and Eric Holder mixed up. Hillary knew who said, ""kick them in the shins,"" the interviewer thought it was Booker.",b_rouse,e914hhc,democrats
Awesome but where was this guide when I sent in my ballot 2 weeks ago?!?,fjbruzr,e90s0a6,democrats
"Right?! I just got it last night. Here are some online guides too, in case you know anyone who hasn’t voted:
https://arizonaballotguide.com

https://drive.google.com/file/d/1SWmWiNHRXQWxKXRiF26CDxsP40qiQ_fH/view?fbclid=IwAR3AKHfd3dSd2ibtAHXbrb12Z6NnYeqQPUHfUwOVOl22QqWEfvs4Z88_36k

Spread the word! ",ogffirg,e918fe5,democrats
"Law enforcement did not fail to see this, they simply ignored it.",red_carpet_hero,e916yjb,democrats
Too many times law enforcement is far-right. Consider convicted felon and Trump pardoned Arpaio.,LebirtandJuztiz,e90lxxg,democrats
Stop trying to make everything about race and instead work on improving the lives of others.,bartonsmart,e90m3wd,democrats
Agree up to a point. Law enforcement can only do so much based on mandates passed down from administration and legislators though. ,usposeso,e90lmhw,democrats
"Not our fault trumpies are currently the biggest domestic terror threat. 

",VegaThePunisher,e90nluf,democrats
Quit supporting racist/white supremacists like Trump who work on improving the lives of the .1% only.,therecordcorrected,e90ouks,democrats
"Calling people “racist” without proof is the easiest and most common tactic used by people to demonize other people these days. It’s lazy.

I am not in the .1% and I have benefited from the improved economy and significant uptick in jobs created since Trump’s time in office. Is he a liar? Yes. Am I supposed to ignore the economic benefits of his presidency? Sounds pretty immature and short-sighted to me. Look, I voted for Hillary, but she lost the election. Trump is my president just as much as he is yours. Let’s not be divided.",bartonsmart,e90yxgb,democrats
"Created since Trump's time in office? Tell us what economic statistic has increased at a higher rate in his two years than Obama's last two years. If you are good you might name one. This isn't the will swallow any bullshit sub. Don't talk it unless you can back it up. Already lost the stock market argument. Unemployment rate? Nope, decreased more under Obama. GDP? Nope. Racist incidents? Yep. White terrorism attacks? Yep. Trump is a racist/white supremacist. There is no doubt about it. Anyone that continues to support him is aiding and abetting that. Aiding and abetting makes you one no matter how much you deny it. It's like giving aid to the KKK but saying you aren't a racist because you would never join them or get involved in their actions.",therecordcorrected,e91rxm8,democrats
"Yes.  The president is a kindly old man who is gentle with women, kittens, minorities, and who would never ever make a shady business deal.",evolutionfan,e92sviq,democrats
Excuse me?,captainmo017,e92mm7v,democrats
Mueller has them. Be patient.,blues4buddha,e92n0am,democrats
Ridiculous that anyone was even trying to prevent them to vote over something so trivial as a # in an address,Anovan,e8ya4ic,democrats
"Suck it, Kemp.",LegendaryGoji,e8yk0nu,democrats
Not so for the native Americans in North Dakota tho. ,lofi76,e8ykr8x,democrats
"This a positive, but this strategy has already been very effective, there should be severe penalties for suppressing voters.  ",sticklebackridge,e8z8bfq,democrats
Great. Why can't they have that in North Dakota?,gdan95,e8yzfm3,democrats
Told....you. ,tdc1atlanta,e97fuph,democrats
"This isn't the 50,000 court case; it's only 3,000. ",baltimoretom,e8yzktv,democrats
"Take that, Brian Kemp.",kerryfinchelhillary,e8z6g8q,democrats
"Not gonna matter. I'm a Democrat and a Georgia native, born here. I voted for Stacy Evans because shes not insane. There is no way in hell Abrams is gonna get elected. I dont understand why our party cant put up a centrist Democrat. That's the only way we are gonna win the south. The response to Trump shouldn't be going crazy in the opposite direction. ",tdc1atlanta,e8yivfg,democrats
K,pedantic--asshole,e8y81d8,democrats
"If you think that’s the real reason they were trying to stop them from voting, you weren’t paying attention.",OkToBeTakei,e8yky6n,democrats
Weren’t thousands provided new ids in cooperation with some third party groups?,pokeonimac,e8z610b,democrats
r/asablackman,Peacelovefleshbones,e8ylf3s,democrats
Down voted into oblivion. I'll be back Wednesday. ,tdc1atlanta,e8yksym,democrats
Username checks out. ,StackerPentecost,e8yoy21,democrats
"I know, but still, that’s like the dumbest way to go about it. No one ever said they were the smartest though",Anovan,e8ylg3s,democrats
The purging of voter registrations gives me hope. That isn't something Kemp would be as likely to do if he had been planning to just alter the digital records  of the vote. So there's a chance that maybe he wont commit election fraud this time. ,mods_are_a_psyop,e8z4dm8,democrats
"Yeah, they had to either try and get new ids or find some way to prove they live in that area, such as bringing a utility bill IIRC. In principle, it still shouldn’t come down to doing those things, and it should be made easier for everyone to vote overall.",willdoug529,e8zang3,democrats
"First of all, one race does not prove a point. And secondly, no body wants to keep the status quo. People want change. People want to help people. ",sexlover6969,e8ykxsv,democrats
"Well, it was pretty clever. It very nearly worked, and has certainly worked before. It’s still working for the Native Americans in North Dakota...",OkToBeTakei,e8ylixc,democrats
"The majority in Georgia does not want a sanctuary state. Nor do they want gun control, or for someone to fuck with Stone Mountain. I'm speaking strictly about my state. They voted out the last Democrat over a fucking flag. California politics dont work here.",tdc1atlanta,e8yl310,democrats
I’m genuinely surprised that that is working too. ,Anovan,e8ylowr,democrats
"After Trump spent the last 2 years stacking the federal courts and GOP governors stacking state courts, I’m not.",OkToBeTakei,e8ylqxp,democrats
"Never compare size with a confident black man, Donnie. ",doyoueven-no,e9174jz,democrats
In other words he supports slave wages.,red_carpet_hero,e916wgo,democrats
I was Infantry and did 2 tours in Iraq during 2003 and 2005 (OIF1 & OIF3) with 3 -15. Rocks were the mildest thing thrown at us. Firing on unarmed civilians -throwing rocks or anything else- was punishable by court marshal.,11Bvet84,e8yf2og,democrats
"This is just fear-mongering before the election. All of this shit will suddenly disappear afterwards and he will claim he never said it. We have to start recognizing how much we are being played and not fall for this bullshit every single time.

We are not hurting him. He is eating this shit up.",backpackwayne,e8yavbs,democrats
Can we see Trump's birth certificate? I suspect he was born in Russia.,gregdbowen,e8yln5p,democrats
"Unless you’re in Israel 
Then, shooting rock throwers is fine /s",pleasebeuntaken10,e8yhqgl,democrats
That response is perfect.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8z718h,democrats
"I just realized *this* is why Neil Young posted a photo on his social media of the Ohio State rally that he wrote his famous song about with the caption ""Never again."" 

*♫ Tin soldiers and Nixon coming*

*We're finally on our own*

*This summer I hear the drumming*

*Four dead in Ohio ♫*



*♫ Gotta get down to it*

*Soldiers are cutting us down*

*Should have been done long ago*

*What if you knew her*

*And found her dead on the ground*

*How can you run when you know? ♫*",bumbiddlytake2,e8zpx7l,democrats
[removed],,e8zqt1r,democrats
[removed],,e8yufid,democrats
Yes but America is technically not at war with Mexico or even Honduras. Can’t be a war crime if you’re not at war can it. Checkmate ,jackredrum,e8yb04p,democrats
[deleted],,e8yh0rx,democrats
"Still is.

When asked upon departure about the issue trump said ""i hope they don't""

",EVRYDAYMANSONTHEBLOK,e8zamac,democrats
"I dare him to say he didn't say this.

This is by far the most disgusting thing he's said in a while. I've written it down.",RadioMelon,e8yj0rz,democrats
He already walked it back. ,runespider,e8zyeyn,democrats
Putin had a pod person made by the FSB to replace the real Trumpski.,mad-n-fla,e8z0zxl,democrats
Where you born this stupid or did you have some type of brain trauma?,therecordcorrected,e90ke7k,democrats
"What are you talking about? How are any rocks going to be thrown at anyone? And if somehow that is possible, how are half-starved, mainly women and children going to just suddenly going to sneak in and throw ""big rocks?"" Have you ever spent any time near the border in Texas (answer is no.)? This whole thing is a fucking joke. 

And what the hell does this have to do with ""going to war?"" What ""PC bullshit?"" What ""nice guy and get pushed around?"" You mean like dropping the largest non-nuclear device ever in Afghanistan? Do you know anything about the military or war or just what you heard? How old are you? Let's get blunt here. Everything you have said is nonsense.",therecordcorrected,e8z12mu,democrats
"
At least our Veterans and troops have self control and MORALS. 
While our cops and are out here shooting American citizens for less, you want our troops to shoot human beings over rocks...

It’s your new normal. Yell and yell until someone dies or gets hurt. Until one of the terrorists INSIDE our country starts sending bombs to people, or shoots up schools and churches. Oh don’t forget these are being committed by white American men and Trump Fanboys. 

Then have everyone else clean the literally bloody messes. 

But you’re worried about PC culture...
Nice priorities ",Egocentricbrat,e8zaqmb,democrats
Vet here. You have no fucking clue what you are talking about. Sit down and shut up. ,pewpewhitguy,e8zby9a,democrats
r/TopMindsOfReddit,The_Doreman,e8z3non,democrats
"You must be suffering from your ""engineering PTSD"" there. May I suggest self-hypnosis? Unknown? You do realize there are many reporters with them? They are not invaders. They haven't invaded anything and have no intent to and that is racist language. They have, by law, and what few will actually make it by the end of the year at best, the right to apply for asylum. They are vetted and have to go before a judge in order for that to be successful. Most are not. What the fuck invasion are you talking about? From mainly hungry women and children? What makes you think anyone is going to be assaulted? Speak up.",therecordcorrected,e8yizf3,democrats
He won't have to say it. He'll just say some other disgusting thing and it will all be forgotten. He's is playing that game brilliantly I hate to say. Nothing he does sticks anymore. The media can't wait for some fresh outrageous thing to report and Americans now has a shorter memory span than ever.,backpackwayne,e8yj4zj,democrats
Surprise!,backpackwayne,e8zz0dn,democrats
"It blows my mind that children of immigrants, like him and Cruz, have grown up to be anti-immigrant.",kerryfinchelhillary,e8z6rb3,democrats
He's for sale. Stop expecting him to have integrity and vote him out. ,curious_meerkat,e8zaj81,democrats
"Section 1. All persons born or naturalized in the United States, and subject to the jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the United States and of the State wherein they reside. No State shall make or enforce any law which shall abridge the privileges or immunities of citizens of the United States; nor shall any State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws.

Can't these morons read?

",Zoztrog,e8zg23c,democrats
That bottle of water he’s drinking... that’s cyanide. He knows he messed up somewhere in his life and he’s just now trying to get out of it,KnowHowSeeker,e8yuadz,democrats
I believe they are both Cuban which gives them a distinct advantage over central Americans in gaining citizenship.,veed_vacker,e8zdygx,democrats
"He is just towing the party like just like the rest of them. He and the majority of the GOP right now are not pro or anti anything until they think it will get them votes. I am an independent and have voted republican many times, but I’m definitely not voting republican any time again soon. There is way too much on the line.   ",arthurtc2000,e90693k,democrats
"Well, anti illegal immigrant is how I interpret their positions. We’re their parents illegal immigrants?",TheMarketLiberal93,e8z78hz,democrats
They have made is abundantly clear that they dont give a fuck about the constitution.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8zhp2w,democrats
Can he please share it with the rest of the GOP?  Starting with Trump?,candianchicksrule,e8zca4b,democrats
I do think that he knows at some level what he’s doing and is unnerved by it.,eric987235,e908vem,democrats
"Look at how the US treats refugees fleeing Communist countries vs those fleeing right wing dictatorships.  At the same time we happily took in Cubans and Soviet Jews, we kept out Haitians feeling Aristide and Central Americans fleeing the Contras funded by Reagan. 

",gremus18,e9117hy,democrats
"The thing is that after getting here they get to change the rules for new immigrants making what would be formerly legal immigrants illegal. Its basically shutting the door closed on your way in.

The big problem with immigration is that its a great motivator for fear mongering and other-izing. Most people don't know the immigration process and even think that it is illegal to enter a country asking for asylum, its not. So instead we get these really overly simplistic denunciations on immigration that eventually never really crystallize into anything other than - 'natives good, immigrants bad' as seen by this administration's attempt at severely decreasing legal immigration as well.

Either way:

> Marco Antonio Rubio was born in [Miami, Florida](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Miami,_Florida),[\[1\]](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marco_Rubio#cite_note-1) the second son and third child of Mario Rubio Reina[\[2\]](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marco_Rubio#cite_note-riseofMR-2) and Oriales ([née](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Name_at_birth) Garcia) Rubio. His parents were Cubans who immigrated to the United States in 1956, prior to the [rise of Fidel Castro](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cuban_Revolution) in January 1959.[\[3\]](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marco_Rubio#cite_note-WaPo_Exile-3) His mother made at least four trips back after Castro’s victory, including for a month in 1961.[\[3\]](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marco_Rubio#cite_note-WaPo_Exile-3) Neither of his parents were U.S. citizens at the time of Rubio's birth,[\[4\]](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marco_Rubio#cite_note-4)[\[5\]](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marco_Rubio#cite_note-5) but his parents applied for U.S. citizenship and were [naturalized](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Naturalized) in 1975.[\[3\]](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marco_Rubio#cite_note-WaPo_Exile-3) 

He would not be given birthright citizenship were it not for the 14th Amendment.",ytman,e8zafzg,democrats
"you'll notice ""pro legal immigration"" politicians often want to restrict or eliminate legal immigration. cruz has repeatedly advocated for reductions and eliminations of certain visas and also restricting chain migration.  


you don't get to say LEGAL GOOD ILLEGAL BAD\*   


\*btw currently trying to change or remove legal pathways",AnimusONLINE,e8zcqsb,democrats
"Constitution makes no such distinction.

So you and they are full of shit. 
",VegaThePunisher,e8zco7n,democrats
Unlike the second grade sociopathic racist we have to listen to spew bullshit and lies daily now..,ChangingFiveHundred,e8zp58l,democrats
“Why is it that the folks that won the last election are so mad all the time?”  Because they're afraid more people will see them as the horrible people they are and they'll lose power.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8zvdlw,democrats
Anger is the only thing they know.,eric987235,e9090b3,democrats
"I wish the article said what the hecklers were yelling. But [another article](https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/2018/11/03/obama-rips-hecklers-why-are-people-who-won-last-election-so-mad-all-time/?utm_term=.fb6aa13d70fa) suggests it was Trumpsters:

>**“Why is it that the folks that won the last election are so mad all the time?”** Obama asked a crowd of 4,000 as the fifth interrupting protester was escorted out of a Miami rally on Friday. Any further shouts were drowned out by the crowd’s roar.

>“It’s an interesting question,” he continued, turning around to address the people behind him. “I mean . . . when I won the presidency, at least my side felt pretty good. I don’t know why . . . **it tells you something interesting, that even the folks who are in charge are still mad, because they’re getting ginned up to be mad.”**

",bumbiddlytake2,e8zps2i,democrats
"It's not the bullshit and the lies, it's through people that lack critical thinking and believe him. ",Awesometjgreen,e8zs58p,democrats
It’s amazing isn’t it.  When you really think about it.   It just mind blowing to me. ,ChangingFiveHundred,e8zxofm,democrats
"The overall destruction by Trump and this complicit congress will take years and maybe a decade to correct, the damage will be long term not only in the United States but abroad also. ",walter1950,e8zncyz,democrats
*yawn*,RackyRacer,e90jjsl,democrats
k,VegaThePunisher,e90jr18,democrats
"Ofcourse, they have lost their humanity.",Stupidiseverywhere,e8zd1zb,democrats
"Chris Wallace repeated this same lie on Colbert's show last night and then backpedalled when Colbert asked his producer to fact check while they continue the interview. 

When they brought out that statistic Wallace claimed he meant only 10% get approved for asylum rather than show up for court and declared himself vindicated",martialalex,e8xb2pm,democrats
"So, at this rate... by the year 2110 Trump will finally be telling the truth.",KevnBacn,e8x21uu,democrats
I’m glad Colbert forced Chris Wallace to sit on the hot seat...it’s time to call out the lies. ,OldGrayMare59,e8xe40k,democrats
Still wasting time fact checking Trump. Facts can't win against a manure spreader. ,The_Write_Stuff,e8x74zn,democrats
"Only two people commented about it. 

I bet Fox news ran the video of Trump saying that and those idiots take what he says at face value.",clonedspork,e8x6b70,democrats
"In numerology, 3 and 89 are the same:

Step 1 — add up the digits 8 + 9 = 17

Step 2 — add up the digits 1 + 7 = 8

Step 3 — take the number of the step you’re on = 3

Works for 91, 93 and 94 too. 
",jackredrum,e8xx26v,democrats
I have a feeling he made up the 3% number...,kerryfinchelhillary,e8xfyij,democrats
To be fair I'm sure Trump has no fucking idea what the actual numbers are,lotusbloom74,e8xt9qe,democrats
"Plot twist: He actually meant to say 3 people, not 3%...",Prefectamundo,e8xgtgl,democrats
"I've also heard it said that only 20% or so of Asylum cases are actually approved, does this have anything to do with how slowly the cases process? As in the cases expire before they actually finish so they don't get granted Asylum but they never really given a fair chance",Deathwatch72,e8y02ym,democrats
"Simba, the lyin' King.",mad-n-fla,e8xnjo6,democrats
"I'm pretty sure Trump is probably just getting the numbers backwards.  

Someone tells him 97% showed up for court...and he hears 97% *DIDN'T* show up.  This is how cognitive bias works...you hear whatever you want to hear.",Archangel1313,e8y18uj,democrats
Never let the facts get in the way of your racist agenda.,NachoMommies,e8y3b7u,democrats
This close *holds hands widely apart*,smeagolheart,e8y3j5g,democrats
Lying as usual... or he’s just to stupid to know any stats on anything ,tiletart,e8y4fzc,democrats
"Daniel Dale is a treasure. His live tweets of press conferences and rallies are amazing. He wades through oceans of shit to call out the endless lies. Cheers Daniel, I’m sure you’re happy to be Canadian and not in immediate danger of an IED showing up at your house.",XinaRoo,e8yfxbc,democrats
I’m so glad our late night comedians do real time fact checks of journalists.,Millwalky,e8xf0nk,democrats
It was astonishing how Wallace tried to play the real journalist card while also parroting party talking points. Colbert made me proud squashing that garbage.,spqr-king,e8xpbsx,democrats
"That whole interview was really eye opening from  start to finish. Wallace repeatedly twisted the conversation in an attempt to play things off as a joke when he was fact-checked and countered on issues.

I used to, while not watching Wallace with any regularity, at least consider him a throw back to an older guard of journalism; that ended last night and he’s as duplicitous as anyone else on FNC (save maybe Shep Smith).",busche916,e8xt7d0,democrats
Though considering the years in question have to wonder if he contributed to the decline in percentage,Dragonlicker69,e8xiay5,democrats
"At this point, don't even bother taking anything he says serious. 
You can't even tell if he is lying or just willfully ignorant spewing the last conversation he had with someone who was preaching gospel. Which is likely someone lying to him in the first place. ",LinusWiger,e8xannd,democrats
"Your comment is so spot on. That’s what’s so frustrating. His supporters come at you with all the bold-faced lies Trump tells them and when you respond with facts, or even ask them to give sources OTHER THAN Trump, they label you a “libtard” or whatever inane insult they can muster. It’s nearly impossible to have a rational discussion with them.",chio413,e8xaod6,democrats
"Not seen any data but most likely it has to do with them not getting legal representation and at least currently, being threatened to lose their children, etc., if they don't sign certain documents. Also, with zero tolerance, there isn't enough judges to process things and give an adequate hearing.",therecordcorrected,e8yj8a2,democrats
Wouldn’t it be amazing if MSM did this with the conservative nut jobs they bring on to “spice up” the political discussion? Instead they just let them talk and interrupt others with no control over factual clarity and the whole conversation turns into a shit show with absolutely zero deescalation. Who cares about protecting our democracy or journalistic integrity when you’ve got those sexy RATINGS!!,Willgankfornudes,e8xhmoo,democrats
No doubt. Afraid of being separated from your children and deported.,therecordcorrected,e8xn1hh,democrats
"Yep. I know it’s been said a million times but I’ll repeat it. Delegitimizing media is one of the steps to fascism. Alongside a thousand other things Trump is doing (like his public inquiry around extending presidential time in office from 8 maximum years to life, nominating (and electing) a Supreme Court justice that would help give the president the power to pardon himself from crimes WHILE in office, pitting the country against each other using fear mongering tactics, inciting violence against the media and opposing party candidates/elected officials, exhibiting strong nationalistic viewpoints, literally never denouncing nazism even during its rise and the murder in Charlottesville and thereafter, inhibiting funding for and belittling the value of education, colluding with other totalitarian entities to win elections and skew public perception, denouncing/sanctioning lifelong allies and starting a trade war, lying about rally/event turnouts, preventing voter registrations and submissions, gerrymandering, firing FBI investigators researching into your crimes, using whataboutisms, hogwash, misdirections and logical fallacies to prove your points, and overall just being total and utter pieces of shit).

Sorry if I missed some stuff, this was just off the dome. But anyone with an OUNCE of world history knowledge can see this in plain sight (and saw it coming in 2016). They aren’t trying to hide it. But I guess that’s too much to ask of our country. Vote folks. ",Willgankfornudes,e8xj93g,democrats
"The current backlog of cases is huge, thats why I was curious",Deathwatch72,e8ykbyo,democrats
Every reporter should have an assistant googling everything in real time so they can call them out. ,koryface,e8ybhr5,democrats
"Politifact had to hire two people after Trump got the nomination. I imagine they've had to hire another two since then. See, Trump is creating jobs!",therecordcorrected,e8yf12o,democrats
"This Narcissistic Pathological Lying Moron will never realize he’s a racist, nor will he realize he will go down in history has the worst most destructive President, his unity has been giving a voice to racism, , bigotry, white supremacy , Neo- Nazis, it’s been there but he has now made it main stream and they believe its normal and their right to promote hate as he does.  ",walter1950,e8znyqf,democrats
Over the top hyperbole!,12rjc12,e8z8u95,democrats
"I'm not even going to read your paragraphs, your title is just so stupid.",Lexiepocalypse,e8zb2rc,democrats
"Trump is the worst racist in the whole world???

Surely the guy who just shot up a synagogue is worse, or you know, fucking Hitler....",TheMarketLiberal93,e8z7ulz,democrats
Racist? Yes. Dangerous racist who is inspiring other racist? Yes.  Worst racist of all time? Have you actually read any history?,brwtx,e905hmh,democrats
I’d rather hear what Cohen has to say about Trump’s private statements. ,orderofGreenZombies,e8zf29q,democrats
"Yes we know, we also have read his tweets.",Thisbymaster,e8z82gt,democrats
"Illinois 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://www.elections.il.gov/VotingInformation/EarlyVotingLocations.aspx): September 27-November 5, 2018 

[General Election](https://www.elections.il.gov/VotingInformation/VotingByMail.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e906mni,democrats
"Arizona 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://azsos.gov/elections/voting-election/contact-information-county-election-officials): October 10-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://azsos.gov/elections/voting-election/contact-information-county-election-officials): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e90lprx,democrats
lol,Xmasnoob2,e8yhz8p,democrats
The fact that they said they were Democrats and were telling other Democrats not to vote should have been the big tip-off that they were bots...,kerryfinchelhillary,e8z7eay,democrats
"Good! A lot of people feel Joe Donnelly is not progressive enough, and I understand that, but 1) now is not the time for a protest vote, and 2) I live in Indianapolis. This is the best dems are going to get out of Indiana for right now. Mike Braun is a jackass. ",doyoueven-no,e8z2b9d,democrats
"Indiana 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://indianavoters.in.gov/): October 9-November 5, 2018 

[General Election](https://indianavoters.in.gov/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8yq26d,democrats
He’s still got it. ,mbkthrowaway,e8yf8i6,democrats
"Henry Kissinger (of all people) was saying that Trump is a symptom of a system getting to a point where people can't ignore it's faults anymore, where business as usual is no longer possible.",Finite187,e8yukzg,democrats
I hope so.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8z8fdd,democrats
"^
|  He’s right, you know.

We should have at least a few amendments when this is all done to prevent something like this from happening again.",CaptainJAmazing,e8yxww9,democrats
You can't have a conversation with a manure spreader. It just keeps flinging shit everywhere and enjoys the smell. ,The_Write_Stuff,e8xrpy4,democrats
"He always says the opposite party is doing exactly what he is doing, so he is admitting that he plans to obliterate Medicare..",Staralightly,e8y0bfx,democrats
Another Trump bald-faced lie. McConnell vowed to end Medicare and Social Security if Republicans maintain control of Congress. Just more lies from the President of Mis-information.,pasarina,e8xy501,democrats
"*And talk about Democrats gutting preexisting conditions!* /s

No lie is too blatant for the Liar-in-Chief.",hrlngrv,e8y1hni,democrats
"Republicans:  ""Uh, wait just a minute here, something isn't right about that statement...Wasn't that supposed to be OUR plan?""

Normal people:  ""Why yes--yes it was!  You've been dreaming of this since 1936.""",jday1228,e8y1ob1,democrats
"If his lips are moving, he's lying!",reddit_1999,e8y3sc7,democrats
"Uh, Trump, you're talking about your plan.",kerryfinchelhillary,e8y3ntv,democrats
And the Republican Congress is complicit with all the lies.  ,walter1950,e8yh8lu,democrats
How is this not a “Pants on Fire” rating?,CaptainJAmazing,e8yxygl,democrats
He only spreads it? No contributions of his own?,hrlngrv,e8y1irg,democrats
More than complicit. They are doing it themselves.,therecordcorrected,e8yj0oy,democrats
"Those are used for lies that aren't for policy based things like when Trump said there is an order from Saudi Arabia for $450 billion in military equipment and there isn't which can be explicitly checked, yes or no.",therecordcorrected,e8z1d04,democrats
Thanks.,CaptainJAmazing,e8z1fni,democrats
What. The. Fuck. Cue the hand-wringing over illegal immigrants bringing drugs into the country. ,doyoueven-no,e8z2lbg,democrats
No it's not. One dumbass doesn't represent our party.,backpackwayne,e8zr8h3,democrats
"obviously, but I criticized this video on twitter and other friends of mine who are democrats said I was wrong for calling out this sort behavior and said the women in question did nothing wrong, I don’t get it ",Abstraction_,e8zrc41,democrats
"Nah..., she and anyone supporting her for doing it is wrong. We don't need and don't want that kind of behavior in our party.",backpackwayne,e8zrkoh,democrats
agreed ,Abstraction_,e8zrnr0,democrats
"Gawd listening to both of them... 

I really miss having an actual President we could believe in, trust, and be proud of.  You didn’t have to agree with all the policy stuff etc. but jeezus what the hell have we become with this current foul mouthed racist sociopathic garbage.",ChangingFiveHundred,e8ygbhk,democrats
&#x200B;,Xmasnoob2,e8yi48g,democrats
Watch it with the name calling,RackyRacer,e90jmn1,democrats
"Clearly he has no comprehension of the words he’s using.

#Clearly he has no comprehension of the words he’s using.",Gay-_-Jesus,e8yjvhc,democrats
Wow a nbc news link with text instead of a single summary video.  ,7yearlurkernowposter,e8x3e0e,democrats
"Texas 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): October 22-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

[Check Your Voter Registration Status](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do)

",election_info_bot,e8xo4hn,democrats
"Good, but this is essentially a Dem endorsing a Dem. Nothing to see here. ",Johnford1963,e8xflw7,democrats
These morons really have a Hillary boner!,12rjc12,e8za24p,democrats
I expect they will hear from us Tuesday,DrNoPants,e8x8srh,democrats
will they vote for the leopard's eating faces party again though?,wwabc,e8x971m,democrats
"Where is that ""better healthcare plan that covers EVERYBODY"" that Donnie promised us? ",reddit_1999,e8y4g55,democrats
"When my GOP governor had a town hall, I went to it.  I stood up and told him that I have struggled with anxiety and depression for most of my life and that I was afraid of what would happen if my health care was taken away.",kerryfinchelhillary,e8xfk8c,democrats
And then?,iwascompromised,e8xjfh4,democrats
He said that I was brave for coming forward and talking about my struggles and that he hoped the Senate would find a solution...,kerryfinchelhillary,e8y3wo5,democrats
"ohhhh i'm sure he has a piece of 💩 for a heart, too.",artisanrox,e8wpf88,democrats
"I am so fucking tired of every third thing he does being labelled as ""the new low.""

No, we got to the bottom when his administration started kidnapping children and lying about it. He's constantly been at a despicable low and editorializing about how he is somehow getting worse is a way to not actually talk about the issues at hand. It's just hand-wringing without any real substance. ",TomHardyAsBronson,e8wwvx0,democrats
"But when you talk to friends and family, talk about the Republicans' plans for Medicare/Medicaid, Social Security, and pre-existing conditions. Don't let immigration fearmongwring dominate - control the message.",paperclipzzz,e8x0674,democrats
Andrew Johnson's administration allowed for the start of the kkk and he turned a blind eye to lynching post Civil War. Trump sucks but not as bad as Johnson. ,jasonwc22,e8whuqs,democrats
This narrative doesn’t work anymore can we update our thinking?,cercone89,e8x04h4,democrats
Does anyone believe that having Russian prostitutes pee on a bed just because Obama slept there is beneath him anymore?   This guy is full of hate and petty revenge is his thing.,smeagolheart,e8wuxvt,democrats
"When are we going to recognize that country of origin doesn't equate to race? 

Why are we cheapening that word, racism, applying it to everything we find offensive?",AuburnJunky,e8wwigf,democrats
Polk and Jackson would be proud. ,edc7,e8wrgcj,democrats
"> I am so fucking tired of every third thing he does being labelled as ""the new low.""
> 
> 

The continued lowest of the low. ",bumbiddlytake2,e8x6vsj,democrats
"Although I agree in general, I don’t think it’s fair to compare presidents out of context with the times they were in. There were different issues then.

One thing that is true is that ever since Washington, there has been progress, occasional hiccups but progress overall.  

Trump is one particular president who isn’t really a president per se, not in the normal way. He panders to his constituents. His entire term is, well...about him. He said he’d tone down the rhetoric but then said that his supporters demand it. 

His “policies” are less about “doing things” or being practical and more for effect and to send a message. He panders messages with projects that reflect nationalism, indifference and intolerance. 

He does and says things to get a rouse out of people. To get them angry, to get their approval and to get their attention and admiration. He loves basking in the power, this is why he campaigns all the time. He has a large audience of people who will listen to him spout his crazy theories and laugh at his vicious jabs. 

Trump might legitimately be the first true mentally ill narcissist president. Under Trump, perhaps for the first time, we might actually be regressing. Makes sense then as to why conservatives like him so much.  ",UserN-me,e8wi6xk,democrats
"Have you overlooked Trump's selling of America to major dictators around the world?  His not punishing them for murdering a journalist, chopping up his body and dumping the pieces into acid stew? Trump's collusion with Russia to get elected? Holding immigrant children in steel cages? Creating the worse national debt in peace time history (excepting the current ""Invasion"" from south of the border).",BucknDoe,e8wyzc8,democrats
I’m surprised Trump didn’t pick Andrew Johnson’s portrait when he chose a portrait for the Oval office.,pasarina,e8x7gae,democrats
"Would you consider that modern history though? No doubt Jackson sucked for that, but Trump is pushing the edges of the Right. ",erosharcos,e8wov9o,democrats
Trump is who we're dealing with now.  Stop defending horrible people.,artisanrox,e8wpgzi,democrats
"""Modern history"" not history. As in since WW II.",therecordcorrected,e8wuww7,democrats
"No one said he was, just that he'd sunk to a new low. Also, why would you be bringing up Johnson here and now? What possible point is there other than to try and justify Trump?",sotonohito,e8wpkki,democrats
Tell that to the migrant children locked in his summer camps who are just trying to have a chance at a decent life as opposed to the gang violence and drugs that run rampant in central america.   Kids just trying to claim asylum by being on American soil and asking for it.... that's how one apples for asylum.  It's too bad trump made a legal move illegal because it panders to the racist crowd that adores him,lamb2cosmicslaughter,e8wr6w2,democrats
"I think in the US, people who are vaguely ""brown"" and distinct from both black and white are treated as their own race. There are a lot of similarities to the rhetoric and prejudices around Hispanics, Natives, Arabs and Middle Easterners, and North Africans. They are treated distinctly different from people who are either black or white and while they obviously have significantly different experiences from each other, there are parallels where I think it's safe to refer to them as a different race. Rhetoric like they are invaders, pests, and diseased. They are inherently treated as unamerican and are presumed to be noncitizens unless proven otherwise (and even still...). ",TomHardyAsBronson,e8wxbtn,democrats
"Polk and Jackson are long dead and if God has any grace Trump soon will be.  Come on, is one massive heart attack too much to ask for??",AkiTendo,e8ws4mv,democrats
"Historians rate Polk as the 14th best president and Jackson as the 18th.

https://static.c-span.org/assets/documents/presidentSurvey/2017%20C-SPAN%20Presidential%20Survey%20Scores%20and%20Ranks%20FINAL.PDF",therecordcorrected,e8xc6s7,democrats
">Trump might legitimately be the first true mentally ill narcissist president. 

Might?  Like we need more proof?",Nearbyatom,e8wpzjd,democrats
"It's true that there has been progress, but in the past two years, there has been a lot of regression.",kerryfinchelhillary,e8wnvbb,democrats
Jackson???,jasonwc22,e8wq90v,democrats
Andrew Jackson is also terrible but the original commenter was talking about Andrew Johnson who took over the Presidency after Lincoln was assassinated. ,vincoug,e8xb54t,democrats
Thats not what modern history means. Early 16th century to present. ,jasonwc22,e8wvx6l,democrats
The possible point is to show that Trump is only slightly better than one of the worst and most evil presidents ever. Its adds emphasis to how horrible Trump is. ,jasonwc22,e8wqgjo,democrats
I’m surprised he’s made it this long.,blueholeload,e8wtoo4,democrats
Until you consider Pence is worse.,GenXStonerDad,e8wzdqb,democrats
Until you consider Pence is worse,GenXStonerDad,e8xb4t3,democrats
Does not mean that they were not flawed men. ,edc7,e8xiy45,democrats
"Well, I mean we are a land of equal opportunity. 
Usually... mostly...

Yes. ",LinusWiger,e8wv8ye,democrats
"Andrew Jackson's average ranking by the presidentials historians puts him as the 18th best president. Perhaps historians don't judge a president on one issue and with modern values. 

https://static.c-span.org/assets/documents/presidentSurvey/2017%20C-SPAN%20Presidential%20Survey%20Scores%20and%20Ranks%20FINAL.PDF",therecordcorrected,e8xc37l,democrats
That's not what it means in this context. Modern presidential history in the US starts roughly with Theodore Roosevelt/Wilson.,israeljeff,e8wyheg,democrats
"If you think Pence is worse than Trump you've been smoking some good weed man.  Pence is an asshole in his own right, but I'm sure he won't destroy our alliances, continue the failed trade war or order a nuclear strike for no good reason.",AkiTendo,e8x20te,democrats
How do you know that?,therecordcorrected,e8xc8kq,democrats
"I see what you did there.  You want to give the next person an opportunity to be a bigger dbag than trump.  Equal opportunity, right?",Nearbyatom,e8wve0e,democrats
"That puts him at the 40th percentile, not exactly something to crow about.  Really, it just goes to show how many terrible Presidents we've had.  Looking at the [list](https://www.c-span.org/presidentsurvey2017/?page=overall) Reagan, who was a fucking monster, is ranked 9th.  Nixon is only ranked 28th, not even the bottom 10!  Also:

> Perhaps historians don't judge a president on one issue and with modern values.

Hitler loved his dog, that doesn't make him a good person.",vincoug,e8xdmv5,democrats
"He might not nuke someone, but he would do his best to destroy many civil liberties and continue the GOP assault against the LGBT community, like he did as Governor of Indiana.   We would see a stark increase in religious doctrine controlling government decisions. Along with doing his best to make abortion illegal.

I also have no reason to believe he won't continue the isolationist movement of Trump. 

Also, if you a grown man who calls your wife mommy, it tells me you have a lot of mental health issues and are unfit to hold any sort of position of power.

So yes, he could easily be worse. Best case scenario is it's a wash and he's separate but equal to Trump. ",GenXStonerDad,e8xcccn,democrats
Name a country run by a religious zealot that can actually be called a good place to live?,GenXStonerDad,e8xcfgz,democrats
"I rather we not jinx it... 
",LinusWiger,e8wvr61,democrats
"Well that is the worse of the presidential historians poll. The rest rank him higher as you can see in wikipedia. And being in the top 40% does not make you near the worse ever. It makes you closer to the best ever. 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Historical_rankings_of_presidents_of_the_United_States",therecordcorrected,e8xf3yq,democrats
"What assault on the LGBT could he do worse than is currently being done? If Trump is impeached, like Ford after Nixon, his only source of power will be in foreign policy pretty much.",therecordcorrected,e8xcw8g,democrats
There have been many presidents that were extremely religious. That is not a valid argument whatsoever. Jimmy Carter was a born again Christian.,therecordcorrected,e8xczj6,democrats
"If it’s clear there was election fraud you’ll be able to find me protesting near the capital building in my state. 

If it’s not and we still lose, I’ll be drunk at home, probably planning my move to Canada/ New Zealand.

No reason to protest if we legitimately lose. It’d be more a moment of reflection and disappointment. ",goodstorydan,e90i446,democrats
I've been trying to formulate a plan of action as soon as it was clear the GOP was going to engage in ELECTION FRAUD but the bots and trolls keep shooting me down.,surface_book,e90egwd,democrats
"This is a victory for all American voters, not just Dems. ",Stupidiseverywhere,e8xuia8,democrats
"Georgia 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](http://elections.sos.ga.gov/Elections/advancedVotingInfo.do): October 15-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://www.mvp.sos.ga.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8xqyt7,democrats
"The ""exact match"" rule was a good example of suppression. ",kerryfinchelhillary,e8y4756,democrats
"Sign a letter stating that it's not up to him.  Or anything else, for that matter.

Unelected piece of traitor shit.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8x90st,democrats
How can anyone say he's pro LGBT?,kerryfinchelhillary,e8xf6fw,democrats
[removed],,e8yi2oy,democrats
Cool. But he. doesn't. care. ,doyoueven-no,e8wy8w2,democrats
[removed],,e8x7rfl,democrats
"Take your bigoted, nonsensical garbage elsewhere. And while you do, think about the fact that thousands are born with both a penis and vagina every year.",therecordcorrected,e91s6o1,democrats
"Of course he doesn’t care. And neither does his hardcore fan base, and they never will. 

But that’s not the point. 

The point is for us all to stand up and get these things on record. 

Because he and America and the world needs constant reminding that he doesn’t have full authoritarian power, and because it gives us a base to fix this shit once he’s removed from power and held accountable for his words and actions. 

So yes, it matters. ",PraxisLD,e8x1p8r,democrats
"Thousands, I think you mean millions. Also, I don't see your point.",Xmasnoob2,e98j0f6,democrats
"I agree. I meant to be scathing towards him, not you. ",doyoueven-no,e8x1wp4,democrats
Understood.,PraxisLD,e8x5liz,democrats
And this is how we win...,PraxisLD,e8y6yin,democrats
"When pressed on issues, has he or his cabinet ever spoken the truth?",Jose_xixpac,e8wzbqz,democrats
"The Lie is the quantum of evil.

And this piece of unelected traitor shit is rich in his chosen coin.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8x9579,democrats
A tiny fraction of what the Post has conjured up.,floridawhiteguy,e93d3o8,democrats
[removed],,e90jrgl,democrats
Prove it.,thesneakysnake,e94z8di,democrats
Well do you acknowledge already that he is a shit liar?,VegaThePunisher,e90osrf,democrats
"Unlike dotarders, the rest of us can count over 100.",therecordcorrected,e90rg82,democrats
[removed],,e90rshb,democrats
"Brcause it’s Obama’s economy.

That’s a fact.

All trump has done is eat, be a racist and commit crimes. ",VegaThePunisher,e90sgiz,democrats
[removed],,e90spp3,democrats
no y?,VegaThePunisher,e90sq2r,democrats
[removed],,e90t0wn,democrats
"False.

This is Obama’s economy and job creation is actually down since orange boy took office.

You poor deluded fools only know what your master feeds you. 
",VegaThePunisher,e910906,democrats
Uhh.. because it was a boneheaded thing to do?  I always wonder 'what were they thinking' when people do something like this. 🙄,Btravelen,e8yna9t,democrats
"I think you will find plenty of common cause on this, but let me be the first to say thanks for being loyal to your values first, party second. 

In general, the last few years have been a tough lesson that we ALL need to be issue-oriented voters, not blindly loyal partisans. That approach always leads to abuses. If people refuse to play the game, we don't end up in these kinds of situations.",beenyweenies,e8xfpln,democrats
"I used to be independent too.  Then I saw what happened to my friends and family, as well as how I was being treated by republican families as friends who didn’t even try to understand my views before venting at me as if I just punched them( most I’ve had to cut contact with cause they were unhealthy; I don’t bring up politics with the ones I stay in contact with). Even when I wasn’t making myself anyone enemy, other people were painting me as the enemy.

I don’t hold anything against you if you one day go back to being independent, but I’ll be one of the people staying democrat because the way I see it, me and friends lives will always be on the line while the republicans are in power which is why we stay demo ",22_An0n,e8ynfq1,democrats
"What in particular don’t you like about the Democrats that dissuaded you from wanting to change sides?

I feel like Trump and the republicans aren’t going to change so you’ll likely be voting dem a while but being forced is definitely not the ideal way to switch parties. ",ScentedShark,e8xnc93,democrats
"Thanks for looking at the big picture, and adjusting your stance accordingly. 

Right now, we need to obliterate the Republicans at the polls as a direct consequence of their criminal actions. 

Once that’s done and the Democrats have regained power and the Republicans have been completely routed, then we can give the independents and progressives a real voice in modern government. ",PraxisLD,e8xq2tt,democrats
"While I've always been a proud Democrat, I've seen many people say similar things around the internet.  You're definitely not alone.",kerryfinchelhillary,e8y4f0z,democrats
I think Trump is doing excellent. Just look at the unemployment rate!!!,Xmasnoob2,e8yi1gv,democrats
"Its not that I dislike either party, I don't like be aligned to single party. It really sucks that there are no voices of reason that lie in the middle and everyone is being forced into a hard right or hard left stance.",dred1367,e8xnjfz,democrats
"It hasn't decreased in his two years at near the rate it did during Obama's last two years. And the stock market? Well we see that. How about GDP? Oh, well.",therecordcorrected,e91sc91,democrats
"The GDP growth has been just as good if not better than when Obama was president.... Btw when you argue make sure to list your sources. 

&#x200B;

[https://www.thebalance.com/unemployment-rate-by-year-3305506](https://www.thebalance.com/unemployment-rate-by-year-3305506)",Xmasnoob2,e98j98m,democrats
"We were running strong in most states in 2016.  *Someonesky* decided it wasn't in the *cardsky*.  And that someonesky has had unfettered access to and control of federal institutions for two years running.

Trump is not propagandizing because he's concerned about an election - there isn't going to be one.  He's propagandizing to set the stage for what happens after.

This was all set in motion the moment our leaders cowered from confronting the coup two years ago.

Reddit will be *inundated* with Russian trollbots, calling everyone reporting on vote-rigging and polling place violence ""salty"" and accuse them of ""sour grapes.""  

They will bombard this and every single other subreddit with Orwellian gaslighting and concern trolling saying ""this is why you lost.""

Exactly like 2016, only more so.  

And they will add little flourishes for their own pleasure, like comments denying that Pittsburgh ever happened.

Freedom costs.  We refused to pay it two years ago against these psychopaths, so the interest will keep accumulating until we face it.

",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8x0ha4,democrats
Could it be that Kansans are getting tired of the Koch-topia they've been living in?,reddit_1999,e8y9ym7,democrats
"The wheels of justice turn slowly, but they do turn and very finely.",Stupidiseverywhere,e8x47yz,democrats
"King is just a symptom of the problem. The GOP has made lunacy, bigotry, and stupidity mainstream instead of ostracizing them beautiful delicate flower",JayWaWa,e8zdc8g,democrats
Does anybody speak yokel or rube that could interpret this sign for us?,Spy_v_Spy_Freakshow,e8vwphv,democrats
Aaaaaaaaand you live in Massachusetts good luck.,kboyer424,e8w0neg,democrats
"r/crappydesign 
",MickeyRen,e8vwfya,democrats
"The fuck does this even mean? These people are like paranoid delusional psychotics, they just assume that bizarre shit in their heads is just obvious to everyone else too.",awhorseapples,e8w2qse,democrats
No 2018 Sitting Bullshit?,MickeyRen,e8vwh8o,democrats
Then don't amplify it for them.  ,Dredderd,e8wbbe3,democrats
"Rob Roy Auto in Salisbury, MA, huh...?",reggiehux,e8wfhwr,democrats
"The only good thing about this sign is the fact that we know who paid for it. A business. People can now choose to not give that business any of their money. And others can see where that business owner stands politically and potential customers can make the decision to not patronize them. 

Edit: spelling ",Elharley,e8wl1dw,democrats
Well the rapepublickcans lit signs on fire in texas...,Ghosteye55,e8x34yt,democrats
Makes me think trump,immakatt,e8x4u25,democrats
"Massachusetts 2018 Election 

[General Election](http://www.sec.state.ma.us/wheredoivotema/bal/MyElectionInfo.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8xql0d,democrats
Why the hell would a business pay for that?   Jesus that is just as stupid as the sign itself.  ,mhoner,e8wmu6s,democrats
I hate the way Trump is encouraging people to act.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8wn42h,democrats
Ignorance at it’s peak! ,ScienceX-007,e8wo6hr,democrats
Pick up the sign. Throw it in the garbage.,jayhawx86,e8wqr7c,democrats
I’m 1/1024th sure I could care less about this,yzf426fm,e8wk3mr,democrats
It’s funny because she thinks she’s a Native American. Silly dingaling 🤣,ForgettingMagic,e8w8qme,democrats
Elizabeth Warren is not native american. We do need a native american president however and prefferably someone with more than 60% native american heritage.,Hiccaries,e8w8tpa,democrats
I’m guessing that’s their name for Elizabeth Warren’s Native American ancestry. Thought it was supposed to be Hillary until I saw where the sign was from. ,yerfatma,e8vydxy,democrats
They hate chairs? ,jackguey2,e8vx4cv,democrats
This is what the right wing media complex is doing to America.,nogero,e8x3nk6,democrats
"I don’t know why everyone is having such a hard time with this

No [elizabeth warren image]

Sitting Bullshit meanwhile is a play on sitting bull. Since she said that she was Native American and they like to make fun of her for that.",BabeGaines,e8w58zj,democrats
Propaganda of the good ol' auto industry,TheReelStig,e8wh011,democrats
It’s a “Sitting Bull” pun. Not a clever one. ,gringledoom,e8w8x3z,democrats
No Siting Bull shit.,higledepiggledee,e8w2hz0,democrats
She said she was told she was partially. DNA test proved partially. Remember how Trump's doctor was proved to be a pill pushing alcoholic? Where was the second test? Dementia president gets a free pass? How about his fucking TAX RETURNS???? ,CanderousBossk,e8wbhqh,democrats
"No, she never said that, nor thinks that. She said she was told growing up she had a great great great grandmother who was native american\*. It's not the same.People spreading easily verifiable bullshit on the internet for their bad ideological agenda is what's silly dingaling.

Edit : added words.",Pterygoidien,e8weluo,democrats
"Yep, it’s anti-Elizabeth Warren. It’s also massive and obnoxious. It’s outside a small auto shop that I’ll never go to because of its political signs.",masterfoo,e8w05or,democrats
I thought that was Jeff Sessions ,Spy_v_Spy_Freakshow,e8vz7oj,democrats
Holy shit. That’s seriously appalling. Rob Roy should be put out of business and run out of town on the bigot railroad. What a fuckwad.  His relatives in the area must be ashamed. ,lofi76,e8wmizn,democrats
"Going by the color and quantity of hair, I thought it was Trump until I looked at the comments.",CaptainJAmazing,e8wo7sq,democrats
Well she said she was told she was part native. Test proved she was part native. WHERE THE FUCK ARE TRUMPS TAX RETURNS??? coward traitor bullshit as far as I'm concerned until he proves otherwise,CanderousBossk,e8wbeo8,democrats
Its like free association for morons.,amus,e8wbusi,democrats
Still don’t get it. So Elizabeth Warren likes to sit around and bullshit. And this guy is against that? Lol ,Richarded27,e8wtl6r,democrats
"Ah, looked like HRC to me. Bad art as well as bad logic.",awhorseapples,e8wwj21,democrats
Really? Wow. You're right. Not a good one at all. The point of puns if for me to catch the wordplay.,MickeyRen,e8waieq,democrats
She’s not even up for election? And I thought that picture of her was Trump... if anyone’s Indian name is Sitting Bullshit...,Millwalky,e8w2anx,democrats
[deleted],,e8whogr,democrats
Haven't we seen trumps tax returns? Didn't what's her face on msnbc have one years?,skuhlke,e8wub1w,democrats
"I'm not saying I agree with it, I just don't understand why no one else gets it. This is a pretty clear message.",BabeGaines,e8wcu1q,democrats
Sitting bull. Was an Indian. Sitting bullshit is a play on that.,BabeGaines,e8wuos7,democrats
"Not for republicans. For them it’s worse than child writing a joke punchline. Not only does it not have the wit or the humor, like a kid joke, but it’s also mean. Ugly. Ignorant. Bigoted. White trash bullshit. As a white person I’m sick of white people’s shit. ",lofi76,e8wmlxr,democrats
"Yeah she's up for reelection. Apparently, this is literally the only thing people are able to use against her, so they try to milk it for all it's worth.",Birchmure,e8w3rj3,democrats
The test said 6 to 10 generations. 6... is a lot more than 1/1000. ,Gsteel11,e8wsl58,democrats
Trump is 1/1000th of a successful businessman,CanderousBossk,e8wqs8k,democrats
"True, but the fraction of it is beside the point.",CaptainJAmazing,e8woa9z,democrats
Nope trump promised he would release his tax returns and never has.,CanderousBossk,e8wvp2u,democrats
"I think maybe the person your responding to is maybe more “I don’t get what the *message* is supposed to be.” Like, I get the pun, but what’s the point supposed to be? Is it racism?",CaptainJAmazing,e8woccd,democrats
Its a bit of a word-salad rebus.,amus,e8wcw3o,democrats
Crazy. She’s campaigning in my state; must be a lock?,Millwalky,e8w4rkz,democrats
"Even though the whole thing was completely shut down by, ya know, facts. This is what happens when they have a candidate they have nothing on. ",LochNessaMonster7,e8wmtjm,democrats
[deleted],,e8xd6m0,democrats
Yeah polling has her up pretty significantly. Also the guy she's running against said he would be a vote in support of Trump and that likely doesn't play well here.,Birchmure,e8w59ng,democrats
Don't forget Trump claimed Swiss heritage,timoumd,e8woytl,democrats
"> Well, you’re dumb I guess.

r/Iamverysmart

She was proven to have Native American ancestry, so therefore she was lying about having Native American ancestry, because lots of other Americans do as well. Riiight.",CaptainJAmazing,e8xsk8t,democrats
"It's easy to forget when he does 18,000 obnoxious things.",smeagolheart,e8wwodz,democrats
[deleted],,e8xthgh,democrats
"Yes, literally everyone in the country has Native American ancestry. Also, people who have to repeatedly call others dumb are totally smart themselves.",CaptainJAmazing,e8xu5dd,democrats
[deleted],,e8xumml,democrats
My post seriously needed an /s? Do you think that literally everyone in the country has Native American ancestry?,CaptainJAmazing,e8y32sx,democrats
That's what he do,Btravelen,e8ynyyt,democrats
It's gonna be fucked up if the Con Party gains a seat or two in the Senate,Btravelen,e8ynqsw,democrats
"Possible, hopefully not probable ",Stupidiseverywhere,e8z7rtq,democrats
"Lol 

&#x200B;

> “It is clear that the president, unhappy with the court’s reasoning and conclusion, merely reargues that his interpretation of the emoluments clauses should apply instead of the one the court gave,” he wrote. “The court sees no point in stating again why it concluded as it did.” 

&#x200B;",Thisbymaster,e8y26ri,democrats
"I wish we would not have normalized the use of the word “theory” in describing Trump’s ramblings. I feel like it implies that there is some evidence, however limited, to support his assumptions... which is the word we should be using. Assumption - “a thing that is accepted as true or as certain to happen, without proof.” That’s far more appropriate.",emotionalgear,e8w7393,democrats
"What Trump’s incendiary and toxic rhetoric has done is give us the U.S.A.’s first Pogrom in 103 years.

Then there’s the #MAGABOMBER

Jesus Wept.",Touristupdatenola,e8wj4p9,democrats
The sad thing is that many people believe his conspiracy theories and I think he also eventually convinces himself that they're true.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8wn9az,democrats
Almost as if he wants it.,LegendaryGoji,e8wyjwm,democrats
"Why isn’t this being played up to the hilt, 24/7?? If true. ",walter1950,e8yiawi,democrats
Maybe it is where this ad is being played? Not where I am at because they know it would cause even more Republican destruction.,therecordcorrected,e8yj33c,democrats
"Complicit with his statements and actions. But just like Trump they don’t care, they believe his supporters are enough to re-elect them. ",walter1950,e8yi721,democrats
"Massachusetts 2018 Election 

[General Election](http://www.sec.state.ma.us/wheredoivotema/bal/MyElectionInfo.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8xqlop,democrats
"In other news, the Sun is larger than the Earth.",ShadeofEchoes,e8yazvp,democrats
"never thought i’d be someone who votes completely for one party, but in light of recent events that’s how i had to vote for the midterms. sucks because it was my first time voting.",lowkeydeadinside,e8un0ko,democrats
"Hey I'm 100% a democrat but please don't vote completely partisan just to be partisan. If you like all the democrats, go ahead and vote for them, but although it's hard to believe, there are good republicans out there. Please don't promote partisan politics because that's what the other side does and we're better than that",DurkHD,e8ummo2,democrats
Screw that hateful garbage. Vote ***FOR*** somebody. Put your pitchforks down and vote for positive change instead of just shadow boxing the boogeyman.,mghoffmann,e8wgvu1,democrats
"I am an independent. I used to agree that the best candidate gets my vote. In today's climate on the national stage, that thinking means giving in to a morally bankrupt band of cutthroats and thieves. National level republicans have repeatedly voted party over conscience. Even if there exists the storied ""one among them,"" that person will not be able to stand up to special interest and party pressures in either national house of congress.

It is worse at the state level. Hundreds more bills pass into law there, and now there is no chance of an unbiased Supreme Court, for many years, to test the consritutionality of those state laws passed by righteously partisan Repubs.",Elfzwolf179,e8unsdo,democrats
"Ugh.  Just when I thought we were progressing as a party, you have to go and say to only vote for this party, even though, although it may shock you, not all republican candidates are bad.  Sure most of them suck and are all for trump but a good amount still carry morals and we should vote for people based on their beliefs not on their political party.",soullessmonster,e8v2966,democrats
Lulz!!  At least the WP isn’t pretending to be objective anymore ,jankadank,e90gif7,democrats
Encouraging to vote agianst EVERY single republican is quite a radical and ignorant statement. Posts like these personally worries me for the future of the democratic party.,skid472,e8uppb3,democrats
"Ugh with all the concern trolling on this thread. Give me a break. Stop trying to be ""holier than thou"" by acting ""independent"" and ""moderate."" We are in an extreme time and there is no room for moderacy between extremism and reason. 

This article isn't saying to do this for every single election going forward. It's an article saying to do this for *this* election if you are sick and tired of having a President who misuses his office to demagogue on immigration, who calls the press the “enemy of the people,"" who employs the language of anti-Semitic conspiracy theories, who presides over one of the most unethical administrations in U.S. history, who lies outrageously and incessantly, etc etc etc.

>**If you’re sick and tired, too, here is what you can do. Vote for Democrats on Tuesday. For every office.** Regardless of who they are. And I say that as a former Republican. **Some Republicans in suburban districts may claim they aren’t for Trump. Don’t believe them. Whatever their private qualms, no Republicans have consistently held Trump to account.** They are too scared that doing so will hurt their chances of reelection. If you’re as sick and tired as I am of being sick and tired about what’s going on, **vote against all Republicans. Every single one. That’s the only message they will understand.**

",bumbiddlytake2,e8vjpa5,democrats
Yeah.,VegaThePunisher,e8ucexa,democrats
Voting against John James is racist. ,NoleSean,e8v97z8,democrats
Already done. ,constapatedape,e8vg1hq,democrats
I am not democrat but you guys have all my votes this time no matter what.,Smiles32788,e8vpp2f,democrats
"Are any “good” republicans still alive? Or did the last of them die with John McCain? I hope someone retains dignity and makes a party similar but not as hateful. You always needs at least two views for somewhat balanced legislation, but we do NOT need the current GOP in politics whatsoever. ",Skewtertheduder,e8w3s77,democrats
I already did. Early voting for the win. ,GreyTigerFox,e8vhdsn,democrats
"Up until a couple election cycles ago, I strived to vote for the most capable person. No more.

Every GOP candidate that gets a pass now, is just money the GOP puts somewhere else. For me they are all culpable now, even the decent ones indirectly.

Voter suppression, gerrymandering, the Citizens United abomination, and worst the breaking up of families, separating kids from parents. The insane war on iimigrants. 

The current national GOP is delusional and dangerous, not only to the US, but to good world order.

Every 'decent' GOP candidate you vote for is just an opportunity for them to divert money elsewhere. 

Donate, vote, and at least until the GOP starts to reform, make them defend every seat, from dog catcher to President. 

",chrisa52,e8vytlc,democrats
"Right now the Republican party is showing us that they've lost all respect for the intelligence of the voters, the rule of law, and the truth.

It's all smoke, mirrors and gaslighting while they rob our nation blind.

It's time we made them pay for that. ",hamsterenema,e8w21xf,democrats
No one with an (R) next to their name will ever receive a vote from me for as long as I live.,ULRB90,e8w8jl7,democrats
"I am a Libertarian, and unfortunately there are none running for any office where I live...So I will be voting Democrat down the line.

I would normally never do that, but the Republicans must learn that if they stand behind people like Trump, they will not get my vote.",jmsturm,e8vcykj,democrats
"I'm from Maryland. I actually really like Gov. Hogan. Other than that though, yea.",SaidTheHypocrite,e8umr8o,democrats
Voting out the GOP  is to vote out extremists. ,sn76477,e8v0zxu,democrats
But charlie baker,Never_Unknown,e8w7xgq,democrats
"Do NOT vote a straight ticket.  Pick (Select) your candidates (and implement a straight ticket if you so desire).  Years ago, I was involved in an investigation of a certain manufacture's voting machines.  Straight ticket votes are FAR easier to ... manipulate (switch).  

",cybexg,e8wtgff,democrats
"You’re wrong. Oh, you’re not? Who cares!",Truculent_Raisins,e8vjq63,democrats
"Not ALL republicans are bad, just the trump supporters ",Vola124,e8ut0g1,democrats
"All done   

Edit: LOL @ the downvotes ",AstromechOne,e8uuy0z,democrats
"The GOP is actively treasonous and harmful to the country, of course you should vote against all Republicans.",Crotean,e8v255z,democrats
"Never do this. Never. 

Edit:Gary Blacks amazing ",Horusprime,e8vx8vc,democrats
Trump is great,hornyalthetime,e8w2h59,democrats
Republicans are evil assholes,ozuguru,e8upy4i,democrats
"Yeah, no. I'll be voting for Baker in Massachusetts. Look him up. He's a liberal Republican.",svadhisthana,e8vpmdb,democrats
"To point out the flaw in this logic, perhaps to apply to future elections, is that it leaves Democratic Politicians the option to just spit on a picture of Donald Trump & then giveaway the farm. I like the farm.",white_n_mild,e8vbna1,democrats
"Where I live we have a local Republican who has proven over the last decade that he puts his constituents first, works across party lines, and is amazing at his job.  The worst that the local Democratic party can say against him is that he is a Republican.  They've even supported most of the policies that he has and the few that they were against had to do with him raising taxes on businesses to help those who were less fortunate - because they said it would hurt minority owned businesses, despite the fact that ALL businesses pay the taxes (including Walmart).

After getting a few mailers and meeting his opponent a couple of times the only answer I've received regarding her qualifications, experience, and policies is:

1. She considers herself a woman
2. Vote ""Blue No Matter Who"".

I voted for a lot of Democrats.  I did not vote for her and I do not regret that decision.",meauho,e8vvccx,democrats
I’m actually surprised I don’t have more canvassers and vital marketing for dems... they have squandered yet another great opportunity sticking to their corporate ways,Skeetronic,e8wakou,democrats
"You know... I've taken a long look at this. I'm 19 and this will be my first election to vote in. Looking at how the republicans handle money. How Democrats handle identity... I also work in the IT field so I know my shit with these voting machines and online ads. You guys really need to understand something, All of us. your vote DOES NOT fucking matter. At all. ",aaronstone628,e8vq6qc,democrats
Even Mueller?,darkrazor87,e8ujmjf,democrats
"I’ve never voted straight ticket before this year. And I was extremely conflicted by it. My reasoning is that I truly believe that even the good Republicans on the ticket would not be able to be effective under the pressure of the current GOP. The short term goal in my mind is to diminish the influence of the GOP and move toward a more balanced structure where I can vote for the best candidates in the future. 

Edit: word",appleburger17,e8v2jgl,democrats
I’ve never had that privilege. I was born a woman in poverty. The Republicans never had anything for me in their party. I have things to lose with Republicans in power. I always vote straight D. ,RedSassenach,e8vo13z,democrats
I would vote socialist but every socialist party and canidate is either illegal or very limited.,Hiccaries,e8up2iv,democrats
You’ll do it every time don’t worry,xPineappless,e8v4veb,democrats
"I agree. You should vote for the morally correct candidate. If the Democrat is sleazy, but the Republican upright you should vote for the Republican. ",Mysterions,e8un0b9,democrats
None of the Republicans have opposed him or called him out on his idiocy. Their complacency to the shit he has pulled and the Kavanaugh investigation proves there arent any decent ones. Voting Republican at this point is a vote for Trumps insane agenda. ,Brannstool,e8uuwkb,democrats
">there are good Republicans out there

Too bad they chose to be in the party that's actively trying to make the country worse to live in for anyone that doesn't have millions in the bank and is playing dirty every step of the way to force their agenda through the system. Don't vote Republican because they can't be trusted to do what's right.",PolybiusHypercube,e8unca8,democrats
"I would tend to agree however we are seeing a national effort by republicans collectively to undermine the integrity of our government at every level. At this point, a good republican should not be calling themselves a republican or should be actively working against the republicans as a party. If they're not than that means they're still working to further the concerted goals of the republican party of undermining American civil rights and democracy. So in this moment in time I agree with the article unless someone knows a specific republican is outspoken and working against the machinations of the GOP. ",TomHardyAsBronson,e8uo2kx,democrats
"> there are good republicans out there

No, there aren't.

If you join up with the Nazis, you don't get to say, ""Don't lump me in with the rest of the Nazis, I'm not like those guys over there!""

If they were good, they wouldn't join an organization devoted to evil.",LysanderSporker,e8uotxc,democrats
No decent person can stay republican after trump. If someone is still republican that person is fine with racism and pure evil. F it,ozuguru,e8uq1iz,democrats
Good Republicans wouldn't stand with Donald J Trump.,SwegSmeg,e8wd6pv,democrats
Well said. People need to stop making entire parties out to be dark empires i an attempt to leverage a particular party. ,Chovinson,e8wtlrd,democrats
Looks like you're no different at all,papi1368,e8vh2xt,democrats
"The Republican Party has abdicated its right to say it values morality when it does nothing to stand up to Trump.  True, individual Repubs may be moral, but by staying in the party they are implicitly okaying Trumpism and thus are fair game in the voting booth.",AllByMyZelph,e8vakgb,democrats
"People act like staying within party lines is a Republican only thing. Top Dems pressure everyone to stay in their party lines too. 

My local rep works for alternatives to college, military apprenticeships, local green energy, small business startups, and local tech industry growth. Sure he doesn’t really care about conservation which is my big issue, but his opponent is just running on “Vote Democrat^(TM).”",Quria,e8v6vms,democrats
"People should probably vote on issues, not whether the candidate is a nice person. At least in national races (and it's extending to statewide races in most states), the issues pretty much align with one party or the other, so I don't really understand the logic here. I look at party platforms and while many republicans aren't bad human beings, they all have bad ideas for how the government should run and the direction our society should go, so voting a straight dem ticket isn't really a tough call.",contentpens,e8vv6fm,democrats
"Yes, they are. If you don't denounce children being ripped from families then you are what's wrong with this country. ",SwegSmeg,e8wdela,democrats
"You're right that it's definitely a bit of an extreme statement and surely there are a few republicans that would be the best choice. At the same time, any candidate that continues to associate themselves with the current republican party is making something of a statement about what they think this country's about and where it should go and little of what the GOP endorses these days is something I can get behind. Republican can't really just mean economic conservatism or something like that anymore. It is the party of trump enacting the policies of trump, which has spent the last 2-3 years doing violence against our laws and norms. To call yourself a republican must mean owning that to some degree and anyone that owns that shit is someone nobody should support.",Saul-K,e8uy4fh,democrats
When the GOP stops trying to kill millions of US citizens with their health care plans we talk about voting for another party again. Its only logical to vote against the GOP everywhere right now.,Crotean,e8v286v,democrats
That's how we ended up in this hyperpartisan mess to begin with.,sovnade,e8uw0lu,democrats
The shit going on in the White House (and on Trump’s unsecured cell phone) personally worries me for the future of the planet.,MaxxEPadds,e8uyn0l,democrats
Nah.  This is about sending a message.  Politics is a street fight.  ,AllByMyZelph,e8vamu8,democrats
When the Republican party supports ripping children from families to put in cages yes EVERY single Republican needs to lose. This is Nazi level shit. Would you take your statement replace Republican with Nazi and still say it's true?,SwegSmeg,e8wdi0k,democrats
Why? Explain in detail. ,VegaThePunisher,e8uwyvu,democrats
You should have bolded the “regardless of who they are” part.,FreischuetzMax,e8vka71,democrats
No.,NoleSean,e8v9d3p,democrats
Yeah.,wazeecha,e8uep2j,democrats
What do you like about him?,SlobBarker,e8ur1po,democrats
It's all nice talk till they gerrymander the fuck out of any other option. Then it's more of the same.,SwegSmeg,e8wdtil,democrats
"Same, voted for him. I just think that some of Jealous’ initiatives are a little too ambitious and I like how we have a bit of a slot in Annapolis right now. 

100% vote for Peter Franchot since he’s taking MD’s shitty booze laws head on to promote more craft brewing/distilling. ",thefluffyfigment,e8urtbh,democrats
"Extremists, like those who call for open borders, abolishment of ICE, Antifa? Oh wait, that’s the left. ",NoleSean,e8v9c9e,democrats
"The New York, Hollywood, millionaire celebrity? Of course, he's just like you. So relatable.",SwegSmeg,e8wduyg,democrats
"I think the wealthier you get the more your moral responsibility grows; but unfortunately, I have to agree with you. Many are selfish, or have shallow worldviews, or naively believe the cosmic powers of the free market will solve all problems. I am stunned at the efforts to eliminate the estate tax and progressive taxes, to dismantle social security and Medicare, to let the homeless die on the streets, and to deny any effort to address climate change. Yet nearly half of voters still support this party! I generally think I live in bizarro land in America... and this is someone who would probably vote for conservative parties if I lived in Europe or elsewhere.",shivaswara,e8us2dw,democrats
That’s absolutely not true. Your vote 100% matters. ,waldrop02,e8vr0b9,democrats
Da comrade,SwegSmeg,e8wdy7d,democrats
Mueller isn't running for office. ,Snapplewolf,e8ukhki,democrats
GOP is dead to me. There will be no phoenix revival story for them to get me to ever vote for a republican again. The party needs to die. I don't trust them and it would take a miracle for me to ever change my view of them. It is time for new parties to emerge. ,Lin0712,e8v3tjv,democrats
"Remember when all those Ralph Nader supporters helped get GW in office? 

Your vote is a narrowly defined action within a game theoretic context. If you’re going to vote for someone who you know won’t get elected please at least understand the message you’re sending. 

The Nader supporters helped support a war and tax cuts for the rich, that we’ll be paying off for generations. ",geneorama,e8usb4p,democrats
is there a single instance of this in this election? asking for a friend of course...,l0lsupbreh,e8usoox,democrats
"The problem is that since the Republican party has become the party of Trump and Nazis and white nationalism, there really is no ""moral"" Republican candidate.  Anyone who was would simply refuse to caucus with them and become an independent- or start a new party. Instead, the people are quietly denouncing it but still using it so they can be elected in red areas.  Its time to destroy the party and let conservatives form a new party without the fucking nazis...Oh and it would help if they believed in science too.",Raspberries-Are-Evil,e8uqbbl,democrats
"My mother has a friend who was telling us about the day she went to vote for the democratic primaries.  So we ask her who she voted for.  
  
""I dont know, I just tick every box that says D...""  
  
Dumb fuck didnt realize they All said D. 
  
I cant stand blind voting",BranTheNightKing,e8vgeap,democrats
Its impossible to be upright and run for the party of Hitler.,IHirs,e8vjd2b,democrats
No,VegaThePunisher,e8unnf8,democrats
[deleted],,e8uyz0j,democrats
"But Hitler did a lot of good things like build the autobahn and... well that’s all I could find. 

For someone in such a position of power it’s shocking that he didn’t do a few good things by accident. Obviously the bad things will impact the world forever. 

I think you’re dead on in your reasoning. ",geneorama,e8uskry,democrats
">If they were good, they wouldn't join an organization devoted to evil.

from their perspective, it isn't. Not everyone shares your judgment of what is good or evil.",zcleghern,e8uxzb2,democrats
[removed],,e8vd9ie,democrats
What a ridiculous comment. ,Chovinson,e8wtmps,democrats
whats that even supposed to mean,DurkHD,e8vhmye,democrats
"By stating that all republican candidates want to rip children away from their families you are being ignorant.  Also if you think that someone is what’s wrong with the country simply because they choose NOT to blindly enforce their parties agenda and simply ignore the fact that not all reps are bad, then YOU are what’s wrong with this country.  You’re acting a lot like trump in fact.  Smh",soullessmonster,e8xk6l1,democrats
"im actually happy acknowledged that, i feel like many democrats would be completely ignorant of that idea.",skid472,e8uz1t3,democrats
"Well this is a more off the bat thought since I am currently busy, but i feel the further we stray away from compromise with the republican party then the more danger there will be to the main foundations of society; leading to a higher chance of radical change in either direction. Which I personally do not favor.",skid472,e8uzcjr,democrats
Blind faith. One of the main reasons we criticize republicans. ,sDotAgain,e8v5ls7,democrats
Yup,VegaThePunisher,e8ves0w,democrats
Yep.,majiktodo,e8ulazc,democrats
The fact that he is part of an organization that rips small children from families to put into cages.,SwegSmeg,e8wds2t,democrats
The difference between an American and a politician.,Jose_xixpac,e8unnws,democrats
Are you me?  I'll never vote GOP again.  ,AllByMyZelph,e8v9r45,democrats
Agreed. Only democrat and socialist should be there.,Smiles32788,e8vprme,democrats
"And your point is ?

If a vote is truly a narrowly defined action within a theoretic context than voting in general is pointless.",Hiccaries,e8usvk4,democrats
This is why expecting ideological purity in the political context is so ridiculous.,AllByMyZelph,e8v9wew,democrats
"We really need a run-off voting type system to narrow things down to 2 candidates.  The ""everyone can be on the ballot"" system is ripe for abuse.",reignfyre,e8vnqwp,democrats
"The message you’re sending is pretty simply, “I don’t like the other candidates as much as this one”.

There isn’t some secret message you’re sending by voting for the candidate that best represents you, and to suggest otherwise is just plain stupid.",TheMarketLiberal93,e8uy9yn,democrats
"Bob Menendez in New Jersey Senate was indicted for corruption. I'm a democrat, but would have a hard time voting for him. I'd probably do it because I think having more limits on Trump is worth having to vote for a crappy candidate, but it'd be tough and I understand not doing it.",_sockinthemachine_,e8vdex3,democrats
"I'm okay with the republican candidate for the Arizona State Mine Inspector. It's a non-legislative position, but still. That was actually the only partisan position on my ballot where I didn't dislike the Republican when I researched them. 

Also my state district is very Hispanic so there's often just a race between a democrat and an independent or green, and I know I've tossed them each some votes before since I genuinely liked them more than the democrat and voting for them wouldn't give it to a worse candidate. ",EchusChasma,e8v7col,democrats
NJ senate race Menedez v Hugin,TheDoonkhan,e8vg8rf,democrats
Right.  Are there any independent voices in the Republican Party anymore?,AllByMyZelph,e8va0lk,democrats
"“You liberals call everyone you disagree with Hitler!” -conservative voters as they cast their vote for the party running on a nationalist platform. 

They did nazi see it coming (and still don’t). ",LucidLynx109,e8vlg75,democrats
"It may seem rare, but it does exist",DurkHD,e8v19v1,democrats
"meh, i googled this for my own general curiosity (clearly im not supporting hitler whatsoever, he's a monster etc etc), and here's what i found:

he started one of the first anti-smoking campaigns, did some good stuff with animal welfare (banned animal testing**, passed hunting season laws), created volkswagen aka affordable cars, and pushed heavy welfare programs (money for having babies, etc).

**i guess you don't need to test on animals when you're testing on people... yeesh. ",hirst,e8v2ntj,democrats
"Hell, even FARC built playgrounds for children.",LysanderSporker,e8ut0ra,democrats
"Yeah, Hitler got the price of bar soap a LOT lower...",AliceBowie1,e8uyj3u,democrats
"> from their perspective, it isn't.

And from the Nazi perspective, the Nazis were the good guys.  What's your point?

> Not everyone shares your judgment of what is good or evil.

I'm well aware that not everyone thinks genocide is bad.  Those people are depraved and their opinions shouldn't be allowed to matter.",LysanderSporker,e8uy8fl,democrats
"I can tolerant opposing views until the point it becomes intolerance. When you align yourself with nazis, you are providing at least tacit support for an intolerant perspective. Because of this, it’s really hard for me to give any republican the benefit of the doubt right now. Notice I said Republican and not conservative. I can respectfully disagree with a conservative.",LucidLynx109,e8vlxej,democrats
"I don't care what your perspective is, if it involves stealing children from parents you're evil. ",SwegSmeg,e8wdaig,democrats
"HOLY SHIT YOU MIGHT BE THE STUPIDEST PERSON ALIVE!!!!!!!!!!

Names mean jack shit, you fucking idiot.  You can call yourself whatever the fuck you want, that doesn't make it so.",LysanderSporker,e8vde33,democrats
"""Better than that"" thats up to the person, no political side is, unfortunately, better than the other",papi1368,e8vids8,democrats
"No, and all cops aren't bad sure. When you don't denounce the evil within your party you get wrapped up with it. I live in Charlottesville and I saw the Unite the Right people up front. Yes, maybe some of them were good people. When you are marching with people chanting ""Jews will not replace us"" you're at the very least a Nazi sympathizer. If you're still a Republican you're a Trump sympathizer.",SwegSmeg,e93cr28,democrats
"But the current iteration of the GOP is unwilling to compromise.  What do you do in a situation like that?

&#x200B;",AllByMyZelph,e8vas8w,democrats
And where did such compromises lead to in 2006-2016?,VegaThePunisher,e8v0ozk,democrats
We tried compromising with them for 8 years lmao fuck that,seditio_placida,e8v0ich,democrats
The Republican party stopped compromising years ago. That's why our politics are so far to the right. Democrats are most western country's conservatives. This is because the Democrats have compromised too much. Now we are teetering on the edge of fascism and the future looks bleak.,SwegSmeg,e8wdma4,democrats
Um no. ,VegaThePunisher,e8v7h89,democrats
Uh huh.,Raspberries-Are-Evil,e8uq599,democrats
That is what Mueller is.,darkrazor87,e8vj74a,democrats
"Well Brother, I hope we can start the change we so desperately need in this country.",Lin0712,e8vg50p,democrats
I had hope for the Green party until Stein...,Lin0712,e8vykcw,democrats
[deleted],,e8w9dg4,democrats
"It’s not pointless. It’s just a very limited action. 

Looking at how gerrymandering works made a light go off in my mind. If a candidate wins with 80%, then there were a lot of “wasted” votes that the winning party would prefer to have in another district where the vote was closer or where they are not winning. Also you want a comfortable margin to save money on advertising. 

When you realize that voting isn’t really about representation, at least not entirely, you can start to see it for what it is; a game with game theoretical optimal actions. 

Representation happens through this “game”. 

Hopefully we’ll see a blue wave this time which is essentially a disruptive event that shakes things up and changes and redraws districts. ",geneorama,e8uudbb,democrats
Brah....good point!,porkypup,e8ut25s,democrats
"Yes. So you have to ask if sending that message is worth throwing your vote away. Also, if anyone’s getting that message. Do you think either party is looking at that <1% and thinking that they should change policy based on that? Maybe, but not much. ",geneorama,e8v79fj,democrats
"if you vote for a candidate who you know won’t get elected, rather than one who has a chance and you think is better than the other nominee, you’re pretty much throwing your vote away.",lowkeydeadinside,e8uyq1b,democrats
"That’s interesting about animal testing. I knew he was a vegetarian.  Also forgot the Volkswagen. I didn’t know the other ones. 

Wonder why I’m getting downvoted on this one? Maybe people not reading it mixed with T_D supporters. They comb the threads better than anyone. ",geneorama,e8v6zpe,democrats
"Well we aren't talking about the Nazis, we are talking about the GOP.",zcleghern,e8v1466,democrats
\+1,AllByMyZelph,e8va3no,democrats
[removed],,e8ve6ha,democrats
Where was the compromise on the ACA?,Truculent_Raisins,e8v69dm,democrats
Which would be?,Smiles32788,e8w9ej0,democrats
This is a democracy and anyone can vote for any candidate they want. Don’t shame someone for voting what they believe in,smoggylog,e8uzl27,democrats
">Well we aren't talking about the Nazis, we are talking about the GOP.

Hmmmm.  Exhibit A: Steve King of Iowa.

Let the GOP put its house back in order,  Then we can talk.",AllByMyZelph,e8va7oj,democrats
They're really the same thing at this point.  The GOP now is where the Nazis were in late 1932.,LysanderSporker,e8v7axj,democrats
The GOP in its present state includes white nationalism. Call them whatever you want. I choose not to tolerate an intolerant person. That is a moral decision based on my own sense of right and wrong. If you are suggesting it is okay to tolerate that perspective in modern society I suggest you examine your own values. ,LucidLynx109,e8vm9qm,democrats
"> I showcased how it fits the name aptly.

No, you just demonstrated that you don't actually know what any of the words you mean.

> Tell me, do food price controls for domestic industry more align with a socialist agenda or a capitalist one?

Capitalist as fuck, because they still preserve wage labor as the dominant mode of socioeconomic organization.  You'd know that if you actually knew what the words you're throwing around meant.",LysanderSporker,e8vebed,democrats
"Who gives a shit? One counterexample doesn't disprove the fact that Obama and the Dems repeatedly gave the GOP a chance to compromise and were consistently shut down, to the point that Mitch McConnell filibustered his own bill to avoid working across the aisle, said that his top priority was making Obama a one-term president, and said his proudest moment was when he told Obama that he wouldn't fill Scalia's SCOTUS seat.

&#x200B;

Don't believe me? [Here's what academics think.](http://www.tampabay.com/projects/2017/politifact/obameter/bipartisan/)

&#x200B;

""...since the mid 1970s, conservative positions increased sharply among Republicans. That trend reached its high point during Obama’s time in office and held steady in the past few years. Shifts among Democrats were much less dramatic. The average Democrat became slightly more liberal, but the trend line remained nearly flat.""

&#x200B;

Finally, why in the everliving fuck would we want to compromise with these people? They have shown no interest in reciprocating.",seditio_placida,e8vjedz,democrats
"The ACA was the GOP healthcare plan, so the plan itself was a compromise at its core. It used to be called Romneycare in its initial form, as it was based off the plan implemented by Mitt Romney when he was a governor.",Ason42,e8v6xu5,democrats
Both can be true,ghpkhg,e8uzuwn,democrats
"i’m not saying you can’t vote for whomever you want. but you need to understand that voting for a candidate that has no chance is the equivalent of not voting. it’s your vote, do what you want with it. just understand what your vote means.",lowkeydeadinside,e8uzucv,democrats
"I wouldn't vote for any white nationalist (or nativist) GOPers, no. In fact, I looked at my sample ballot and I won't be voting any GOP candidates at all.",zcleghern,e8vng5y,democrats
"It was a MASSACHUSETTS Republican plan. That isn’t anywhere close to being a national GOP plan. So, again, I ask where was the compromise?",Truculent_Raisins,e8vhn26,democrats
"This is something people don’t like to hear, but it’s the truth. If you believe in an egalitarian society and liberal values, you need to vote democrat.",LucidLynx109,e8vl45m,democrats
"Good job moving the goalposts to needing it to match the national GOP plan instead of your original ask for any compromise with GOP policies.

The ACA was the MA GOP plan, concocted by the Heritage Foundation, a national GOP thinktank, with lots in common with the health plan the GOP pushed for nationwide back in the 1990s. So from its inception, the ACA was a compromise. The uncompromised Dem plan would be something closer to universal healthcare.

Since the GOP decided to sabotage the olive branch that was the ACA, many Dems are thus now calling for the uncompromised health care plan of Medicare for all. Since the GOP has proven to be dead set against any plan the Dems propose simply because a Dem proposed it, they might as well go for what they want since a GOP refusal to play ball is guaranteed no matter what.",Ason42,e8vqmsm,democrats
[Fixed it](https://m.imgur.com/a/Fvsvu1a) ,SeriouslyItsAmy,e8y10zp,democrats
"Arizona 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://azsos.gov/elections/voting-election/contact-information-county-election-officials): October 10-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://azsos.gov/elections/voting-election/contact-information-county-election-officials): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8xj6ez,democrats
Blaming the victims.  Classic Trump.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8xgcsm,democrats
"So, Trump is full of shit! Who would have thought.",12rjc12,e8w2wws,democrats
Thanks Anderson. Keep up the good work. It must be exhausting day after day after day... I will be glad when Nov 7 th is here then president looney will see how much of an idiot he is. Lock him up he is a disgrace to sit in the White House. Draft dodging no tax paying POS. How he gets away unchecked is beyond me. I hope and pray Special Counsel pounces on him November 7th. I love CNN!,uporondrocks,e8whlo1,democrats
All Trump needs to do is tell his followers that he has built the wall and they will believe him.  It will save money and be just as effective as his wall.,Thisbymaster,e8wmwsr,democrats
[Credit: Philosophy.Seeking on Instagram](https://instagram.com/p/Bpr72GuHhKu/),PhilosophyThatWorks,e8xbeky,democrats
"Dropping out a few days before the election, after hundreds of thousands of people had already voted and your name is still on the ballot is not courageous.

**G**et
**R**epublicans
**E**lected
**E**very
**N**ovember",Brysynner,e8we35v,democrats
"Arizona 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://azsos.gov/elections/voting-election/contact-information-county-election-officials): October 10-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://azsos.gov/elections/voting-election/contact-information-county-election-officials): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8x7rdc,democrats
But uninvestigated claims by multiple women about the Supreme Court are more bogus than the Rapepublican claims by paid accusers....,mad-n-fla,e8wvqlg,democrats
Everything and more.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8wnmnb,democrats
Caught with their zipper down. Literally!,wsppan,e8wwffj,democrats
The what never mattered.. just the who,HawlSera,e8wzqhk,democrats
"California 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/voting-resources/county-elections-offices/): November 3-4, 2018 

[General Election](https://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/polling-place/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8xrcj3,democrats
Georgian here. I don't trust Kemp and quite nervous about this one. There will likely need to be a runoff.,PaceeAmore,e8xbp4o,democrats
Christianity is dying in America and it's speeding up. Evangelicals are pouring gasoline on the fire.,Gsteel11,e8x9nnn,democrats
One flaw in your plan: God either doesn't exit or doesn't care.,AkiTendo,e8x2f91,democrats
Anyone who considers themselves American should be outraged at this. ,Stupidiseverywhere,e8w0y7m,democrats
"How low can they go? Equal rights yeah right. When the Dems get power i hope they stop all this bullshit.  Make sure if you can to VOTE! 
",uporondrocks,e8w9830,democrats
Why are cheating criminals allowed to prosper?,Zelk,e8wilpt,democrats
This question? ,wantabe23,e8wp3cu,democrats
"We are letting cheaters hold office. It's like catching a sports team when they cheat but it's too much work to do shunt about it because they are declared the winner, and it wouldn't be fair to disqualify them for some reason.

That's the state of our political right now. As long as we obediently do nothing about it because apparently holding cheaters accountable is against the law, pull keep happening.",Zelk,e8xkgwx,democrats
"I mean Biden might take a similar position. Hard to say for sure. 

But I'm not sure it's going to be a huge issue? Trump is doing so much other stuff, it may get overshadowed.

I think a lot of people feel that ""worrying about the checkbook"" isn't a priority when it seems the ""house is on fire"". 

Things will take better shape after the midterms. ",Gsteel11,e8xo9aq,democrats
"You're not going to find true deficit-hawking in either major party, though it's been better under Democrats than Republicans. The prevailing (and I believe correct) shift in the Democratic winds are expanding the social safety net and earned benefit programs. The energy on the left wants programs like Medicare For All, and I don't want us to back away from that.

That being said, when it comes to military spending I do think we should cut back massively. Not a little bit, a lot. Last year's budget increase to defense would have funded the ""pie in the sky"" free college. The INCREASE would have done that. Taliban controls more territory in Afghanistan than they did in 2001. This technique just doesn't work.

Ending the drug war and decriminalizing/legalizing marijuana would also go a long way. Target tax breaks for small business as you said, not for giant corporations that don't need it.

Part of the reason both parties seem to kick the can down the road on the deficit is the same reason we see it with climate change: it's always less of a campaign issue to worry about things that are presumably not immediate threats, but distant ones. The incentive isn't always there for the individual politicians who are jockeying for more and more power. But Biden does seem like the Dem most suited to your top priorities, at least in terms of Democrats who are in the running for 2020.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e8xx5f3,democrats
"I know it won't be a huge issue right now and I agree that it shouldn't be a major issue right now because ""the house IS on fire"". I just don't want to vote AGAINST the GOP because I disagree with who they are now. I want to actually vote FOR some one who does align with what I want and fiscal prudence and tradition/convention in politics are two of my big points. ",WheresSmokey,e8xpc3f,democrats
"I completely support the social programs. I thoroughly agree with a Canadian style of Healthcare. I think there parts of the govt are fantastic and need more funding. Specifically the parts that millions of Americans use every year. But there are absolutely also parts that squander their money and need to have their efficiency looked at. Reform is necessary for these branches.

And I ahree with you on the military. I think we would be fine with a military half the size but double the quality. We spend so much to make quantity, but talk to any vet or active duty service members and they'll tell you that the quality of their equipment is garbage and sub par for a military claiming to be the greatest in the world.

And I think you're dead on about why it gets kicked down the road. Everyone cares about the here and now and doesn't really wanna put priority on the 50 years from now... ",WheresSmokey,e8xy4pq,democrats
"Yeah... I think it will be an issue, just maybe not a central one. 

I think the more moderate candidates would more likely focus on it. ",Gsteel11,e8xq1ox,democrats
"Yep. It's gotta change. Climate change solutions and the move to clean energy really can't wait any longer, and it's one of the biggest reasons why I could never support the GOP even if I agreed with them on social/economic issues, which obviously I don't. Their views on climate change and the mythical ""War on Coal"" are non-starters for me.

Couldn't have said it better. I actually knew a guy who was on a military plane that went down recently based on still-mysterious reasons that I'd imagine had a lot to do with being a shit quality plane. That can't happen if you're spending more money than the next 12 countries combined. It's totally an efficiency and allocation issue, not simply a ""let's just throw more money at it and it'll be solved"" problem. 

It's tough to see some of wastefulness, and it's another thing that sadly seems to be low on the priority list of both parties... so many agenda items take center stage over it, most of which are just sensationalist crap to drum up the base. I identify more as a Berniecrat than a Bill Clinton style liberal, but at the rate we're going... it's quite possible that Clinton is the last president we will ever see balance an annual budget.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e8xzgkb,democrats
"Definitely a central issue. But I do think the Dems could help themselves massively if they take congress and then at least balance the budget. If they can go in and truly reduce the deficit and make strides toward lowering the debt, the GOP wouldn't have a leg to stand on except maybe appealing to folks that want harsher immigration policy. But the GOP has always run on a big platform of ""fiscal responsibility"" if the Dems can take on that mantle and actually follow through, I think it would be huge. 

&#x200B;

Like I said, I'm looking ahead to 2020 and assuming (hoping) the Dems take congress if nothing more than as a rebuke to tactics being used by the GOP at the national level.",WheresSmokey,e8xqlxc,democrats
"Yeah, I used to be one of those folks that said that humans weren't effecting climate change, and Thankfully some kind, patient, and well educated folks fixed my opinion on that one and I thoroughly agree. And there are Republicans who agree with you and i here but they're mostly at the local level. And not even necessarily for the climate change reason. We're at a point now where it's just good business sense to go green because of how far solar and wind have come.

Absolutely. I had a marine friend die because of a problem in a marine air craft. Not because he was down range, literally because the aircraft malfunctioned during take off. That was in 2014 and still no answer as to why. We spend way too much money for shoddy equipment to be acceptable in our military, especially when that shoddy equipment is killing people.

I think it's low priority because of the modern media which operates as a business rather than a public service. So they want to talk about the sensationalist crap because it sells. So that's what the people know now. However, I'd have to find it, but I did read a recent study that said that a lot of youngish americans are starting read their news from groups that aren't as inflammatory and sensationalist as TV news like CNN and FOX.

It would be very sad to see Bill be the last president to actually do right with American money",WheresSmokey,e8y08rs,democrats
"Yeah, things will change if dems win... hard to predict how. 

The biggest problem is, dems are going to want to fix what trump messed up, and it likely won't be cheap. ",Gsteel11,e8xsfcq,democrats
"I don't mind things being expensive, as long they're worth it and paid for (not by raising deficit). I'd be fine even with Eisenhower style income taxes and streamlining efficiency rather Than this BS ""starve the beast"" tactic we have right now",WheresSmokey,e8xuda8,democrats
"If you're not already a member of the ACLU, you should be.

https://action.aclu.org/give/become-freedom-fighter-join-aclu",wenchette,e8xem1u,democrats
"Of course, perfect. Joining now. Thank you!",__howzat__,e8xhptb,democrats
"These are presidential election year numbers, 10x the 2014 midterm numbers in some cases. KEEP IT UP! 🔥🔥🔥",bumbiddlytake2,e8vnyhc,democrats
Anything coming from his mouth and/or fingers is utter garbage. ,GlobeTrott3r,e8whfft,democrats
"Can we just rename ""pants on fire"" to ""trump""? ",Gsteel11,e8xart2,democrats
"Good news, but keep pushing. 5 days",Stupidiseverywhere,e8v9eir,democrats
I voted early today. You can see and feel the blue wave when you go. Here it comes.....Blue RAGE!,kmurph72,e8vftjw,democrats
"Drill, baby, drill. ",VegaThePunisher,e8vexc4,democrats
"Georgia 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](http://elections.sos.ga.gov/Elections/advancedVotingInfo.do): October 15-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://www.mvp.sos.ga.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8wbmvm,democrats
"Texas 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): October 22-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

[Check Your Voter Registration Status](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do)

",election_info_bot,e8wd7gk,democrats
"Depends adult diapers are flying off the shelf in those states, I bet. ",GlobeTrott3r,e8whd6f,democrats
We had an estate tax.   People kept voting R and got it removed.,cowbear42,e8ty1uw,democrats
"How would legislation be drafted for this? I’m pretty sure most of their money is in stocks and bonds, which aren’t taxable until they are sold. For example, Jeff Bezos just owns 16% of amazon which is a vast majority of his net worth. ",avgrocketscientist,e8tuxe0,democrats
"What about a 90% tax on campaign contributions above $100? You got money to spend campaigning, you got money to pay taxes with.",AkiTendo,e8uzpsu,democrats
It's what actually made America great.,mad-n-fla,e8vinv0,democrats
"What’s wrong with it is that most of it isn’t saved money and it’s never been taxed. The vast majority of large estates consist of stock in either public or private companies. That gains on that stock would normally be taxed at sale, via the capital gains tax. But, when it’s inherited, if there wasn’t an estate tax, it would never be taxed. The inheritors get to step up the basis at inheritance, which means the gains during their parents lifetimes are never taxed.

This is currently true for estates below the threshold. If trump et al get their way, the estate tax would be eliminated and it none of it would be taxed.",nhtshot,e8ub2nm,democrats
"I agree.
Also we need to close loopholes that will allow the rich to exploit. ",red_carpet_hero,e8udyi2,democrats
A big one. We need to tax wealthy that isn’t working income at 90%.  Fund everything.  ,lofi76,e8uf4rf,democrats
"What is wrong with people like the Walton family having lots of money? This money wasn’t stolen, it didn’t appear out of nowhere, it wasn’t handed down by God. It was built up generation after generation. Sam Walton the founder of Walmart literally worked on a farm to help feed his family during the great depression.

But now it is suddenly bad to save up money so your children can have a better future? If the argument is that the Walton children did not work for the money/wealth then we should also tax every gift and Christmas present because the recipients also didn’t work for it.",some_guy1e,e8u8bgh,democrats
"If you want to use the tax system to address inequality but you don't want to wreck the economy or steal people's net worth, look into land value taxation instead.",zcleghern,e8uroj0,democrats
The GOP always thinks the little guy shouldn't get something for nothing but they sure is a hell want their kids and themselves to get all they can,GoodTimes2018,e8ub48d,democrats
"I hope that includes all the money I gave to his campaign that he then turned around and gave to the billionaire Clinton’s. Fool me one shame on me. Fool me twice, go fuck yourself. ",ForestRanger42,e8uisa2,democrats
more like it's time to seize their wealth and redistribute it around the populace. ,2018throwaway_accoun,e8vm2bm,democrats
"“You don’t want the death tax taking all the money you saved for your children.”

That’s was such a false/misleading talking point and people are so stupid they ate it right up!",meth_cupcakes_,e8tzoqx,democrats
"I think the dumbest argument I ever heard against it was, “It’s taxed twice! That’s wrong.” So is everything you purchase ",blueholeload,e8uc05n,democrats
"We still have one, it just doesn’t kick in until 11MM instead of ~5.5MM.",TheMarketLiberal93,e8uj0nf,democrats
"We inherited a medieval system which taxes transactions, originally designed to force the poor to sacrifice for the benefit of the rich.  The motivation behind taxation has obviously changed since then, and personally, I believe that taxation, itself, needs to change as well, i.e., we need to focus on taxing *net worth*, gradually restructuring our tax system towards that approach while gradually removing the flat transactional taxes.  This would of course require far stricter penalties on hiding assets abroad and probably mean giving more power to the ICC to prosecute those sorts of violations.",zelda-go-go,e8u0dmy,democrats
"Transfer of ownership. I mean, either that or the unclaimed assets will become property of the state anyway, right?

The boogeyman: estate taxes! Boo! Happy Halloween!",ExoticCommunication,e8tv8ll,democrats
We’d have to revoke their passports and lock their assets first. Otherwise the rich might just leave. ,lacrosse117,e8uhce4,democrats
"The Walton family made money in our country and should help to maintain it. They receive government tax cuts and subsidies to build their stores under the assumption that they providing jobs, then they pay the employees low and cut benefits so the same employees has to go to the government for healthcare and food. All the money they ""saved"" for their family were made by screwing people over. And now we give them even more tax cuts to give them an incentive to spend money here. And you can apply this format to any major business in this country. We have a problem with poor people in this country advocating for the people who are actively keeping them poor.",I_said_what_I_said,e8ueq12,democrats
Generations of worker abuse regardless is never earned its slavery which is btw condoned by faith in Christianity. Christmas presents? Seriously poor people dont ave a christmas you're just a troll.,Smiles32788,e8ugqic,democrats
I have absolutely zero problem with rich people as long as they pay their fair share of taxes. The present system of welfare for the ultra-rich is absolutely unsustainable and unconscionable. ,WeTrudgeOn,e8udh7s,democrats
"Nothing is wrong with people having money.  You can’t have a rich country without rich people.    

On the other hand, once a person has enough money that he doesn’t have to worry about anything (except maybe being kidnapped) he can, with basically no suffering, can start to contribute to the system that works so well for him (and maybe not so well for others).  

Well, so how should this rich guy contribute? Should he, perhaps destabilize the system that works for him? Maybe cut taxes so schools, roads, and hospitals need to get more money from people with less political power? Maybe he can just go live on an island or surround his castle with a moat, and let the peasants starve?  

Or he could keep his golden goose healthy. He could share some portion (not enough that he ever goes hungry or, actually changes his life in any meaningful way) and keep the peasants from kidnapping him first chance they get.   

I’m not joking. In Brazil, where the gap between rich and poor is quite extreme, there is a plastic surgeon who has a booming business in rebuilding ears for the wealthy who get kidnapped—the kidnappers send an ear to the kidnapped victim’s family as proof that they have the guy and that they are desperate.",lifeofideas,e8u9lis,democrats
it was stolen by the fact that big money keeps electing reps that keep wages very low and benefits. They are basically skimming off the top of the labor of americans by paying them less than they even need to live. It's fine to make billions but minimum wage should have kept pace with inflation. Also tax avoidance. ,wrongwayagain,e8uh96a,democrats
"> “It’s taxed twice! That’s wrong.” 

Someone saying money is ""taxed twice"" is tantamount to saying they don't understand how taxes work.  ",hansn,e8uggu8,democrats
"Wow, I really forgot the details on that change.",cowbear42,e8v0p6f,democrats
"But if you put your wealth into a trust fund... No estate tax applied... So essentially, the only people who paid the estate tax were generally kids who inhereted a farm and often ended up having to sell the farm to pay for the estate tax. That sucked! Meanwhile the children of billionaires didn't have to pay a dime because they had trust funds. ",iamwhiskerbiscuit,e8vfltm,democrats
"That’s absolutely ridiculous to tax net worth while you’re alive. Your money goes throw the taxation system as you earn it. That’s the best chance for the government to somewhat moderate inequality. Once you have the money after-tax, you shouldn’t be penalized. A foundational aspect of this country is the right to the pursuit of happiness in however that manifests itself to you. The government has no right to place a wealth limit. They already control inflation, which acts as a wealth limit. Taxing income is far more effective. Now, I certainly believe that we should either abolish 1031 tax exchanges all together or open them up to other things. Additionally, estate taxes would be like income taxes, not wealth taxes, as someone is receiving the money. It only makes that the tax rate on it be greater than ordinary income tax as this money is not earned to them.",barchueetadonai,e8ui8ba,democrats
If they leave they must never come back and we should put sanctions on them and their families. Our allies should not allow them into their country either. These people are traitorous thieves,I_said_what_I_said,e8ui1rk,democrats
"\>The Walton family made money in our country and should help to maintain it.

&#x200B;

They made money by providing goods and jobs, so they don’t owe anything to the country because they already gave something back.

&#x200B;

\>All the money they ""saved"" for their family were made by screwing people over.

&#x200B;

The way I see it, jobs like Walmart and McDonalds are not meant to be a full time career. These are stepping stone jobs for students with no experience. Higher admin jobs in Walmart pay well but require experience.

They are not screwing anyone over because people know the pay is low yet still choose to work for them anyway because they have little experience.",some_guy1e,e8uxohc,democrats
"No, if you think that Walmart employees are akin to slaves then you belittling and insulting those who had to live with real slavery.

&#x200B;

The reason I brought up Christmas presents is because the common argument for estate tax is that the children never worked for it and therefore it is ok to tax the inheritance. Children who get Christmas presents also never worked for it either. ",some_guy1e,e8uwxac,democrats
"I'm just saying, it would be funny if the plastic surgeon did so well, one day he's kidnapped too.",ActuallyYeah,e8ucqeq,democrats
"No ""too much power, to too few men"" then?",Smiles32788,e8ugvm0,democrats
"Which is why the Republican Party succeeds in elections and being a Libertarian is ""cool."" Most Americans don't know shit about taxes.",blueholeload,e8ui4ds,democrats
I don't think they owe us anything and not suggesting that they give any if the their earnings away. This is about taxes which is revenue for this country and they are not paying enough. They lobby the government to cut their rates and create loopholes so they avoid using their money. You talk about higher paying jobs like they are vacant and abundant and that everyone is capable of higher learning. Next your going to tell me that everyone should start a small business. ,I_said_what_I_said,e8v7ot1,democrats
Still not a relavent arguement,Smiles32788,e8v18ec,democrats
"> real slavery.

There are multiple kinds of slavery; chattel slavery isn't the only one.  Wage slavery is slavery, too--all coerced labor is.

And under capitalism, labor is absolutely coerced because if you don't work, you starve.",LysanderSporker,e8vsxmc,democrats
Excellent point. Very meta.,CHSummers,e8ucspd,democrats
"What are you addressing?  Since Citizens United, and the general letting loose of the monetary political hounds, money is “political speech” and can’t be regulated. So effin crazy.   But this is law, and can be repaired. ",lifeofideas,e8waqyb,democrats
"I don't think higher taxes are the problem. The highest tax bracket is 50%. The problem though is with existing loopholes like moving the business oversees to tax havens. Close those and more revenue will flow for the government. 

&#x200B;

\>You talk about higher paying jobs like they are vacant and abundant and that everyone is capable of higher learning. Next your going to tell me that everyone should start a small business.

&#x200B;

Trade jobs. Save up for a higher education. And no, not everyone is capable or smart enough to start a business but if they are smart and capable then yes they should. There are many ways to get higher paying jobs.",some_guy1e,e8vi9mm,democrats
Why not? The principle is the same. In the end no matter what rich people will just give their fortunes to their children on Christmas to avoid inheritance tax.,some_guy1e,e8vgg06,democrats
">And under capitalism, labor is absolutely coerced because if you don't work, you starve.

Unless you have enough money saved up....
Really no one is being coerced to work at Walmart so it isn't slavery in the slightest. ",some_guy1e,e8w6zy3,democrats
It's so meta,ActuallyYeah,e8uct5p,democrats
To prevent all power going to any singular person. The constitution. I am addressing that,Smiles32788,e8wc213,democrats
"The avoiding stupid shit just corrupts and destroys government and most rich's are lost anyway through generation of destructive rich people killing everything around themselves including thier own...the bible even teaches this and despite the fact I disagree with most of it still says the chances of anyone rich (which determining what that ment means over middleclass biblically in america *about 80K btw*) reaching heaven is so low it generally WILL NEVER HAPPEN. I'm sorry but common sense still says that people hyper succesful donating to charity AFTER destroying the lives and families of poor people means nothing they do will ever forgive them...evils nobility get no forgiveness for a reason.

EDIT: grammar",Smiles32788,e8vno0l,democrats
"Money doesn't fall from heaven.  Unless you're born into it, you're still coerced into exploitative conditions for at least a while.",LysanderSporker,e8w75lt,democrats
Which part of the constitution addresses all power going to one person?,lifeofideas,e8wjb7y,democrats
Thanks for ignoring my argument. Have a nice day.,some_guy1e,e8vpdo5,democrats
"\>Money doesn't fall from heaven. Unless you're born into it

Even if you are born into it your parents had to work to get that money so it didn't come from no where. 

&#x200B;

\>you're still coerced into exploitative conditions for at least a while.

&#x200B;

Yeah no, people are free to choose where they want to work, when they want to work, and how they want to work. No where close to slavery. If you want to bring up wage slavery there is nothing stopping a person from improving their wages, they aren't trapped with the same wage their entire life. ",some_guy1e,e8wa50t,democrats
"I didn't I spoke and gave 3 examples as to why you were wrong scientifically. You probably just dont like being called out on BS so yes I hope you have a good day too...unless that entails hurting someone.

EDITED: Clarification incase it was missed.",Smiles32788,e8vpgw4,democrats
Here’s my response: Fuck them,messiestbessie,e8w91fo,democrats
[deleted],,e8wj6nv,democrats
What he said. ,Bookmanfilm,e8wf59o,democrats
"He’s not wrong, though. ",VegaThePunisher,e8wr552,democrats
"""forgets""",cookingGuy02,e8x64zl,democrats
"Arizona 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://azsos.gov/elections/voting-election/contact-information-county-election-officials): October 10-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://azsos.gov/elections/voting-election/contact-information-county-election-officials): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8x7uun,democrats
It's not forgetting.  Just leaving out inconvenient truths.,Futharon,e8vvmnn,democrats
MS -45,Perspective2018,e8w8ti3,democrats
Red hats and brown shirts.,mad-n-fla,e8vib31,democrats
"Pennsylvania 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://www.pavoterservices.pa.gov/Pages/PollingPlaceInfo.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8wbwys,democrats
"Great news, keep pushing",Stupidiseverywhere,e8vobv0,democrats
"We're past the point of plausible deniability. Let's stop the stupid headlines about him possibly being a white nationalist. He's a bigot, a  racist and a man-child,  I'm done pretending that he's anything less than this. Anybody who speaks in favor of him I tell them nothing less.",unknownclient78,e8w3u1p,democrats
Trump’s own words are writing the Democrats’ 2020 campaign commercials.,AmbulanceChaser12,e8voxy9,democrats
"From my experience, since ballot box questions, amendments, and candidates change depending on the location, the local DNC Office usually has fliers with such information. I got one from my local DNC office that you can take with you to vote.. this is especially useful for elected judges since they don’t have a party affiliation. ",thezerosubnet,e8xo2cp,democrats
"> for elected judges since they don’t have a party affiliation

In some states they do.",wenchette,e8xodxe,democrats
"Thanks this was helpful. It makes sense to check the local DNC office. I know its a lot of information to manage with local election etc. However I every party has people standing the regulated distance from the polling place on election day handing you their recommendation on tiny piece of paper, sometime with just numbers or letters on it. Like a cheat sheet. I thought they may have something online. However I can see all sort of issue with endorsing and not endorsing candidates and managing it online for everyone.

",peligant,e8ycqsu,democrats
Thanks for the correction.,thezerosubnet,e8xomh5,democrats
"Of course not. At the moment the US would need to use cruise missiles to reach the convoy, and that'd be simpler from navy ships which could get closer to the convoy than US Army troops waiting at the border.",hrlngrv,e8vtnjr,democrats
What the fuck parallel universe are we in again?,epgenius,e8vukmz,democrats
Serious question for the people here much smarter than me: what do candidates even use money for at this late stage? Aren't most people decided by now? ,doyoueven-no,e8wzog9,democrats
"People complain about Hollywood's involvement in politics, but I think it's good that many of them are engaged.  Just because a person doesn't have a career in politics doesn't mean they shouldn't be engaged.  The laws passed by government impact all of us.",kerryfinchelhillary,e8vlyn1,democrats
"You know it is an Obama era policy, right?
Please don’t downvote me to hell for disagreeing. I would love to have a civil discussion.",battleship743,e8vq41w,democrats
That is a good point,jesse2182,e8vzptr,democrats
Trump is going to spew out all kinds on nonsense over the next few days because he knows when the Democrats are in charge of Congress and Mueller get fired back up he is toast.,kmurph72,e8vh5py,democrats
Nice to know there's a fire truck in the background to put out the dumpster fire.,Artgod,e8uibfh,democrats
"Iv seen similar reports that the legal cost have been covered by organizations that have funding from Soros. I don’t know if that’s true, but if it is, why would that be a bad thing? ",HarpoMarks,e8uh7u5,democrats
"He wants to murder someone via proxy, then he thinks the GOP/KGB can keep the rest of us in check.",mad-n-fla,e8vixr8,democrats
Does he ever think before he says things?,kerryfinchelhillary,e8vlnas,democrats
"Pennsylvania 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://www.pavoterservices.pa.gov/Pages/PollingPlaceInfo.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8wbx5d,democrats
I think they've been talking to each other 🤔,llcoger,e8tz9fx,democrats
"Well unfortunately all this is going to do is make the Republicans dig their heels in deeper because their conspiracies are being questioned, even if said conspiracies are batshit insane and rooted in antisemitic nonsense.

I only wonder how the hell Soros feels knowing the right hates him so much they're willing to blame him for everything short of the death of Jesus Christ.",RadioMelon,e8ua61q,democrats
Soros does have a hard on for flooding first world countries with 3rd world immigrants lesbihonest,SolarTortality,e8uw9ur,democrats
What if the conspiracies don't exist?,anonisavirgin,e8uiy15,democrats
"What do you mean short of? Jews are immortal due to being soulless lizard people. Soros was probably nailing Jesus to that cross 2,000 years ago. 

Yes this is /s",Abuddend,e8uws4v,democrats
"Here's the thing.

This is the wildest thing of all, alright?

If the investigation into Trump is finalized and they prove anywhere close to HALF of the things they've accused him of, it will be one of the biggest conspiracies in United States politics in a number of years.

Conspiracies do exist, but they're not always in the batshit-insane forms you see them spread out over the internet. Sometimes they're nuanced, and sometimes they work to undermine the entire integrity of an entire country.",RadioMelon,e8vca7p,democrats
"Thankfully I figured you were kidding.

I'm actually getting pretty worried that I'm hearing the real life equivalent of this on a semi-regular basis from actual Trumpists.",RadioMelon,e8vc5jy,democrats
What reputable source is tracking this caravan? Is there like a predictable time they reach the border or will they lose numbers as some settle in Mexico? Just curious.,platoprincipal,e8uvm7f,democrats
[removed],,e8uq57k,democrats
"You believe the typical Republican voter has any geographic sense, do you?",hrlngrv,e8vtwl1,democrats
"Trump has torn up other treaties, why not Guadalupe Hidalgo too?",hrlngrv,e8vtzu8,democrats
Cant wait until people start checking this motherfucker ,Stupidiseverywhere,e8uh8hv,democrats
"Well, if it does come to a civil war, he will quickly find that   
1. Democrats are the majority of those that voted.   
2. The majority of americans didn't vote.   
3. His base is badly outnumbered.   
4. Unlike what the majority of right wing pundits claim, democrats are gun owners. Granted, not as high by percentage as rapepublickcans, but high enough to outgun them with our superior numbers.   
5. Once the bullets start flying, we can take our gloves off. When they do start flying, the reply will be swift and brutal. We will be able to try the entire republican leadership for insurrection, murder, and treason. And we will get our public executions. Is that what they really want? Because that is what trump is gonna get them if he actually ignites a civil war. 

\>:(",Ghosteye55,e8ul3u6,democrats
"FYI, he's not sending 15,000 troops.  He's **saying** he's going to send 15,000 troops.

Lies, lies, more lies.",Touristupdatenola,e8v4eep,democrats
"**Background**

My goal was to understand the bias and accuracy of news sources that reddit users would see when browsing popular political subreddits.


**Data Source**

Reddit and Media Bias/Fact Check

Unique link posts on applicable political subreddits were captured continuously from October 4th 2018 8PM Pacific until October 31st 2018 4PM Pacific using Python/PRAW. Only the top 25 ""hot"" posts at any given time were considered. All political subreddits with >20K subscribers (as of October 4th) were captured, excluding issue (e.g. /r/Environment), text-only (e.g. /r/NeutralPolitics), and meme subreddits (e.g. /r/PoliticalHumor). /r/RonPaul was collected, but excluded from the visualization as it was only links to 1 site.

Bias and accuracy data was taken from Media Bias/Fact Check: [mediabiasfactcheck.com](http://mediabiasfactcheck.com). Links without an entry in the Media Bias/Fact Check database were excluded. News sources rated as ""Satire"" and ""Pro-Science"" were excluded from the visualization.

The bottom 3 graphs are looking only at unique news sources (e.g. WaPo only counts one time, despite having 265 unique links). My intention was to provide context for the breakdown of sources used across reddit, i.e. there are a lot of left-center news sources, and the majority of news sources have ""High"" accuracy.

Note that obviously not all subreddits had an equal number of applicable posts. On the high end /r/politics had 1,350 posts included, and on the low end /r/communism had 42 posts.


**Tools**

Python, PRAW, Microsoft Excel, Preview
",BrainyTrentKite,e8vb5mc,democrats
"Cool chart... I have some concerns over ""China daily"" a state owned news paper being included in that bias check websites non-biased list and it makes me wonder about some of the other sources. ",Gsteel11,e8vbtwi,democrats
"She doesn’t “have a knack for lying”. She lies. It’s not like she does it well, everyone knows it’s a lie. To have a knack for lying you’d actually have to be convincing :/",WittyWest,e8so80p,democrats
Its not a knack. Its a condition of her employment.,Diorj,e8su82n,democrats
"After she gives up the lime lite, will SS  keep habitually lying? THAT is what I need to know.",pasarina,e8si7rc,democrats
Scary times when our own government tries to force feed lies and manipulate the truth to the general public.,Nearbyatom,e8spjvi,democrats
[Jon Lovitz](https://www.nbc.com/saturday-night-live/video/liars-at-home/n9388) should play her in the movie.,Pal_Smurch,e8tn9vp,democrats
Posting paywalled articles removes Redditors from the body politic....,AltMiddle,e8ssxo8,democrats
"She is the garbage, unnecessary mouthpiece of the trash heap in Chief. ",GreyTigerFox,e8taxz5,democrats
330 million people to choose from in this country and the republiCANs chose... Donald tRUMP... to represent them and THEIR values!!  IT's Time to Make Them Pay for It!!!  Vote!!!!    POLLS ARE OPEN!!  Vote BLUE!,Stinkymatilda,e8tuhw5,democrats
"I’ve never heard that either. Is that for real? No!
Though it sounds feasible knowing how evangelists love Trump, Repubs and their lies.",pasarina,e8tut7k,democrats
"Say it after me everyone: ""Baghdad Bobbette""",AkiTendo,e8ufiol,democrats
"I have a hard time listening to a full press conference  where she is talking, I find her voice very distasteful, and the lies and tone are infuriating. ",Romanismydad,e8tf4ju,democrats
She’s merely repeating the daily marching orders from the conservative think tanks propping up the gop. ,drlove57,e8ti3m9,democrats
Sarah Sanders is a human greasy shitbag,ffafayfaytfayth,e8tkl8z,democrats
"It matters not a fig. Of course I realize her lies, while employed by this government, are the ones that affect the masses. I wonder about so many things; important and trivial.  As of this minute, it is my right to wonder about the effect of all aspects of SS’s lies. My prerogative still, and if something has changed in the last minute, well, shoot me then.
",pasarina,e8suzle,democrats
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ubIpoPjBUds,skekze,e8t4fgf,democrats
Seems like they intended to use the word “tendency”.,TheCouncil1,e8stm3n,democrats
She seems to believe what she says.,semantikron,e8t77sw,democrats
"It's hard for it to be convincing when it's common knowledge that statement x it's false.

On the other hand, I am convinced she is lying.",Deliniation,e8tri5l,democrats
SS is fitting because she is literally pushing Nazi ideals and practices on us,CanderousBossk,e8slw8a,democrats
"She is like her father, an evangelical christian, and as such, she believes that everything is part of god's plan, and that everything happens for a reason, including the Trump presidency.  She is therefore willing to lie for him at every turn, because anything she does in service to Trump, is in service to god's plan. period.",sirchancelot,e8t3zn8,democrats
Am I missing something? Why does that matter? It's the lies she says while in power that affect me. She can go work PR for a corporation and lie all she wants in a couple years,weluckyfew,e8spgi6,democrats
"The USSC did tell us that money is speech.

Wish I was joking.",whygohomie,e8t21vj,democrats
I am starting to feel the GOP has been in conspiracy with the prince of lies.,mad-n-fla,e8vkgcs,democrats
"Lets just call them ""tanks"".",Pal_Smurch,e8tneaa,democrats
So heinous and true.,pasarina,e8sobn5,democrats
"So much for not bearing false witness. She disgusts me, and I am an atheist with theological training. Hypocrisy served up fresh with a side of cold sneer.",Elfzwolf179,e8teut2,democrats
"Wouldn’t God frown on deceiving? Perhaps SS is following a corrupted leader in Trump. Just saying. I’m no evangelist, so I can’t say.",pasarina,e8t58dr,democrats
"> She can go work PR for a corporation and lie all she wants in a couple years

PR isn't lying per se...PR is spinning information so that it paints you in a good light.

When I present things to the board of directors, I don't say that my programmers are screwing up more this year than last year, I tell them that the number of successfully fixed bugs is greater than this time last year.",SynfulVisions,e8tu0nh,democrats
Hah that’s right on.,pasarina,e8vlc8x,democrats
It is called Lying For Christ. It has been an integral aspect of Evangelical Christianity for ages. ,matts2,e8tme7i,democrats
fair,weluckyfew,e8tw0xx,democrats
Former fundamentalist and evangelical. I’ve never heard that phrase before. ,adamdesautel,e8trn2k,democrats
You guys don't call it that. It is a common term with those of us who argue with creationists. ,matts2,e8tyux9,democrats
"Ah. Well I would call it despicable. 

I’d be interested to hear more details about it. ",adamdesautel,e8tzth2,democrats
"I can probably count on one hand the number of Senate Dems I like less than McCaskill, but I hope the disenchanted, more progressive Missourians do vote for her. 

To me, there's a time and a place for sending messages with third-party voting. This isn't that time. Too much at stake.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e8vbm0k,democrats
"> *So far this year, the RGA [""Republican Governor's Association""] has reported spending a relatively puny $672,000 in Vermont for TV and online advertising plus $38,000 on polling.*   
>  
> *That's small compared to two years ago, but it dwarfs Hallquist's entire campaign, which had raised $413,000 and spent $351,000 as of October 15.*  
>  
> *Outside organizations have failed to step up for her campaign. As of Thursday afternoon, the total spending on behalf of Hallquist by out-of-state groups comes to a measly $10,769, all for online advertising. If Hallquist was hoping for an influx of funds from the Democratic Governors Association or other national groups, it has yet to materialize with less than one week until Election Day.*  ",rieslingatkos,e8vmttv,democrats
This is why they made trump stay away this week,kmurph72,e8vgbaf,democrats
And people should stop pretending those who support him can be good people.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8vmkcc,democrats
"Georgia 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](http://elections.sos.ga.gov/Elections/advancedVotingInfo.do): October 15-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://www.mvp.sos.ga.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8w7lx2,democrats
"But we can counter all that by showing up and voting. And his base is shrinking.  There are many that voted for him that are drifting away. The mores lies that come right out of his mouth, the harder it gets for many to defend or excuse as flukes. And he continues to grow more and more nutty with his rhetoric.

",ShellyATX2,e8u1ons,democrats
Remember how his only mental capacity exam was performed by an alcoholic pill pushing doctor? Um yeah can we get another opinion,CanderousBossk,e8u8evd,democrats
Yeah but pisses the rest of us off like crazy.,AmbulanceChaser12,e8tsn3d,democrats
"Each night I pray for his death. Each morning I'm disappointed so far. His unhealthy lifestyle will catch up eventually. While the evil people who've rallied around him won't go away, hopefully they'll disperse.",AkiTendo,e8v006g,democrats
Congrats to all the Democrats who stopped talking about impeachment. I love it when a plan comes together . Impeachment is all you will here about next week.,kmurph72,e8vhfek,democrats
330 million people to choose from in this country and the republiCANs chose... Donald tRUMP... to represent them and THEIR values!!  IT's Time to Make Them Pay for It!!!  Vote!!!!    POLLS ARE OPEN!!  Vote BLUE!,Stinkymatilda,e8tzj6a,democrats
It will be 300 episodes long only to cover the part before the election.,Thisbymaster,e8vc1z7,democrats
Took 2 years for them to figure that out? ,cjheaney,e8tihj7,democrats
Literally there is no argument to this. Actual unbiased reporting makes Republican snowflakes Scream bias because their ideas make them look like fucking idiots. ,CanderousBossk,e8smczn,democrats
I really feel like democrats suck at this.  They should be out selling 2/3 especially.  ,timoumd,e8snfa2,democrats
"I would say this is right-on, yet I know I will hear progressives scream about how the two parties are the same and neither deserve a vote, thus invoking apathy in the base, and giving the GOP the edge to win, since their voters are already so apathetic that pleas to make them otherwise do not have the same effect.",outspokenentity,e8sppy6,democrats
We are up against a massive propaganda machine that doesn’t present the arguments accurately. Trump’s now claiming he will [protect pre-existing health conditions](https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.nytimes.com/2018/09/21/us/politics/fact-check-trump-pre-existing-health-conditions-.amp.html) which has never been the Republican plan. Trump’s objective is to confuse his own base.  ,ThirdMostAverage,e8sqov1,democrats
But the republicans have twice as many points /s,HVD3Z,e8t7i2w,democrats
"There may be some strawmen hiding in this image, but that's for them to counter not us",deaconheel,e8sf4n9,democrats
I’m subscribed to both this and the conservative subreddit and you guys focus way to much on the extremists of both groups. ,Pactace,e8sws0w,democrats
This is perfect.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8tp20v,democrats
No republican has ever said “constitution doesn’t matter.” You’re projecting your own views on the GOP.,puggy0420,e8t9p9w,democrats
"Ok I’m going to be that doofus because I’m hoping someone here has a legit answer and can educate me. Why does the Republican party hate social security, Medicare and Medicaid so much? Is it just knee jerk aversion to social programs or do they have a rational rationale for wanting them gone or do they just really hate the poor/ill? Not trolling or trying to start an argument just want it explained to me",Abuddend,e8taq57,democrats
"The day, Trump won, there were protesters committing arson. I have yet to see a peaceful Antifa rally. Please show me the quote that says he wants to “ban all Muslims.” Additionally, why didn’t the media cover the “white powder” being sent to Trumps family? The media is so biased they will not cover media unless it fits their personal agenda. Obviously, Trump didn’t send the pipe bombs himself, but the media is saying he “encouraged it” and says it was committed by a “Trump voter” who was a convicted felon before Trump started running for office. 

If someone is an illegal immigrant, they are not exempt from our prosecution, but they will be deported back to their home country.  The 14th amendment author of the provision, Jacob Merritt Howard of Michigan, pointed out that the jurisdiction language ""will not, of course, include foreigners."" You have to remember that America was a different, younger country back then and the framers probably didn’t think to clarify it that well. However, I have heard arguments stating that the jurisdiction thereof part, only apples if their was no prior nation loyalty like native Americans, who weren’t part of another sovereign nation.",puggy0420,e8tlnqn,democrats
330 million people to choose from in this country and the republiCANs chose... Donald tRUMP... to represent them and THEIR values!!  IT's Time to Make Them Pay for It!!!  Vote!!!!    POLLS ARE OPEN!!  Vote BLUE!,Stinkymatilda,e8tv861,democrats
"A violent*
Learn some grammar first. ",GoldenBlazeTc1,e8tr35j,democrats
This is so stupid and wrong. I swear everyone just talks passed each other. ,MilitantSatanist,e8u1ebr,democrats
"This is what happens when you elect obstructionists(all these people were elected to do was to stop Obama) in to office.  Once you get them into power, they are forced to actually come up with ideas and policies.  Problem is all their ideas are on being anti-Democratic and wholly moronic.",DJSteel,e8t7qeg,democrats
"I’ve noticed Democrats talking more about number 2, actually. Haven’t heard much about 3, but that doesn’t resonate as much to an uninformed voter as 1 and 2 do (even if it’s an incredibly important argument to make).

Just my observations on this, though. I could be wrong but the attempts at repealing healthcare and tax reform are the main drivers of anti-Trump sentiment in this election. Candidates are reflecting that because a lot of them—especially in the house—are new candidates and are fed up with attempts at changing policy like this.",evanibble,e8spn89,democrats
This bothers me a lot.  Or they will try and get cute and vote independent or 3rd party.  3rd party gets so few votes that they are essentially throwing out their vote.  Meanwhile the GOP base rarely ever veers away from party lines.  ,Nearbyatom,e8st00t,democrats
"I really don't think you'll hear any progressives say that this year. You might hear that from some radicalized anarcho-leftists that only get their news from Facebook. The word ""progressive"" pretty much precludes equivocating the two major parties.",infiniteninjas,e8sqoaf,democrats
"**Direct link**: https://www.nytimes.com/2018/09/21/us/politics/fact-check-trump-pre-existing-health-conditions-.html

---
^^I'm&#32;a&#32;bot&#32;-&#32;[Why?](https://np.reddit.com/user/amp-is-watching-you/comments/970p7j/why_did_i_build_this_bot/)&#32;-&#32;[Ignore&#32;me](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=amp-is-watching-you&subject=ignore&message=If%20you%20click%20%27send%27%20below%2C%20the%20following%20action%20will%20be%20taken%3A%0A%0A%2A%20The%20bot%20will%20ignore%20you%0A%0AYou%20will%20receive%20a%20confirmation%20in%20reply.)&#32;-&#32;[Source&#32;code](https://github.com/bvanrijn/aiwy)",amp-is-watching-you,e8sqpsp,democrats
It's literally what trump and his NPC supporters chant. ,CanderousBossk,e8sm4ns,democrats
LMAO WHAT?!?!,Rich_Pickle,e8sst1u,democrats
"Points 1,3,4,5 are all directly from the President who is the leader of the party. The Republican Party is extremist, the Democratic Party is the moderate party. ",deaconheel,e8syid0,democrats
"I could not agree more. The problem with Us (Democrats) is we get so hung up on the negative side of Republicans. Instead of trying to outplay the positive, we attack the negative. So many Republicans do not care about those points. Few people on the fence care about those points. End result is we gain no more votes. 

We need to put together a platform that counters their pros. Stop focusing on the cons. ",partially-confused,e8t42k0,democrats
Yeah I follow both to and I see the same thing.,ODSTWhiteout,e8tagcz,democrats
"Its because democrats dont understand different ideas. They dont bother to learn the other side of things, instead they force an ideology on people. Look how biased this post is honestly, the rhetoric is childish. Democrats divide people, dont be fooled by the togetherness they seem to promote because if you disagree on any part of their ideology then you are wrong in their eyes. For the record i always vote libertarian, but all i can say is libs call me right wing and conssrvatives call me a libertarian.

I think you see it like it really is",ACannabisConnoisseur,e8tiuf9,democrats
The president said he wants to change the Constitution with an executive order fucking yesterday ,SlobBarker,e8ti1tx,democrats
"You mean like Trump saying journalists are the enemy of the people (1st amendment), and just because you're born here doesn't make you a citizen and we can take it away with an executive order (14th amendment)

Also forgot that whole emoluments clause Trump allegedly violated by profiting off of Saudi diplomats in his hotels",TVK777,e8tepjt,democrats
"Dont bother arguing, if your not left youre wrong...

These libs only ever parrot what fits their agenda. They arent interested in learning that the 14th amendment doesnt apply to the children of those here illegally. Or that the 1st amendment was critically damaged by the Smith-Mundt act and that misinformation is a threat to the nation.",ACannabisConnoisseur,e8tlsbl,democrats
"Those aren't even social programs, you've been paying directly into it for your entire working life. That's your money and you can see where it's taken from your paycheck.

Republicans don't hate those programs, but they fucking love tax cuts. However they can never find a way to cut spending to match so they steal from the money you paid into SS and Medicare. It's been happening for years.",SlobBarker,e8thyba,democrats
"It is partly a knee jerk reaction to spending money and partly to helping the poor. But they are generally okay with helping poor white people, and very against poor minorities getting help.  I think it’s Ohio with a Medicaid work requirement which has exemptions for people who live in certain counties. Those counties all have major white populations and the counties with large black populations are the only ones affected by the requirement. ",deaconheel,e8tghzh,democrats
"So how do first generation Americans become Americans? When people immigrated here from Europe or Asia, their children born here are citizens even if their family is not. We are a nation of immigrants it’s been our entire history. 

This is a fun one!",deaconheel,e8tnsrt,democrats
You're not the only one it bothers. ,outspokenentity,e8tgxzi,democrats
The only people you'll hear saying that this year are GOP/Trump supporters trying to project and make Democrats seem as bad as Republicans,TVK777,e8teht8,democrats
[removed],,e8sz5z5,democrats
“Correct.” Not change. And it only applies to illegal immigrants! Not legal citizens!,puggy0420,e8tjmty,democrats
"When referring to the journalists about the 1st amendment, he was stating that spreading misinformation about him is deceiving the American people. Trump wasn’t against free speech, he was against the intentional spread of misinformation. Finally, the 14th amendment was attempting to declare that you would have to be a preexisting legal citizen in order for your child to achieve citizenship. Trump and many scholars agree that the original message of the 14th amendment was misinterpreted. I honestly appreciate you wanting to have a civil conversation, thank you for that!",puggy0420,e8tfglz,democrats
"Yes, we are a nation of immigrants, but not a nation of illegal, undocumented immigrants. You have to keep in mind that a country that has no borders or border enforcement cannot sustain itself as a country, just like how ancient Romans had a refugee crisis and ceased to exist. Obviously, I’m putting this into the simplest terms I can as there are some gray areas and exceptions.",puggy0420,e8tomtp,democrats
"/r/democrats does not allow the direct linking to external subreddits without the use of ""np"".  Please use http://np.reddit.com/r/<subreddit> when linking into external subreddits. 

The quickest way to have your content seen is to delete and repost with a corrected link.  

*I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/democrats) if you have any questions or concerns.*",AutoModerator,e8sz6f0,democrats
Correcting the Constitution isn't changing it?,SlobBarker,e8tlnxw,democrats
"1st Amendment - Trump is literally misinformation. It’s what he does. The enemy of the people is about making people distrust the news. Further, he tried to ban Muslims from entering the country based on religion. He is attempting to ban protestors from the National Mall in front of the White House. 

14th Amendment - applies to everyone born in the US, doesn’t matter the status of the parents. Your parents could be citizens. Your parents could have a work/school visa and give birth here and you are a citizen. They could overstay their visa, thus becoming undocumented, and you are still a citizen. The most ironic part is the a tourism business exists to bring pregnant Russians to vacation at a Trump property and give birth to a dual citizen. Almost every scholar and the Supreme Court agrees with us. Eliminating birthright citizenship is literally on the wish list for the white supremacists. 

He’s also flagrantly violating the emoluments clause. So there’s that too. ",deaconheel,e8th57r,democrats
"The position put forward is that people are not American citizens unless their parents are citizens. That would exclude the children of all immigrants, except for very few us. It is quite simple. If are on American soil, then you are within its jurisdiction. The only exception is foreign ambassadors with diplomatic immunity. 
 
This really isn’t that hard. ",deaconheel,e8tr8as,democrats
"To be fair, a lot of leftist protesters are violent mobs like Antifa, so I could understand wanting to “ban” them. Trump wasn’t targeting just Muslims, he was targeting the country itself for its instability. Additionally, misinformation is the enemy of the people, which is what mainstream news propagates to fit their agenda. They constantly do selective reporting and blame everything they can as Trumps fault. “Pipe bomber?” Trumps fault. Don’t forget the mainstream news said Trump had something like a 96% chance of losing on Election Day and had polls that were nowhere near actuality. Then there was the Brett hearing, which was just an hit piece to discredit him, which the media loved to claim as “Truth.”

As for the 14th amendment, you have to realize that the Supreme Court is almost entirely Democrat which sways the majority opinion on the topic dramatically. Finally, that is a wild accusation to say that people who believe the 14th amendment was misinterpreted are white supremacists. WE’RE TALKING ABOUT ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS HERE, not legal citizens.",puggy0420,e8ti4zg,democrats
"Wrong, it was not a Muslim ban. In fact the TRAVEL ban only stopped people from coming from 7 countries out of 50 that are Muslim majority nations. Hence why Venezuela and North Korea were on the list. Because it didn't ban based on religion.

You can Google the list of counties affected, your narrative has holes.",Arcliight,e8u049k,democrats
"Or people with a green card. Your right, it isn’t hard, so as long as your not ILLEGAL. Again, illegal immigrants are not included in the amendment. If you have a green card, naturalization certificate or any other legal documentation, then the 14th amendment is irrelevant to that person. What I can only assess from what your saying is that the parents legal status doesn’t matter, despite them breaking the law.",puggy0420,e8trtb4,democrats
"Wrong again, but I appreciate it. 

Protestors - Almost every protest is peaceful, he doesn’t like seeing them. 

Muslim Ban - he literally said he wanted to ban all Muslims and then asked for a legal way to do it. It was about a religion. 

Media - nobody said Trump sent the bombs, they discussed his role in the heated political rhetoric. That he is the only politician on record encouraging and supporting political violence is not the media’s fault. With Kavanaugh, credible witness came forward with a story of sexual assault. That she was a more credible witness than the Judge is again, not the fault of the media. You seem to have a lot of things that do not bear out with reality. Even the election part is wrong. Polls gave Clinton a 3% lead, she won the popular vote by 3%. Pundits interpreted that as a 70-90% chance for her to win. That still gave Trump plenty of room to win, and a lot of things had to go his way on election night to win. That he had a narrow path to victory was fairly obvious and that the unlikely series of events occurred is not the fault of the media. 

14th - I didn’t say that people against the amendment were white supremacists. I said that that is what the white supremacists want. But whatever. Birthright citizenship is the law of the land. Doesn’t matter who your parents are, if you are born here then you are American. If you are within the borders then you are within the jurisdiction of the US. Can an illegal immigrant commit a crime? By your definition, undocumented persons are outside the jurisdiction and thus cannot be charged with a crime- even for crossing a border illegally. The jurisdiction and the constitution applies to all persons on American soil - citizens, residents, visitors, undocumented people, men, women, white/black/Hispanic/Asian/Native and everyone else. ",deaconheel,e8tjtjr,democrats
"I already answered that. He said a complete ban on Muslims, which is blatantly illegal. So he asked his people to narrow it. Round one was only Muslim countries and it lost in court. Round two was also only Muslim countries and it lost in court. Round three three in Venezuela and North Korea for cover and it finally stuck. The funny part about North Korea travel ban is that North Koreans aren’t allowed to travel. ",deaconheel,e8ubyxi,democrats
The sins of the parents are not the sins of the child. ,deaconheel,e8tt03p,democrats
"Well then why does “civil parental liability” exist. The children’s wrongful actions are the parents responsibility below a certain age, so why is there a double standard?",puggy0420,e8tth91,democrats
"You are responsible for your child, your child is not responsible for you. ",deaconheel,e8ttnl2,democrats
"So if an illegal immigrant comes to a country and has a baby, the child should automatically become a citizen? Couldn’t that be a potential burden for the country?",puggy0420,e8ttrwi,democrats
That what the the 14th Amendment says.,deaconheel,e8twtey,democrats
"Iowa 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://sos.iowa.gov/elections/pdf/absenteeballotapp.pdf): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8w4j1b,democrats
I've seen so many conservative internet personalities say they think being a nationalist is a good thing.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8vm7tz,democrats
Steve King said the national socialists in Austria would be Republicans here.,therecordcorrected,e8vzf7b,democrats
I was surprised they wouldn't accompany him.  If only they'd stand up to him more.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8tpa3y,democrats
330 million people to choose from in this country and the republiCANs chose... Donald tRUMP... to represent them and THEIR values!!  IT's Time to Make Them Pay for It!!!  Vote!!!!    POLLS ARE OPEN!!  Vote BLUE!,Stinkymatilda,e8twt0j,democrats
What about: really stupid liars?,Franklin-B-Johnson,e8tf56o,democrats
I love Biden.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8tou63,democrats
"I always tell people assume everyone is either very stupid or very evil and decide which you can put up with. I'd rather people be stupid than evil, because I'm evil lol

But many say evil because they fear incompetence. Which to be fair incompetence lowers standard of living. Evil can too but it's done in a functional way. But evil also tends to be very authoritarian.",Hookahwave,e8ttocm,democrats
What about red terror committed by leftwing groups?,InGeeksWeTrust,e8u73t4,democrats
"Do you see there it says “73%”????

",VegaThePunisher,e8u9wmq,democrats
330 million people to choose from in this country and the republiCANs chose... Donald tRUMP... to represent them and THEIR values!!  IT's Time to Make Them Pay for It!!!  Vote!!!!    POLLS ARE OPEN!!  Vote BLUE!,Stinkymatilda,e8tzjt9,democrats
"Patrick's Agenda...

>  I propose a government that makes counter-semitism central to all aims of the state. A government:

>  1) Of a People, for that people, free from jews [sic]

>  2) That cannot revoke the right to bear arms, such that this people can remain free from jews

>  3) that forbids all immigration except of biological kin, where no person of jewish origin may live, vacation, or traverse


In the wake of the Pittsburgh Massacre of October 27 2018, the connections between the GOP and Nazi Holocaust Deniers must not be ignored.",Touristupdatenola,e8uhtxi,democrats
"I didn't think there was a limit, but I don't want to see that tested, every fucking week. Seriously, is this our excuse for a government?",malachiconstant76,e8tx6gd,democrats
330 million people to choose from in this country and the republiCANs chose... Donald tRUMP... to represent them and THEIR values!!  IT's Time to Make Them Pay for It!!!  Vote!!!!    POLLS ARE OPEN!!  Vote BLUE!,Stinkymatilda,e8tzndl,democrats
"Project Veritas has always started at the conclusion they wanted, tried to work backwards from that by going undercover, found little to no evidence supporting their prejudice, and finally they just end up saying ""Fuck it! Lets cut together some misleading video clips and go home.""",DumpOldRant,e8u48m5,democrats
"Virginia 2018 General Election 

[General Election](http://www.elections.virginia.gov/voter-outreach/where-to-vote.html): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8v5ucc,democrats
[removed],,e8skv3r,democrats
So do you just hate on every Hillary post or? It's kinda weird you would take the time to single out this person almost like you have an agenda..... It's kind of weird,CanderousBossk,e8sm0ub,democrats
"I don’t. 

I’m a democrat and was a Hillary supporter. I voted for her. 

But someone else responded to this dolphin person yesterday about this.

Dolphin of course responded with some snarky bull shit response. 

I do think it’s odd that this guy posts nothing but Hillary posts. 

And yeah, I’m going to ask why. ",Essential_tranquilo,e8sm6jn,democrats
"If conservatives are passionate about the lives of infants & children and are concerned with the well- being of pregnant women, I think they’ll find that Democrats support programs to assist these individuals more than the GOP does. Here’s hoping to more voters like this.

Edit: clarity",bmschulz,e8syrdq,democrats
"Texas 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): October 22-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

[Check Your Voter Registration Status](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do)

",election_info_bot,e8tvnhl,democrats
"You know what would help pregnant women?some decent healthcare lol

Granted I think there's too many people in the world as it is so maybe that's one thing I actually do agree with Republicans on is Thanoscare",Hookahwave,e8ttib6,democrats
"There are enough resources to go around for everybody. 

The problem is not scarcity, but distribution. The top 0.01% hoard the vast majority and control of all wealth, the GOP creates systems to reinforce the socioeconomic status quo, and the rest of Americans suffer in a broken and inefficient system. 

If you’re sick, you should be able to go to the doctor. Period. It’s only expensive because congressional Republicans would rather line their pockets with special interest money from Big Pharma and insurance conglomerates. 

The solution to overpopulation is NOT to let people die. The solution is to innovate and improve renewable energy sources and agricultural production. Of course, the GOP prefers to take bribes from Big Oil lobbyists and screw farmers with tariffs. 

The problem is not people. The problem is the Republican Party.",bmschulz,e8udvxq,democrats
"I think we are wasting our time here a bit. 

Can they just let us know when he’s not being a shit liar so then it’s news?",VegaThePunisher,e8sg16a,democrats
Exactly. It will be newsworthy if he does a legitimate act of kindness. Posting this is kinda pointless in this subreddit.,PaceeAmore,e8sj9da,democrats
Preaching to the choir. But I guess the easy to copy and paste link helps when replying to the dark side.,captnspock,e8tytyj,democrats
330 million people to choose from in this country and the republiCANs chose... Donald tRUMP... to represent them and THEIR values!!  IT's Time to Make Them Pay for It!!!  Vote!!!!    POLLS ARE OPEN!!  Vote BLUE!,Stinkymatilda,e8u03o4,democrats
Willy Horton ads worked. ,Bookmanfilm,e8u3q11,democrats
The title makes it sound like he totally dissed Cedar Rapids.,HowLittleIKnow,e8so1pq,democrats
"Goddammit! One of these websites finally got me, on the ""Allow/Block"" scam. Clicked the wrong button. Fuck you, Des Moines Register! I don't want your shit!",Pal_Smurch,e8tiq38,democrats
"""Should be"" might be a better word choice.  Unfortunately, this isn't the only injustice in the history of this country.",kerryfinchelhillary,e8tpjvz,democrats
"Stop helping people believe they are better than they are, American arrogance doesn't help one bit. We are easily a proud enough Nation already, and then some.

You don't learn lessons by lying to yourself.",CarbonLifeForm69,e8sqdrg,democrats
"It's literally not and if Biden doesnt realize this, he will have no chance of winning.",CriticalChad,e8sm946,democrats
"Maybe Democrat’s could start getting a little louder about things before this racist sociopath talks his psycho cult into a re-election.   No reason democrats shouldn’t be wiping the floor with these racists assholes in all these midterm races.    All I see and hear every fucking day is trump.  Every minute every day.   Where the fuck are the democrats??    I mean a few are battling... but I’d feel better if every single democratic politician would get even LOUDER about everything.  Get on the news, show your face every second.  Get your name buried into the minds of voters.  Tell them to VOTE!!

Not just Sanders, Warren, and the couple other few we always hear from.  EVERY ONE of them should be on the airwaves screaming   ",ChangingFiveHundred,e8u0n66,democrats
"They are...

I see tons of news articles about statements democrats have said. And in fact, few about statements independents like Sanders have said. Probably the self selecting news and selective memory factors affecting both of our perspectives about it. Suffice to say that liberal politicians of all sorts are yelling about it. ",bumbiddlytake2,e8u29uy,democrats
"I only hear the usuals... sanders, warren, a peep from Clinton here and there. Obama has been getting little bit louder. 

Last time I checked there are 40+ in Congress and how many in the House?

I don’t wanna JUST hear from the potential Dem presidential candidates... every single one should be blasting these racists and all they stand for.  

But all I see is trump and his rich minions  every day... blasting fear thru every channel they can. ",ChangingFiveHundred,e8u2l6w,democrats
"More like the goal of the native Americans, kick us all back to the Atlantic.",mad-n-fla,e8vjazq,democrats
"Sounds like bleeding Kansas all over again.

Rapepublicans falsehood and voter harassment are the best they have to win?",mad-n-fla,e8vivsk,democrats
"They were allowed to vote with the hats on? 

Over here nobody was allowed to wear anything like that. ",Stupidiseverywhere,e8t6ags,democrats
"More important than any other midterm in modern times. 

#Please folks - Just vote!",backpackwayne,e8t4lbc,democrats
I call bullshit,Greenlove2020,e8t78u6,democrats
Wouldn't be allowed here either.,LunaKip,e8t6v4b,democrats
Apparently they were. I was surprised. Someone complained as I was leaving. First election worker said yes since they didn't have a candidate's name or political party on them. They went to ask someone else to double check. I was gone for that. ,designgoddess,e8t9w7h,democrats
Talked to a blue voter in line who was dragged there by a neighbor. He thought the blue wave was a given and didn't need to actually vote. I really worry about this attitude and then I walk out to see a couple hundred red hats. Made me sick to my stomach. ,designgoddess,e8t4zmq,democrats
"Just because you call it, doesn't mean it didn't happen. I live in a red county. So while I was surprised they were there before their ""Halloween"" party, I wasn't surprised that they were doing this. Halloween is in quotes because they're known locally for having a party on Halloween so kids have an option that doesn't include the devil or something along those lines. ",designgoddess,e8ta60o,democrats
Agreed,Stupidiseverywhere,e8t7moz,democrats
Just keep telling people to vote. Dont be discouraged or afraid. ,Stupidiseverywhere,e8tc340,democrats
Oh that scares the crap at of me. Don't let it happen folks!,backpackwayne,e8t58cd,democrats
"I volunteer and drive people to the polls on election day. Already driving this year. Not discouraged or afraid. Live in a red county, but trying to turn that tide. ",designgoddess,e8te5ww,democrats
Good!! Keep up the good work. ,Stupidiseverywhere,e8tghju,democrats
"Have grown up in a red family, but honestly this guy is going to lead us to a better future. Hate how people are stuck on one party or another, and not for the betterment of the people",IskanderEXC,e8reep3,democrats
"Listened to him tonight on MSNBC.  It is so damn refreshing to hear an honest, thoughtful from the heart politician speak.  No hate or fear or division.  ",Oliver_Cockburn,e8rh563,democrats
"I know I will probably be downvoted, but I am speaking honestly. He is such a damn fine candidate. 

It’s a shame he is running in Texas. He won’t win. His opposition to guns is just a deal breaker in that state. Polls have been solid for decades supporting it. 

Honestly, if he broke with the party platform, he’d have swept the state and could have found some compromises for gun control. 

I hope I am proved wrong, but the state is so solidly in favor of gun ownership and the polls have so consistently showed him behind, I’d be an impressive and sudden change for him to win. ",Machismo01,e8rt9d9,democrats
"Scale of “meh” to “BETO 2020!” ? 

I really like him. ",rblue,e8rbb7f,democrats
He’s the best!,andyreajc,e8r4max,democrats
"Win or no win tho guy has that illusive something that winning national candidates need. Bill had it, Barack had it.... something to watch. Yea!",tomcatproductions,e8rlorn,democrats
"If he doesnt win tuesday, really hoping he runs in 2020. ",provolone12,e8skphf,democrats
Go Beto!,Laszlovich,e8rcuqm,democrats
If Beto doesn't win Texas it's certainly not the end for him. This man will go places! I would love to see him run for President!  ,Rocketdog3,e8ryhjh,democrats
"He's been here to San Angelo alot the past year and a half.  It's awesome because this is Cruz country but seeing him down here has inspired alot of closet dems to come out. So far we're had over 12,000 early votes out of 60,000 registered voters so far. Even if he loses the vote here, it's inspired many to come out and get more active. ",Anthonym82,e8s49bt,democrats
"Texas 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): October 22-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

[Check Your Voter Registration Status](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do)

",election_info_bot,e8rkrs8,democrats
"My grandparents like in Amarillo, I hope he has some support there! Here in Austin basically everyone is behind Beto",salesman_jordan,e8rqxtk,democrats
Beto > ted cruz any day of the week. If he doesn’t win I believe it will because of either A) the stupidity of the state or B) election fraud as evidenced already in some red states. ,lookingforsome1,e8rvx99,democrats
This great guy is gonna be president and he is going to be a great one. Remember where u read this first. Straight fm the pinchface.,pinchface45,e8ry2gz,democrats
i have listened to him and am not interested,onehunglow58,e8saqmf,democrats
Golly. Did you get goose bumps listening to Mr. politician spew poll-tested info at ya? ,verynoodlyappendage,e8saqzn,democrats
Did he discuss his history of nepotism back when he wanted to push out low-income immigrants in an effort to line his family's pockets? [Pepperidge Farms and the New York Times remembers.](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/29/us/politics/beto-orourke-el-paso-texas-senate.html) ,don3dm,e8rtg0l,democrats
You mean Robert,TurboMan9000,e8rxf7l,democrats
What's the poooooooooooooooooooint? Lyin' Rafael is like a million n points ahead.,MonsterIt,e8rgdoo,democrats
Did he say how he planned to accomplish any if his problems. I watched the last debate and he he said were things he wanted to do but not what was necessary to do them.,HA5396,e8s9ws4,democrats
What was incredible about it?,Ramennov,e8rsv4u,democrats
Love me a white heir to a billionaire fortune posing as a POC fighting for the little guy ,bakeohbro,e8rmiwd,democrats
Unbelievable!,trafridrodreddit,e8s1ngr,democrats
"Beto is great but I think honestly we've been focusing too much on him.

Consider how many other democrats need our attention in MUCH closer races... but don't get it because posts about beto dominate every liberal/left leaning subreddit...

You hardly ever hear people talk about Claire McCaskill for example, who is in a much closer race than Beto is. She has a real chance to win. ",CardinalNYC,e8sk5fo,democrats
"Too bad the great state of Texas has implemented modern voter suppression laws that have effectively disenfranchised me. Now my only choice is a meaningless vote for Dianne Feinstein in a district that has been red since the beginning of time... Seriously annoyed. I'm beyond angry... I sincerely hope some sort of class action lawsuit is filed to put an end to this shit. If there is, Count Me In.",SuperdorkJones,e8rudt2,democrats
"Truth. I have friends and family who are voting R out of habit and completely passing up on a decent candidate that is willing to talk to and represent his/her constituents. Even here in Jersey, we have people voting for Lance, despite when I tell them Malinowski doesn’t take PAC money and has a grassroots campaign, right after they complain about bought and paid for politicians. It’s a habit I’m hopeful we’ll break over time. Happy voting next week.",Workodactyl,e8rhuw9,democrats
"The reality is that the two. parties are so far apart, and so ideologically sorted, that unless you happen to fall roughly in between them, the choice is basically always clear, and since voters can only pick one, there's not much reason to even think much about the ""options"". We know which ""side"" we're on, and we know who the single person representing that side is. If we had \[STAR Voting\]([http://www.equal.vote](http://www.equal.vote))  we'd see much more flexibility, both in terms of the kind of candidates we'd see running and winning, and in terms of how voters perceive themselves, since in every election they'd have the ability to give multiple parties/candidates top scores, and thus feel equally aligned with all of them, and some parties/candidates middling scores, and feel moderately aligned with those, as well as giving some 0s, and knowing they oppose those. It would change the psychology of voting from ""pick a team, defend your side, try to influence your side, but mostly help them win because they're 'your team' and the other side is the enemy"" to ""think about what you are about, and how much, find the people who seem to have good proposals/resumes in relation to those issues/values, find the people who are kind of mixed on them, find the people who are generally in opposition to them or just lack the requisite qualities to have earned your support, and vote accordingly"" Way less team mentality, which means way less loyalty, and also way less demonization of the opponents, since many of those opponents are, by your own estimation, okay, at least in comparison to some of the other options. It would also mean a more accurate reflection of how an electorate feels, meaning you know more about what positions you hold are popular, and which need a lot of advocacy before they can be realistically enacted. ",LiberalArtsAndCrafts,e8rsi5x,democrats
"I don't think it's ""people"", it's more the politicians who are stuck one party or the other.  Everyone else is just along for the ride.  I wish politicians voted how their constituents would want them to, instead of to the almighty party.  But I like your sentiment.",troy_caster,e8roxrp,democrats
"As someone who worked hard to get open carry passed in Texas very recently I can confirm, he is a fine candidate but his stances don't jive with what is important to me so sorry Beto I'm not voting for someone who is wanting to dismantle the work we fought for over the last few years. Great guy but not for Texans that I know.

",malovias,e8rtniy,democrats
If elected he will serve his full term he has stated. His opponent Cruz will not make the promise to not leave office for the presidency if he has the chance.,MrBlaze-65,e8rqwe2,democrats
*elusive. Sorry! 😞,SuperdorkJones,e8rw1r7,democrats
"Oh no, he didn't interest a conservative, anti-science, Neo-Nazi apologist :(

We can see your comment history, dude. He was clearly never gonna get your vote",StopTheMadness85,e8sgb0p,democrats
"If every single word of that is true... and even if it was twice as bad for twice as long.

He's still 10 times better than Cruz on his best day before breakfast. ",Gsteel11,e8snzpf,democrats
Fuck out of here troll ,smu_12,e8ru4nx,democrats
I doubt you call Ted Cruz “Rafael”,How2BWild,e8s7v1y,democrats
"A. The only poll that matters is next Tuesday.

B. Downballot races can be impacted by turnout for headline races, and they are often closer.",kittenpantzen,e8sf8vr,democrats
He can’t help he was born into money and he’s not pretending to be a POC he’s a product of his environment. As a Mexican American I’m more ashamed that Ted Cruz denies his Latin roots than I am offended that Beto embraces them. And he’s Better than Cruz who’s only thought is how to get more money at the expense of his constituents. He’s got the mentality of a low class loser willing to do whatever to not feel left out and poor.,chipsandsalsa3,e8rqqzk,democrats
That’s an awfully new account you got there da da,smu_12,e8ru6zc,democrats
How the hell are you voting for Fienstein yet being suppressed in Texas?,malovias,e8rvrc9,democrats
"I don't think it's ""the politicians"" who are stuck agreeing with ""the almighty party"", it's the system of plurality voting, low turnout (and highly partisan) primary elections, and the money/infrastructure game that means the candidate with the most name recognition wins that incentivizes politicians to follow the dictates of ""the party"" so as to keep their jobs. If we had a system like \[STAR Voting\]([http://www.equal.vote](http://www.equal.vote)) it would matter more that they generally appeal to a broad swath of voters than that they have the ability to win a partisan primary, or have the highest name recognition, or raise the most money. If voters knew they could vote for multiple candidates, they'd have reason to check out all of them, rather than just focusing on the two that seem like ""front runners"" (because they're from the major parties, or they've raised the most money, or they have the most signs out in yards). ",LiberalArtsAndCrafts,e8rs8a4,democrats
What part of his stances? I’m a LTC holder and live in Texas and have multiple guns nothing he has said bothers me same goes for all my family who also have LTCs we all voted for him. It’s this kind of one issue shit that infuriates me with voters.,smu_12,e8rtwpk,democrats
"Thanks for willing to be honest. Sorry everyone is shitting on you. 

I disagree with your views, but there's no reason to shit on you for being willing to confirm what the previous commenter was talking about. ",CardinalNYC,e8sk8os,democrats
If only you cared as much about texas as you do about your gun. ,Gsteel11,e8skack,democrats
"I am sympathetic to your position. I don’t carry or own, but I know the state values it dearly. I also know how remote some people can be from law enforcement help necessitating gun ownership in some areas especially. It’s a shame. He is earnest and respectful. We need more of that. ",Machismo01,e8rtq9m,democrats
"In Cruz's defense, he has a longer senate record republicans and democrats would love to defeat him with. ",BorisYellnikoff,e8rwecz,democrats
I call him a faggot from Canada ,TurboMan9000,e8trwsz,democrats
"He could choose the money he married into though and how he voted when he was in El Paso for his father in laws project that harmed the poor Latin community that stood in the way of his father in laws development.

",malovias,e8rvmt5,democrats
"I moved to Texas in July. Despite my best efforts to get registered there they kept coming up with new reasons they couldn't register me. now if I want to vote at all, my only choice is to vote by absentee ballot in California.",SuperdorkJones,e8rvstw,democrats
"You don't know anything about me so don't start with the single issue voter nonsense. I can disagree with his policies fundamentally and still think he is a good candidate that doesn't stand for what myself or other Texans feel is important. People as a whole don't vote on entire platforms, that's just not how people work. Some policies I can deal with and others I refuse to endorse. That's not single issue, that's using your head and weighing what's important to you and what isn't.

But on this issue for starters his wanting to dismantle reciprocity for LTC. His very clear misunderstanding of what a weapon of war is and his statements of wanting to ban the highest selling and most used firearm amongst Texans.

 The fact he isn't educated on firearms enough to understand why his ban stance is idiotic is itself indicative of his refusal to learn more about the people he should be representing and instead is too deep into his party to recognize what Texans have fought for very recently. 

You are damn right I'm not gonna vote for someone who is trying to dismantle the work we were on the ground marching for and fighting our state legislators on for over two years. You have a LTC, that's great, did you put in the work to make it a reality?

 I highly doubt it if you don't even see why his stances are problematic for what we fought for. I'd wager you are just the beneficiary of the work we did and so have very little vested interest in the issue. You will probably spout off that you put in the work since it's the internet and you don't wanna be called out but the truth is nobody who actually put in the work would be so cavalier about Beto stances.

If you did put in the work you would know gun control disproportionately affects lower socio economic citizens and POC which often need protection the most when police response toes suck in their neighborhoods. The AR is a great equalizer for women and is why it's the best selling amongst that demographic and he wants to strip it away from them.

I won't be voting for Cruz either btw but don't give me this one issue voter bullshit, there are plenty of other policy issues I disagree with him on as a matter of finding policy  but this one in particular is what the person I was commenting on was speaking about.",malovias,e8rv1od,democrats
"Much appreciated, 
I am used to it as an independent voter. Being in the center and looking for policy that I can get behind on a personal level vs a partisan level means I get crap from both sides. I don't agree fully with either party and have to analyze and balance what I can live with and what I can't get behind from each candidate and vite accordingly. 

What is important to me may at times shift depending on who the candidates are. It's political math if you will that means listening to all candidates and literally voting in my best interest. 

I assumed that most people did this but apparently the partisanship is too great for people to accept being slammed for using their vote as it was intended.",malovias,e8slbx7,democrats
"Its not about my gun it's about my right to defend my family and those around me from the very real evils that exist in this world. When seconds count the police are minutes away.

If only you cared about individual rights as much as you care about partisan politics. I am willing to defend my fellow citizens while you are happy giving up my rights just because they aren't important to you. From my perspective I care more about my family and fellow citizens and would be willing to put my own life in danger to protect them while you would cower and call on the same people who are disproportionately killing POC and have been the enforcement arm for every racist policy and law in our shared history. See how assumptions make us both look stupid?

You don't know anything about me or how I came to my idealogy so if you want to be a snide dick look for someone else to talk to but if you wanna have an actual conversation then by all means hang around.",malovias,e8skyno,democrats
"I literally registered when I renewed my license at the DMV and I'm a Latin American. It was a box on the same form, really easy.  What was their reason for saying you couldn't register? 

BTW I'm against voter ID laws and things that make it harder to vote as strongly as I am against things that make it harder for people to exercise their right to bare arms so I'm not saying what you are saying isn't true, I'm pointing out my experience and trying to see why yours was different.",malovias,e8rw3ia,democrats
"I don't see what you are getting so angry about. He didn't even suggest that you were voting on that only one issue, only that he dislikes one issue voters. you seem to take it as a personal attack, when I didn't interpret that way at all. Maybe I'm Wrong... Would he like to weigh in? Were you attacking /u/malovias directly?",SuperdorkJones,e8rw6qv,democrats
"A real conversation about what? I see no valid points you're making? 

No, ""I'm scared my family will all be slaughtered"" is not a rational reply.

You're projecting pure fear. 

That's not a conversation and you re not capable of one.",Gsteel11,e8slf7o,democrats
"They wanted me to provide a utility bill or lease with my name on it, despite the fact that I am living with my friend temporarily, until I settle on a place to live. They would not even accept my pay stubs showing 3 straight months of working in Irving. What's more, the register to vote link on the county registrar's website pulled up a 504 error for the final two weeks before the voting deadline. 

It was disgraceful and inexcusable in my opinion. I have lived ALL over this country, and NEVER have I been forced to jump through so many hoops just to exercise my god-given right as an American citizen to participate in our democracy. ",SuperdorkJones,e8rwj3f,democrats
"You keep assuming alot, it seems you are the one unable to have a conversation. You are too busy attacking instead of trying to understand.

I very clearly said there are real evils in our world. Look at the guy that walked into a McDonald's and started shooting but was stopped by someone like me. There are far more defensive uses of firearms than there are Murders in the USA, that's just factually proven.

You can disagree and rely on the same police who enforce the racist laws and policies in our nation if you want but I choose to rely on myself and others of the same mindset.

You say I haven't made valid points only because you don't care to engage in refuting what I actually stated.

Being prepared isn't projecting fear. I buy insurance that doesn't mean I'm afraid. It means I understand the reality of risk in daily life.

Better to have it and not need it than need it and not have it. I spent ten years thinking I was serving my country only to come home and see our actual freedoms under attack from within our own ranks. I'm not gonna apologize for putting personal freedom higher on my priority list than party politics or caring about triggering people who obviously don't know what it's like to be in the middle of the shit and see people die.

Go hide behind government's skirt if you want to but don't try to drag me behind it with you.",malovias,e8sm2yt,democrats
"I see so you are having trouble proving residency in Texas.

Did you change your driver's license to a Texas license? Did you register your vehicle when you came?

Texas residency for license is fairly broad and can be two from the following list. You work so should have at least two easily for your license and can register for voting just checking the box on your license application. If they are indeed not accepting any of the below documents for your driver's license then thats an issue you shouldn't keep quiet about and take to the media. 



Current deed, mortgage, monthly mortgage statement, mortgage payment booklet or a residential rental/lease agreement

Valid, unexpired Texas voter registration card

Texas motor vehicle registration or title

Texas boat registration or title

Texas concealed handgun license

Utility statement (including electric, water, natural gas, satellite TV, cable TV or noncellular phone bill) dated within 90 days of the date of application

Selective Service card

Medical or health card

Current homeowner’s or renter’s insurance policy or homeowner's or renter's insurance statement

Current automobile insurance policy or an automobile insurance statement

Texas high school, college or university report card or transcript for the current school year

W-2 or 1099 tax form from the current tax year

Mail from financial institutions; including checking, savings, investment account and credit card statements dated within 90 days of the date of application

Mail from a federal, state, county or city government agency dated within 90 days of the date of application

Current automobile payment booklet

Preprinted paycheck or payment stub dated within 90 days of the date of application

Current documents issued by the U.S. military indicating residence address

Document from the Texas Department of Criminal Justice indicating the applicant's recent release or parole

Current Form DS2019, I-20 or a document issued by U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services

",malovias,e8se7yz,democrats
"Is texas a fucking war zone? 

That's what you're making it sound like. 

Good luck in your shootouts... ",Gsteel11,e8smlm7,democrats
"Nowhere did I make it sound like it was a warzone. Do you have reading comprehension issues or are you just trolling?

People like you kept saying open carry in Texas would make us the wild west with shootouts everywhere and yet here we are a couple of years later and that failed to materialize. 

Being prepared does not mean seeking out danger or confrontation, in fact Texas keeps records of crimes committed by licensed carriers and guess what, we are more law abiding than your average citizen and even have lower crime rates than police officers. But don't let facts get in the way of your rhetoric.",malovias,e8sn091,democrats
"""In the middle of the shit seeing people die""... in a conversation about carry laws. 

Yeah, I have no idea. I live in a safe area where no one gets shot. 

""Go hide behind the gov skirt""... from what? 

A story about one guy in kentucky? ",Gsteel11,e8sndpd,democrats
"So you do have a reading comprehension issue as you clearly couldn't tie in what I said about people dying and my time in the Army.

I see you are just trolling at this point or mentally deficient so I bid you good day.",malovias,e8snhtp,democrats
"You brought up your time in the army in this conversation. 

If texas isnt a warzone, why the fuck are you talking about it? 

You're just throwing out random shit, apparently? Lol",Gsteel11,e8snrhb,democrats
Someone definitely got indicted. We will get back to indictment Friday soon after the election. The Mueller investigation will fire back up right after the midterm.,kmurph72,e8vhr17,democrats
It would explain why Putin Jr. has been complaining about the immigration lately.,mad-n-fla,e8vjfxk,democrats
330 million people to choose from in this country and the republiCANs chose... Donald tRUMP... to represent them and THEIR values!!  IT's Time to Make Them Pay for It!!!  Vote!!!!    POLLS ARE OPEN!!  Vote BLUE!,Stinkymatilda,e8u0ge9,democrats
"I mean if you're looking for reasons not to vote for anyone... and you're including what their family does... you're likely to find reasons pretty quickly why you shouldn't vote for anyone. 

I don't personally have troubles with my family members, but I have good friends who are good people who have horrible families. 

I mean you have to do what you have to do, and I don't know all the details, but this feels kind of weak? ",Gsteel11,e8unpkd,democrats
Pick someone from your district who you think would be an actually good candidate and write in their name. Then write a letter to them letting them know that you voted for them and encourage them to run in the future. ,SamOfAllTrades,e8uft6l,democrats
"This is why we need ranked choice ballots [www.fairvote.org](https://www.fairvote.org)

After all, the 2016 presidential election was another example of choosing between dog shit and horse shit.

More people would vote if they had real choice.",AkiTendo,e8v0ijj,democrats
"Definitely vote for a 3rd party candidate instead of unacceptable Democratic candidates. OTOH, since 3rd party candidates are almost certain not to win, so this would be a protest vote, consider writing in someone in your community who you respect if your ballot allows write-ins.",hrlngrv,e8v3c9u,democrats
Write in or skip it is what I usually do. I’d vote Green Party only if it wasn’t an entire throw away vote. I lose say on local government positions that only have the two parties running otherwise. Unless your area doesn’t have much extra on the ballet then go for it. ,MunchyTea,e8x2zom,democrats
I completely agree— election reform is my biggest issue and I love fairvote. However that doesn’t help me with my problem since I still have to play by the current rules ,rmourz,e8vldyi,democrats
Anyone has a mirror pretty please?,BoboCookiemonster,e8sm3lf,democrats
330 million people to choose from in this country and the republiCANs chose... Donald tRUMP... to represent them and THEIR values!!  IT's Time to Make Them Pay for It!!!  Vote!!!!    POLLS ARE OPEN!!  Vote BLUE!,Stinkymatilda,e8u0ccl,democrats
"Freedom of speech
",Marswithlife,e8t06x9,democrats
What does that have to do with anything?,GuyForgett,e8t0g4k,democrats
"Nothing, I just like it.
",Marswithlife,e8vn66v,democrats
GOP lie even if the truth fits the best,goforthandconquer,e8t7bd5,democrats
Just like when he said he would be the “Best president on LGBT issues” and then decided that the T doesn’t exist ,rmourz,e8u47tx,democrats
Her line about his mom was one of the highlights of the week.,evolutionfan,e8ta9b0,democrats
What a cluster fuck!,jamalwhite70,e8tabmr,democrats
"The Trumpsters are going to create as many false flags as possible, it's how they think.  This was just one of the dumber ones.  They brought Hillary down with a last minute news-bomb...  fuck 'em and vote.",evolutionfan,e8taopa,democrats
Or you can just take the trick or treaters candy and say you’re giving it to poor unfortunate children who didn’t go trick or treating for themselves and explain redistribution of other people’s property. ,Mr_Rivera,e8sztv9,democrats
WHATABOUT WHATABOUT WHATABOUT THIS THING I CARE ABOUT,killxswitch,e8t1fcc,democrats
Exactly. Thank you!,darkvader3771,e8tisvu,democrats
Kemp will get what's coming to him ,Stupidiseverywhere,e8twwyx,democrats
I'm surprised that there is nothing that states the Secretary of State has to recuse (for lack of a better word) themselves in cases like that.,bx995403,e8ud3m7,democrats
"Don't FBI profiling data back this up?

Las Vegas shooter Paddock: white male.

Sutherland Springs shooter Kelley: white male.

Parkland shooter Cruz: hispanic male (by surname).

Pipe bomber Sayoc: hispanic male (by surname).

Pittsburgh shooter Bowers: white male.

60% of the 5 most notable mass murderers in the last year were nonhispanic white males, and the other 40% hispanic white males. OK, for those who insist on legalisms, Paddock and Kelley were killed during their killing sprees, Paddock by police, Kelley by an armed citizen, so neither were convicted. The other 3 await trial.",hrlngrv,e8v30w0,democrats
I mean if we are going by straight numbers then black people are on a racist killing spree. A white person is more likely to be killed by a black person than the opposite. Straight numbers don't tell the whole story.,some_guy1e,e8vhbux,democrats
So white men are the biggest threat based on you cherry picking half a dozen psychopaths?  I'm sure you don't 100% stand by that but still silly to post nonetheless,FreedomSR,e8vm6t1,democrats
"I haven't seen any recent data, but my impression based on homicide rather than murder rates is that blacks kill blacks and whites kill whites for the most part.",hrlngrv,e8vjd5o,democrats
"I figure multiple homicides by the same person produce greater terror than single homicides. Black men may commit more drive by shootings, but white men commit more planned mass killings.",hrlngrv,e8vqdae,democrats
"They mostly stick to their own races but black on white crime is nearly double than white on black crime

[https://ucr.fbi.gov/crime-in-the-u.s/2016/crime-in-the-u.s.-2016/tables/expanded-homicide-data-table-3.xls](https://ucr.fbi.gov/crime-in-the-u.s/2016/crime-in-the-u.s.-2016/tables/expanded-homicide-data-table-3.xls)",some_guy1e,e8volfk,democrats
I can see where you come from..however I bet the next black on whoever killing will come before the next mass murder,FreedomSR,e8vumr2,democrats
"
first they came for .... 
then they came for ...
and then they came for ....
Me.

From quartz

The US is sending thousands of troops to “harden” the border with Mexico, Pentagon officials said today (Oct.29), as thousands of asylum-seekers approach on foot from Central America.

The armed forces will send 5,200 personnel, three helicopters, several military planes, and more than 150 miles of razor wire to border locations, starting in Texas, Air Force Gen. Terrence J. O’Shaughnessy, commander of North American Aerospace Defense Command and US Northern Command, told reporters Monday (Oct. 29) afternoon, confirming earlier reports.

Customs and Border Protection officers will continue to enforce immigration law on the border, the general stressed, and the thousands of military personnel dispatched on “Operation Faithful Patriot” will be “complementary to that effort.” In addition, he said in response to question, “everything we are doing is in line with and adherence to posse comitatus.”

The Defense Department press conference marked the second time a Trump administration official was asked about “posse comitatus” today. Reporters also grilled White House press secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders about whether Trump would suspend habeas corpus—the right for anyone who is arrested to appear before a judge—in order to stop asylum seekers. She did not rule it out, sparking concerns",myjuly14name,e8tr40u,democrats
"Over a division worth of troops and the dotard questions us having troops in South Korea and Europe. If you were to start walking from South Dakota now, you would reach the Mexican border well before these people reach the same place. At the rate they are going, and half have dropped out, whatever is left will each the border sometime between January and March if they go the safe route.",therecordcorrected,e8trjuv,democrats
"Excuse me? Dotard-in-Chief, if you please.",myjuly14name,e8tsr5z,democrats
"Iowa 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://sos.iowa.gov/elections/pdf/absenteeballotapp.pdf): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8unynj,democrats
"*There are none so blind as those who will not see.*

Reworded for context: *There are none so powerless as those who refuse to exercise the greatest power they have.*",hrlngrv,e8rumes,democrats
"I loathe non-voters, but this shit is just disingenuous.

See that guy on the right side with the green pants? He's from California. His vote is worth 1/4 the vote of the guy with the blue pants on the left side from Wisconsin, on a good day. On most days, his vote gets thrown out because of the Electoral College.

I've been reaching out to non-voters for years. This shit isn't for them. This shit is just designed to make \*us\* feel better about ourselves. If we were really trying to reach them, we would be acknowledging and refuting their best arguments, not their weakest straw man.",doodcool612,e8s1mr3,democrats
"99.9 percent of nonvoters don't say any of that shit. 

They barely know who the president is  ",Gsteel11,e8sg9u2,democrats
"Agree. But I don't think we'll see either party willing to make a push for electoral reform until voter turnout improves. It's too easy for politicians to blame turnout and not the system. Our culture as a whole needs a fundamental shift into realizing that doing objectively ""pointless"" things is still worth it, especially when those actions are a civic duty and right that many people on this planet (and within this country even) do not have the option of completing. I agree it's sometime pointless and that's hard for voters. But the only way to work towards making it not pointless and getting closer to the ideal is do it anyway. ",doyoueven-no,e8s2gyv,democrats
"""You are dumb"" is hardly the argument we should be making to potential voters/allies. ",doodcool612,e8srfd0,democrats
"I think the argument is more ""you are wrong"" than ""you are dumb."" ",Gsteel11,e8srowo,democrats
"Everybody in America knows who the president is.

If disaffection is the driver behind non-voting, then Dems should be avoiding that condescending shit like the plague.",doodcool612,e8ss26o,democrats
"I said barely. Just 19 percent voted in 2016. And the candidates could hardly be more polar opposite in favor of the youth and against. 

At some point they have to make an effort and you can't make then vote. ",Gsteel11,e8sslcv,democrats
"You're *barely* not retarded. It's okay because I said ""barely.""

I completely agree that nonvoters are required to make an effort. I'd even go so far as to say that some votes are morally obligated. But this ""hurr durr u r dum"" shit is just bad strategy. ",doodcool612,e8staib,democrats
Yes..  that was my total strategy!  That's exactly what I said!,Gsteel11,e8sxai9,democrats
Damn Clooney couldn't have said it better myself.,Tyrannosaurtillerson,e8sluq7,democrats
"George used to be a very handsome man, but he sure has aged ALOT. Maybe it's time for a vacation at Lake Cuomo!⛵🚣🏊",Baloneysniffer,e8t8tkt,democrats
"You forgot ""repeal the Magnitsky act"".",awhorseapples,e8qcf2a,democrats
"We should not be normalizing talk of ""civil war"". I've seen it far too often on far-right subs and the reality is that not only is it false to say civil war is inevitable, it's also irresponsible.

We don't need a civil war, we need civil discussion. It's not too late for that even if it seems that way sometimes.",Kyles39,e8rjfbm,democrats
For the rest of us this results in a 'write-up'. His needs to be titled Midterms 2018.,doinmybest4now,e8qbpd7,democrats
Not sure if I missed anything on the list,elbunts,e8q941i,democrats
"☐  Lock

☐  Him

☐  Up

",Futureman999,e8qkjh6,democrats
"One idiots critique: saying he cultivated civil war is hyperbole. It’s not that out of hand yet (though we are on that pathway.) Don’t use hyperbole to criticize trump, there’s plenty of ammo. ",Real_Perd_Hapley,e8qpmew,democrats
Obama promised flexibility. Trump promised sanctions. ,ElDudeReddit,e8r4zyd,democrats
[removed],,e8qvy43,democrats
Cultivate civil war? If you let one man do that something is wrong with you. ,troglodyte1717,e8qa3bz,democrats
Well if bombs and shootings aren't enough for you what constitutes civil war? ,yIdontunderstand,e8rz9rf,democrats
I don’t think it’s to that point quite yet. I don’t think there are enough people willing to kill over some undue duress about political correctness.,lolux123,e8rsvre,democrats
Cultivate civil unrest?,elbunts,e96f9ln,democrats
[removed],,e8q9mjf,democrats
"Don’t use the word hyperbole wrong.. it’s getting old and annoying...

hy·per·bo·le

exaggerated statements or claims not meant to be taken literally.

-These statements are meant to be taken literally, regardless of them being true or not. ",Thatythat,e8r2oup,democrats
Yeah I wasn’t sure how to phrase what Trump is doing. I call it “slinging hate”,elbunts,e8r6xzw,democrats
"This is the beginning stage of bleeding Kansas. Sure, it has been simmering for quite a while, but once militias or posse’s form and conduct violent acts consistently, it’s over. Especially if local governments can’t or won’t control them.",Boden,e8qr65k,democrats
"Lololol... yeah, trump supporters are totally not in need of serious help.. ugh...",Thatythat,e8r2r6v,democrats
Yes... there is something very wrong with America. That's kind of the point.,Gsteel11,e8qdc2n,democrats
"Its called freedom of speech. Unfortunately yes, that means tolerance of insane postions. You might not be familiar with that in your native Russia. ",Pint_and_Grub,e8qagt9,democrats
Answer me honestly. Do you hate democratic Americans?,elbunts,e8qflzv,democrats
Organized militaries dueling it out in the street. A section of the country breaking off to form another country or trying to subjugate the rest of the country. You know that's what a civil war is right?,Kyles39,e8s9rjc,democrats
"That would be much more acceptable, but Civil War is a leap that people should not be making and it's talked about far more often than it should be.",Kyles39,e96rsrl,democrats
Imagine being this bad at trolling. 2/10 low effort and SAD,pewpewhitguy,e8qbn7l,democrats
"lol, hows the supression campaign going?

",cybexg,e8qc4me,democrats
Fair enough. +1,Real_Perd_Hapley,e8r7xbe,democrats
"Well and I was wrong about how close we really are to a civil war. Unfortunately, it’s worse than I thought. ",Real_Perd_Hapley,e8r7z6x,democrats
"Well I’ll be dipped in shit. Never heard of bleeding Kansas, had to wiki it. Touché. I wish it WAS hyperbole still... Thanks for the comment or I wouldn’t have looked it up. ",Real_Perd_Hapley,e8qrv5s,democrats
"A statement like that on the Donald would have gotten you ejected. Funny how we allow your opinions here
",elbunts,e8r6sfr,democrats
"Our mental health plan is paid in full by cousin vlad, ",Toastnipples1,e8r319q,democrats
If this is what being great again feels like can we go back to whatever we were before? ,closer_to_the_flame,e8qgosa,democrats
[removed],,e8qg5v4,democrats
"Give it time, what's the hurry? When the president is calling one section of the population ""enemies of the people"" and inciting violence all the rest will come.....",yIdontunderstand,e8sdq66,democrats
It's almost like he's satirically mocking trump fans. Almost.,Gsteel11,e8qderq,democrats
"Thanks... please for the love of the FSM, tell your friends! Have it taken off of the official trumpkin trigger word list..",Thatythat,e8r80kt,democrats
"Ummm wut? I’m not a trump supporter and I was kicked out of T_D and the republican subs.. also muted from debatethealtright and given no reason

An obvious trump supporter said everyone in this sub needs help, I pointed out that this is definitely true for trump supporters, not so much for reasonable people in this sub..

Edit.. oh I get it now.. sorry, I’m tired...",Thatythat,e8r71oc,democrats
Wow... great joke... got a real thinker over here,Thatythat,e8r37f5,democrats
Appropriate username,evdacf,e8qgf7m,democrats
"He's the president. 

Please look that up and correct everything you said... as clearly no one is ""letting"" him do anything but he was elected into a position of great power and uses that great power daily. ",Gsteel11,e8qhhq6,democrats
This relates to the question do i hate American democrats?,troglodyte1717,e8r1vrp,democrats
This relates to the one man you spoke of. ,Gsteel11,e8r2a9j,democrats
"They want ""infinite detention of the children, precious precious"".....",mad-n-fla,e8vk6ip,democrats
They are such an understanding and open bunch. ,Gsteel11,e8t51ou,democrats
I guarantee that mod has a swastika flag or at the very least a questionable hentai folder,Hookahwave,e8ttuqr,democrats
"[October 9, 2018, was the last day to register to vote for the November 6, 2018 election.](https://www.votetexas.gov/register-to-vote/you-must-register-by.html)",wenchette,e8tawqs,democrats
"This is why I don’t understand the whole “don’t forget to vote!” movement a few weeks before an election. Registration is the *real* battle, and it ends almost a month before the elections in most states. We need to run 90% of our “voter awareness” stuff in the summer when people can actually register. ",rmourz,e8u46do,democrats
Contact someone at votetexas.gov but I do fear it may be a tad late.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8t82yi,democrats
It’s too late.  You should have gotten “tired of the gop “ three weeks ago ,Druidshift,e8todg7,democrats
Thx man I think it might be too late but it won’t harm me to contact them and make sure. ,fvckpvblo,e8t8bmj,democrats
Maybe but at least I care unlike most of my friends and colleagues but guess I didn’t care enough,fvckpvblo,e8tpzix,democrats
Never hurts to try,Stupidiseverywhere,e8t8cnu,democrats
Register now.  You will be able to vote in 2 years.  And a myriad of local elections until then.,Druidshift,e8tu9vo,democrats
Because Obama did not encourage hate. ,red_carpet_hero,e8the6p,democrats
"You're not being blamed because you're the president, you're being blamed because it's your fault.",chubbiguy40,e8tkdne,democrats
Thanks Oprah! ,Bemuzed,e8snxb1,democrats
"Georgia 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](http://elections.sos.ga.gov/Elections/advancedVotingInfo.do): October 15-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://www.mvp.sos.ga.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8trrb0,democrats
These people are nothing new. Voting against your own self interest is as old as democracy. ,Gsteel11,e8sr4nf,democrats
\#SunkenPlace,DrNoPants,e8svz19,democrats
What your saying is they shouldn’t support the president just because they are black? They’re in the sunken place because the have different opinions than you? Hmmm ok. ,Buck_Nast213,e8t24gs,democrats
Troll.,jamalwhite70,e8ta9yv,democrats
"That’s your response? Isn’t it trolling to respond with just “troll”? It’s also funny that some people think that being a black conservative is going against their own interests but unless you know them personally, how would you know their interests? 🤔 Not all black people fall into the victim category you know. It’s sad that some believe that they do and will never benefit from what this country has to offer as long as they keep that mentality. ",Buck_Nast213,e8th0uq,democrats
Troll,mad-n-fla,e8vjm50,democrats
"And this shit is why the republicans will probably win the next general- weak ass, desperate, no agenda democrats.",Bookmanfilm,e8u3tok,democrats
Sorry- that’s my senator. It’s not fun living somewhere where this is the only democrat on the ballot who has a chance.,rmourz,e8u423d,democrats
Dino?,mad-n-fla,e8vikox,democrats
Ain't that the truth.,tracertong322,e8u4o1r,democrats
Thought this was The Onion at first. ,usposeso,e8q6fax,democrats
Satire tag right in the post title for anyone glitching out after reading that. ,LostInteraction,e8qxwco,democrats
"Andy at it again. Lol

I love this guy!",Gsteel11,e8q8zvz,democrats
The fuck?,DHank96,e8q6k0m,democrats
I'm surprised The Onion is still in business after the last two years of crazy.,speedycat2014,e8q78tc,democrats
"It's called satire. Says it right there at the top of the page. Of course, like the best satire, it's almost indistinguishable from reality.",speedycat2014,e8q77pc,democrats
Trump really gives them a run for their money. He is almost un-satire-able. ,Whit3W0lf,e8q8bhz,democrats
I honestly expected them to just start reporting real news at this point.,Jezon,e8qeun3,democrats
"If you know how to read satire, The Onion presents much more informed worldview than any regular news web site.",anotherblue,e8q9joi,democrats
Real life *is* satire now. Remember the Gorilla Channel thing? It sure fooled me!,eric987235,e8qbktw,democrats
"Silly me missed that it said satire right at the top of the article. At the same time though, real life really *is* satire now, so happy to realize I made a mistake while reading it.",DHank96,e8smdir,democrats
"After the past two years if you're not voting, you're not paying attention. ",Gsteel11,e8sg5av,democrats
Watched this live. Did not see amy confrontation they got out paid their respects amd left. ,dunrobulex,e8rvaog,democrats
What great news day,Stupidiseverywhere,e8rn0cr,democrats
Love love love it!!  Should be like that at every city the racist sociopathic pig goes to. ,ChangingFiveHundred,e8rvzr9,democrats
This makes me feel warm and fuzzy inside! Want to bake cookies for every protester.,Medcait,e8s2sf6,democrats
I wonder why none of these thousands of people were at their jobs.,Brexter24,e8s5zbv,democrats
People have too much time on their hands. ,Ty-Tass,e8t27up,democrats
Shut the fuck up,GutCart,e8sdufd,democrats
That’s not very nice it was just a question. ,Brexter24,e8t12wg,democrats
We know the line of questioning and what you’re implying. Stop pretending to be asking an “innocent” question.,GutCart,e8t19va,democrats
"That’s funny I’m an African-American Democrat. And I’m genuinely curious as to how thousands of individuals whom I share my political party with can afford to not show up to a job on a Wednesday. I may not be a republican nor do I stand for 90% of the things they represent, but there comes a time when it’s our duty as a political party to look in the mirror, and maybe when we do, we can start getting our priorities straight. All I’m saying is, I’ve yet to see thousands of right wing protesters on a weekday morning, not at their jobs blocking public roads. As sad as I am to admit it, they are showing more maturity than I’ve seen the Democratic Party show in 5 years. And maybe they do have a good point about the no jobs thing. ",Brexter24,e8t1xml,democrats
"More maturity than the Democratic Party? Have you see who’s president? If you’re really an African American democrat and this is the shit your espousing, life’s going to be extremely difficult for you.",GutCart,e8t2qnt,democrats
"Eh, no worries, he'll just sign an executive order and fix everything. /s",doyoueven-no,e8srn2z,democrats
Clicking the link sent my ESET into a ransomware threat stage.,chubbiguy40,e8tuhz9,democrats
Correctly so.,mad-n-fla,e8vklex,democrats
Who says bipartisanship is completely dead? 🤣,therecordcorrected,e8rkx02,democrats
"California 2018 Election 

[General Election](http://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/voter-registration/vote-mail/#apply): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8rmrok,democrats
"Went to college with this kid.
So glad he disavowed his family and is making up for all the harm he caused others with his radio show and old viewpoints.",,e8rt7mi,democrats
Lock this kid up - his father too,supercali45,e8rmze6,democrats
Never ends with these fucking scumbags.  Every one of them should be behind bars. ,ChangingFiveHundred,e8rlu7v,democrats
"California 2018 Election 

[General Election](http://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/voter-registration/vote-mail/#apply): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8ryndf,democrats
"Holy God.  Did this make me sad.  

I keep getting told, by the David Hoggs of the world, that all of us old people (His definition of old being 30 or over) need to get the fuck out of the way and let the young people run everything.

Really?  When 49% of you don't vote?  

When the reasons given for not voting are ""Mailing things in a mailbox gives me anxiety.  It triggers my ADHD"".  

When the reasons given for not voting are ""Hillary didn't win and now I am like, totally disillusioned"".

When the reasons given for not voting are ""I am like, totally a poli sci major, and like, totally know more about politics than Donald Trump....so that's why I don't vote""  Yeah..a poli sci major that doesn't understand voting.

""Can we have a snap chat filter, for like voting?""

""My polling place is down the street, so it's so close and so easy to vote, it feels like..anti-climatic?""  I don't get a rush from voting, because it's too easy.


To which I know the millions of millenials are going to dog pile me ""Well, it's your fault because you don't INSPIRE US to vote!""  How do I inspire you not to feel anxiety mailing something in a mailbox?  Give me a fucking break.

",Druidshift,e8slqb5,democrats
Who are you young people? Clueless idiots who are focused on your feelings and can't do a simple Google search on how to vote. Or adults able to make simple decisions about your future. ,Gsteel11,e8sokuj,democrats
Disillusioned? Still vote.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8smtt7,democrats
">Then I Googled “Republican versus Democrat,” and I like kinda both, kinda not. That’s why I’m an Independent. It wasn’t till the Trump-versus-Hillary election that I realized how important it is to vote. Maybe it had to do with, like, society and all.

Like...society....and all

> You can send in your registration by mail, but I didn’t have stamps. I kept thinking that I shouldn’t have to jump through this many hoops to register.

....a stamp is jumping thru a Hoop?

> When I was at the post office to register, this poor girl, clearly also a college student like me, didn’t know what “postmarked” meant and had no idea how to send an important document by mail. Most people my age have zero need to go to the post office and may have never stepped into one before. Honestly, if someone had the forms printed for me and was willing to deal with the post office, I’d be much more inclined to vote.

...I mean....he just said that he would vote, but only if someone else LITERALLY DID EVERYTHING FOR HIM.

> Well, I don’t give a shit about student interest rates if I’m not going to live past 13 more years on this planet.

What a *great* example of dramatic one issue voters!  First, Dems are demonstrably better on the environment.  Second, The earth will still be hre in 13 years, even if we all started to pollute at 10 times the rate we are now?  Woefully uninformed, uneducated and brazenly sure that you know everything.  What a shitty combination.

> I love that literally everyone is promoting actually registering to vote, but it’s never how to vote or the steps to voting or what you do next after you’ve registered to vote.

The Laziness is astounding.  Hand it to me on a silver platter, or it's your fault!  It sounds like quite a few posters here on r/democrats to be honest.

> For a while, I thought it was an immoral act to vote. It means that we’re giving our approval to a system that I totally do not want to validate.


",Druidshift,e8spsc6,democrats
"To be a little fair.. hogg is telling people to vote like crazy and I doubt he would enjoy this article. 

But yes, if the young people don't vote, then they don't have a lot to complain about as their future gets mortgaged and foreclosed on economically, environmentally and internationally. ",Gsteel11,e8sohfb,democrats
"It really is sickening. I don't entirely agree with you, since I think the importance of inspiring the young voters and tapping into ""inspiration"" is deeply important, no matter how much the idea is mocked.  

But some of this logic these 20-year-olds are using to not vote is absolutely absurd. Maybe I'm being overly optimistic, but these responses are likely the exception, not the rule. My guess is 90-95% of kids who get invested in politics and have an idea of what's going on will wind up voting (at least during presidential years); I think the major issue is that plenty of them never develop a passion for it. They grow up hearing about how it doesn't even matter since they're ""all crooks"", not recognizing that the difference between ""shitty"" and ""super shitty"" can make a massive difference in their own lives.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e8sposv,democrats
"How about /you/ give /me/ a fucking break. They picked the dumbest sounding kids to put on this. That's what people do, so it will trend or whatever. They want us divided, along race lines or generational lines, makes no difference to the other side. Divided is divided. And people whining about how this particular crop of young people sucks ain't helping and is disingenuous. 

The ones inspiring this rhetoric from the rotting fish head on down, and turning to voter repression (of which disillusionment messaging is just one facet), they're the ones who really merit your disdain. ",doyoueven-no,e8srcrk,democrats
"Someone who was almost 30 said that they can't mail letters because it gives them a panic attack.  How do I ""inspire"" them to vote?  

Seriously asking.",Druidshift,e8spvk4,democrats
"Inspiration is tricky. It can be easy to knock over some high standards that have been set up. 

Emotions can be more easily swayed than a decision based on the issues. A single well-timed news report in late October can make a huge impact in a inspiration focused contest. ",Gsteel11,e8srbot,democrats
"> They picked the dumbest sounding kids to put on this.

51% of millenials don't bother to vote.  It's not just these 12 kids.  Some of these kids being late 20s.

> The ones inspiring this rhetoric from the rotting fish head on down, and turning to voter repression (of which disillusionment messaging is just one facet), they're the ones who really merit your disdain.

The People NOT VOTING merit my disdain.  It's not the advertiser's, it's the people buying the product. Where is your responsibility?  At what point are you in control over yourself?

Stop coddling them.  If a Millenial gets drunk and gets in a wreck, what do you tell them?  ""Oh my god, it's totally not your fault.  You have no autonomy of your actions!  It's everyone's fault but yours!""

When a million millenials come on Reddit and say ""You old people have SCREWED US!  I wish you would all die out so the world will become a better place!""  Why is your response ""Yeah!  You're right!  Nothing is your fault!"" instead of ""You fucking outnumber us, why don't you fucking vote!  And then our opinions won't matter!""",Druidshift,e8srrtb,democrats
"Lol sure, that voter is likely going to be impossible to reach. That's probably a person in need of legit counseling.. I'm just saying that's not everyone, that's not most, that's not even a notable # of millennials who have THAT extreme mindset.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e8sq58v,democrats
And that's a problem.  Why are people so disconnected and float in and out of life?  Where is the self responsibility.  Democrats and Republicans could not be more different....how do you not know the side you fall on?,Druidshift,e8srv7t,democrats
"I'm not denying the statistics. I didn't down vote you. You and I agree that it is absolutely essential to vote, and necessary, and an important responsibility that should be taken seriously. My point was that the reasons that 51% have are far and away more serious than those in the video. Voter suppression is real. Young people are one of the biggest groups targeted, and they have a high level of intersection with other targeted groups, LGBT, debt heavy, and mixed race voters for instance are usually younger.

I mean, do I wish we had more 20 year olds capable of the things my parents and grandparents were dealing with at that age? Fuck yeah. But the biggest hurdle to millenials isn't a lack of being held accountable. They are held accountable all the time, some of the oldest ones are nearing 40. The millennial awakening has been a rude one, that's why they're all complaining. Trump was a real rude awakening too.

You can't go back and change how they were raised. You can't treat someone's extreme fear of criticism with criticism or their social anxiety with social censure. That doesn't actually help it just spreads the blame. And yeah, maybe that blame is fair... but it's not getting us anywhere.

The only thing that's gonna help millenials out of their political and social rut is treatment for their kicked dog syndrome. It's learned helplessness. They've been criticized so frequently and held responsible for such a myriad of social and market-related events that it's like, why bother? ""If everyone's going to tell me I'm stupid, lazy, sensitive, and selfish no matter what I do, well I might as well be those things for real.""

You're not at all wrong that not voting for some of the reasons in this video is ridiculous and irresponsible. And yes, these people are old enough to know better. But the mass painting of millenials with the same brush without considering why they have some of the problems and perspectives that they do all but ensures that  they'll never shape up.",doyoueven-no,e8st6dr,democrats
"From being on Reddit during the 2016 election, and reading a lot of the postings on here from ""young people"" i tend to disagree with your estimation that most millenials are not like that.

I am not shitting on millenials because they are younger than me and bug me.  I am not treating them like shit because every older generation treats the younger like shit.

I am shitting on them because the ""I don't feel *inspired* to vote...like..what does Postmark even mean?"" Is so fucking rage inducing I don't even know where to begin.  My big gay marriage, and the rights I get from it, depend on millenials that think the earth is going to end in 13 years, don't know what stamps are, and won't vote unless they are provided a snap chat filter where they can put dog ears on their heads.

Millenials don't need to be ""inspired"" they need to get their ass kicked.  When I am told of all the problems and issues that this generation will face, like no retirement, no social security, crippling student loans, a shrinking job market, a planet abused by generations before......I automatically think ""well fuck you guys, it's YOUR FAULT, not OURS, It's YOUR fault because the above issues don't *inspire* you enough to act out of self preservation.""  

This is not the only article, and these are not the only millenials, that have used ""I don't feel inspired!"" as coded language to mean ""I am really, really, really, truly, sttttuppppppid and lazy"".  

When you hear ""I don't feel inspired"" You immediately think ""Oh, we need to coddle these poor people.  They just need a pep talk!""  When I hear ""I don't feel inspired"" I think ""you whiny, stupid piece of shit.  How do you *not know* what a stamp is???""",Druidshift,e8sr0dh,democrats
"And I think part of it is..  people are busy. Some of these younger folks have 2 jobs and are barely making it and want to spend their free time having a little fun while they are young. 

But how do you reach them? 

It's a nice situation the gop has with the elderly vote that just sits at home watching fox news all day. ",Gsteel11,e8ss3cn,democrats
"> I didn't down vote you.

Nor I you.  And I understand what you are saying.  But jesus christ, 30 year old men should not be saying things like ""Mailing letter leads me to have a panic attack"".  And it's just not the people in this article.  It's a vast majority of millenials.

I was born in 1980.  By some definitions, I AM a millenial.  I know what a postmark is though.  It's mind boggling how helpless these people are.",Druidshift,e8svbug,democrats
"No, I feel you on almost all of that. I notice a HUGE difference between the mindset of a lot of actual millennials and people on Reddit who I presume to be millennials (people do say some disproportionately idiotic shit when they're online), and let's face it Reddit attracts some crazies by nature.

But the people I'm referring to aren't the crybabies who say ""none of these people are exciting performers, I want to see Trump vs. Avenatti for a real battle! That'd be awesome!"" Those people who are only intrigued by the theatre and entertainment of politics and NOT the substance... I don't know man, they gotta find some way to re-train their minds about that and not buy into that. I didn't even know about that stamp shit, holy crap... I do put a TON of the blame on past generations because much of this indifference is absolutely a product of their actions making them feel like things are hopeless, but we have to move forward and I agree, sometimes you just want to shake somebody and tell them to wake the fuck up. There are always things that can be done, so giving up can't be an option for these people.

But what about the young people who are more genuinely indifferent than jaded? The ones who might go about their lives but just never paid much attention to how relevant the political goings-on can be to their situation. The people who don't even KNOW that they haven't had their interest piqued, who never gave it a second thought. I don't think those people are as unreachable as those who are so jaded that they check out. Truly stupid/stubborn people often can't be reached, but painfully ignorant people can be.

On social issues, I'm happy that millennials are more left-wing than any generation ever (which I think will increase generation by generation), plus they deal with things like student loan debt/the cost of college, affordable housing issues, the list goes on. The framework is in place to wake people up to become much more proactively progressive. Damn near EVERYONE in America benefits from left-wing policy, so we don't have much of a choice but to try. 

I'm guessing I'm younger than you are, and it's possible in the future I will feel just like you do about the youngest and more careless voters. But I am holding out hope that if we passionately show them how BAD the other side is, and on top of that we give them something to vote FOR (both in substance and yeah, in messaging)... it's safe to say we've done our job at that point. I just think it's important to do everything within our own control as liberals to maximize turnout, which always leads to wins for us.

At the end of the day, it's incumbent upon these politicians (and these parties) to get people to vote them into office. The heartbreaking reality is that many people will suffer as a result of conservatives being in power, and non-voters are culpable for that, but it doesn't change the never-ending need to keep trying to reach them. My bad about the length of this lol.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e8stsn6,democrats
">  people are busy. Some of these younger folks have 2 jobs and are barely making it and want to spend their free time having a little fun while they are young.

45 million people buy lottery tickets twice a week.

https://www.nbcnews.com/politics/politics-news/record-turnout-not-millennials-just-third-say-they-ll-vote-n926231

So many excuses though.  Do you know why millenials have to work 2 jobs?  Because they don't vote for worker protections or a living wage.  

Hell, in this article, one Millenial said they are dealing with chronic illnesses, so they don't know if they are going to feel well enough to register to vote...it's a day by day thing....IN THE SAME SENTENCE THAT SAID THEY WENT OUT OF THEIR WAY TO GO GET THEIR LEGAL WEED CARD.
",Druidshift,e8ssin4,democrats
"Oh I agree. But buying a lottery ticket, for them, is easier than voting. Granted, in reality, not much. ",Gsteel11,e8ssrvn,democrats
"Not to be a Debbie downer, but all of those things also suggested a Hillary Clinton presidency so we should probably still prepare for the worst and hope for the best. ",rmourz,e8u4c9u,democrats
That is even on the wild side for me...take a step back  ,iwilleatyoursand,e8tclho,democrats
"He is at his lowest today. Going to Pittsburgh while is the chief instigator
Mbs shaking Jamal Khashoggi’s sons hand offering condolences comes to mind... sickening . It’s always about him.. 
he was and is the whistle blower! ",uporondrocks,e8qvh25,democrats
"Jeez, he has a hard enough time understanding that he is responsible for things he does, now you expect him to wrap his mind around the fact that others aren't responsible for crap they had nothing to do with, even if he doesn't like them? How unfair. ",doyoueven-no,e8q76ne,democrats
"Idk

Answer me this riddle

How did Trump get republican nomination after spear heading that very racist birther movement.",RedditfalconFan822,e8q9nih,democrats
Trump goes into victim mode. ,azmodan72,e8qb7jk,democrats
"Yes, that's because POTUS 44 wasn't a crypto-Nazi.  You fucking well are Donny.",Touristupdatenola,e8qipbz,democrats
What a breathtaking moron.,Frebdignabliaq,e8r3gev,democrats
"Obama was blamed for a lot, I believe many tried to pin the Dallas police shootings on Obama. Much of the BLM violence was placed on him. 

Obama didn’t demonize and dehumanize and declare anyone or news organization as “enemies of the state”. He never said he’d pay the expenses for the people who beat up protesters at his campaign rallies. He never spoke about or claim or insinuate his opponent was guilty of a crime and should be jailed. He never accused his political opposition of crimes without evidence. 

That’s why he wasn’t blamed for a white supremacist’s act of terrorism on a black church. The shooting is a little bit less directly related to Trump, but the bombings are very clearly because of him. 

That’s not even the point though, we’ve had 45 Presidents over 200+ years. Every single one of them faced unique problems and resided over different periods of cultural and political views of the time. Lincoln had to deal with slavery, Andrew Johnson had to oversee reconstruction, Dwight Eisenhower had to oversee the beginning of the Cold War. 

Good leaders don’t say why me and whine about how it’s not fair they have to deal with it when others didn’t when shit hit the fan for them, they rise to the occasion and attempt to be the person people need and do the things they can to help. George Bush with the bullhorn, the Gettysburg address, FDR’s address following Pearl Harbor, LBJ after Kennedy was assassinated. 

If trump showed a shred of leadership and ability to standup and be an example of the resolve of America and the ideals it was founded on and not avoid acknowledging the issue and deny any share of responsibility, the negative coverage might ease up a bit. ",SirJohnnyS,e8rf25i,democrats
https://www.google.com/amp/s/m.mic.com/articles/amp/120927/charleston-church-shooting-fox-news,CosmicCharlie99,e8q6la9,democrats
"South Carolina 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://info.scvotes.sc.gov/eng/voterinquiry/VoterInformationRequest.aspx?PageMode=VoterInfo): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8rxvfx,democrats
"The late William T. Kelley, who taught Trump at the University of Pennsylvania, said, “Donald Trump was the dumbest goddamn student I ever had.”",Guilf,e8qam6t,democrats
tRUMP needs a diaper change. ,GlobeTrott3r,e8qxl0h,democrats
"For them it’s a feature, not a bug.",BladePactWarlock,e8qhent,democrats
He never came out of victim mode. It's default. ,Towns-a-Million,e8qhsev,democrats
"CONservatives perpetuate the con

CONNEDservatives buy the con.",concreteblue,e8t6qzy,democrats
Completely. ,cjheaney,e8rl6bk,democrats
"Don't worry, they are.",RadioMelon,e8rybu1,democrats
"I’ve heard this used plenty of times, though it’s from conservative writers who hate the “own the libs” stuff but also try to flip the insult around for similarly silly shenegains from the more radical progressives. 

From what I’ve seen, it’s used much more as an ironic ciritque of the TPUSA types than it is for people actually seriously supporting it, so I don’t think embracing this variation would be that helpful.",Bioman9,e8s91n7,democrats
Folks who label others should be called on it. Immediately. Turn the tables on them with logical fact. Helps to unite instead of dividing. Most of the time.,rockcandymtns,e8rvbor,democrats
Lib and con lives within each and every one of us. Labels are phony and divisive. ,rockcandymtns,e8rn3p4,democrats
"100% agreement.  This would be the ideal.  Not exactly reality at the moment, however.  ",Maroonedit,e8s8d85,democrats
I mean... this sub is labeled Democrats? I don't really follow? Do you think that's bad? ,Gsteel11,e8sgo9e,democrats
"I generally lean more liberal, as society views it on most days. According to the policies I believe in. 

How is that phony or devisive? ",Gsteel11,e8sgkyq,democrats
"Good point.  Best to even out the usage, I suppose.",Maroonedit,e8rn6sm,democrats
No. Labeling someone lib or con is the. ,rockcandymtns,e8tk5e6,democrats
"Didn't say it does. It's when folks use either one as a label. I lean politicaly lib also but live with many con methods personally. For instance, I occasionally drink whiskey, but cheaply and at mostly at home. Lol",rockcandymtns,e8tk1d5,democrats
I Can't Believe That Butter!,FakeRegDunlop,e8p88gx,democrats
"Someone should let them know that their sh*t isn't demonstrably better than the store brands. Screw them, won't buy again.",angryvetguy,e8pdckq,democrats
"Iowa 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://sos.iowa.gov/elections/pdf/absenteeballotapp.pdf): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8pnitv,democrats
Anyone have any other butter brands you recommend?,kerryfinchelhillary,e8pelcq,democrats
"Well, last time I buy land o'lakes butter, it's the only type I've basically ever bought.",Vulkar59,e8po03h,democrats
I've always been a big fan of Land O'Lakes....time to switch to Kerrygold. ,Cassakane,e8puotm,democrats
KerryGold it is!,neovenator250,e8q0om1,democrats
This sucks because I like Land O'Lakes unsalted for basic cooking. Now I'll have to find a new staple butter. ,Emily_Postal,e8py657,democrats
For all you know it is a business venture into Nazi butter to go will all those (wait for it) - white crackers! ,docinlft,e8q5hx8,democrats
"This is from his Wikipedia page: 
“August 2015, King was named the least effective member of Congress by InsideGov due to his persistent failures to get legislation out of committee.”
He doesn’t even do anything, except drop inflammatory quotes.",EzBonds,e8qdwa3,democrats
Welp- I know which butter I'm buying from now on and it is definitely NOT Land O' Lakes. Fuck that. ,comfort_fiend,e8q82j8,democrats
Worked for chik-fila,slapper5000,e8q5juu,democrats
I Can’t Believe It’s Nazi Butter!,lofi76,e8pvxdp,democrats
Why doesn't this have more votes?,bradybunches13,e8ptyha,democrats
"Retweet. 

I'm in complete agreement",schweeppe,e8pxjhz,democrats
I like Kerrygold Pure Irish Butter.,nearlyneutraltheory,e8pohpd,democrats
Shop locally if you can.,Pal_Smurch,e8pilwv,democrats
"I honestly can tell no difference between Land O Lakes and whatever store brand butter there is. I usually shop at Kroger or Aldi, and their butter is fine.",Schooney123,e8pmmza,democrats
Presidente salted butter from France. Accept no substitutes.,btribble,e8po7u0,democrats
Anything that’s straight butter and not a Nazi supporter. ,lofi76,e8pvsjr,democrats
Definitely kerrygold. So good.,Anovan,e8pzbal,democrats
Challenge is my current goto. ,BigTulsa,e8ptgad,democrats
Store brand. You won’t be able to tell a difference and it’ll be way cheaper.,Patrico-8,e8pugbn,democrats
"There's a whole world of vegetable oil based substitutes that are even better tasting (in my opinion), arguably healthier, and cruelty free.",oneinchterror,e8poua4,democrats
How about any brand that makes real butter. Land just does margarine. ,Jgrigg17,e8php9z,democrats
Which is unfortunately a lot more expensive,barchueetadonai,e8pyhr9,democrats
KERRYGOLD,Anovan,e8pzcl0,democrats
I did NAZI that coming!,FreedomSR,e8qktbx,democrats
I did Nazi that butter.,mad-n-fla,e8pym8k,democrats
KerryGold is the business!,S1owJam,e8psmew,democrats
"Sadly this shit IS local for us. As is Steve King. Dick Butter King of the midwest right here, ladies and gentlemen.",Elfzwolf179,e8pmhry,democrats
Gotta get that organic free range non-GMO cage-free butter that has the name of the cow the butter originated from.,iwascompromised,e8pjufa,democrats
That’s likely because Land O Lakes is probably making the butter and packaged it specifically for Kroger’s or Aldi. My husband works for a big bakery company. They make the Aldi bread. It’s the same as the name brand (obviously of similar type) but have different packaging for Aldi products. ,chalicehalffull,e8pnl12,democrats
I get using the French brand. But why salted butter?,ExoticCommunication,e8q4z16,democrats
"Meh, none dairy butter works too. I can’t tell the difference.",homojojojo,e8qx8ds,democrats
Lol no,barchueetadonai,e8pygo5,democrats
You can get it for a pretty good deal at Costco. ,OreoTheGreat,e8q0q4k,democrats
"I like kerrygold a lot, but I find it doesn't hold up well outside the refrigerator and I like to keep my butter on the counter.  I'll be buying Kerrygold and other brands from now on.  ",Emily_Postal,e8pzglf,democrats
Thank God for Bessy and her giant tits!,duomaxwellscoffee,e8q0hlv,democrats
"This was my first thought on reading the headline.  They probably make so many other brands, and you'd have to boycott them all...",asomebodyelse,e8pvry5,democrats
"Why salted anything?

Salted butter is really for use as a spread on breads, toast, etc. it’s fine for most cooking, but you have to watch the total salt content.

What kind of butter do you use and are you sure it’s unsalted?",btribble,e8q8fti,democrats
Thanks for your input.,oneinchterror,e8q3vt6,democrats
Yeah I've noticed it tends to form a kind of skin more readily than some other butters but I think the trick is to eat so much of it that it doesn't have a chance  ;),Anovan,e8q1023,democrats
">I like to keep my butter on the counter.

Heathen",tdjm,e8q12bz,democrats
"For one, because I prefer to season at the end, and it’s always easy to add salt later, but you can’t remove it. Also, for something like a roux I prefer to use kosher salt for texture. 

I keep salted around for bread, though. It lasts forever. 

I mostly use the 365 brand of unsalted butter. Sometimes I’ll use whatever Trader Joe’s or the locks Japanese market has too. And unless I’m really bad at reading, it’s “unsalted” on the box. Though who knows?",ExoticCommunication,e8qaila,democrats
"Tank axle grease is not healthier than butter, that’s what the “lol no” ment.",Pint_and_Grub,e8q7poo,democrats
"Presidente is the only butter in the US that I’ve found that has a truly “European” butter taste, even amongst other European butters.

Buy a few different butters and try them side by side. That lack of real butter flavor (partially a byproduct of malolactic acids/fermentation, and partially a product of the type of cows and their diet) in US butter makes me sad.",btribble,e8qnnn8,democrats
That’s a fair point! I agree completely on that. :-),ExoticCommunication,e8qtmys,democrats
And their state's rapepublican leadership is fine with the fake election.,mad-n-fla,e8vkyco,democrats
"California 2018 Election 

[General Election](http://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/voter-registration/vote-mail/#apply): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8svqig,democrats
[And she’s never been wrong.](https://youtu.be/bSR0PvG9F_I),bartonsmart,e8sd3m0,democrats
"I mean, domestic Nazis vote Republican, so we kinda already guessed that?",amus,e8pq1mv,democrats
">	King is expected to easily win reelection against Democratic challenger J.D. Scholten, though Scholten has out-fundraised King over the last two years.

Stay classy, Iowa. ",StackerPentecost,e8pqcki,democrats
This is the first time I have ever agreed with Steve King.,therecordcorrected,e8peund,democrats
"That fucker is actually saying that members of the GOP would be openly Nazi if only it were slightly more acceptable in the USA. He's just trying to create that air of acceptability with his horse shit about Nazis in other countries right now. Come one IOWA, vote this pile of Nazi anal discharge out.",puss_parkerswidow,e8q0a42,democrats
Iowa has very few Americans apparantly. Have non of them heard about WW2?,Stupidiseverywhere,e8pxc9v,democrats
To surprise of absolutely no one,Juanlarra,e8q3xcu,democrats
"Iowa 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://sos.iowa.gov/elections/pdf/absenteeballotapp.pdf): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8pnivd,democrats
Please don't encourage them to come here.,craigthelesser,e8qoo4i,democrats
All right Iowa you welcome Neo-Nazis with open arms cool cool cool ,El_Eleventh,e8pvb8e,democrats
"You would have thought that an anti-Nazi Dem would *easily* win over a Nazi sympathising Rep.

Most people voting for King probably had parents who fought actual Nazis in WWII. What the fuck is wrong with people?",RosemaryFocaccia,e8q3s2d,democrats
The Stopped Clock was right one of its 2 times a day on this.,hrlngrv,e8pfyvp,democrats
"They have been brainwashed into believing ""liberal"" and ""Democrat"" mean they want the government to do your thinking for you. Oh the irony. ",Towns-a-Million,e8qhhww,democrats
*2 zeits per day,cheshirepig,e8qc8j0,democrats
"and we know also social media contains far left organizations like antifa... should we be worried about them too?

&#x200B;

edit: grammar",skid472,e8sg0ul,democrats
I give it 4 weeks... before they are banned. ,Gsteel11,e8qvr71,democrats
"This is all that tyranny of the masses shit that the Founders knew well.  God forbid these people ever get into pow.... oh, wait......",myjuly14name,e8r5yrr,democrats
I don't imagine Instagram is the best platform for their bullshit.,RadioMelon,e8r8oea,democrats
Trying to kill a Hydra is tough.,comfort_fiend,e8r9zdn,democrats
"Full interview is here

https://www.cnn.com/videos/world/2018/10/30/dave-chappelle-jon-stewart-amanpour.cnn/video/playlists/amanpour/",Readingit939,e8r6ng5,democrats
"Pennsylvania 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://www.pavoterservices.pa.gov/Pages/PollingPlaceInfo.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8plxx9,democrats
But Fox News said we might never know the guy's motivations? ,Ofbearsandmen,e8ptyiz,democrats
Trump needs to go. Not just from office but from the face of this earth.  ,IfJerryDiesWeRiot,e8q0xjm,democrats
[removed],,e8plux7,democrats
[removed],,e8pm7wz,democrats
[removed],,e8px2gm,democrats
[removed],,e8q0cst,democrats
"According to reports, Mueller hasn't accused anybody of anything.  He simply referred the reports to the FBI for investigation. 

I'm sure the Republicans, and Trump and Grassley specifically, will now all of a sudden be VERY concerned with unsubstantiated claims of sexual misconduct and DEMAND an immediate investigation...  By the House of Reps, lead by Nunes. ",supergreen26,e8qwdqt,democrats
Jacob Wohl is an incompetent moron and should be locked up for obstruction.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8r0h1x,democrats
https://www.nbcnews.com/politics/justice-department/mueller-refers-sex-assault-scheme-targeting-him-fbi-investigation-n926301,Stupidiseverywhere,e8qwno6,democrats
"Not to mention how much they'll enjoy ignoring the facts that quite a few of them have some unresolved sexual harassment claims of their own.

Ah, the joy of projection!",RadioMelon,e8rgc94,democrats
"Easy solution: Donald Trump - just him, that one piece of shit - is retroactively not an American citizen.

Being the worst traitor in American history, that's not a very tough sell.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8qbvvo,democrats
unfortunately the majority of America has this mindset,Ronson18,e8r5qu7,democrats
"Trump ~~lies~~ prevaricates. [I parsed the OP more carefully.]

Water's wet.

Shit stinks.",hrlngrv,e8r7fag,democrats
"I think it's stupid to nitpick and pull anything out of context, but if you're going to do it, do it right. Idc what party side he's on, he's a politician above all. They all double speak and speak redundancies to cover their ass. It makes no sense to hang on every word. ",BeezyJ,e8r5zu3,democrats
"Majority?

Majorities in just enough states, but not nationwide.",hrlngrv,e8r7ih1,democrats
"Its the perfect trifecta of a libertarian meme. Contradictory, naive, and mildly racist.",messiestbessie,e8rocdo,democrats
"""Libertarians are just Republicans who smoke weed.""",Franklin-B-Johnson,e8rqrvi,democrats
Where's the part about dismantiling the department of education,tyrantsblade,e8rp9pn,democrats
"Lol, Libertarians always make it clear to me they're pretty opposed to gay rights",begonetoxicpeople,e8ruw28,democrats
"How about 1/2 the “Republican party” I.e the fascists, join the “libertarian party” I.e. the other “don’t get in the way of my taking everything you have if I feel like it” fascists, and split their vote, leaving the rest of us to put what’s left of the planet back together?",myjuly14name,e8rlj65,democrats
"The increasing refusal to continue treating patients pain is already increasing the number of people turning to illegal opioids for relief. The average person doesn't even know that most of the deaths are due to synthetic opioids made in China and elsewhere - the media has been part of the disinformation campaign that brought us here. The new legislation will only make it worse. 

But that's what they want. If you're a chronic pain patient or an addict, your life has little value to conservatives. If they can put you into prison and profit from your labor, you have a little value. Otherwise they're just waiting for you to die. 

This has never been about helping people other than the drug companies and others who profit from the 'crisis'. Otherwise we would be having conversations about what causes people to abuse substances in the first place. Hint: it isn't opioids. 

",wtf-is-this-bs,e8rptcp,democrats
"Did you click on the leak? They haven't taken the domain name since it is .gov, that would be illegal. It takes you to the correct government website. All they are doing is paying google to put their words around it. Actually fairly smart.",therecordcorrected,e8rlhl5,democrats
">are indeed subject to U.S. jurisdiction, and denying their children citizenship privileges would be unconstitutional

Repeat this. Repeat this. Repeat this. ",Towns-a-Million,e8qkr4k,democrats
"Better to avoid hyperbole.

In 1861, army muskets and hunting rifles weren't all that different. Privately owned revolver pistols were no different than cavalry/officer's pistols. The Confederate States raided US armories in their states early on to secure cannons exactly the same as the Union army had. Armed rebellion was possible then because weaponry was no where close to what we'd consider modern today.

That's not the case today. There's no way citizens armed with AR-15s and similar modified to handle fully automatic firing could stand up to APCs with dual .50 machine guns firing rounds which could easily pierce any kind of body armor of any kind of shielding a human could budge. Then there's attack helicopters and fixed wing aircraft, not to mention standard and rocket artillery.

Americans aren't ready to wage decades-long guerrilla war, which would be the only type of armed rebellion with any chance of lasting for a decade.

The question is whether the US military would obey illegal/unconstitutional orders. The risk there is that commanders may rely on what the courts say, and there's just so damn many Republican-nominated/confirmed judges these days.",hrlngrv,e8r3781,democrats
I am pro 2nd Amendment and I don't like the party's national stance on guns and wish they would change the stance. ,2018throwaway_accoun,e8w1o30,democrats
"California 2018 Election 

[General Election](http://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/voter-registration/vote-mail/#apply): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8ryoyp,democrats
I'm asking out of pure ignorance but isn't not believing in Jesus and the New Testament one of the main tenets of Judaism?,GutCart,e8qnfs1,democrats
"Nope. Judaism, like all religions, is defined by what its adherents *do* believe. 

Judaism was in existence before the common era, so to say that its beliefs depend on negating a belief system that emerged thousands of years later is nonsense.",AltMiddle,e8qo8o4,democrats
That makes sense. I just knew they killed Jesus. /s,GutCart,e8qp2mc,democrats
The less he does the better.,WarWeasle,e8q8cd1,democrats
Good news. Maybe we could get him some crayons and coloring books too? ,awhorseapples,e8r305l,democrats
[removed],,e8qf3az,democrats
"Alright dont just vote for someone because they're blue, vote for them because they are a candidate that stands for something that you believe in or at least has policies you agree with. I'm tired of seeing people saying to just vote blindly for a candidate because they support the party. It is one of the problems with a 2 party system and a result of being uninformed. ",jk9910,e8q8er6,democrats
[deleted],,e8qkw1i,democrats
"this is r/democrats.

We are proud democrats. If you arn't a team player in something as important as national elections please fuck off! You are not special, and you third party losers are always middle-upper class and 90% white. Thats no accident, as you will never be the first to burn in the Trump era. 

Please take your racist sheep dogging horse shit and shove it!",SuperNES_Chalmerss,e8r4v57,democrats
"No, son, it’s to take a stand against fascism.

Stop whining about your privilege. 

Other folks have more at stake.

",VegaThePunisher,e8qcyvi,democrats
"You are such a hypocrite You automatically support all these new, inexperienced, unqualified people with unproven records. You do so because for no other reason than they say they want single payer at a time when it is impossible to get. Then you dismiss and bag on anyone else who has achieved so much over the years, only becasue they have been there for awhile.",backpackwayne,e8rjabq,democrats
[removed],,e8qpb0d,democrats
[removed],,e8rfdmr,democrats
"Don't bother. They're nuts. People like the person you're replying to are the reason Trump got elected in the first place. They despise white people, treated blue collar whites like shit on a shoesole, and now they are crying foul because those same mistreated people didn't vote for a shitty candidate. They are irredeemably hateful, blinkered human beings,  and will vote in a minority candidate on the basis that they're not white regardless of whether or not they are the best person for the job. Probably even hate Lamb because he's a white male, despite the fact he's a great candidate that is future POTUS material.",mudlarker84,e8rlq0p,democrats
I never said who I support and what reasons I vote for lmao ,jk9910,e8rjj72,democrats
[deleted],,e8qs32h,democrats
"I didn’t say that, that is just a strawman you pulled out your ass to excuse your phoniness and self-entitlement.

",VegaThePunisher,e8rfgak,democrats
"Idk if your reply is about me or not but that was a point I didnt really want to say but agree with. People will vote for someone because they are a certain thing while that person might be the exact opposite of what they are looking for. 
Edit: fixed a typo",jk9910,e8rnffg,democrats
"So true. Just want to tell them to STFU every now and then, It gets so old.",backpackwayne,e8rtb61,democrats
[removed],,e8qw8hz,democrats
[removed],,e8r3hoi,democrats
Didn't know voicing an opinion to get people to think twice about their actions that have momentous potential  was phony or self entitled... ,jk9910,e8rg2y2,democrats
[deleted],,e8qzlde,democrats
"We are all fighting for the same thing. Quit with your bullshit. She is not running for anything. She is getting out the vote, she is campaigning for our cause. My god, get off your damn high horse and stop buying into all the smears that you fell for back then hook line and sinker. 2016 is over.  Get over it.",backpackwayne,e8r3yh8,democrats
You’re not really sharing your opinion. You’re just repeating propaganda slogans created by the right. ,JustMadeThisNameUp,e8rm24l,democrats
"Well now you do.

This is an election where we don’t need the self-entitled adjusting their fedoras.

It’s how we got into this mess in the first place. ",VegaThePunisher,e8rgftp,democrats
"They are not fighting for the same things. 

They are republican wanna be trolls that get paid by  the Trump administration through Putin to pretend to be leftist and dilute the will of the people by sowing division and creating cynicism. 
/s

Or it's most likely lack of critical thinking skills due to years of practicing bias confirmation. 
",chemforge,e8saf7h,democrats
[removed],,e8r4ity,democrats
I think it was people that shouldn't get into office getting into office because people voted for them blindly without knowing the candidate but I'm just a neckbeard so what do I know ¯\_(ツ)_/¯,jk9910,e8rgt9j,democrats
[removed],,e8se07l,democrats
"I do, so by definition, *someone* wants to hear from her.",FlyingChihuahua,e8r8sj4,democrats
">  Nobody wants to keep hearing from her

Then downvote and move on.  Don't presume to speak for every poster on this sub.  We have a downvote/upvote system for a reason.",Druidshift,e8r63zj,democrats
Oh bullshit. Why do you attack our own party? Join it or get the fuck out.,backpackwayne,e8r4l7i,democrats
Exactly. ,VegaThePunisher,e8rjfu8,democrats
"> Face reality, Hillary Clinton is not popular by any means

She doesn't need to be popular among racists and sexists. All that matters is that she is highly popular among liberal activists, and this is the community that needs to be activated to turn out the vote.

Nor does her activities harm Democrats. No one is changing their vote to Republicans in 2018 based on her exhortations.
",StevenMaurer,e8tbkcp,democrats
">You sound eerily similar to conservatives when they claim that all legitimate activists or protestors are paid by Soros, a mild criticism doesn’t mean I’m paid by the opposition. There is definitely a lack of critical thought abound, I would argue that it’s taking place by those who insult anyone who isn’t blindly loyal to the party. It’s easy to disregard anyone you disagree with as a troll.


Clearly you can't read or don't understand what sarcasm is. You clearly missed or don't  understand what /s means.  Thank for proving my point. (In case you are too sense to get it and lack the critical thinking skills: your comment showed lacked of understanding)
 
>Face reality, Hillary Clinton is not popular by any means, her favorability % is lower than Donald Trump, it’s unwise for Dems to continue pretending she’s a leader and adds value.

How insecure must you be to think that me or anyone can make Hillary a leader. Hillary is a leader by her own merit, something the likes of you will never understand. 
",chemforge,e8u58ct,democrats
"You commented to inform me of the upvote button, thanks.",ginjamane1,e8r69aw,democrats
[removed],,e8r4q44,democrats
[removed],,e8uji4u,democrats
"You're welcome.  

You are trying to police the content on this sub.  There is a system in place for that already.",Druidshift,e8r6kir,democrats
Support my ass. All you do is tear it down. Go join the republicans and do for them what you are doing for us. Nothing would please me more. We are tired of you tearing the party apart. All you do is bitch. ,backpackwayne,e8r4v9m,democrats
What would I do without you?,ginjamane1,e8r6po1,democrats
[removed],,e8r5bs9,democrats
Do you know what Shelby County v. Holder is? ,ShariceDavidsJester,e8rcp2v,democrats
"Yes, and voter suppression is far from the only reason Dems are losing elections.",ginjamane1,e8sdgu6,democrats
"Well, they're not really silent. They're loud and obnoxious. And they voted for the guy who spearheaded birtherism, so of course they think racism is okay. They're big fans of sexual assault, too. ",Belostoma,e8por0z,democrats
"""Fuck healthcare and infrastructure, life is wonderful as long as we ruin the lives of brown people.""

\- The GOP apparently",RadioMelon,e8pqd9i,democrats
VOTE!!,Stinkymatilda,e8pssp5,democrats
Silent?,eric987235,e8q6joc,democrats
[removed],,e8pq13p,democrats
"That’s the very loud minority. The silent majority are the people who quietly still vote republican and vote for trump. Most would still again saying things like, “Well I don’t like like everything he does but he’s doing a good job with the economy.”",DasFunke,e8q3oki,democrats
"What kind of projecting bullshit is this? One side has actual Literal Self-Proclaimed Nazis.... Guess which one. Speaking of which.... A group of Jewish leaders in Pittsburgh, a city still reeling from the bloody attack on the Tree of Life Synagogue that left 11 people dead, have published an open letter telling President Donald Trump not to come until he denounces white nationalism.",CanderousBossk,e8pt1qh,democrats
"Um, trumpies are now the biggest domestic terror threat.

",VegaThePunisher,e8q1epq,democrats
[removed],,e8pt4yn,democrats
And want they have done with economy will come home to roost by 2020.,therecordcorrected,e8q5lqc,democrats
Wow couldn't even get one huh?,CanderousBossk,e8pt59w,democrats
"/r/democrats does not allow the direct linking to external subreddits without the use of ""np"".  Please use http://np.reddit.com/r/<subreddit> when linking into external subreddits. 

The quickest way to have your content seen is to delete and repost with a corrected link.  

*I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/democrats) if you have any questions or concerns.*",AutoModerator,e8pt4yx,democrats
"Hopefully not, but looks like it. Headed towards a bear market at least",DasFunke,e8q9jka,democrats
"Except Mueller isn't applying for a position. How would such a claim even have anything to do with him releasing his report? Releasing the report isn't a test of his qualifications for one of the most powerful jobs in the land. 

I feel like this wasn't thought out on the part of the person behind it. ",Silverseren,e8qoskw,democrats
"Jesus tap dancing Christ, this is really where we are at as a society? Sexual assault claims are now a political smear tactic. I’m so sorry, ladies, seems as if we have a long, long way to go. ",OldRobTPooner,e8qkmgr,democrats
It's a sad statement that tRump and the GOP will go to any length to discredit Mueller. ,cjheaney,e8qlm9o,democrats
He should ask Kavanaugh how to get through the bullshit. Wonder if he will be Guilty until proven innocent too?,darkvader3771,e8tjeza,democrats
Great article. I (and most other articles so far) have largely overlooked the impacts of Trump's policy approach to domestic terrorism on recent events for the social aspects. I think that this is an important angle.,mcorah,e8pg04g,democrats
"Pennsylvania 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://www.pavoterservices.pa.gov/Pages/PollingPlaceInfo.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8pr1t8,democrats
I think it overlooks the damage  this policy did/does to minority communities even before Trump's cuts,linguistico,e8pgkf5,democrats
Can you be more specific than that? I can't make much out of what you are saying without detail.,mcorah,e8pgo67,democrats
"Sure. Even under Obama funding went disproportionately to minority community groups, particularly Muslims. This funding incentivized soft surveillance of community members by their spiritual and Healthcare service providers, which meant less people in need of help sought it out. 

LA recently voted against this program, and that vote was seen as a success for progressives. For more information you should check out Muslim Justice League, who actively organize against the program. ",linguistico,e8pgxt3,democrats
Let's worry about next Tuesday first. ,backpackwayne,e8rted7,democrats
"Only folks who have impressed me are Kamala Harris and Beto O’Rourke. 
",VegaThePunisher,e8rzama,democrats
"Bernie and either Elizabeth Warren or Nina Turner as veep. We need a true economic left-winger in there if we want the real reforms this country needs, and he's shown the most ability to inspire a large turnout on the left.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e8rwyvt,democrats
"Besides, the 2020 campaign season begins next Wednesday anyway.",hrlngrv,e8rusq3,democrats
"Or better yet, let’s make a plan for maintaining or even expanding the house majority if we win it. If the house switches back in 2020 then it can’t reign in Trump or assist a potential Democratic President, so it’d only be useful for two years.
",Bioman9,e8s99nw,democrats
Fox news would have a field day. 60 percent of America would think he's a commie by election day. ,Gsteel11,e8sgdx6,democrats
"I honestly think him with Warren is asking for a loss, but I agree it's a logical pairing by the powers that be. ",doyoueven-no,e8s3k0w,democrats
"Sure they would. But I think it would fail. Fear of right-wing media attacks shouldn't dictate our nominating process; they called Obama and countless other much more moderate Dems ""socialists"" (and even communists) with a straight face. It is what it is, but if left and left-leaning voters show up, we'll be able to win either way. Bernie's somewhat counter-intuitively got more crossover appeal than most Democrats though, something like 16% of his primary voters.

I also think some of the most vocal ""#NeverBernie"" Dems will be reconsidering their position once the choice of Trump vs. Not Trump shows up in November, just like plenty (not all) of the Bernie or Bust people did. ",OmarIsaiahBetts,e8sp0g8,democrats
"He got more crossover voters in a completely positive news cycle. 

He had a free ride. Trump and Hillary were 99 percent positive about him. 

A general election would not work that way. ",Gsteel11,e8sp95z,democrats
"Remember when being an open racist was bad and people didn't repond with ""that's just your opinion and they can have their opinion, both sides are bad""?

Not sure what America we are going back to ""again""? ",Gsteel11,e8qbtc9,democrats
Fascist playbook. Bombard with bullshit. ,usposeso,e8qmeu6,democrats
"We aren't numb - everyone I know is extremely stressed out and terrified of the future. Articles like this are lazy and dangerous because they feed the already overwhelming sense that we have no power. 

Voter turnout is already breaking records in many places. Hopefully this will continue. People are protesting and speaking out and encouraging others to vote. Aside from civil war, we are doing everything we can to stop this. 

Instead of blaming the victim, perhaps we can admit that the election was stolen in the first place, our country hijacked, and our customs and rules disregarded by a fascist leader and his powerful friends. The fact that we haven't yet been successful at getting control back doesn't mean we aren't trying... it means we may need help overcoming the takeover that has occurred. ",wtf-is-this-bs,e8rqedu,democrats
"Trump supporters and Republicans in office know ***exactly*** what type of ""again"" they want. ",Towns-a-Million,e8qmoh7,democrats
"Lol- at first glance I thought, ""WOW, thats a bit of an extreme reaction to IBM's recent acquisition.""  ",stos313,e8oxonu,democrats
This is your work? It's fantastic.,wenchette,e8ojff5,democrats
Going to be completely honest: for a second I thought I was looking at r/linux and that you were talking about the [acquisition of Red Hat by IBM.](https://www.cnbc.com/2018/10/28/ibm-to-acquire-red-hat-in-deal-valued-at-34-billion.html),NTGuardian,e8pi2f6,democrats
"really clever, im impressed",chakrablocker,e8pfdbc,democrats
Very clever design. Nice work.,CoffeeIceCube,e8pl2ug,democrats
"Santa has a red hat, you maniacs!",FakeRegDunlop,e8p8gum,democrats
I like this design. Could make a cool tshirt or hat. ,Gsteel11,e8orni1,democrats
Brilliant design! Says it all!,jlo1510,e8osl2k,democrats
Lol I though it just said “ Red Hat? Hat Red.”,ElementalIce,e8psxqa,democrats
Awesome design. Reminds me of talking heads true stories ,elbunts,e8pyzv2,democrats
Bravo OP this is fantastic work.,Nomandate,e8q1tbc,democrats
I clicked this thinking of IBM's acquisition of RedHat,GustavoSF3,e8q6r41,democrats
I like it,katgib13,e8orrat,democrats
"Gee, this seems a bit harsh... Redhat isn’t my main distro, but I still like it. ",collectioncard,e8pqagq,democrats
[removed],,e8oowtf,democrats
it took me longer than it should’ve!,eganmay,e8p5m1n,democrats
[removed],,e8pu4n7,democrats
"Nice wordplay, solid work. 

But President Trump supporters aren't filled with hate - or at least the vast majority of us aren't, anyway.",dantepicante,e8ow60c,democrats
[removed],,e8pbrma,democrats
Maybe instead of hatred you should put red hat debate to try and encourage civilised conversations about politics. ,Amirasalam123,e8p2lq7,democrats
"The only problem I could see with this is redhats being like “see they say right here that they hate us!!1!!1!one!”

They would be wrong but they love to twist shit",Anovan,e8ox7p5,democrats
[removed],,e8okyvb,democrats
That was my impression of it as well. I’m tired of the meme posts here. ,iwascompromised,e8ozx8c,democrats
"Yep, all yours now ;) ",Artgod,e8ojmm5,democrats
Poor Redhat... ,LukariBRo,e8pibzi,democrats
then my work is done. ,Artgod,e8q5n1q,democrats
Blue hats. ,Artgod,e8osk8f,democrats
"Well, I am a product of the 80’s so..... subliminal maybe. ",Artgod,e8q029z,democrats
"/r/democrats does not allow the direct linking to external subreddits without the use of ""np"".  Please use http://np.reddit.com/r/<subreddit> when linking into external subreddits. 

The quickest way to have your content seen is to delete and repost with a corrected link.  

*I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/democrats) if you have any questions or concerns.*",AutoModerator,e8ooww3,democrats
How can people still attempt to bothsides anything when the right wing is sending bombs and shooting up synagogues? Disgusting.,killxswitch,e8q2152,democrats
Yep that's what happens when one side decides that hatred trumps all.,Nomandate,e8q1wl7,democrats
[removed],,e8pwr7k,democrats
"The overall effect is still the same even if there are individual members of the group aren’t all of the exact same mindset. 

If you aren’t hateful, you should ask yourself why you’re comfortable aligning politically with literal nazis and the KKK. ",Anovan,e8ox51g,democrats
"Bring a Trump supporter means that you're willing to accept blatant racism (among other things) in exchange for your tax cut. 

Red hat = Hatred. ",cricketsymphony,e8pgvy7,democrats
There is no debating people who live in an alternate reality.  They will just scream fake news when challenged. ,azmodan72,e8p342k,democrats
"We've tried that for *a while* now.  Every single time, they refused to honestly debate, spat right in our collective eye, and called it a ""victory"".  At this point, there's no reason to keep trying if the redcaps are just going to keep acting like spoiled, sociopathic *toddlers*.",TrashJack42,e8p4xki,democrats
"Yes, but this is representative artwork used to express an emotion or opinion and not an attempt to encapsulate perfect truth.

In my opinion, it is a jumping off point for discussion, entirely in line with your desire for discourse.",catttttts,e8pij5u,democrats
"I guess, but the thought was that if you wear a red hat you’re passive against, or represent hatred. ",Artgod,e8oxv0u,democrats
We should spend zero minutes worrying about what will offend the insane right.,killxswitch,e8q257h,democrats
"Lol, this doesn't look like their logo to me and being on a political website, I doubt they would do anything.

They would be SUPER BUSY if they're chasing down every ""red hat""meme and logo. ",Gsteel11,e8omei3,democrats
"This is not a meme, it’s original art.  ",Artgod,e8p5a35,democrats
"Excellent. I had a similar thought just after the ‘16 election. The unfortunate counter to Hillary‘s outstanding “Love Trumps Hate“ slogan is:

“Trump Loves Hate”",WeHaSaulFan,e8oxc0q,democrats
I was thinking gray... but blue could work too. ,Gsteel11,e8osl6d,democrats
[removed],,e8pws8s,democrats
"Yeah, all 200 of them.

Listen: I'm about to head out for the night so I can't really go into the diatribe I'd like to, but suffice it to say that you have been lied to. You've been tricked. President Trump is not racist and it's pretty ridiculous to claim that he is. He has enacted no racist policies. His supporters I've talked to online and in person are not racist. The_Donald is not a racist subreddit - we have patriots of every color and we love them all.

I know you don't believe me, and it *sucks*. I was a hardcore democrat not three years ago and I really get that you feel like you're certain of what's what. And I know that I probably won't be able to convince you or anyone here that the world view you've got isn't objectively accurate. I'd only ask that you try to keep an open mind and check out the other side for yourself. Subscribe to and read the_donald and see if it matches your expectations. ",dantepicante,e8oymi8,democrats
[removed],,e8ph6p9,democrats
You know that is the same thing Republicans are saying about democrats right? ,Amirasalam123,e8p36h4,democrats
Have you tried being friends with a republican? Maybe that would help you understand their point of view more? ,Amirasalam123,e8p5am9,democrats
This person is making arguments in bad faith.,Basalit-an,e8pm0ht,democrats
I meant more they would try to use it against us but you right lol,Anovan,e8q2j8w,democrats
Grey is the better design choice but blue is the better political one. ,Artgod,e8ot71c,democrats
[removed],,e8pwyfu,democrats
"It’s sad to hear someone who’s principles are so malleable they can claim to be a ‘hardcore democrat 3 years ago’ and support Trump. If you are capable of this you have no principles, there is literally no common ground. There might have been at one point before he went full ultra right wing. ",Boomslangalang,e8q08dy,democrats
"I have read it and it does match my expectations. I have checked out the “other side” and have found it to be a cesspool of the absolute worst American humanity has to offer. 

You’re fooling no one here, bud. ",Anovan,e8p2i38,democrats
"- Charleston, bad people on both sides

- Mexicans sending rapists

- ""Globalist"" dog whistle

- Muslim ban

- Bannon in cabinet, see Breitbart work

- Obsession with radical Islamic terror, ignorance of far more threatening domestic terror perpetrated by white men",cricketsymphony,e8pislx,democrats
Democrats don't go running around saying FAKE news..   We are way more open minded than republicans. ,azmodan72,e8p3ili,democrats
"Most of us have Trump supporters in our family. We've tried to understand their viewpoints. The issue is that they don't acknowledge facts, science, or history. Tribalism like that can't be reasoned with. ",cricketsymphony,e8pgzcs,democrats
"Their viewpoints are painfully transparent, you seem to be misunderstanding the point. Or maybe you're just being flat out disingenuous.",Basalit-an,e8plwxc,democrats
If they don't use this it'll be something else.  No use concerning ourselves with that type of thinking.,killxswitch,e8q2xpy,democrats
[removed],,e8px8l4,democrats
[removed],,e8pxzcv,democrats
[deleted],,e8px0s2,democrats
"Back then I bought into a lot of the propaganda that I believe the vast majority of democrats believe. The simple and ugly truth is that the majority of democrat politicians and the corporate media supporting them straight-up lie to you constantly. They create a false version of reality that truly feels real but has no semblance to objective reality. My suggestion to you would be to do a lot of research on cognitive biases and the history of propaganda, starting with Edward Bernays and working up to modern astroturfing and COINTELPRO techniques, and then try to figure out how those techniques may have influenced you throughout your life.",dantepicante,e8q2dam,democrats
Can you pick one thing off the current front page that you find to be indicative of that cesspool? ,dantepicante,e8pbk7x,democrats
"* Illegal migrants do create trouble, that is the issue he was addressing, illegal immigration. This was around the time of  the rape of a local American woman by an illegal boarder crosser. You’re paraphrasing and misinterpreting a paragraph long quote which has been and continues to be spewed across extremely biased media outlets. 
* How is viewing your country as priority wrong? I don’t agree with a lot of what he does economically or environmentally but it has nothing to do with racism. I can come up with numerous other countries who reject globalism but are definitely far from racist and would never be called racist. 
* Islam is an incredibly dangerous religion, it invites hatred and violence which we have seen carried out across the globe. If you’ve ever read through their literature, it’s quite telling. Democrats like to blame guns for the amount of gun violence but don’t like to blame the religion affiliated with the major acts of terrorism occurring worldwide. Not to mention their ideologies completely go against Western principles. If you care about women’s rights, the civilized way we live today, church separate from state, and basically the foundation of what the west has been built on -do not embrace a religion thats goal is to take eradicate anything that does not follow the Quran. 
* There is no way domestic terror that happens to be carried out by white men in a majority white country -is a bigger threat than Islamic terrorism which has been the cause of the largest number of American fatalities on US soil. That is utterly delusional and I’m absolutely speechless in terms of responding to that statement. 

Let me remind you that religion is NOT race. ",,e8pl1jk,democrats
Really because I have a list of reddit communities that I have been banned from because I have asked the exact same question that a republican would ask and I am NOT a republican. When I asked these questions I was respectful and I did not call anyone a name. ,Amirasalam123,e8p3uzg,democrats
Are you able to get along with them. You should be careful about making generalizations about a certain group of people ,Amirasalam123,e8ph6ji,democrats
[removed],,e8pxd1m,democrats
[removed],,e8px3yq,democrats
Thanks for the lesson in manipulation. I’m quite familiar with this. I think you need to rethink your positions. You believe you have been lied to and this makes you support Trump. I’m sorry I call bullshit and restate you’re ‘principles’ are so malleable they might as well not exist. ,Boomslangalang,e8q3q9b,democrats
Not gonna happen debate-troll.,Basalit-an,e8pm29l,democrats
"- A single instance of a migrant raping a woman does not justify a presidential candidate painting them with that brush. That's divisive and hateful rhetoric. Imagine Eisenhower, Kennedy, Carter, Reagan or George HW using that language. Trump is not only a racist, he's a disgrace to the office. 

- Globalist: https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2018/03/the-origins-of-the-globalist-slur/555479/

- Fundamentalist/Radical Islam is indeed dangerous. However Trump doesn't have the oratory skill (to say the least) to communicate the difference. He's using Muslims as a bogey-man to rile up his base. Islam is the largest religion on Earth, perhaps we'd be wise to learn to see the other side of the coin, and build bridges. I've never heard him mention the countless Muslim charities that support Americans in times of tragedy. Instead, we hear about how Muslims were celebrating in the streets as the twin towers fell, a simply untrue story that he spread. 

- Regarding domestic vs Islamic terror, just pull up the stats. From 2008-2016 there have been twice as many terrorist killings involving white-supremacists as there were involving Muslims. Granted this is post-9/11 data, but I still think domestic terror deserves a mention. There are many additional domestic mass-shootings which (for some reason) don't qualify as terrorist attacks. Lastly, look into the leniency granted to whites vs Muslims in violent crimes. 

https://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/americas/us-politics/terrorism-right-wing-america-muslims-islam-white-supremacists-study-a7805831.html

- Congrats, race isn't religion, aren't you smart. So if you like, we can instead call Trump an Islamophobe, a bigot, AND a racist. I don't care to belabor the semantics, but many Jews out there may disagree with you on whether religious discrimination is indeed a form of racism.",cricketsymphony,e8pr5e4,democrats
"If by 'getting along' you mean remaining cordial, yes.

Don't act like Democrats are the ones who have forgotten how to be civil.

Our dear leader is the one who slanders his opponents in public, using schoolyard nicknames and making light of disabilities (to name a few of his many tactics). ",cricketsymphony,e8piy3r,democrats
[removed],,e8pxq8f,democrats
"If you can't see the constant overwhelming onslaught of propaganda that's been targetting President Trump since his nomination, then you are not as familiar with manipulation as you believe yourself to be.

I've maintained the same values and principles I've always had since making my \#walkaway. The thing that changed is that I started researching stuff on my own, and doing my own thinking, and I came to the conclusion that democrat policies typically make problems worse, not better. More government means more centralized power means more corruption.

Edit: typo",dantepicante,e8q4t8a,democrats
I'm not trolling. The_Donald is not a hateful subreddit and I want you people here to understand that. ,dantepicante,e8pwcrb,democrats
"I have to give you points for audacity. But don’t insult our intelligence. You rail against ‘propaganda’ but cite walkaway, a well researched and known foreign propaganda campaign. No one in their right mind making the arguments you’re making would do that unless they had an agenda. You have no credibility. You’re shady my friend. Incredibly shady. I guess account age is no longer a reliable indicator of fake on here anymore. 

Edit: fuck you are in deep, and a total liar. No way in hell you were ever a Democrat. Please. You can’t espouse the extremist right wing views you do with such glee without having a screw loose or more likely a fake. ",Boomslangalang,e8q5chz,democrats
"""you people""",Anovan,e8pywpi,democrats
">I have to give you points for audacity. But don’t insult our intelligence. You rail against ‘propaganda’ but cite walkaway, a well researched and known foreign propaganda campaign.

It was started by a gay New York hairdresser. There was a\#walkaway march last weekend with thousands of people in attendance. Are you under the impression that they were all Russian bots? Do your own research, don't just read an article that says ""walkaway is a foreign influence campaign!"" and blindly believe it. 

> No one in their right mind making the arguments you’re making would do that unless they had an agenda. You have no credibility. You’re shady my friend. Incredibly shady. I guess account age is no longer a reliable indicator of fake on here anymore. 

I do have an agenda. I want to help you folks see that the other side isn't bad. President Trump is not an evil man
He is not racist. He wants what's best for America and its citizens. The irrational hatred of him and his supporters was programmed into people by way of emotionally manipulative propaganda in both social and legacy media. It pains me to see so many people who can't see how manipulated their opinions and world views are. 

>Edit: fuck you are in deep, and a total liar. You can’t go from Dem to extremist right wing nut job without having a screw loose or equally likely a fake. 

I am not an extremist nor am I a nut job. 
",dantepicante,e8q67jd,democrats
"""you people here"" as in the folks who frequent this subreddit, ostensibly democrats..",dantepicante,e8q1r09,democrats
"You are one of two things: 

A person who holds extreme right wing views espousing well established foreign propaganda (ironic). If this is the case, own it don’t duck around with this bogus backstory. 

You’re an agent. 

There’s not much difference anymore but both are toxic to the principles and values of America. 

I have no more time for you. Happy propagandizing. 
",Boomslangalang,e8q7e2m,democrats
"Literally no one is falling for your BS, dude. Just leave.",Anovan,e8q2ki9,democrats
"What foreign propaganda am I allegedly espousong, exactly? What are the American principles and values to which you believe I represent toxicity? What I've told you about myself is 100% true. ",dantepicante,e8q7lw1,democrats
"No bullshit. I'm speaking from the heart, friend. ",dantepicante,e8q328f,democrats
k bye,Anovan,e8q4zg0,democrats
[removed],,e8nxvzy,democrats
[removed],,e8nzb4f,democrats
"Well you know, 2 short years ago, more than half the voters chose her...",jello-kittu,e8nypl5,democrats
At least she's out there doing good. What are you and I doing but fooling around on Reddit? ,cheebear12,e8o21rh,democrats
"Nope, you are the root cause. Thanks asshole.",cheebear12,e8o276e,democrats
[removed],,e8o0qiq,democrats
When the election is between two of the most unpopular candidates in modern history thats not a huge achievement. She failed to energize the democratic base and a lot of those votes were just people holding their nose and voting against trump,Arcanas1221,e8o0e8n,democrats
That's the real problem right there. ,jello-kittu,e8o1qae,democrats
"Stop believing what the GOP is selling. She won the popular vote. She is not and was not that unpopular with Democrats. She was reviled by the GOP, who correctly identified her during Bill Clinton's presidency as a future big hitter. So they pushed every hate identifier they could. The so called Bernie Bros may have held some anger, but when don't they? (And I voted for him in the primary. Then happily voted for her in the main election, thanks.)",jello-kittu,e8o1owa,democrats
">On Saturday morning, Abrams closed by reminding the crowd of Kemp’s views on democracy. “He said he is concerned that if everyone eligible to vote in Georgia does so, he will lose this election,” she said. “Let’s prove him right.” In a week, American voters can do to white nationalists what they fear most. Show them they’re being replaced.",Front_Sale,e8re7um,democrats
"Yup.

Nice is for Michelle Obama. Not voters.
",VegaThePunisher,e8ronoo,democrats
"The campaign is in need, whatever people can throw her way. ( https://secure.actblue.com/contribute/page/jr_fr-match ) Here is today's campaign update:

This news could sink our campaign:

Mitch McConnell just dumped ANOTHER $2 MILLION into new attack ads to defeat us in Nevada and keep his grip on the Senate majority.

That's why I'm about to walk into an emergency finance meeting with my team – we're making final decisions about the last week of this campaign, and the reality is, pulling back anywhere right now could ruin our chance to take back the Senate for Democrats. 

This moment couldn't be more important: Nevadans are already voting, early-voter turnout is high and we have a clear path to Senate control. But right now, the GOP is going ALL-IN to defeat us, and we're falling short of our final end-of-month goal to fund our ads and keep turnout high in the last week of this race.

Senate control and the future of the Supreme Court are on the line, and the polls show us within 1 point. A group of donors is matching all gifts up to our $200,000 end-of-month match goal to win in Nevada, but time is running out and you're our only hope: Please, will you rush every dollar you can – and have it DOUBLED – to fight back against the GOP, win in Nevada and take back the Senate for Democrats?

Thank you so much, 

Jacky


https://secure.actblue.com/contribute/page/jr_fr-match
",skepticalspectacle1,e8qgrzt,democrats
"In one way, I completely agree. In another, I completely disagree.

Healthcare should be the #1 item. Not even close, it's by far the most important issue to the highest number people this election. That being said, you're right. ""Preserving Obamacare"" and similar centrist ideas just don't land as invigorating messages. That's why you need to embrace bold agenda items like Medicare For All, which covers everyone, net saves the American people money, and is the smarter plan in terms of both politics AND policy. It sounds good plus it actually IS good, which is the pre-requisite for a campaign centerpiece.

A lot of the Democrats really don't know how to fight, and do capitulate to right-wing framework of a lot of ideas. That's unfortunate, but I don't want the focus coming off of what I believe is a winning issue like healthcare. I think this is something that impacts a high number of people, and it just needs to be packaged in a more confident and intelligent way.

But you HAVE to be ""for"" something. You can't just be ""against"" the Republicans. We saw how well that anti-Trump strategy worked in 2016, when 75% or more of Hillary's ads hit Trump instead of propping herself up. I know a lot of that is because she's inherently not very likable, but we've seen that pathetic incrementalist strategy lose us 1000 seats since Obama's election. It's time for a real change.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e8rmy5w,democrats
"Sure new account!

",Stupidiseverywhere,e8rkdf5,democrats
"Fuckin' A we don't.  And haven't.

Trump is an unelected, insurgent traitor.
",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8pl7pt,democrats
*sweats in Brazilian*,MrAms1204,e8q4wcs,democrats
"Yo Mark, look up “irony.”",Sick0fThisShit,e8q3t87,democrats
Who’s Mark? None of the Marks I know said this. ,danimal6000,e8q1yw9,democrats
More people didn't vote for him than did. It's even safe to say more people voted Against him than for him. Like the election was stolen again.... Even aside from the 10thousand interactions with Russians that everyone from the campaign keeps getting caught lying about,CanderousBossk,e8pt7gn,democrats
"He has no right to this blatant attack on the constitution.

If he signs this it is immediately an impeach and remove offense on its own merit.  So severe an offense that if the House votes to impeach and Republican Senate fails to ratify it the House would then be fully within their rights to impeach ALL senators voting against the ratification for violation of their own oaths to defend the Constitution, file a s second impeachment motion on the President and remove them all.

This is so severe an attack on the Constitution that the Secret Service agents in the room as he signs the executive order would be fully obligated to honor their oath to defend the constitution and put a bullet in the fucker's head on the spot.

We'll see which one comes to pass, but more likely than not Trump's just blowing wind out his ass to please his base.",AkiTendo,e8pyip0,democrats
A reminder that his knowledge of the Constitution is only the 2nd and 5th Amendments.,Franklin-B-Johnson,e8q220j,democrats
Can we please not get distracted by this obvious distraction?,eric987235,e8q6lii,democrats
Stop calling him Trump; he works for Putin.,mad-n-fla,e8q4afl,democrats
Built into the constitution much that phantom middle class tax break just some pre mid term hot air to distract from him failing as any kind of moral leader after the weekends tragedies ,bergerac121,e8q8flg,democrats
"You wouldn't need a personal form of telling the truth if you just, you know, told the truth. ",doyoueven-no,e8qtsud,democrats
So lying president then.,mad-n-fla,e8vld8e,democrats
"Maybe, just maybe, its cuz they want the help?",Stupidiseverywhere,e8qe7a0,democrats
They need help because we reject archaic WASP ideals. ,Essential_tranquilo,e8qi7s9,democrats
Momentum means nothing. Go vote!,captnspock,e8qlodg,democrats
"Suggests?   Tell him we don’t want you here!! 

All he’s going to do is make it all about himself... put down the media, the victims, and just for a moment sound like a robot and read off a TelePrompter... and then spew more hatred. 

Tell him we don’t want you here. And be done with it. ",ChangingFiveHundred,e8pmnaj,democrats
Let him come but send no one to meet him. Let him roll up to an empty tarmac. ,katgib13,e8q4fu4,democrats
"Stop suggesting.

Tell the Nazi fuck he's not welcome.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8pq5dl,democrats
She is delusional. ,red_carpet_hero,e8ti8a8,democrats
">Georgia Democrats announced Monday that President Obama will host a Get Out the Vote rally in Atlanta on November 2 at the Forbes Arena at Morehouse College.
",wenchette,e8or6q1,democrats
"Georgia 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](http://elections.sos.ga.gov/Elections/advancedVotingInfo.do): October 15-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://www.mvp.sos.ga.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8ppob8,democrats
I sure hope turnout will overwhelm the GOP voter suppression tactics.  ,GlobeTrott3r,e8pqj55,democrats
What do you expect from that televised Klan meeting?,Stupidiseverywhere,e8ozpqq,democrats
"It's nonsense, spouting nonsense. The sheeple at this point do not even realize what faux is shoveling in their faces.",unknownclient78,e8pawnq,democrats
What does that even mean?,kerryfinchelhillary,e8p8c5d,democrats
"Unfortunately, there are some people dumb enough to believe this!",jamalwhite70,e8q6jzd,democrats
Sayoc seems far more diverse in his willingness to harm others. He did seem to send pipe bombs to white Christians too.,hrlngrv,e8mov14,democrats
Well if it were Isis then Trump would blame Obama and Hillary. ,_manoftheyear_,e8n2xwm,democrats
Because white supremacy.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8mr1wf,democrats
"Because in the eyes Trump and his supporters white supremacists are not considered terrorists, rather just misunderstood American patriots. ",red_carpet_hero,e8mlp1x,democrats
"Because the perpetrators are white. 

Didn't ya know -- Only brown people are ""bad hombres""",Sunnysunflowers1112,e8n327c,democrats
"New York 2018 Election 

[General Election Date](https://voterlookup.elections.state.ny.us/votersearch.aspx): November 6, 2018",election_info_bot,e8mp7i2,democrats
Because that’s what dump wants to be happening.,joaniemansoosie,e8mklop,democrats
"Shooting in grocery stores? Fuck, did I miss something that happened?",eric987235,e8n328b,democrats
"Forget isis. Imagine if they were Americans of Mexican descent. Or Muslim descent, or any other shade of brown. ",SheHartLiss,e8n6i91,democrats
"Because white supremacists have a get out of jail, mental illness, card. And always will",ArmaniDiamonds,e8n3ld9,democrats
Because that's their base... attacking their enemies. It's mind numbingly simple.,SwegSmeg,e8nikdz,democrats
Because they’re racists,Avatar_Yung-Thug,e8nmqsb,democrats
"Dems should run on getting tough on right wing domestic terrorism and conspiracists (Q).

They are the number 1 terrorist threat to the u.s. ",eldungeon,e8n4x10,democrats
"I think a big difference is that these people aren’t really apart of an organization like isis. 

Also, Islamic terrorism does happen in the United States.

What response do you think is called for? I feel like this is vague rhetoric that doesn’t clearly define the problem or propose a solution to it. ",phantomupload,e8n8va9,democrats
"Well, ISIS would have sent bombs that explode.  Gotta give them credit there.  Yes, the warmongers would have been sexually aroused just thinking about all the potential money they would make.  Thankfully, McCain is dead, and he was usually the one leading the push for any war he could start.  ",housecalls247,e8n4hlt,democrats
I call him dump with a lowercase d cause he’s lower then a piece of shit to me.,joaniemansoosie,e8pkspx,democrats
This is the kind of progressive leadership we need!,BrodyLoren,e8n60w8,democrats
"Powerfully poignant.

I am continually impressed with this woman.
",keyboard_jedi,e8n9ohd,democrats
"Because some of them are ''good people""",Anonyhippopotamus,e8ncaka,democrats
it was.  vanilla isis = republican party,IIllIIllIlllI,e8nvzce,democrats
"So that locked reddit post above this one (about Hillary's advice), good going guys I heard the term ""Bernie bros"" still being used in a that thread as the hard-cores were defending the scarecrow. Enjoy losing the 2020 election. From: a left leaning centrist living in a purple state. Maybe don't be so brittle next time one of these posts reach ""all.""",PuffTheMagicBoy,e8oqyti,democrats
Aren't the perpetrators being treated like the criminals they are by the rules set forth by the system we have? I don't think we need to be treating the perpetrators like anything other than criminals or seeking extra judicial punishments.,jamesdanton,e8p1sba,democrats
So true. Dare I say plain as black and white,elbunts,e8pz2pq,democrats
She's not wrong.   She's got a great point there.,smeagolheart,e8nernr,democrats
Lets stop holding groups accountable for the actions of individuals.,ACannabisConnoisseur,e8nlsl0,democrats
"Because McVeigh scared the government.

When Dems get in power, they need to unleash a big fat can of whoopass. A few more Wacos. A whole COINTELPRO op. Do them as they've done us.

Any sort of standoff nonsense should be ended with the utmost brutality.",Disabledsnarker,e8n7jlz,democrats
"Well you have to remember that in the eyes of a mentally-unwell racist terrorist, whites who disagree can be seen as just as bad or worse than the ""inferior races."" Hence why terms like ""n*****-lover"" exist.",AmericanFatty,e8n87rg,democrats
"I mean Obama is a Kenyan born Muslim extremist and Hillary is a demonic usurper of souls who on the side runs child sex rings in the basements of Comet Pizzas’.. which don’t actually have basements, but that’s just how hardcore her demon powers are.   If Obama’s Muslim brethren were involved with these recent events as well.. that would just be the end of it.  DEFCON 5.  ",tking191919,e8n7n4j,democrats
Because brown-people hate.,chandaliergalaxy,e8ns7j5,democrats
"They like to use the term ""troubled individuals"". ",TheFatMan2200,e8nor35,democrats
That's the best explanation I've heard yet......👏,clonedspork,e8novpx,democrats
*drumpf,playsroguealot,e8nb8j1,democrats
">A white man who allegedly killed two people at a Kroger grocery store in Kentucky tried to enter a predominantly black church nearby minutes before the fatal shooting, police said.

>The two people killed Wednesday -- Maurice Stallard and Vickie Jones -- were shot in the grocery store and the parking lot, respectively. CNN affiliate WDRBdescribed both victims as black.


[Man who killed 2 at Kroger tried to enter a predominantly black church minutes earlier, police say](https://www-m.cnn.com/2018/10/26/us/kentucky-kroger-shooting/index.html)
",pgm_01,e8n48uf,democrats
"Dude wanted to be the next guy to shoot up a black church, but he had to settle for to random people minding their own business at a grocery store.

How fucking horrible. ",up48,e8n6oul,democrats
"they are part of an organization - the klan or white boys or nazis or an evangelical church or the republican party, etc.

we send traitors and terrorists to prison or the grave.  that's always been the solution.",IIllIIllIlllI,e8nwafe,democrats
"Only sane comment in this thread^

How do you safeguard against these people when there isn't even a single unifying organization they are a part of? The question this post poses is incredibly loaded and implies that the groups in question are similar, when that doesn't appear to be the case at all.",oneinchterror,e8nd5k7,democrats
Fine. They are part of WSUSE... the Western State of the US and Europe. Does that give you the structured framework you need to draw a comparison?,Braerian,e8nj04k,democrats
[My favorite beach boys song.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=o-zoPgv_nYg),up48,e8n6tfv,democrats
Was Sayoc confirmed as a white supremacist? ,TheEnsRealissimum,e8oqlqb,democrats
"But remember ,they're also completely impotent as leaders and let other countries walk all over them and lack the energy to be president.",kurisu7885,e8ne7cr,democrats
You forgot to mention Benghazi. 8/10,poliscijunki,e8n9659,democrats
"Always had problems with calling him a Kenyan Muslim while they were slamming him for something that Chicago preacher said in the non-Muslim church he attended. 

Someone will downvote me - but they are stupid and gullible and just looking for a reason to hate non-white Christians - ",docinlft,e8nr401,democrats
Thank you.,red_carpet_hero,e8nwuzv,democrats
tRump.,IIllIIllIlllI,e8nvzp7,democrats
They should have played that at bitter old McCain’s funeral.  ,housecalls247,e8nptuv,democrats
A) what the fuck does that have to do with what we were talking about.  And b) go back to your own corner ,tking191919,e8neia3,democrats
"I wasn't being serious but it's the kind of weird double logic they use.

According to them Hillary is a criminal mastermind but also totally incompetent as a leader and Obama was a wannabe dictator but also a total wuss.

The enemy has to be both a real threat and easy to beat.",kurisu7885,e8nel6g,democrats
"Oh ok my bad, I get what you’re saying.  Good points too ",tking191919,e8nfdnv,democrats
"It's ok, Poe's law and all that mess.",kurisu7885,e8nngnh,democrats
"In other news grass is green, water is wet, McConnel is a turtle...",AkiTendo,e8odokv,democrats
"Over the past few decades, both Democrats and Republicans in Congress have moved away from the center. But the Republican Party has moved towards the extreme much more quickly -- a trend that political scientists’ call “asymmetrical polarization.”

That asymmetry poses a major obstacle in American politics. As Republicans have become more ideological, they’ve also become less willing to work with Democrats: filibustering Democratic legislation, refusing to consider Democratic appointees, and even shutting down the government in order to force Democrats to give in to their demands. 

Democrats have responded in turn, becoming more obstructionist as Republican demands become more extreme. 

And that’s made it really easy for media outlets to blame “both sides” for political gridlock. As political scientists Thomas Mann and Norm Ornstein explain in their book “It’s Even Worse Than It Looks,” journalists feel a pressure to remain neutral when covering big political fights. So politics coverage has been dominated by the myth that both parties are equally to blame for the gridlock in DC. 

But they’re not. And the only way to stop Republicans in Congress from continuing their drift towards the extreme is to be brutally honest about who’s responsible for breaking our politics.",PeteWenzel,e8nyi1x,democrats
Obama broke them. They simply had a meltdown and lost track of reality. ,Gsteel11,e8o4ig9,democrats
Which is truly amazing because the dude went out of his way to calmly explain himself at every opportunity.,maikuxblade,e8ppwzk,democrats
Get em Jimmy,Stupidiseverywhere,e8o6i08,democrats
That man is amazing. He’s past what 90 (?) and still has all of his mental faculties and lives a very active life. I hope I’m in as good shape when I’m that old. ,mbkthrowaway,e8o729q,democrats
"I wasn’t really paying attention to this race. I was completely unaware that he was overseeing an election that he was running in until about 3 weeks ago. 

I know the occurrence is rare that the secretary of a state decides to run for Governor while still holding that that office and I would understand why they would have never passed a law to prohibit that from happening but I still was surprised. 

Even if it was a human who had the most integrity of any human on earth or all of mankind and had never lied and always been forthcoming and transparent about everything and they won, some of those doubts would never disappear for their entire term and probably stay with them for the rest of their career. 

Let’s let the QB also be the referee in the game. I’m sure it’s going to be completely fair and free. 

It shouldn’t take a former President to write you a letter to make that request. Politics are a different game, but on a main stage with the highest position in elected state office as the stakes, you have to show at least a little bit of an attempt to show you’re a leader that can do the right thing and fight on a level playing field without having to be asked. ",SirJohnnyS,e8ovhfi,democrats
"Pennsylvania 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://www.pavoterservices.pa.gov/Pages/PollingPlaceInfo.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8plyfh,democrats
[removed],,e8plzdq,democrats
"Did he also mention he likes hanging with the racists and bigots that hang in that filth sub called TD? You know the one, where only the vile hang?",therecordcorrected,e8pm36u,democrats
[removed],,e8pm65d,democrats
"Yes, because he wasn't anti-semitic enough. Not anti-semitic, just not **enough**. Were you raised a racist/bigot/white supremacist by your mother or would she be disappointed to know what sub you crawl through the filth in?",therecordcorrected,e8pmad4,democrats
[removed],,e8pmi92,democrats
"He’s one of yours, trumpie",VegaThePunisher,e8q495e,democrats
https://lawandcrime.com/high-profile/alleged-synagogue-shooter-robert-bowers-endorsed-gop-talking-point-that-jewish-groups-funded-migrant-caravan/,Stupidiseverywhere,e8px88d,democrats
So raised that way then?,therecordcorrected,e8q2pvq,democrats
[removed],,e8q697b,democrats
You are a lying racist. Go back to your sewer sub.,therecordcorrected,e8q6x0u,democrats
"What the actual fuck are you talking about? 

Keep holding the wool over your own eyes then.",Stupidiseverywhere,e8q7gsk,democrats
Lowlifes ,Stupidiseverywhere,e8ojdz2,democrats
"Texans will be armed...

The GOP has no idea what happens when you piss off Texans.",mad-n-fla,e8vlt2r,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8pmkrx,democrats
The GOP is a false flag for the KGB.,mad-n-fla,e8vloxn,democrats
"What do some people expect, to put armed guards in front of every building?",kerryfinchelhillary,e8oqome,democrats
"So a radical person(s) went and shot up a place and we should be outraged that people died. I just wish people were just as outraged about San Bernardino. Both have to do with extremist views and both were targeting a narrative in the news paper.

Yes, everyone is against illegal gun ownership, however that does not make it harder for law abiding citizens to have the ability to protect themselves. ",iwilleatyoursand,e8nup8c,democrats
"Why not try it, at least? I'm not going to be pulling anything that's going to get me shot and even if I'm not, if one of these guards says to lie down and not move, guess what I'm doing?",jamesdanton,e8p1zz2,democrats
Sooo you are saying we should just keep guns from people who are not law abiding?,elbunts,e8pz7o2,democrats
And I thought it was bad when two black guys got accidentally ARRESTED at a Starbucks. Armed guards would have been much safer,elbunts,e8pzcbd,democrats
What do you think was accidental about the arrest?,jamesdanton,e8rbzyd,democrats
"They have one advantage, which is that they are highly organized and motivated and the opposition party isn’t. Democrats have to get their act together and get their people motivated to vote.",mbkthrowaway,e8mydvv,democrats
And do you know why? MONEY.,kHartos,e8nuxj6,democrats
CNN...,Nikolay_Milenkov,e91dyug,democrats
"""Without spine""...nonsense.  The GOP is more brazen than it's ever been.  Republicans want America dead so they can piss on its grave and proudly fly their Confederate and Nazi flags.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8n4qow,democrats
That's what I see as one of our biggest disadvantages.  I volunteered for Obama's 2008 campaign and it was so much better organized.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8p83ti,democrats
"Democrats are highly motivated and organized and solid. The Left as a whole, liberals, leftist Libertarians, Greens, Socialists, Independents, etc. are not. The Right will always vote as a bloc as long as they can stick together on the main issues ( God, Guns, and Gays). The Left generally doesn't agree with ""lesser of two evils"" like Hillary. They wont debase themselves and be amoral hypocrites to win like the Right with Trump. There isn't a simple solution like ""getting people motivated"" when no one agrees on any issue. It's also been this way since at least the 1800s and you can trace it through major events like the Civil War where the progressives had major infighting and WW2 in Germany when communists and socialists fought among eachother as Hitler killed their leaders.",DumpOldRant,e8n522z,democrats
People won’t vote until gerrymandering is fixed,RecallRethuglicans,e8n849t,democrats
Some of em used to have values but they dripped em to support trump. The final ethics died with John McCain it seems like,CanderousBossk,e8nm8dk,democrats
I don’t think it’s a coincidence that he was a community organizer prior to becoming the president with the most votes in history. He knows a thing or two about how to get Democrats out the vote.,mbkthrowaway,e8p88nx,democrats
Very well said. Rolling into Pittsburg to rally his supporters is obscene.,gousey,e8nntaw,democrats
"He's a modern Nazi. He will *never* denounce white nationalism and other hateful views. It's also specifically what his base wants, the hate rhetoric. If he denounces it he's toast and he knows it.",vkashen,e8nqwni,democrats
Wishful thinking. Trumpism is BUILT on white nationalism.,ULRB90,e8o10as,democrats
"That's the right thing to say, but I know he won't denounce it and will try to show up anyway.",kerryfinchelhillary,e8oq7r1,democrats
[removed],,e8nr21f,democrats
"Yes, it is right. You are clearly ignoring how he handled that situation. You are taking one quote that he was told to say, and backtracked it immediately (and his supporters all loudly proclaimed that they knew that statement was BS in case you are ignoring that part). Stop pretending he has a hint of decency to support your own ideology, you're not fooling anyone.",vkashen,e8nr5st,democrats
"Hahahaha

https://www.businessinsider.com/trump-regrets-charlottesville-both-sides-speech-bob-woodward-says-2018-9",goodstorydan,e8nr99j,democrats
"Ohio 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://www.sos.state.oh.us/globalassets/elections/forms/11-a_english.pdf): November 6, 2018 

[Check your registration](https://voterlookup.sos.state.oh.us/voterlookup.aspx) 

",election_info_bot,e8pqxj0,democrats
[removed],,e8ocw25,democrats
[deleted],,e8oe1ch,democrats
[removed],,e8p2xr6,democrats
[deleted],,e8p33qv,democrats
"Seriously fuck this lying bitch also.  They all need to be in a prison cell for what they’ve done to this country. 

Every day I say to myself they can’t go any lower... and every fucking day they prove me wrong. 

Seriously what’s next??  How can they top this now?? ",ChangingFiveHundred,e8ovsbn,democrats
Special place waiting in hell for this one.,backpackwayne,e8ovwdi,democrats
And her father as well. ,red_carpet_hero,e8p6peq,democrats
"Ugh, her father.  He's one of the craziest people in politics these days.",kerryfinchelhillary,e8p8mq8,democrats
They will create an eighth layer of hell just for him.,backpackwayne,e8pk485,democrats
"I don’t know how the man finds the motivation to keep trying after liberals basically laid an egg in 2016 and handed all three levels of government to the same people who spent 8 years trying to destroy his presidency. I don’t know how he doesn’t just say, “fuck it” and just enjoys his money. He’s a special individual that’s for sure. ",mbkthrowaway,e8odqat,democrats
"President Lyndon B. Johnson once said, ""If you can convince the lowest white man he's better than the best colored man, he won't notice you're picking his pocket. Hell, give him somebody to look down on, and he'll empty his pockets for you.""",stretchdaddy,e8o092k,democrats
Sad that 50 years later it still works like a charm. ,Gsteel11,e8o7z0q,democrats
"Electronic voting is such a bad idea, I have no idea why the US does this.",Finite187,e8o6a9d,democrats
~~Some~~ Texas voting for Beto say voting machines are flipping selections to Ted Cruz ~~the other party~~,Raspberries-Are-Evil,e8nzenq,democrats
"First Georgia, now Texas...",kerryfinchelhillary,e8oplqt,democrats
"Texas 2018 Election 

[Early Voting Starts](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): October 22-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

[Check Your Voter Registration Status](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do)

",election_info_bot,e8ozhxk,democrats
"It's less than 20 people who have reported this problem, out of the 10's of thousands who have voted so far.  The problem isn't the voting machines, it's the idiots attempting to use them.",WightRarebit,e8ok0f2,democrats
"Good that you investigated that so quickly...

I will blame malicious GOP workers hacking vote booths first.",mad-n-fla,e8vm0eu,democrats
"(Paywall there.)

We know exactly where this story goes, because it's happened before.

We know exactly who Donald Trump is, because we've seen him and his Russian patron before.

There are still people alive who lived through WW2.  They know.

",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8pcq9z,democrats
incognito is your friend.,therecordcorrected,e8phhr4,democrats
This is great.  I've never listened to Ben Shapiro before - how is a person so brainwashed and robotic?,kerryfinchelhillary,e8p7tqp,democrats
"They can say it all they want, if they don't elect Democrats it's not going to happen. ",Ofbearsandmen,e8ltgel,democrats
"While 39% are very happy with their $6 a week ""raise"". 

",2018Blunami,e8lxjj4,democrats
Every time a republican Congress or President enters office I lose faith that social security will not be there for me. I’m not even 30. ,jshaver41122,e8m3wwb,democrats
"If this is what they want, they need to vote for Dems.",kerryfinchelhillary,e8mq6di,democrats
Well if the GOP doesn't give everyone's money to corporations then who's gonna donate to their campaigns? ,LiquidMotion,e8m0pwi,democrats
"Food for thought

Top 1% pays 90% of tax revs",Sir_Bitterhands,e8mlteb,democrats
Agreed. GOP voters are voting against their own interests. Makes zero sense.,Anderson74,e8lz6ie,democrats
That's the actual ignorant voters' trump and the gop love. The people who have a little or no actual education who believe if they just work hard enough at the sawmill or in the mines they will one day own a black granite tower with a gold plated toilet seat. That's why they always do everything in their power to destroy public education.,WeTrudgeOn,e8lzhrp,democrats
I'm not 20 and I already have accepted the fact that social security will be gone by the time I'm 30.,deadpool098,e8m4zit,democrats
"I feel ya dude, under 30 and the same way. I am not counting on SS or the retirement benefits my parents and their generation will/have enjoyed. I am already looking now as to how me and my significant other can keep costs as little as possible and that way hopefully save to retire. Luckily both of us are a no on having kids so hopefully the money that would be spent on that over the years can go to us in our older age. ",TheFatMan2200,e8npp7x,democrats
And they have so much money that it doesn't even scratch the surface of their wealth.  Why shouldn't the people with all of the money pay the most in taxes? ,biggles7268,e8monh3,democrats
"That's not true, .9% of taxpayers pay approximately 40% of the total income tax revenue.^^[1](http://www.pewresearch.org/fact-tank/2017/10/06/a-closer-look-at-who-does-and-doesnt-pay-u-s-income-tax/).    It's worth remembering that only accounts for a portion of the total revenues generated by the United States government, although it is a significant portion.  

The top 1% of the country can afford to pay a higher share in taxes, particularly given the amount of wealth that has flowed to them over the past 30 years.  While I wish there was more balance as well, someone earning 20-50k per year will feel the losses in government services and hikes in taxes far more than someone earning 100k+.",simciv,e8mw8j5,democrats
So?,RecallRethuglicans,e8mmq99,democrats
Because It's brown people's fault somehow. ,fuckinusernamestaken,e8m0y38,democrats
"And if you tell them that, that call YOU elitist ",RecallRethuglicans,e8mmpio,democrats
[removed],,e8mss6z,democrats
"God this is so true! I just started working the graveyard shift at a local factory because $$$ & most of the people there are like this. It's so frustrating because all many of them talk about doing with their lives is maybe moving up the food chain at the same factory. The majority of them are HUGE Trump fans 🙄. Go figure. I don't even talk about how I've re-enrolled in school to 
(finally) finish up my Bachelor's & plan on going for a Master's in Counseling. I know how to read a room & I can see I'd only be ridiculed for it. I can hear it now:

""Them student loans are nothin but a waste of money and them colleges are full of Librals! That degree ain't gonna get you nowhere & why you want one anyway when you make $12/hr working here? This here is a great job! 🤪"" Sadly, $12/hr IS decent pay in this town but I think it's still low enough to qualify for food stamps when you have kids. It's not something you can retire on. I'm happy I can only hear my coworkers during breaks 😁.",reereejugs,e8m46v0,democrats
"Look I hate the Republican party and their stupid ass policies more than I can clearly articulate. But mostly the people working in their sawmill are just trying to get through the day with as little changing in their life as possible, and the mental position of ""at least I'm not black"" might be all they have going for them.  So they'll vote against their own best interests & against things that might actually have a chance to help them simply because they may cause things to change. Why do you think they pine for the past so much, they don't want change.   They don't want to be too successful that'd be change.  They are honestly fine with the rich being rich & being the bosses, it means they can just turn up & do their job & go home and not have to change.  Most of them don't think they'll be rich.   They just want to live their small little lives & not have to worry about scary new things, be they thoughts, jobs or people.   And they're going to drag the rest of us down with them.     They're panicing about change, a fear fed & fueled by the media they watch, and like a drowning person that fear can cause them to drown  people trying to save them as well. 

Again not justifying what they're doing, just that I can understand small, scared people hurting themselves in fear. ",wwaxwork,e8m26k9,democrats
It’s a bleak future for us both friend. ,jshaver41122,e8m5286,democrats
Do you not like the idea?  Why would you just accept that the government is gonna take your money to pay for a retirement you're not gonna get?  Get out there and defend your future.,postal_blowfish,e8m7au4,democrats
But the issue with our entire generation having to save is that it will cause the entire economy to shrink which is then going to effect people’s ability to get jobs which causes the economy to shrink further and then layoffs occur and then there’s more people looking for work and no one can find it. All this because an entire generation of people don’t know if they’re ever going to be able to retire. I’ve never taken an economics class but if lawmakers who have degrees in economics and have aides with degrees in economics from Ivy League institutions who don’t understand this simple concept they must have ulterior motives. ,jshaver41122,e8p6ss9,democrats
I'm just saying I feel lately there's a misconception on exactly how progressive our tax system is,Sir_Bitterhands,e8mopyr,democrats
"Whose else fault would it be?

/HARD S",Anderson74,e8m8vez,democrats
I have. I was a GOP voter. Changed to Libertarian a while ago. Now I’m a full on Democrat (or a leftist libertarian?). Who would’ve thought.,Anderson74,e8mvg2b,democrats
Or maybe they are generally easily manipulated and not very bright. Which is what the data shows. ,concreteblue,e8o1ma1,democrats
"Good for you, you'll likely be counseling some of those people one day. ",WeTrudgeOn,e8m4qbd,democrats
"Oh I understand it too, I won't say I've big even felt some of that at times. That doesn't make it any less stupid. ",WeTrudgeOn,e8m3t9g,democrats
[removed],,e8p30ty,democrats
Your denial is exceeded only by your stupidity.,concreteblue,e8q7528,democrats
[removed],,e8ujdsb,democrats
"“Out, out, brief candle! Life's but a walking shadow, a poor player that struts and frets his hour upon the stage and is heard no more. It is a tale told by an idiot, full of sound and fury, signifying nothing.”
When the wlwction results are not what you expected, will you admit you were wrong?

I am guessing no.",concreteblue,e8uvrsm,democrats
[removed],,e8v19tz,democrats
"I get paid to play music. Have most of my life. Most of my traveling is under that regimen. It has allowed me to spend weeks on end in California, Wahington state, Oregon, Texas, Florida, Vermont, among the 33 states I have worked in. I will never retire, because it is my favorite thing to do.
  When I'm not traveling I flip houses. I WILL retire from that soon.
Yeah, life is good. But I realize that I am lucky and fortunate, and I want my children to live in a better world.
  
People not caring about politics is how we ended up with the current cancer that is the republican party and Trump.",concreteblue,e8w7zqb,democrats
In other news water is wet and grass is green.,AkiTendo,e8o90xe,democrats
Market for balance? Wtf? So much w(h)inning!?,data2dave,e8p48wi,democrats
"Who the hell upvotes a scam because they think it's impressive? Lol, people are fucking idiots.

Maybe these kids need to get scammed to learn a lesson that their parents it seemed never learned. ",Gsteel11,e8oea9u,democrats
"This is why I barely post comments on YouTube, Facebook, news articles, etc anymore...",kerryfinchelhillary,e8ostkp,democrats
There's no point in reading comments anyway. They're all from scammers or written so poorly it makes true dialogue impossible. I haven't read them in years and rarely comment on anything because of it.,colinthetinytornado,e8ozm3w,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8o8hpm,democrats
Birds of a feather.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8mup4g,democrats
"Georgia 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](http://elections.sos.ga.gov/Elections/advancedVotingInfo.do): October 15-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://www.mvp.sos.ga.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8n81kg,democrats
Stop giving them a platform. Your making it worse. ,cercone89,e8n997w,democrats
[removed],,e8nx8ha,democrats
"/r/democrats does not allow the direct linking to external subreddits without the use of ""np"".  Please use http://np.reddit.com/r/<subreddit> when linking into external subreddits. 

The quickest way to have your content seen is to delete and repost with a corrected link.  

*I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/democrats) if you have any questions or concerns.*",AutoModerator,e8nx8iv,democrats
"Oh, oh, I know this one!!

He's a Fascist.",DiscHorse,e8n326z,democrats
Because it’s who they are!!,miketeeeveee,e8n5kio,democrats
"Pennsylvania 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://www.pavoterservices.pa.gov/Pages/PollingPlaceInfo.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8n76ty,democrats
Yes,VegaThePunisher,e8oaitg,democrats
Duh,Btravelen,e8nyun8,democrats
"Trump cultists care about one thing.
Make America White Again. ",red_carpet_hero,e8oxtkp,democrats
Fraud so.,jamalwhite70,e8oym4h,democrats
Because in this case being critics of Trump is the connecting thread between all the parties that were threatened. I also believe that if any of the bombs were successful then this would be framed differently. Luckily this guy was incompetent so we're looking at attempts on Trump critics instead of assassinations.,PM_me_ur_swimsuit,e8obfql,democrats
And we should be 'civil' with these assholes 🙄,Btravelen,e8luef4,democrats
What the fuck is wrong with these people?,Stupidiseverywhere,e8lq60z,democrats
"Yet another example of why I roll my eyes when people tell me ""Dallas is liberal!""",ImpossibleWonder,e8luz3p,democrats
If I was on the fence and somebody did that as I was about to vote I would absolutely vote against them. ,DasFunke,e8lx8ic,democrats
"This ""baby killing"" nonsense is so annoying.  They use it to make us sound bad, because they don't care about living people at all and don't believe in helping others out.",kerryfinchelhillary,e8mqhwq,democrats
"I hope soon we can hold these people up as ""this is why you lost.""",postal_blowfish,e8m7sk2,democrats
"Just be aware of local laws and what the legal grounds are for assault and self defense. 

I encourage tolerance, but you have a right to self defense and a right to vote without facing  assault yourself.",CosmicCharlie99,e8m7ph5,democrats
"Yes we should, we always should because we are better than this. It sucks but law enforcement should be posted at polling sites to ensure this doesn’t happen. 

On a brighter note it is not looking good for Ted.",stillbored_at_work,e8m4mj6,democrats
"They are scared to death about losing.
They will lose and they know it so they are doing desperate shit. ",batshitcrazy5150,e8lti8j,democrats
They are losers with pathetic lives who feel they finally have an opportunity to do something that will make them proud of themselves. ,Ofbearsandmen,e8ltvsh,democrats
The President is encouraging them to intimidate voters.  Like the MAGABOMBER they are good slaves.,postal_blowfish,e8m7v57,democrats
"on the whole, the *population* of dallas is liberal. it is a blue county, you can check the election results yourself. that doesn't mean it doesn't have any very loud, very frightened republicans getting increasingly desperate to maintain their hold on power. 

i honestly think between the voting machines switching straight-ticket dem votes to cruz, voter intimidation, voter roll purging, oppressive voter ID laws, and blatant electioneering (which has been reported and is being ignored by the republican sec.state), i don't think we should accept these results as legitimate. it is very clear what the PEOPLE want as well as how the ""official"" vote count will play out. they've stolen elections before and gotten away with it, they're just going to keep doing it until we don't just *vote* them out, we *FORCE* them out.",superfucky,e8lxt3v,democrats
"I'd try and ask him in front of everyone which party they represent, and then tell them I'm voting against them.  And if they have a problem with that, they can ""go kidnap some kids about it.""",postal_blowfish,e8m806a,democrats
Good point. Fuck them.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8ltk63,democrats
Sad,Stupidiseverywhere,e8lupji,democrats
And what do you suggest? Storming the capital buildings? That's a good way to get shot.,ImpossibleWonder,e8lzum8,democrats
i don't know. but what's the alternative? lie back and let them fuck us?,superfucky,e8m1rp5,democrats
I have no idea...,ImpossibleWonder,e8m3b2c,democrats
It’s not a safe place PERIOD ,Tsmitty247,e8n1xa1,democrats
It's our America not his.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8n2cj4,democrats
"Can we stop saying ""Trump's America""?

The phenomenon he represents is a minority that only holds power because of a foreign-backed coup, and it only serves *their* propaganda to pretend there is such a thing as ""Trump's America.""

**We are America**.  And we are failing to assert that often enough, even in words, let alone actions.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8n0xdq,democrats
'It's not a safe place' for any of us,Btravelen,e8n31jq,democrats
"Sorry, but no. Trump is the fairly predictable culmination of Conservativism as a political philosophy, the bigotry and hatred he espouses have been present in this country since its' founding, and have been a core elements of Republican strategy for at least fifty years. This didn't come out of nowhere, and this new wave of hate crimes is in no way inconsistent with American treatment of Jews throughout history. This IS and has ALWAYS been what our America really is.",DiscHorse,e8n2ds7,democrats
"> This IS and has ALWAYS been what our America really is.

Then you buy into the false cancervative narrative about themselves.

They wouldn't need to rig elections if they were capable of winning them.

They wouldn't need to lie if America would even tolerate their reality, let alone follow it.

A tumor is not an internal organ, and misanthropic traitors are not a country.

",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8n3acw,democrats
"""That's why we have the Koch brothers and Sheldon Adelson""",ATC_av8er,e8lz5gu,democrats
"“...because we’ve already bought and paid for the election, so it totally wouldn’t be *fair*...”

/r",PraxisLD,e8lx4zw,democrats
"Unpopular opinion: I don't mind big donations.  Politics is an expensive business.

Either way, doing this after Soros was sent a bomb is definitely low.",kerryfinchelhillary,e8mqs8u,democrats
"United citizen says yes they spend serious dollars. Deal with it GOP, ya smucks.",somebodyetc,e8mqk0i,democrats
Because otherwise our Kremlin master won't pay us!,Dark_Ansem,e8nljp7,democrats
"Wisconsin 2018 Election 

[General Election Registration Deadline](https://myvote.wi.gov/en-us/registertovote): November 6, 2018 

[General Election](https://myvote.wi.gov/en-us/FindMyPollingPlace): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8q60js,democrats
By gerrymandering and suppression of voters.  I think time will be soon that we have to petition EU and Great Britain to come and supervise our elections. I do not understand how this asshole Kemp is even allowed to supervise his own election in Georgia. ,ManchiBoy,e8lxh4z,democrats
I wish we could use Soros as an example of why Citizens United is worth overturning. But I doubt that would work. ,BbCortazan,e8owqlm,democrats
"Right there with you, my friend...",PraxisLD,e8lzrco,democrats
"Man, great snippets but we're preaching to the choir here. Those damned Independents are the ones who get to pick and their General Ignorance about politics is killing us. 

Just watching C-span about Karl Rove and GW Bush's ability to KISS* their way to power.

*keep it simple, stupid.  And Message Discipline! Atwater et al drilled this. 

Other problems we have -- we are not ""faith based"" we just don't lie to ourselves as much as Republicans!! ",data2dave,e8nlvdv,democrats
"Goldbach......

You cant make this shit up.",Stupidiseverywhere,e8mwy2w,democrats
"not just the Pittsburgh gunman, but also the MAGAbomber, and I believe there was also a third hate crime in the same week. ",TheFatMan2200,e8nqgiu,democrats
"Because **failing** to call Latin American babies rapists and murderers risk some Trump supporters not bothering to vote, and the current administration is far more concerned with this administration's security than the security of the whole nation.",hrlngrv,e8mfepf,democrats
Is Chris Wallace getting a conscience?,beezer210,e8n689q,democrats
"No, he’s still a pos. I randomly turned on Fox the other day and he was arguing with Shepherd Smith about how Trump’s rhetoric definitely had nothing to do with the maga bomber or the synagogue shooter. ",goodstorydan,e8nslr4,democrats
"The entire area wasn’t even open. There wasn’t even planes in sky. What a shit liar.
",VegaThePunisher,e8me6na,democrats
"no he didn't, he said ""Dick Russell, a friend of mine"" opened NYSE the day after

&#x200B;

&#x200B;",wwabc,e8ml3n8,democrats
Paul Krugman - The Conscience of a Liberal,Tommy9fff,e8nb0r0,democrats
"Nevada 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://www.nvsos.gov/sos/elections/voters/early-voting-information): October 20-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://nvsos.gov/votersearch/index.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8mtq8y,democrats
[deleted],,e8mpzmf,democrats
"This is directly from her campaign.  And ActBlue is one of the two main donation platforms for the majority of Dem candidates.  While I appreciate the concern and agree in concept, this is literally the official donation method for Jacky Rosen's campaign. :-)

If it helps, please start off at her campaign website and then click on the donate link there.  It will take you to the same ActBlue donation page in the end:

http://www.rosenfornevada.com

:-)",skepticalspectacle1,e8n79na,democrats
It's almost like they're Fascists​ and actively fomenting domestic terrorism against their political enemies.,DiscHorse,e8k247j,democrats
And a mass shooting at a synagogue.  Trump says we have to be “tolerant” of religion.  This from the guy that tried to ban all Muslims.  Fuck you.,Raspberries-Are-Evil,e8kabw5,democrats
"Can we start a ""one in one out"" program for immigration? We bring in one immigrant and send out one red hat.",AnxiousSun,e8kbp1u,democrats
"I thought the war on terror was about getting these people... oh shit, it was only about brown people.

My bad, ",Canadian-Pharmacy,e8k4g9r,democrats
"Crafty illuminati, some of those bombs got intercepted at my base and I didn't feel any way about it. 

What over the top thing is gonna happen next that won't even shock me.",Bastcydon,e8kx341,democrats
Fucking far Right has demonized George Soros to such an extent its now gone full blown Nazism. ,data2dave,e8k8p1n,democrats
The racist Kroger murders happened in my city. Drove past the store this afternoon. I was really surprised; Louisville is a very liberal city and shit like this really doesn't happen here.,cainneigh,e8l3q42,democrats
"Just another week in paradise. 

Is there any phrase more horribly ironic than ""make America great again""?",DoriCee,e8kmagz,democrats
"Almost as if police the ones paid to deal with criminals. (As they have)

Although it should be Border Patrol waiting for illegal immigrants.

Maybe DHS could look into these claims of Russian hackers if they have nothing to do.",0drag,e8l1q8e,democrats
"So at least the DHS has their straight priorities.

Straight in the wrong direction.

But all straightened out, nonetheless.
",keyboard_jedi,e8k744i,democrats
Welcome to Nazi American ,WillCle216,e8kbghn,democrats
The best people,Stupidiseverywhere,e8k0w6d,democrats
"News cycle might forget, I never will. ",swaharaT,e8kcj8d,democrats
"Honest question, what's he talking about with the assassination attempts against presidents?",erotic_majesty,e8k3om0,democrats
Jews being shot?  Where is all of the anti Jewish hatred coming from?  What did they/we do wrong? What are we being blamed for?,Tomsisson4170,e8ky6r6,democrats
[removed],,e8l0tfa,democrats
I'm thinking they ain't got time for these small fries,pandaking1991,e8l2sfk,democrats
Racism at its best.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8lo35s,democrats
What Kroger where? I haven't heard anything like that in the news?..,ImpossibleWonder,e8luuzf,democrats
Thank you for the encouraging words.,Tomsisson4170,e8lv2en,democrats
"Where was it said that the Kroger shooter was a white supremacist? Please cite the link. That is a total false narrative. 

I’m not defending the guy by any means. I live VERY close to the location and the guy is reported to be mentally unstable. I haven’t heard any motives other than that. 

Again, I’m not defending him. AT ALL. Dude deserves to rot. Just don’t make it something it’s not. ",fleshflavoredgum,e8lvv25,democrats
"Meanwhile, in E_S_S, if you point out that the people responsible for this are bad, you get banned.  Their mods are, at this point, apologists for white supremacy.  I'll keep posting there once the ban is up because the community is great, but the mods clearly don't have its best interests in mind.",LysanderSporker,e8lw226,democrats
Imagine the chaos if all that happened AND a group of Honduran mothers and their ISIS children got into the country? Exactly? American sovereignty can not withstand the influx of breastfeeding Honduran ISIS sleeper agents.,jackredrum,e8kb8id,democrats
"Those problems do not reflect the interests of most Jews.  For many it is a matter of faith, belief, and religion only.",Tomsisson4170,e8l474m,democrats
[removed],,e8lplah,democrats
"Uhhh, the migrants consist of more than just starving kids. Also, they were offered places to stay in Mexico but many refused. ",watergo,e8kp3u4,democrats
All whites aren’t supremacists ,flyingasshat,e8kukfj,democrats
[removed],,e8kvvsx,democrats
And another moron heard from.,Hammer1024,e8l0dud,democrats
[removed],,e8l9dgs,democrats
What presidents had an assassination attempt against them? ,SoulOfOrnstein,e8kvxwh,democrats
This place is such an echo chamber of misinformation and bullshit,pboi3333,e8l7rhu,democrats
Kids? The horde looks like 18-35 year old men that push about 30 women to the front for cnn photo ops. Why do democrats hate this country so much.,BodankHusk,e8l8yhb,democrats
"Funny how those comments are staged to make it seem like white supremacists did all of those things, completely glazing over where the pipebomb mailer is actually from. 🙄",MegaHashes,e8kzwjj,democrats
almost?,eddiervc2,e8kklyh,democrats
Since when are jews political enemies of Republicans?,TheMarketLiberal93,e8kmwlp,democrats
[removed],,e8l7dwn,democrats
"It's almost like you don't understand the definition of fascism...   
And no one is actively fomenting domestic terrorism. Jesus. Its like your drowning the CNN kool-aid. 

&#x200B;

Democrats are for more government power and control and republicans are for more individual freedoms and smaller government with less power. The latter of which is the complete opposite of fascism.",Warfighter1776,e8k7a73,democrats
Even if they weren't false flag(s?)  That's bullshit,pboi3333,e8l7pek,democrats
"The mass shooter was raving about migration on his social media, specifically about Jewish groups helping them.

Hmmm, if only we knew where all this hate towards immigrants came from? ",up48,e8l617c,democrats
"No joke, it doesn’t matter to his base, according to my red hat grandpa “MUSLIM ISNT A RELIGION!”, which I mean is right but probably not his point.",ATR_Doug,e8kj17q,democrats
Some religions are better than others boii,pboi3333,e8l7qiu,democrats
"He didn’t try to ban all Muslims just from a list of 5 or so countries and it was only for 90 days, the countries only happened to be Muslim and it has nothing to do with religion at all. Also please don’t respond to this with something like “fuck you” or whatever I’m just trying to have a civilized discussion and to look at the facts. ",TwitchtvD0rad0,e8l668c,democrats
When did he try to ban all muslims?,Synaesthetic4Cash,e8kpql4,democrats
Surely nothing bad could come from giving the government the power to deport citizens,unclefisty,e8lfj5t,democrats
Red hat = red coat.,shroyhammer,e8kg4gh,democrats
I think that would be a terrible idea plus what would happen if we said something like that for Hillary supporters? The internet would go absolutely insane. But I don’t think we should be deporting American citizens for someone who wasn’t born here or raised here. ( don’t get me wrong I’m all for immigration and refugees and foreign people coming in but this seems a little to targeted),TwitchtvD0rad0,e8l6cyf,democrats
"are we already at the part where we try to banish all the people with different political opinions and label them ""enemies of the revolution""? I thought we had to burn books first",dope_smoking_hippy,e8kf4sh,democrats
Are we the baddies?,Peacelovefleshbones,e8kba6a,democrats
Who knew that people that obsessed so much about terrorism were doing so because the first chance they got they wanted to be terrorists and were simply jealous. ,wwaxwork,e8kes0f,democrats
Trump will shoot someone in the middle of 5th Avenue ,llcoger,e8l4u8f,democrats
"Who deals with the radical conservative terrorists?
",VegaThePunisher,e8l3yzr,democrats
MAGAbomber sent two mail bombs to former presidents Obama and Clinton.,brabbit8881,e8k3uru,democrats
You fucking serious right now?,MonsterIt,e8ktttg,democrats
"Same shit as always, secret conspiracies controlling the world via money. The current antisemite buzzwords include globalism and George Soros. As well as classics like Zionist. ",microcosmic5447,e8l3wob,democrats
"You aren’t being blamed for anything! You just happen to be an easy target and convenient. As things digress we will all have a turn in the barrel,",zstrata,e8loavs,democrats
"/r/democrats does not allow the direct linking to external subreddits without the use of ""np"".  Please use http://np.reddit.com/r/<subreddit> when linking into external subreddits. 

The quickest way to have your content seen is to delete and repost with a corrected link.  

*I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/democrats) if you have any questions or concerns.*",AutoModerator,e8l0tfr,democrats
nah,VegaThePunisher,e8m1w9e,democrats
Holy shit. People like you actually exist. ,MsAndDems,e8l5tfn,democrats
ISIS children? /s?,Lexiepocalypse,e8kuye0,democrats
I hope this is sarcasm? ,zstrata,e8lof8u,democrats
^ irony,VegaThePunisher,e8lr5ku,democrats
"Uhhh sofa king, what?",VegaThePunisher,e8kp5rr,democrats
What an insightful comment,BRodgeFootballGenius,e8kx0mi,democrats
What?,VegaThePunisher,e8kvxsq,democrats
"Are you ok, widdle boy?",VegaThePunisher,e8l42v0,democrats
Troll warning issued.,backpackwayne,e8lceod,democrats
"Presidents Barack Obama and Bill Clinton. 

That is always their title and how they are addressed for their rest of their lives.
",VegaThePunisher,e8kwq4a,democrats
"What is inaccurate about the OP, snowflake?",VegaThePunisher,e8ljicr,democrats
Sorry we're not  R/the_Donald ,FlamingAshley,e8lowgo,democrats
"Gaslight, Obstruction, Projection",4stringsoffury,e8lc65h,democrats
"That’s a lie, stupid.",VegaThePunisher,e8ljg9d,democrats
He’s white,VegaThePunisher,e8l458g,democrats
You white supremeists   own this one. Add it to your list. Do your moma proud!!!!!!,zstrata,e8lon6j,democrats
wait are we labelling people by birthplace now? im from arkansas and about as left as you can be you fuckin ninny,ANiceCitrusFriend,e8laz0o,democrats
"Sorry, no, that's exactly what it is.",DiscHorse,e8kla1b,democrats
"Since GOP candidates started using language so blatantly anti-Semitic to call it coded would be disingenuous, in a successful attempt to create a coalition of cultural reactionaries, Christian religious extremists, white supremacists, fascists, the wealthy, and the gullible?",DiscHorse,e8krdza,democrats
God you  are ignorant.,backpackwayne,e8kn00p,democrats
"What the fuck kind of planet are you living on, son?",DiscHorse,e8lnlhu,democrats
"That’s not happening.


Trumpies are currently the biggest domestic terror threat.

",VegaThePunisher,e8lkkuq,democrats
"The party of ""small government"" seems to be enjoying the powers of big government, and complaining its not big enough. So... Try again? ",ZenYeti98,e8k7grm,democrats
"So you never read a book after High School, huh? That people actually have these uncritical, surface level, party-line beliefs is just incredible.

If you really, honestly believe the GOP is lessening governmental power and increasing individual freedom, I've got this great bridge out in San Francisco I'd like to sell you.",DiscHorse,e8k7kpf,democrats
"Ahhhhh delusions. How did you stumble in here? Republicans don’t actually care about giving people more individual freedoms, it’s just “on their ticket” despite increasing the federal deficits over and over, and democrats care about giving government oversight to welfare-based programs which help out individuals. Democrats care not about control. Democratic attack ads don’t fear monger - which republicans commonly do. Fear mongering is control ",tbl5048,e8k7fge,democrats
"> Democrats are for more government power and control and republicans are  for more individual freedoms and smaller government with less power.  

They are for individual freedoms ? Really ? It's the litteral core of liberalism, not conservatism. But yeah, yeah, I'm pretty sure GOP voted unequivocally ""Ay"" for the Civil Right Acts in 1964, or for any issues concerning LGBT(Q+) and minorities. ",Pterygoidien,e8k8s6m,democrats
"Congrats everyone, you have the individual freedom to get shot and blown up!",OhThrowMeAway,e8kdd06,democrats
"HahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahHahahHhHahHhHhHahahahahahahaha

*breathes again*

Hahahahahahahahahahahahhahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahhahahahaahahahahahahahahahahahaha",dismayhurta,e8k876w,democrats
"> more individual freedoms

Like all those individually free kids in those free ass concentrations camps right?  Get fucked.",algernonsflorist,e8kg0y9,democrats
"> And no one is actively fomenting domestic terrorism

To say this, is to pretend that the recent bomb scare was any sort of surprise after Trump's constant vitriolic and hate fueled attacks of his political opponents. 

Those of us who are paying full attention have seen something like this coming for two years, ever since Trump started talking about bashing heads at his rallies, to great applause.",ChewsCarefully,e8k7mmz,democrats
"Less government control... except they love to forbid women to have access to contraception, or control what bathroom trans people can use. For example.",Ofbearsandmen,e8k89nl,democrats
"Trumpies are now the biggest domestic terror threat.

",VegaThePunisher,e8k8qi7,democrats
"> republicans are for more individual freedoms and smaller government with less power.

lol, you gotta stop taking their campaign ads so literally",tevert,e8kf0oj,democrats
I think there may be some wool over your eyes there eh?,sonbrothercousin,e8kdb3w,democrats
"I think there may be some wool over your eyes there, eh?",sonbrothercousin,e8kdc0d,democrats
"The only reason the GOP is for smaller government is so their wealthy donor class can run free abusing labor the environment public education ect unchecked.
It has nothing to do with peoples ""freedom""

It's like you are drowning in FoxHole Kool aid",MichiganMafia,e8kfkot,democrats
Technically true,Chibraltar_,e8l8xvq,democrats
The fact that he wanted to ban any person due to their religion is enough.,Raspberries-Are-Evil,e8lbp9q,democrats
https://www.aclu-wa.org/pages/timeline-muslim-ban,shadowveeeeeeerse,e8ktav8,democrats
https://youtu.be/-sz0KY-3PbQ,Murgie,e8kzywf,democrats
"Nah, we're at the part where we attempt to bomb our political opponents while gas lighting the nation into believing it's the targets fault.

Try to keep up.",VReady970,e8ki6ov,democrats
"Book burning was always a Conservative tactic.  The Liberal side actually endorses things like free speech and doesn't suggest we lock up journalists (or condone their murder) because they disagree.  If you actually believed in making America great again, you'd support the side that created the changes that shaped the country into what it was. Instead, you made the decision that empowering someone who sides with Nazis was somehow a good decision.

If I am given the choice between taking in an immigrant who believes in the actual ideals that created America in exchange for someone supporting the rebirth of Nazi ideologies,  I'll ask if we can make it a 2 for 1. ",GenXStonerDad,e8ltm5d,democrats
It's rare that I read something they protest that they don't do or accuse us of doing that doesn't turn out to be projection. Case in point.,IsaacEiland-Hall,e8kyinv,democrats
"Nah, thats gonne be his largely foreshadowed finale. 

*O! Fortuna starts playing quietly in the background. *

Its probably gonna be Robert Mueller, but out of the shadows a bullet flies back and hit Donald in the leg, then another! Right in the chest, and as Donny collapses, we pan towards the darkness of the alley, and through the smoke and shadows walks Donny Jr. Shaking, gun in hand. He walks over and stands above his father, tears streaming,  ""ALL I EVER WANTED WAS YOUR LOVE AND APPROVAL"", he screams at his gasping father.  

Cut back to Meuller, peeling off his fine pressed and now bullet punctured crisp white button up. To reveal a bullet-proof vest. He clutches at the impact site of the bullet, and looks at Don Jr, eyes wide. ""NO JR DON'T DO IT! THIS ISN'T OUR DEAL! YOU'RE BETTER THAN HIM""

quick cut back to DJTJr, hands shaking clasped together on the gun, pointing at the head of the now wheezing President.  

O fortuna reaching a crescendo 

""YOU NEVER LOVED ME""

*wheezing* 

""What is there to *long gasp* love? (Speaking softer now) You could never really *wet raspy gasp* be me.""

Cut back to Mueller 

""NOOOOOOOOO!""

O fortuna rages at its peak in the background

*BANG!* 

Don Jr drops after shooting himself.

Top down view camera slowly raises and rotates as the song decrescendos, lights fade and in the distance you hear one last quiet word....

""Yuuuge""

",eyeIl,e8l8hxq,democrats
"Police & FBI, as they always have. ",0drag,e8l426i,democrats
[deleted],,e8k6nvj,democrats
Excuse me?,erotic_majesty,e8l7bzx,democrats
"What do u mean, “nah”? You don’t want to cite the link?",fleshflavoredgum,e8md5cx,democrats
At least six people who can’t recognise obvious sarcasm exist on Reddit ,jackredrum,e8l5vur,democrats
"which part is ironic? the part where these homeless, broke people are being fed and bussed several thousand miles with no resistance from the mexican government. The only irony here is that the people funding this are going to let those people starve and die at the border to make a point. Its fucking cruel and sad politics. The dems dont care about immigrants any more than the republicans. The only diff is one side is pretending to give a shit for votes at the cost of thousands of lives.  Ppl were up in arms about DNC server hack, but they never bothered to look at the disgusting shit inside. Im pretty sure repub servers are just as fucked, but to play like the dem party is saints is just ignorant to the facts.",IonCann0n,e8mf28i,democrats
"* fear-mongering about unarmed starving kids 1000 miles away

* attempting to prevent a public health crisis

Please select only one
",iamonlyoneman,e8kwh9v,democrats
TMoR mod here. You should probably just ban him.,bigbowlowrong,e8lct2o,democrats
[removed],,e8lpubf,democrats
"WTF are you smoking? 

https://i.imgur.com/vT5LPQc.jpg

‘Cesar Soyac’ is not white. He’s clearly some kind of Hispanic, probably Cuban. 

If you think he’d be welcome at a KKK rally, you need to get your head checked. ",MegaHashes,e8lm65l,democrats
"I’m not a white ‘supremeists’ [sic]. 

Cesar isn’t white, and his bombings aren’t even racially motivated. 🙄",MegaHashes,e8lpr89,democrats
Examples? I’d love to read up on it.,TheMarketLiberal93,e8kspca,democrats
Thanks for the insightful answer to my question. Much appreciated.,TheMarketLiberal93,e8ksnu3,democrats
[removed],,e8texua,democrats
"It's really tough to go back all the way to 1964 and see the parties as they are today.  Truly, the Republicans did vote for civil right and Dems we're against it in the 60's, but the last 20-30 years have entirely flipped script and Republicans have gone entirely against that which they voted for 50 years ago

Edit: voting rights act passed house in 64 with 78% Dem and 82% Rep approval (try passing anything with those numbers now).  

[Politifact civil rights act](https://www.politifact.com/truth-o-meter/statements/2010/may/25/michael-steele/steele-says-gop-fought-hard-civil-rights-bills-196/)",GingerCurlz,e8kc9i7,democrats
"*cries in a corner because people really are this stupid and now humanity’s fucked 😭 *

....hopefully my 1 vote can cancel out the vote of another faux-news imbecile 🙃",slipmshady777,e8k8yi2,democrats
"Ah, you misunderstood it. Common mistake. 

Less government control for *old white rich guys*, not those **other** people. 

After all, why worry about people actually struggling when you can get money from rich dudes?",Xechwill,e8l8op8,democrats
Trump encouraged this nonsense and now the chickens are coming home to roost. ,ElDouchey,e8k9gdx,democrats
But it has nothing to do with the religion of these people it had to do with the documentation of these countries and immigration,TwitchtvD0rad0,e8moczc,democrats
All the countries that were included in the ban were FAILED STATES. States that can’t keep accurate and up to date records of their population.hence the need to ban the ppl travelling from those countries. These countries happen to be Muslim. (I’m sorry if this is too logical an answer for you),Jojobelle,e8lc3x4,democrats
"as long as we can paint them all with the same broad brush, I guess we're on track",dope_smoking_hippy,e8kth64,democrats
Projection to the point of deafening!,zstrata,e8lo1nk,democrats
Beautiful! I'd pay good money to see that movie!,llcoger,e8lnjh3,democrats
DHS and local police as well. ,VegaThePunisher,e8l4djv,democrats
"It’s like if someone tried to rob a bank, but their gun jams as they open fire on the tellers.

“Well, I guess we can’t prosecute the guy. His intent was to murder people, but nobody got hurt. Wrap it up, boys, we’re done here!”

Doesn’t work like that, unfortunately.",TridiusX,e8kdtex,democrats
Except the other two far Right recent instances are Deadly. ,data2dave,e8k8tkq,democrats
What link?,VegaThePunisher,e8md6tv,democrats
Wow you are really programmed about Democrats. So sad. ,VegaThePunisher,e8mf9mp,democrats
"There is no public health crisis.

The border handles hundreds of thousands of attempted refugees per year. 

",VegaThePunisher,e8kwm4y,democrats
"He will be. Procedure here is a warning then ban. This as just a step in the process.
I have tagged him as a troll and we will see if he does anything again.

Thanks for the tip though.I'll be watching him.",backpackwayne,e8lcxo9,democrats
Funded?!?!? Where did I say that?,VegaThePunisher,e8lqxlz,democrats
"You know Hispanics count as white people right? Hispanic is not a race, it's an ethinicity. ",FlamingAshley,e8lp2l0,democrats
"No he father was filipino whom he never knew. 

His mom is Italian-American.

So he’s white and whitebred.
",VegaThePunisher,e8lm8ye,democrats
If you are a Republican you own this crap. And this time around we have to remember ownership! For a long time!!!!,zstrata,e8lxwj8,democrats
"If you'd love to read up on it, do some research and apply some goddamn critical thinking. It's not hard to trace terms like ""globalist"", ""fake news"", and ""America First"" back to their origins. Look into the Southern Strategy. Look at how many white supremacists find a welcoming home in the GOP as soon as they tone it down in public a bit. It's not exactly an inscrutable riddle.",DiscHorse,e8kto2f,democrats
Soros. ,MsAndDems,e8l5w6h,democrats
It was accurate. ,VegaThePunisher,e8lklwo,democrats
"No they haven’t.

It’s just projection since trumpies are trying to kill people.",VegaThePunisher,e8tfe5o,democrats
"Wow, you're right, thanks for the insight !

But let's not forget that after it was passed, the democratic party was divided, and those who did not support it left the democratic party and many of them went to the republican party. But yes, you are totally right, and the democratic party had his fair share of assholes when it came to racial rights (such as George Wallace), not to mention Jim Crow laws. We must never forget that (nor deny it, as it is a ""Duty of Memory"").

I did not know it had such an approval within the GOP at the time. So I would like to retract my statement about Civil Right Acts, but I think that my point is still valid concerning minorities rights nowadays : immigration has become a central subject in republicans, and most of them campaign is not based on individual rights... Many people in the republican party are actually against many individual rights, such as abortion, gay mariage, women rights, etc.",Pterygoidien,e8kd33j,democrats
This is exactly what he wants. All of his supporters think this is a false flag. They’re all foaming at the mouth. Frothing. ,Laugh-Or-Cry,e8kbqjk,democrats
"Perhaps I’m uninformed, but how did he encourage this? If I’m missing some speech he gave where he called for the death of Jews and Democrats please let me know so I can get out my bigger pitchfork.",TheMarketLiberal93,e8kn2yt,democrats
"“ “Donald J. Trump is calling for a total and complete shutdown of Muslims entering the United States until our country’s representatives can figure out what is going on.”

Oh let me guess he was just joking right?",Raspberries-Are-Evil,e8mrlwt,democrats
I need the logic explained concerning Saudi Arabia. The funds and. Extremists that pulled off 9/11 were from Saudi Arabia. I don’t believe that country appears on the ban list.,zstrata,e8lnuxx,democrats
If you have to worry about sounding “too logical” you might have an insubstantial platform for your argument,Roolerk,e8lo7o9,democrats
"Police includes ""local police"". Did ya think I meant Martians?

DHS are a waste of skin, IMO. ",0drag,e8l6w3x,democrats
[deleted],,e8k9cu0,democrats
The link profiling the Kroger shooter as a white supremacist ,fleshflavoredgum,e8mdo80,democrats
[removed],,e8kwpz9,democrats
"if you say so, there's no threat of a public health crisis.  

>[Dr. Jan Orient, executive director of the Association of American Physicians and Surgeons, said on Breitbart News Daily that the thousands of people marching toward the U.S. border with Mexico could bring diseases that could pose a threat to public health.](http://archive.fo/JH9VD)",iamonlyoneman,e8kxgsl,democrats
You darn Democrats and your respect for procedure and the Rule of Law will kill us all:o,bigbowlowrong,e8ncawg,democrats
[removed],,e8meeom,democrats
">	father was filipino

So, asian islander. *Definitely* not white. 

The only source I could find about his mother mentions she is Italian, not italian-american. Which, depending on which part of italy shes from would determine if she is more mediterranean or european looking.

 Timothy McVeigh and Terry Nichols, OK city bombers, white

Ted Kaczynski (Unabomber), white

Eric Rudolph, Olympic Park bomber, white

Cesar Soyac — not fucking white. 

He does not look, have the ancestry of, or even sound white. Obama is more white than this guy. ",MegaHashes,e8lna3g,democrats
"1) I’m not a Republican. 

2) Remember what? Crazy and stupid isn’t limited to one political leaning. ",MegaHashes,e8ly8pj,democrats
"The reason I asked you for examples is because I wasn’t able to find any outside of a few bigoted ass state or local candidates - which are largely criticized by other GOP party members.

I dislike the GOP as much as anyone else, but I just don’t see any evidence to support a blanket claim on the entire party as being Anti-Semitic.

Not everybody comes across the same sources you know. I’m not requesting sources as an “I got you” moment if you don’t provide, I’m requesting sources to potentially fucking learn something I wasn’t aware of, and to get someone else’s perspective on the topic. We all interpret information differently.",TheMarketLiberal93,e8l6m8r,democrats
You’re not helping. ,the_chandler,e8ku8ub,democrats
"Wow!  Even Hillary said that it wasn't Cory Booker that said kick em', but that it was Holder. 

Here's Maxine:  https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.cnn.com/cnn/2018/06/25/politics/maxine-waters-trump-officials/index.html

Here's Eric:  https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/2018/10/10/eric-holder-when-they-go-low-we-kick-them-thats-what-this-new-democratic-party-is-about/?utm_term=.c278d388be74&noredirect=on

And here's your Savior:  https://youtu.be/_6U1Wmq-Ems

",darkvader3771,e8tgubg,democrats
"Yep, and I completely agree about the current state of the GOP.",GingerCurlz,e8kgmre,democrats
"He refuses to condemn violence from his supporters. For example, he refused to condemn the events that took place in Charlottesville and after he was pressured to do it, he said “it was one of his biggest regrets.” He also said that the event in Charlottesville had some very fine people on both sides. That’s right, according to Trump, the KKK and nazis are very fine people.",ElDouchey,e8kon9k,democrats
If you find the actual quote from Trump himself I’ll admit i was wrong but until then I still stand behind that it had nothing to do with religion ,TwitchtvD0rad0,e8nq5w3,democrats
k,VegaThePunisher,e8l70f5,democrats
"Yes, sorry didn't mean to criticize. Just pointing out that seems whatever Leftist violence they speak of is mild in comparison... oh well m, it's like we're on the same page in this sub! ",data2dave,e8kbh5q,democrats
http://nymag.com/intelligencer/2018/10/white-supremacist-shooting-in-louisville-kentucky-kroger.html,VegaThePunisher,e8me2d2,democrats
"/r/democrats does not feature links to that website. Please don't post unreliable sources.'

*I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/democrats) if you have any questions or concerns.*",AutoModerator,e8kwpzo,democrats
"“could”


Wow. The end.
😆 ",VegaThePunisher,e8kyhjf,democrats
"Brietbart thinks brown people carry disease.  

""But don't call us racists!"" cry the Trumpers. ",MostSensualPrimate,e8l3igq,democrats
Your first problem is listening to Brietbart ,llcoger,e8l58fk,democrats
"No, not all of it.

They are definitely partially responsible, yes. 
",VegaThePunisher,e8mep0z,democrats
"Nah, he’s white. ",VegaThePunisher,e8lnd6m,democrats
At this stage of events it is inevitable. ,zstrata,e8lyn15,democrats
I honestly believe the Republican Party has let itself be hi jacked. Anything goes now as long as it suits a short term purpose? The GOP will disavow in the future. G W Bush is a prime example of distancing. Public’s memories too short and uninterested?,zstrata,e8lmaga,democrats
"What, because I'm not spoon-feeding a reading list to a devil's advocate liberal? Grow up.",DiscHorse,e8kv4gz,democrats
"No that was a figure of speech.

Same with Michelle Obama’s.




Meanwhile, trump supporters are murdering people. 

",VegaThePunisher,e8tgz6v,democrats
"That is the actual quote. He refers to himself in the third person. Would you like to see video of him actually saying it?

https://www.c-span.org/video/?c4737466/trumps-muslim-ban",Raspberries-Are-Evil,e8nx6i9,democrats
"Ok, fair enough. I’m seeing the national news on this reporting now. [This is the reports we got locally,](https://www.wkyt.com/content/news/Police-Louisville-Kroger-grocery-shooter-shot-man-in-back-of-head-498535331.html)  which STILL doesn’t state the fact that his ex wife was black. So, there’s that. ",fleshflavoredgum,e8mo3b0,democrats
"Obviously, this guy is mentally unstable. Anyone who assaults their own elderly parents has some issues. 

Again, like I said- there is a false narrative making this racially motivated. Yes, the two victims were black. They were RANDOM people. But please tell me if any white supremacist would marry a black woman?? 

AGAIN- not defending this POS.  Just trying to show how “politics” swerve a tragedy into division. ",fleshflavoredgum,e8moig0,democrats
It's quoting the executive director of the american association of physicians and surgeons. bot ur dum as dirt.,iamonlyoneman,e8kxdfo,democrats
"oh and the known gang members...welp, they're not here yet i guess we should just do nothing (?)",iamonlyoneman,e8kyjfc,democrats
It is not debatable that there are more diseases in South America due to preventable illness.,iamonlyoneman,e8n06cy,democrats
It was the first hit on an internet search and it's quoting a prominent physician but ok,iamonlyoneman,e8n02mp,democrats
What are you even talking about? 🙄,MegaHashes,e8lz3w8,democrats
I agree for the most part. It is going from a somewhat Conservative party to a protectionist one with every passing day.,TheMarketLiberal93,e8lrc65,democrats
"Nope. Can't use that one. Both were clear in their intentions.  Trump supporters aren't murdering anyone. The bomber didn't agree with Trump either.  Also on the subject of the caravan, there is a legal way for all of those folks to come into the US. That's what needs to happen. Not to just overwhelm Border Security.  Check out the photos of the caravan. Interesting that folks with nothing can afford those nice shoes and backpacks. THE WEEK BEFORE THE ELECTION. Hmmmmm.....",darkvader3771,e8thtif,democrats
Ahh ok that makes more sense so yeah sorry I was wrong but I still do stand by our presidents actions and thank you for having a civilized discussion with me,TwitchtvD0rad0,e8oolqf,democrats
"Well that is what could have made him hate people. 

There isn’t a false narrative. 
",VegaThePunisher,e8mvavd,democrats
"No proof of that either, son.

Keep flailing.
",VegaThePunisher,e8l4av5,democrats
"It is legal to just cross the border and plead asylum.

Trumpies are currently more dangerous.

",VegaThePunisher,e8tivk8,democrats
Yea no worries man- we can't move forward if we can't have civilized discussions and people can learn from it.  Appreciate it.,Raspberries-Are-Evil,e8orwhr,democrats
I just hate how everything gets turned into a race issue. Does nothing but divide. ,fleshflavoredgum,e8nts2f,democrats
"There's only no proof of it if you are unwilling to trust your own government, dad.

I'll keep winning, you keep being mad, and I'll be a lot happier than you are when President Trump gets re-elected, k?",iamonlyoneman,e8n04uu,democrats
"It is. Currently, you have thousands that are coming at the same time. None are vetted and we have no idea who they are and only what their stated intentions are. Also, they are coming across the border with no means of support when they get here which means taxpayers are paying the bill. Again.  

So if you feel so strongly, give them your address and sponsor several of them in your home.  No need to find out who they are, right?

You're logic about Trumpies being more dangerous is illogical. ",darkvader3771,e8tk8wx,democrats
"It is a race issue. The guy murder two, tried to get into a black church, and then when an armed white citizen confronted him he said “whites don’t shoot whites”.


",VegaThePunisher,e8ntv1e,democrats
"He’s only your orange baboon messiah. 

Not non-CHUD Americans.
",VegaThePunisher,e8n0bzo,democrats
"They have always been thousands coming at a time.

What is wrong with you people?",VegaThePunisher,e8twd7l,democrats
So you'll be happier than me when he wins in a landslide?,iamonlyoneman,e8n0nqa,democrats
"Again, a Dem with no basis of argument that will bitterly suggest that I am the one who is wrong.  I work with several immigrants who came in the legal way and feel that they should do the same.  Closed borders doesn't mean let no one in. It does mean to allow time to vett people to let the good in and keep the bad out. Look at what Germany has experienced with its open borders policy. There are now portions of that country that its citizens are afraid to go. Not to mention the cost of deportation that the US pays every year, just for someone to turn around and come right back.  

https://www.heritage.org/immigration/commentary/merkels-leadership-threatened-killings-immigrants-wrought-open-borders",darkvader3771,e8u4dg6,democrats
That pee pee drinker didn’t even get the most votes the first time. 😆 ,VegaThePunisher,e8n0sx1,democrats
"Um, again that’s a load of horseshit.

There were more people coming over the border under George W. Bush than Obama, and less now. Hundreds of thousands less per year.

You people are living a cult delusion to encourage conservatives to vote, since nearly all conservative policies are shit and have devastated Republican towns across America. ",VegaThePunisher,e8ucq6i,democrats
"No, Hillary got most of the votes from people who are registered in excess of the number of live people in the country LOL https://www.investors.com/politics/editorials/u-s-has-3-5-million-more-registered-voters-than-live-adults-a-red-flag-for-electoral-fraud/",iamonlyoneman,e8n0z5r,democrats
"No your link doesn’t say that. 

Typical trumpie shit liar. Shocker.",VegaThePunisher,e8n1gfr,democrats
Sorry you can't comprehend written English.,iamonlyoneman,e8n2i01,democrats
"Sure sure, orange. ",VegaThePunisher,e8n3ij8,democrats
"Pennsylvania 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://www.pavoterservices.pa.gov/Pages/PollingPlaceInfo.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8mufhp,democrats
Cesar Sayoc. Happens all the time if you read the news. There was an anti Jew shooting like yesterday in Pittsburgh. ,Andrew_Cryin,e8mzf6g,democrats
https://www.newstatesman.com/world/north-america/2018/03/americans-are-more-likely-be-attacked-far-right-terrorists-islamists,VegaThePunisher,e8n06xv,democrats
"Ghosthrad you are clearly looking for an argument, go away",tomcatproductions,e8n0ohq,democrats
"Montgomery September 16th 1963, Atlanta October 12th 1958, Emmett Till and the innumerable other lynchings of African Americans, Greensboro '79, Oklahoma City, the Atomwaffen murders, any other number of recent shootings, and of course all of last week. That's just off the top of my head. Look into DoJ threat assessments. Right-wing extremists are far and away the largest and most imminent threat to Americans.",DiscHorse,e8n0u87,democrats
"I’ll play along for a moment.  Timothy McVeigh.  Disillusioned army vet.  Proud supporter of the nutjobs at Waco.  Rents a truck, packs it with fertilizer and blows up a government building.  169 dead, including 19 kids.  He got what he deserved.  

Though really not sure of your working towards.  Plenty, dozens really, of other examples.  ",90Carat,e8n1yw1,democrats
A turning point is Republicans disrespectful racist one term Obama agenda a decade ago. Nothing but political and social dysfunction ever since.,rockcandymtns,e8n0fdk,democrats
Abortion clinic bombings,goodstorydan,e8n2nzf,democrats
"Timothy McVeigh, Robert Dear, the dumbass who showed up with an AR to the pizzeria that Flynn posted that Hillary was running a child trafficking op out of. Pay attention",Btravelen,e8n3r82,democrats
"Off the top of my head: there's the Oklahoma City Bombing.  The Charleston Church mass shooting.  The 2015 Lafayette shooting.  Not to mention Cesar Sayoc, the recent mass shooting at a synagog, and the (also very recent) targeted shooting a blacks at a Kroger near a black church in Kentucky.

Technically nearly all terrorism is right wing terrorism.  Islamic fundamentalists are very right wing.

",icefire9,e8n4755,democrats
"Here is another one in California from last year:

* https://www.dailynews.com/2018/10/28/4th-southern-california-based-white-supremacist-group-member-charged-in-attacks-surrenders-to-fbi-in-westwood/",backpackwayne,e8n6s0g,democrats
"And a Trump- fanatic sending 14 bombs to prominent democrats

And the  Charlottesville Nazi rally where a guy drove through the crowd and killed a lady.",backpackwayne,e8n0whq,democrats
Thanks. So I guess my mom is lying to me. Tomorrow I am hitting the school library. Thanks everyone.,ghostheadx9,e8na95n,democrats
"Now I’m starting to believe it. Thanks.

My conservative old hoot mom isn’t giving me the full story because she’s radical which is what I thought.",ghostheadx9,e8nabt4,democrats
"Go easy, check out OPs post history.",nscherneck,e8nbakp,democrats
No I am looking to find out the truth.,ghostheadx9,e8n0peu,democrats
[deleted],,e8n0xqt,democrats
"Ok so I can confirm what you just said. I actually believe it now.

Thanks.",ghostheadx9,e8n9u7i,democrats
"See I was wondering if my parents were remotely giving me the whole story. 

My mom is a crazy radical right winger and I am trying to do my own research without having to blindly accept as told. Thanks for the examples.",ghostheadx9,e8na1k7,democrats
Thanks. Now I know my mom is a radical right winger who doesn’t want to give me the full story.,ghostheadx9,e8na7fq,democrats
"Cesar Sayoc is the bomb guy. Also, I forgot about Charlottesville.",Andrew_Cryin,e8n18rh,democrats
"Yeah. If you’re mom is denying alt right violence in America, I’m worried about what else she also withheld from you.",Andrew_Cryin,e8nbjy2,democrats
"Get off Reddit and read a book, then. I'd maybe start with The Terrorist Next Door, or Bring The War Home.",DiscHorse,e8n0zxw,democrats
"You're not actually one of my students, so I'm gonna just come right out and say that's a stupid question. ",DiscHorse,e8n130m,democrats
Yea they do that sometime. :D,backpackwayne,e8nabga,democrats
Hard to keep the names straight. Thought that was the Synagogue killer. ,backpackwayne,e8n22bs,democrats
Yeah so now I’m educating myself on both sides and I need to go to my school library tomorrow.,ghostheadx9,e8nblm7,democrats
I know right,Andrew_Cryin,e8n22uz,democrats
"Well for future reference, if you want less bias sources, avoid MSNBC and FOX. CNN’s bias, but much less than those. They present all of the information on a bias way, rather than cut out half the story. So in the future, try CNN or the Onion which is CNN but written by comedians. Goodnight",Andrew_Cryin,e8nbouk,democrats
Thanks.,ghostheadx9,e8nbq1y,democrats
"""Trade wars are good, and easy to win!"" - A charlatan.",Alternative_Duck,e8mbm59,democrats
This is what happens one buys the education. Trump so called high IQ could not even fetch him even 10 points over the lowest SAT score. His dad bought him the Ivy League education. There is no doubt that he was the bottom of the class. ,ManchiBoy,e8lx8u9,democrats
"Its funny how in “real” life everyday citizen world, the stability and sanity of one’s life can be measured somewhat by the company you keep and the longevity of one’s relationships, both professionals and personal. Here we have this despot in the WH that operates a revolving door of friends and allies, coworkers and lieutenants, managers, employees, underlings and it changes every day..... look no further for signals of severe instability. He’s a con artist, mob boss, and street thug that falls in and out with other swamp creatures daily, depending on what suits his criminal purpose. ",usposeso,e8lx2jg,democrats
Fucking Bond villains. Hope the media blasts this ,Stupidiseverywhere,e8morf2,democrats
The Obama justice department would’ve sued their asses off. ,mbkthrowaway,e8mga8t,democrats
"Pennsylvania 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://www.pavoterservices.pa.gov/Pages/PollingPlaceInfo.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8mufsn,democrats
"They all realize nothing they say will change what POTUS says, so why bother?

If, as a Republican, you see a slow-moving landslide coming towards you, which is your first priority: warning others, or getting out of they way yourself? Taking any risk to erect some form of barrier is completely out of the question.",hrlngrv,e8mp32w,democrats
"Wisconsin 2018 Election 

[General Election Registration Deadline](https://myvote.wi.gov/en-us/registertovote): November 6, 2018 

[General Election](https://myvote.wi.gov/en-us/FindMyPollingPlace): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8q61ou,democrats
"If you're just inviting democrats, what's the point? You don't want debates. You want validation. You're not creating a forum for the exchange of ideas, you're creating an echo chamber.

&#x200B;

Trash.",mudlarker84,e8mr2g9,democrats
"Sorry to surprise you, but if you'll check my recent post history, you'll see invitations to conservatives, Republicans, even one to the alt-right in there. r/ConsensusDebate is truly intended to be a home for all. And I'd say even many Democrats have legitimate and interesting questions to debate between themselves that we'd love to host. ",Chackoony,e8mr8zk,democrats
"I would consider it, but it would depend on the sort of moderation. Typically whenever a conservative makes an irrefutable point on reddit, the moderators simply delete it. Is this trend going to be the standard on your thread?",mudlarker84,e8mrge2,democrats
"You should first apologize for making an assumption about the sub, and then you should politely ask questions.

No one owes you anything and it’s amazing how conservatives are perpetual snowflake victims wherever they go. Pathetic.

",VegaThePunisher,e8rm5q1,democrats
His gums are flapping. It's a dead giveaway.,wheezergeezer,e8mf0kq,democrats
Lyin Ted,Stupidiseverywhere,e8mbb83,democrats
"People are calling him that. Smart people.

Bigly people!",eric987235,e8mg8om,democrats
"VOTE, VOTE, VOTE

Also, I hope Kemp gets nailed to the wall for this.",Stupidiseverywhere,e8lz8rg,democrats
"So whatever happened to personal responsibility and accountability in the United States of America? Each person is responsible for their own choices and actions even if there's a crazy person preaching wild outlandish things. Blame everybody that you want it's nobody's fault but the people who chose act in ways that are radical and ILLEGAL. I guarantee you every single bad person out there had/has a political party that they supported. That doesn't mean the political parties bad because they're connected with them, it means they're bad and collected with that political party in a minor way. The people that are committing the actions are sick disgusting people that just so happen to support the Republican Party. Please don't let the actions of a few people with problems color your whole view of a party.",RedEyedReeferHunter,e8lnadx,democrats
[Link to the article](http://sugarcrushthebook.com/tag/gangrene/) ,GAMER_GIRL_POO,e8lz326,democrats
"The current leadership of said party is what's coloring most people's views. Granted not all Rs should be lumped together, but it doesn't help having the us vs them mentality on either side.",Stupidiseverywhere,e8lu010,democrats
"The shooter said himself that he doesn't see Trump as a nationalist, but as a globalist. So I don't even think he supported Trump to begin with.",Strawberryweeb,e8lq7le,democrats
"Well , Trump owns the Republican Party now like John Boehner said earlier ""It's Trump Party now because Republicans are taking a nap somewhere else.""

Moreover Trump owns all the crazies now that the G.O.P. owned before. And these Trump and Republican crazies are going around on zombie moods right before the Halloween.

Just like the movie ""Night of the Living Dead"" 3 of these zombies got caught in 3 days in a row. 
One for sending live bombs to 12 prominent Democrats.
One for killing 2 innocent and older Black folks in Louisville, KY.
And the last one for killing 11 Jewish worshippers in a synagogue.

Now do you really think that we Democrats are overreacting?

I don't think so.",ihatejoemcCarthy,e8lx7a5,democrats
"He doesn't think Trump is extreme enough. Weather or not he's a trump supporter, hes still a far right nutcase that needs major help. 

Mental health needs to be take more seriously in the US.

https://lawandcrime.com/high-profile/alleged-synagogue-shooter-robert-bowers-endorsed-gop-talking-point-that-jewish-groups-funded-migrant-caravan/",Stupidiseverywhere,e8ltqt0,democrats
Okay so all these separate events did Trump or anybody in the Republican Party order those events to happen? Or did these people just so happen to try and take matters in their own hands and break the law and do immoral things to others?it's not the party it's the people with problems in their heads it's an individual issue not a party issue.,RedEyedReeferHunter,e8lyz27,democrats
Actually the killer has some anti trump statements he’s adamant about - just sayin,Tekshow,e8mb7vp,democrats
"Trump gave them an aura of invincibility by talking to their demons directly. 
Trump had shown his presidential credentials to give them the impression from early on that he'll protect all his crazies no matter what. 
He's the one who told them at all his rallies,""If you beat up these protesters, don't worry. I'll pay for your lawyer.""

Now his crazies think their messiah / president Trump will get them out of jails too even after they committed these heinous crimes.",ihatejoemcCarthy,e8lzp0w,democrats
"No he didn’t. 

He subscribed to the hysteria over the caravan, which trump was pushing.

Trump has blood on his hands. 
",VegaThePunisher,e8rn3u5,democrats
"You have some interesting logic! So if this was all Trump's fault, does this mean someone else is responsible for everyone else's actions? There is no self accountability? Who should we blame for the Steve Scalise shooting? What about the Gabby Giffords shooting?",SevereSpot,e8ml1x6,democrats
"Maybe but it ain’t the blood of the people at this synagogue. Trump visited Pittsburg almost immediately, his son in law is Jewish... but spin whatever narrative you like. 

https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.bbc.com/news/amp/world-us-canada-46038898",Tekshow,e8tb2zk,democrats
"Trump is naming his enemies and the crazies are targeting them.

He even refused to denounce white nationalism.

Stop carrying his water.

",VegaThePunisher,e8rn2dp,democrats
"Did he denounce the white nationalism that caused the mass murder in Pittsburgh?

Why did the families shun him?
",VegaThePunisher,e8tbtzg,democrats
"Interesting logic again eh! We all carry our own water mate. You're responsible for your own actions and sadly your not seeing this is being made political by the media. If I break the law it isn't your fault, the media's fault, not the fault of the violent video game I just got done playing, not the fault of the music I'm listening too, and definitely not the fault of the movie I just watched. It's my fault... Be careful who you point your finger at! ",SevereSpot,e8v1yoq,democrats
"...And understand, both sides are playing dirty! Don't refuse to see it!",SevereSpot,e8v28d2,democrats
"Pennsylvania 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://www.pavoterservices.pa.gov/Pages/PollingPlaceInfo.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8mufuv,democrats
He really needs those rallies. ,hwkns,e8lhf81,democrats
Pathological liar,caligirl2287,e8lrkcn,democrats
"Yea, no shit. ",DrMaxUrban,e8m6h0k,democrats
"Woke Frum, after supporting conservative nutcases for years, realizes this is the end result.",wwabc,e8li79f,democrats
You might also try posting this in r/Pennsylvania_Politics and r/Pennsylvania.,wenchette,e8lu4cz,democrats
"Incase it helps others, I contacted them with my correspondence number and they were able to confirm that they had my ballot and it will be counted.  ",phandam,e8ocsi3,democrats
"Thanks, will do
",phandam,e8mlmn9,democrats
Trump has failed in his biggest promise -- to protect the homeland against terrorism. A complete and total failure.,therecordcorrected,e8m1cnq,democrats
I have a higher chance of fairies flying out of my ass than Trump apologizing ,Stupidiseverywhere,e8m56xs,democrats
Answer the main question first: ***does*** Trump want to become a true leader? Or does he prefer to remain divider-in-chief?,hrlngrv,e8mfk5w,democrats
Does Will Ferrell live in GA? Because that’s awesome.,SenorCaimain,e8izwoa,democrats
Will... please go and spend some time in UGA and Georgia Tech to tell the importance of voting to the young voters. ,ManchiBoy,e8j1tqp,democrats
Countdown until Republicans start saying Will Ferrell is washed up and should shut his mouth ,Slntrob,e8j46ma,democrats
Thank you to one of my favorite actors.,1shunthesun,e8j1j8m,democrats
Is this real? Please be real.,Illpaco,e8j1viq,democrats
"Georgia 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](http://elections.sos.ga.gov/Elections/advancedVotingInfo.do): October 15-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://www.mvp.sos.ga.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8j2173,democrats
They could've at least set him up on miniVAN,PonderousHajj,e8ja8rv,democrats
MAGAts telling him to stick to acting in 3...2...1...,Stupidiseverywhere,e8j1y63,democrats
Unfortunately I didn't get to see him but my boyfriend did at the varsity in Kennesaw georgia today! It's really cool that he's helping out with Stacey Abrams and Sarah Riggs amico!!,totally_jawsome,e8jgkj1,democrats
Any idea what area he's canvassing?,Solanace,e8j9no6,democrats
I'm Cam Brady and I seductively approve this message.,toughguy375,e8j3bek,democrats
Ron Burgundy for President ,jackredrum,e8j28e3,democrats
If I pretend to be the R word would you please come to my door??? ,jesskat007,e8j5hqy,democrats
Ricky I was high when I said that! ,BootyUnlimited,e8jbc7j,democrats
He's got baggies on his feet.,willflameboy,e8jn5jy,democrats
"“Oh hell, Son, I was high that day. That doesn't make any sense at all, you can be second, third, fourth... hell you can even be fifth.”",sexylegs0123456789,e8jsjdb,democrats
"Whose forcing him to do this?

What do they know about him",Clownshow21,e8jxp5t,democrats
"I was being silly, I love Will Farrell. 😊",jesskat007,e8k9gor,democrats
Excuse me while I go and watch *Talladega Nights* for the 50th time. ,BlisterBox,e8kb4xj,democrats
Can you imagine being the person who gets to walk around and hang out with Will Ferrell all day?! How freaking fun would that be?! ,alsoaprettybigdeal,e8k26gs,democrats
I wanna go fast!,Tangpo,e8jow00,democrats
That guy is so cool he has two first names,N3ME0U5,e8jtyvy,democrats
It is so cool to see a celebrity with a purpose,Amirasalam123,e8k35b4,democrats
"Hopefully he is better at politics than acting, cause damn.",YouNeedSlapped,e8k53na,democrats
Yea buddy! Wanna do karate?,jafishak011,e8j6juc,democrats
"Uhhhh, is it me or does he kind of look dead inside..?",Biffjohnson,e8j2y6h,democrats
Good ole celebrities using their fame to persuade voters. Can't get more American than that. ,teslamagnetron,e8j7w99,democrats
[removed],,e8j5uwa,democrats
Gross,rand0m0mg,e8jf32f,democrats
Nah. probably shooting a movie here since we are becoming the Hollywood of the east coast,RedditfalconFan822,e8j9frt,democrats
I’m a Tech student. Early voted and encouraging as many people to vote as possible!,martinostino,e8j4a78,democrats
"Yes as a young voter, I think the reason why many of us don't vote is because at this point in time, politics is not something that's interesting to us, until we get a little bit older. But I am interested in politics myself, in fact, today I just found out my school has a democrat club! I'm joining it.",FlamingAshley,e8j23vd,democrats
And Southern and State. He was at kennesaw St today. ,bigdoc91,e8j5fex,democrats
"My husband (38) just went back to school for a 2nd degree. He asked a bunch of his younger classmates if they were planning on voting and every single one said no. None had good reasoning either, they just weren't. It seems like they do need help instilling the importance of voting.

We took our young kids with us to vote in the primaries. I never got to go as a kid though, it was treated as something private. My parents wouldn't even tell eachother who they voted for.",craponapoopstick,e8j2odo,democrats
"I heard a story the other day from Mark Kelly that he and his wife, Rep. Gabrielle Giffords, went to UNLV to try to register young people to vote. They had a really hard time registering people to vote - because 99% of people already were.

The culture of voting has changed so much in the last two years. Town halls are cool now. People actually want to go out and vote. It’s super great.",hufflepuffwhore,e8jxsw1,democrats
Countdown to Will Ferrell receiving a pipe bomb in the mail. Because I guess that’s where we are now. ,nobody99356,e8jclp4,democrats
Oh it's real. ,Dungeon-and-dragon,e8j65w5,democrats
"Canvasser high-five.

Next election season, they need to improve accuracy on maples address, and including a routing function.",MaresEatOatsAndDoes,e8jkdd9,democrats
But they elected Trump. Smh.,mishagorby,e8jbny6,democrats
"I tried to find out. I think North Central GA, Forsyth County?",RDay,e8jl3k4,democrats
Stay classy San Diego,N3ME0U5,e8jty6r,democrats
"Canvassers wouldn’t go to doors of people registered for the other party, normally. Time is best spent getting supporters out to vote, and talking to voters on the fence who might be open to commuting to your candidate or issue. And then contacting them again to remind them to vote.",MaresEatOatsAndDoes,e8jkbeg,democrats
Like the President?,RDay,e8kbb38,democrats
It’s you.,barrelfever,e8j3lz1,democrats
A celebrity is literally our president. It's also not the first time that's happened. ,totally_jawsome,e8jgjro,democrats
You're brigading on our sub and you call us the loser? Pretty interesting.,FlamingAshley,e8j7afs,democrats
"He showed up to a random NC State tailgate and went knocking on doors in Durham leading up to the 2016 election. So while it’s possible he’s filming in the area, my guess is no. I think he just likes to get involved. 

Edit:
To clarify, he was specifically at the tailgate to campaign for Hillary / Roy Cooper. ",WorthyJefe,e8jcncw,democrats
Wait what? You are?,andreagassi,e8jxjrl,democrats
I wish my younger son from your school does that too. Is there a voting place in Tech? The elder son(also from Tech) who is doing internship in Greensboro NC did postal ballot. ,ManchiBoy,e8j4qd5,democrats
"I'm not sure what young people you're referring to. I'm 28 years old, most of my friends are between 26-30, I'm the only one who votes every year.

Their reason is never ""I'm not into politics,"" I mean these are people who pay taxes, send their children to public school, have ACA insurance, ect. Their reason is always the same, ""my vote doesn't count."" In my opinion that's a bullshit, cop-out excuse, but I can't convince them to vote. I've even shown them examples of when votes have **literally** been determined by a coin flip because the vote ended in a tie, and yet their rebuttal is always, ""has that happened here?""

I wish I knew a way I could convince these people to vote, but nothing I say seems to matter to them. Hell I'm in NC and there's a constitutional amendment on the ballot which will give our state one of the most strict voter ID laws in the country, and nobody I know gives a shit.",Weav1t,e8jcpcz,democrats
">politics is not something that's interesting to us

Seriously? Forget the word ""politics,"" for a bit and think about the *issues* local and federal governments should be dealing with. Is the legal right for a woman to choose a safe abortion of interest? Is clean water? A healthy planet? How about being able to afford an operation for a kidney stone or appendicitis attack? How are the bridges and roads you drive on? Ever hear of the bridge collapse in Minneapolis? Do you think the idea of creating energy from wind or solar is compelling? Should going to college be more affordable without being saddled with a lifetime of debt pique your interest at all?

Good for you for joining your democrat club. Align your moral compass to issues that affect your city, state, region, country, and world and you'll be hooked.

Edit: fine tuning; typo",fairwayks,e8j5nnl,democrats
Do young people need health care? Do they pay taxes? Do they pay student loans? Do they buy stuff? Could they be drafted? Do they have family that care about any of the above? ,tevert,e8j78y1,democrats
Thank you for getting involved. ,WarWeasle,e8joyfs,democrats
"Don’t get discouraged or become reactionary when you get buzz sawed by the machine politics. There’s a whole other side to politics... 

It’s a dark, ghoulish underbelly where there dwells a specter.....a specter that has been haunting the planet and sending fear into the hearts of the powerful for a hundred years. 


",ThePartyDog,e8jpgfj,democrats
"You do not speak for young voters, at all",BROLYBTFOLOL,e8jctq3,democrats
"*slaps cheeks like Macaulay Culkin* 

NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO",notmyrealname1983,e8jm5ed,democrats
And worship Reagan. ,belinck,e8k0thz,democrats
"They elected Trump...and Reagan...and Fred Thompson...and Arnold Schwarzenegger...and Sonny Bono...and Fred Grandy...and Shirley Temple Black...

But entertainers should stay out of politics, right?",DustinBones13,e8k3vlg,democrats
"Most of them didn’t want to. Much like most Democrats didn’t want Hillary. 

A product of the primary process means the candidate with the greatest power base early on will win. Competition drops out and the winner gains the majority of the needed votes. As an example, Kasich got almost 50% of the primary votes in Ohio. But subsequent elections, Trump gained momentum, but never a majority. ",Machismo01,e8jn040,democrats
"I'm serious though. Like, his smile and stance seems really awkward, i dunno, I'm just speculating I guess",Biffjohnson,e8j4yff,democrats
Glad he was able to help boot out Rat McCrory. He lost the state a few thousand high-paying tech jobs.,SalsaRice,e8jhytj,democrats
"For two days last week there was an early voting poll at the Ferst Center. For some reason it was only available for those two days. Other than that, he can request an absentee ballot, early vote at any available location in the county, or vote on Election Day. ",martinostino,e8jl4fn,democrats
"Greensboro has some sweet heroin, I'm sure your boy is having fun. ",ParaplegicDogRapist,e8kxmzs,democrats
"That's anecdotal, it doesn't really prove much. What I said was also anecdotal, so it wasn't meant to be as a general consensus. There are some surveys and studies out there that can probably examine the general consensus of young voters more accurately, what I've found is generally according to these studies, young voters feel like most laws dont affect young voters as much as they do older voters, which is why theres a higher turnout for older voters. There isn't just one reason though, I'm just giving an example of what I researched.



But I do hear alot of ""my vote doesn't count"" thing, idk why people feel like that.",FlamingAshley,e8jdchd,democrats
"I wholeheartedly agree every word you said. From my experience my peers and classmates have said during class discussions that the reason they don't vote is because most of the things being voted for dont affect them as much, for young people, as they do for older people. Things like healthcare, young people are usually ""healthy"" so they dont think about healthcare issues until they're older,  or you mention the collapsing bridge, not many of millenials and post millennials drive as much previous generations. Thats one big reason why young people are just unintetested. Although my entire statement is based a few class discussions in sociology. Nevertheless, I disagree with them because even policies like social security, it doesnt effect us young people but voting for people to keep in place will help us in the future and will help others as well. I wont wait until im 30 to start being involved when laws affect me more than in the past, im 21, I will vote for my present and for my future as well.",FlamingAshley,e8j6u51,democrats
[deleted],,e8j7l91,democrats
"That's why I said ""I think"" not ""I know"". Don't try to correct a flaw that doesn't exist.",FlamingAshley,e8jcyde,democrats
But Kasich won the primary in the state he was governor. ,belinck,e8k0v6c,democrats
He HATES taking photos from what I've heard. ,DayOff4Superman,e8jn3f3,democrats
You're stretching here.,-Curious_Potato-,e8joh9u,democrats
He’s a democrat,rand0m0mg,e8jfi9z,democrats
I am certain my boy would never touch. ,ManchiBoy,e8kzcmr,democrats
"I didn't mean to discount your statement, nor was I trying to be argumentative, I was simply stating that as a fact about my life.

When it comes to how politics effect my own life, it's much less than a lot of these people I know, be it them having children who are enrolled into a public school (and they won't research or vote on the members of their school board,) or people who sell marijuana (who won't research or vote on the county sheriff, where a current candidate wants to stop sentencing for intent to sell marijuana.)

Hell I've even tried to guilt trip my best friend into voting by saying he obviously doesn't care about the future of his children if he doesn't even care about who's running the school his child is attending, and once again his argument is always ""my vote doesn't count.""

I'm simply at a complete loss on how to convince someone like him to vote. I feel like it should be easier to convince someone to vote on a county level where ~80,000 votes is on the high end in terms of voter turnout.

Personally I've voted in every single election since I've been eligible, which was 2008, and yet I can name a dozen people who've never cast a ballot. I guess it wouldn't irk me so bad if it wasn't for the state that I live in, where gerrymandering is a huge problem so the general assembly is nearly always a Republican majority while the governor is generally a Democrat. But measure such as one of the constitutional amendments they're trying to pass will make it to where the General Assembly gives the Governor a list of candidates he can appoint to the Supreme Court, rather than the Governor choosing and then the GA approving his appointment. (Which all 5 living former Governors, Republican and Democrat, say you should vote against.)

I'm not sure what state you live in, but the current constitutional amendments on the ballot in NC are downright power grabs by the Republican controlled General Assembly to strip powers from the Democratic Governor. If you're interested you should read up on them at [ACLU of North Carolina's website.](https://www.acluofnorthcarolina.org/en/news/election-protect-our-state-constitution-vote-against-every-amendment) Hell, some of them are so vague and worded so poorly on the ballot that even uninformed Democrats will probably vote yes on quite a few of these amendments.",Weav1t,e8je3mw,democrats
"It feels a bit weird that the younger generation doesn't care about bridges and roads collapsing because they don't drive. They still have to take public transportation, Uber/Lyft, ride their bikes on those roads and bridges so will be on them if something happens. Perhaps that is something to bring up in your next discussion. ",purplemonkey_123,e8jb1j0,democrats
"Net neutrality, marijuana, human rights for asylum seekers, people who are LGBTQ, and a host of others.

I know we're all in the choir here, but the conservative elites are attacking policies that millennials care about too, if they have an awareness of them. ",faedrake,e8jn3q5,democrats
"Oh yeah right on, my questions were more rhetorical - ammunition for those who don't have it :)",tevert,e8j85he,democrats
Why do you think that then? You obviously believe it.,BROLYBTFOLOL,e8jefvl,democrats
"Yeah true, that will definitely wear out someone's spirit.",Biffjohnson,e8jx53n,democrats
"Is gerrymandering even legal? Now I kinda understand where your friend is coming from but that does not excuse ""my vote never counts"" statement. My state is Maryland, pretty much a heavy blue state. I will look on the website right now and get back to you on that.",FlamingAshley,e8jefq7,democrats
"Oh okay haha. But they are very good questions, and we young voters need to really step it up.",FlamingAshley,e8j87k0,democrats
"Don't tell me what I do and don't believe, I dont know why you're interrogating me like I commited a crime. If you must know, it's because of my anecdotal experiences, My peers either are not interested in politics or it's not on their mind. I've even brought up the midterm elections to acquaintances, and I generally get a ""eh, not too big on politics"" or ""I only vote during General Elections"".",FlamingAshley,e8jelpd,democrats
"You know people are allowed to have different political beliefs without it reflecting on their character, right?",barrelfever,e8jyque,democrats
">Is gerrymandering even legal?

Not exactly, it wasn't illegal officially until the [US Supreme Court found our gerrymandered voting districts to be unconstitutional.](https://www.reuters.com/article/us-north-carolina-districts-court/us-court-says-north-carolina-gerrymander-is-illegal-seeks-new-congressional-map-idUSKCN1LD026)

>Republicans in 2016 won 10 of the 13 House districts - 77 percent of them - despite getting just 53 percent of the statewide vote, nearly the same result as in 2014.

I'm not aware if the voting districts have been redrawn as of yet, but we'll see as the General Assembly will still get the final say, and they've been very unashamed about how they manipulated the district lines.

I would hope the Supreme Court decision would put the fear of God into them, but with Trump being president and a now Republican leaning Supreme Court, I'm not so certain.",Weav1t,e8jeriu,democrats
"ONE question = interrogation. What a time to be alive. HOW ABSOLUTELY DARE YOU, SIR! ",BROLYBTFOLOL,e8jg6pj,democrats
Not true. Going left is the path of willful ignorance and corporate worship. Those are both very bad qualities to have.,Biffjohnson,e8jyuy3,democrats
"You do know interrogating and questioning someone is the same thing right? Any question you ask is an interrogation. That is a madam to you, btw not that it matters. Anyways have a good day or night.",FlamingAshley,e8jgaxb,democrats
I thought republicans were the ones who deregulate things and cut taxes for rich people. I’m confused. What’s the willfully ignorant stuff?,barrelfever,e8jyzl2,democrats
[removed],,e8jgfwy,democrats
"Confusion is your natural state, which is exactly what your masters desire. Become stronger by trying to learn why almost all republicans are happy, and leftists are in a permanent state of rage, confusion, and fury. Stay frosty buddy, I've got work to do so I'm outta this thread. Cya",Biffjohnson,e8jzjz6,democrats
"Professional victim? You've made alot of false claims about me tonight, I think its time to wrap up the bullshit. You can't tell sarcasm through words either, but whatever makes you fall asleep at night.",FlamingAshley,e8jgjjp,democrats
"Haha, okay bro. Sorry you have so much hate in your heart, have a good day at work.",barrelfever,e8jzpod,democrats
"What's up? ""If government health insurance will pay literally any price to a hospital for an insured individual, the hospital can keep asking for more and more money from our government and our taxes""

I don't think you understand how healthcare works. But then again, you're a TD poster and you call people NPC'S. Go whine about being censored some more. ",ParaplegicDogRapist,e8kyd1p,democrats
I'm the one who can't wear a MAGA hat out in public without being harassed :(,Biffjohnson,e8l3mbe,democrats
"Pennsylvania 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://www.pavoterservices.pa.gov/Pages/PollingPlaceInfo.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8mug04,democrats
[removed],,e8lmz40,democrats
Piss off. He hated Trump because he didn't hate Jews enough.,therecordcorrected,e8lu23u,democrats
But we all know this is a dem conspiracy to make republicans look bad before the election. /s,backpackwayne,e8l7li7,democrats
"And people say we're the violent, racist, anti Semitic ones. Very depressing week ",kerryfinchelhillary,e8lnr49,democrats
It's projection. They think it will cover for their bullshit.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8lvliw,democrats
He is a bad bad president. Vote ,uporondrocks,e8lb2sl,democrats
I miss him as a leader ,bglemommy,e8kmsdo,democrats
"I remember the day after the 2016 election when everyone at my work, mostly women, were talking about how she possibly could have lost. All the different reasons. And I just said, ""Yeah all of that I guess, but also. They just didn't like her. Just like they just don't like us (meaning women)... and they don't need a reason."" It got dead fucking silent. ",doyoueven-no,e8lmz1f,democrats
This is perfect. I know so many people who insist they aren't like him. That doesn't matter because they've proven they're okay with it.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8loa3u,democrats
Trump is the full deal. You'll get heartburn & then the runs. Ditch him & his sycophants in congress & senate. ,Perspective2018,e8kr9w2,democrats
"The bomber was a psycho already but he was motivated into action by trump the megalomaniac ‘s constant garbage into twitter and the airwaves hating anyone against him. 

Two sorry more years of the moron",blove1150r,e8kp9ox,democrats
"Exactly... Trump said -on camera- he understood ISIS better than the generals. Pull the comments! Play them. 

When heard Trump make this statement I thought WTF he was either not sworn in yet or recently sworn in. He hadn't even chooses Mattis yet ",Perspective2018,e8knfqz,democrats
"> Two sorry more years of the moron

Not if we can get a Democratic majority to impeach/imprison him and his cohorts...",PraxisLD,e8ksfcz,democrats
Please list the 67 senators who will vote to remove him from office.,eric987235,e8kv8vg,democrats
Give it some time...,PraxisLD,e8kvvad,democrats
Faith is good,blove1150r,e8lju4s,democrats
"And donating, volunteering, and voting is better...",PraxisLD,e8lldwv,democrats
"Pennsylvania 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://www.pavoterservices.pa.gov/Pages/PollingPlaceInfo.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8n8afo,democrats
"Pennsylvania 2018 Election 

[General Election](https://www.pavoterservices.pa.gov/Pages/PollingPlaceInfo.aspx): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8mugfs,democrats
[removed],,e8l2gyu,democrats
"2mo account spouting false moral equivalency ""they're all the same"" bullshit. Nobody is buying it.",evdacf,e8l4zzw,democrats
Lets hope that Rashida Jones and Wil Farrell's appearance in Georgia can push Stacy Abrams over the finish line to VICTORY!,TheDebbie,e8l07l5,democrats
"Georgia 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](http://elections.sos.ga.gov/Elections/advancedVotingInfo.do): October 15-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://www.mvp.sos.ga.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8ldc1p,democrats
Trump could send Army Special Forces into Mexico to stop the caravan. That'd put it back on page 1. /s,hrlngrv,e8l87a5,democrats
Good. I hope he loses sleep like I have for the last 2 years.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8l7i8h,democrats
I'm not buying it,Strawberryweeb,e8lnwcd,democrats
I'm not buying it,Strawberryweeb,e8lnwpc,democrats
"Iowa 2018 Election 

[General Election Registration Deadline](https://mymvd.iowadot.gov/Account/Login?ReturnUrl=%2fVoterRegistration): October 27, 2018 

[General Election](https://sos.iowa.gov/elections/pdf/absenteeballotapp.pdf): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8lapex,democrats
Yeah I heard the synagogue was wearing a short skirt and had been drinking. Oh wait. ,doyoueven-no,e8ln34n,democrats
"How exactly do terrorists illustrate our ""disunity""?

We are unified *against the terrorists* and their Republican masters.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8l4hu2,democrats
[removed],,e8l5ot8,democrats
"What is it with you people and compulsive lying?

Your own link literally talks about the fact that he doesn't think Trump is right-wing enough, and spouting racist conspiracy theories about the immigrant caravan.

",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8l63kg,democrats
https://lawandcrime.com/high-profile/alleged-synagogue-shooter-robert-bowers-endorsed-gop-talking-point-that-jewish-groups-funded-migrant-caravan/,Stupidiseverywhere,e8l5w5n,democrats
He didn't comprehend the article. He's a fucking moron all around. Says the dumbest things.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8l66ke,democrats
[removed],,e8l65f7,democrats
Hahahahahahahaha you're a nutcase Boris. That's why I love you.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8l6b7i,democrats
"One is free speech 

The other is a felony.",backpackwayne,e8kf8na,democrats
When violent crimes are the result of grandstanding and disinformation campaigns for political gain is yelling at the people responsible wrong? They should not feel comfortable in public until they work to fix the problems they help create.,angryvetguy,e8khv15,democrats
1000000% agree. Fuck them if they fuck over their countrymen.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8kjg52,democrats
"Voted yesterday, wife voted today! I'm taking anyone in my fam that wants to vote all weekend.",Stupidiseverywhere,e8k0vk0,democrats
Thanks for doing your part! Doing all I can to get my family and friends in Texas to vote for Beto! ,thedogwasindiana,e8k87wm,democrats
"Texas 2018 Election 

[Early Voting Starts](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): October 22-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

[Check Your Voter Registration Status](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do)

",election_info_bot,e8ks6ik,democrats
"It was amazing. So far my county is one of the most conservative ones in the state BUT early voting here has broken records. So far we have 60,000 registered voters here in my county with close to 11,000 that have voted early with still a week left of early voting.",Anthonym82,e8kusw2,democrats
Beto has made more trips down here than Ted. It was unusual for Ted to campaign down here but he had to.  He's getting nervous in his own back yard,Anthonym82,e8kuvut,democrats
Pathological liar,caligirl2287,e8luthw,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8l6dfp,democrats
"With no sarcasm intended.

The US has an electoral system which prevents extremes which parliamentary systems can reach. Besides, Nazis didn't secure power until von Hindenburg died and Hitler assumed presidential powers in addition to his party controlling the Reichstag. If you want to work with analogies, that would correspond to the 2016 general election. Republican's haven't done such a good job securing control, though they've done a fine job packing the courts.

Also, back in the 1920s and early 1930s, several political parties in Germany had *security* for their political adjitators. The NSDAP's SA may have been the largest, but it was certainly the most trained and disciplined. Trump's more violent fans are many things, but trained and disciplined they ain't.

The US isn't going to become Nazi Germany. It won't even become fascist Spain. At worst it may become a banana republic. To be serious, I can't see the US military supporting any sort of take-over, and without military support, Republicans can make it harder for their opponents to kick them out of office but not impossible.

If the young (18-30 year olds) can't find it in them to vote in historically high numbers, we're screwed. If the young believe they'd be screwed either way (voting or not), then Democrats have already lost, and a period of prolonged Republican rule may be the catharsis needed to change the country.",hrlngrv,e8kbthl,democrats
"I'm super happy to see some discussion here. I think maybe I can drag myself bank from the edge if the Congress swings heavily blue and voter turnout is amazing. If it turns deep crimson, that's probably when I'll panic. ",kingbloop,e8l8snu,democrats
About 18 years ago.,DiscHorse,e8ka6c5,democrats
"The US's federal system applies most to elections. There is no single federal election authority. Not even the Supreme Court. There were 2 outcomes which could have come from Florida in 2000: the Florida secretary of state certified Bush the winner or certified no winner. SCOTUS does not have the power to compel state secretaries of state to certify election winners.

Florida certifying Bush the winner gave Bush a majority of Electors, so the presidency. Florida not certifying a winner would have thrown the election to the House of Representatives. The House had a Republican majority after the 2000 election, even when voting by state. IOW, Bush would still have become President.",hrlngrv,e8kc636,democrats
"Yes, the Nazis also rose to power in a mostly legal fashion, with help from existing Conservative movements. Adherence to constitutional law doesn't mean anything. That SCOTUS decision was both legally sound and disastrous for this country. I don't see what point you're arguing.",DiscHorse,e8kjazy,democrats
"My point is that G W Bush as 43rd POTUS was unavoidable given the way US politics and election law actually work. IOW, it wasn't the work of the Republican Party which made Bush POTUS, it was the system in place at the time. If you believe that's when fascism in the US ***manifested*** itself, you'd need to go further back to point out when the circumstances were put in place to allow that manifestation.

Additionally, Al Gore didn't give up. He realized there was no way to win short of eviscerating the US constitutional order.",hrlngrv,e8kkwbm,democrats
"I'm not implying that was the moment tht fascism ~magically~ manifested itself, I'm saying that was the moment that the inadequacies of our constitution became abundantly clear, and the GOP fully realized that the electoral and judicial system could be legally manipulated to gain de facto authoritarian control. 

The Constitution may have been a bold, comprehensive governing document at its' inception, but it is woefully lacking in the modern era. The elevation of ""order"" as an inherent, self-justifying good devalues considerations of representation and justice. Alongside a cravenly and opportunistic Conservative party, this is a significant factor in how we've arrived where we are, and how the Nazi rose to power in Germany.

The United States began as an oligarchical white supremacist state; unsurprisingly our Constitution always seems to guide us back to that.

The point I am trying to make is not that the GOP has been a full-blown fascist party since 2000, simply that in light of the current political climate in the country it would be fair to retroactively compare our fall to that of Germany starting around 18 years ago.",DiscHorse,e8ksoj2,democrats
"I'm not convinced SCOTUS ruled incorrectly in Bush v Gore. To the greatest extent possible, courts should stay out of elections. I understand you consider than an inadequacy. I don't.

Given Obama's 2 terms, that's some awfully ineffective authoritarian control.

The Constitution is a creature of its time, the late 1700s. Blame succeeding generations rather than the founding one for serial inability to modernize it.

I also take issue with *the US began as an oligarchical white supremacist state*. Not least because the US began as rather loose federation of state**s** (plural). It's no accident of archaic grammar that before the Civil War it was *the United States ___are___* and after the Civil Wat it's been *the United States ___is___*. The political systems in South Carolina and New Hampshire were considerably different. There are records of African Americans voting in New Hampshire in the 1700s. OTOH, one needed to own property to vote in South Carolina, and one needed to own certain numbers of slaves to hold elective office in the state.

Finally, there's nothing wrong with the Constitution which higher voter turnout would moderate or eliminate. Belief that voting won't matter is rather self-defeating considering it hasn't really been tried  (75% turnout in presidential elections, 67% turnout in midterms) recently.

If the US is analagous to Germany from 1920, the similarities began with the 1972 election and Nixon's Southern Strategy. However, given what North Dakota is trying to do to the Sioux in this election, I figure Democrats going back to Jackson share a healthy serving of blame.",hrlngrv,e8l2r6c,democrats
Hmmm Jared & Ivanka... you helped to open a pandora  box. Good luck ,Perspective2018,e8kp963,democrats
Flip the house slow Trump down,blove1150r,e8knoei,democrats
"Cowardice runs deep, one must have empathy to understand what others are going through, personally if I was still serving I wouldn’t give to shits if he came to visit or not, I sure as hell didn’t when Nixon was President. ",walter1950,e8jshp4,democrats
"I wonder how many military personnel still support Trump, who still refuses to visit the troops. ",red_carpet_hero,e8junks,democrats
[removed],,e8kbktj,democrats
I think you have it wrong as to whom is stupid. Now someone that spends all their time in /r/orks living in their parents' basement should really think about who they call stupid also.,therecordcorrected,e8kfqmf,democrats
Yeah in eight year nothing current administration was what eight weeks until the whole Flynn thing,bergerac121,e8jo0hd,democrats
I am sure Fox News will come up with a lie about this. ,red_carpet_hero,e8juq6c,democrats
"""Hostile invaders""? Does that term sound familiar?",therecordcorrected,e8kfb7t,democrats
"^The linked tweet was tweeted by [@HuffPostPol](https://twitter.com/HuffPostPol) on Oct 27, 2018 18:18:08 UTC (31 Retweets | 29 Favorites)

-------------------------------------------------

Robert Bowers, an avowed anti-Semite, allegedly shouted “All Jews must die!” before killing at least eight people at the Tree of Life Congregation. [http://huffp.st/uqJrrRx](http://huffp.st/uqJrrRx)

-------------------------------------------------

^^• Beep boop I'm a bot • Find out more about me at /r/tweettranscriberbot/ •",tweettranscriberbot,e8kfa2d,democrats
You know you fucked up when Barack starts calling you out,apt41790,e8j2kfd,democrats
Amen! This is absolutely so spot on as to what this is all about. Pretty scary times.,jlo1510,e8in4v2,democrats
"Hey, I drive a White Van but other than that I am for POC to get out and vote. Am canvassing inner city neighborhoods and yeah, they want to vote! 
Stop the Terror! Vote All Republicans Out of Office!! ",data2dave,e8ia5hj,democrats
The president is radicalizing young white men before our eyes.  They are committing acts of terror on a regular basis.,deaconheel,e8iutum,democrats
What's new.,rosadaniela,e8i8wy4,democrats
"That goddamn young fascist rally in the Whitehouse today actually turned my stomach, an absolute abomination.",WeTrudgeOn,e8iuxmg,democrats
Punching nazis is political violence,ACannabisConnoisseur,e8j0xzp,democrats
"You sound like a bigot. There is hate and threats on both sides, and trump rallies are filled with people of all races.",Conserv_Liberal,e8it7dx,democrats
His first name should have been Adolph! Let's just call him Adolph Trump. ,Angelwells,e8jpq0f,democrats
[removed],,e8itwmv,democrats
yawn,oneinchterror,e8j1jb7,democrats
[deleted],,e8k1dp4,democrats
The racists are becoming more emboldened and may seemingly actualize on their beliefs more so now.  Perhaps the copycat effect goes into full swing?  ,brahmen,e8jel6a,democrats
"Being a Nazi is political violence. 

But that's besides the point. Point out one Democratic leader who advocated punching nazis? 

And so also you're admitting Trump is a Nazi?",FrankieGH,e8j8s07,democrats
I’m not calling you a bigot. But bigots think you’re a bigot. ,underbridge,e8iwgrw,democrats
You sound like you can't be older than 22.,therecordcorrected,e8j5h72,democrats
You are not doing a good job of proving your point. I was being fair an honest. You should try it.,Conserv_Liberal,e8iwma4,democrats
Is that supposed to be an insult?,icoolio22,e8j5j3b,democrats
[deleted],,e8k1fcz,democrats
Nah. U r dum,underbridge,e8iwnhg,democrats
Straight to name calling without a good argument. I was afraid that was going to happen. What happened to having a conversation?,Conserv_Liberal,e8iwqk8,democrats
I don’t have conversations with people that are dumb.  I am smart and make lots of money. ,underbridge,e8iwwxe,democrats
"Okay now I get. You're just trying to be funny.

I don't like when people make ignorant statements like what was said in this post. That is why I replied.

I'm not trying to be a jerk, I just want people to know the truth.",Conserv_Liberal,e8ixg1v,democrats
Oof I’m a dem and this wasn’t even good :/ ,,e8j1oor,democrats
"Context, this is OC, I recorded this last night at the event at Cass tech. Originally posted on r/Detroit. It was amazing and honestly still can’t believe I was in the same room as so many powerful people. From future governor Whitmer , AG holder, to POTUS. 6 November is gonna be interesting! Get out and vote and bring your friends, that was the Presidents main message. Don’t boo, vote.

Thanks to everyone who checked it out, feel free to browse the rest of my content on my channel if you’ve got some free time. Might interest you.",theguyfromuncle420,e8l3ta7,democrats
What if we are witnessing dementia in progress but the GOP congress refuses to skewer one of their own?,Nearbyatom,e8hxa24,democrats
"Yeah, rage tweeting at 3am will definitely stop the press from attacking the President.  This guy is such an idiot. ",90Carat,e8hq9ry,democrats
"I think he sent another tweet later in the morning bitching how Republicans are doing so good in early voting (and how would he know??) but the media is covering ""bomb stuff"" and not politics. Ridiculous.",FloridaGirlNikki,e8hzal7,democrats
Dems outta get on board with branding Trump as a ‘Radical Republican’ whose followers are unhinged and afraid to stand up to him.,ThunderBucket970,e8hzl5a,democrats
"His tweets don't seem to be hurting him, they seem to be helping him which is bizarre.

When will the media decide they should stop giving the tweets air time and they should focus on the elections that are happening all over the country?",Conserv_Liberal,e8i2eug,democrats
What did he tweet?  Was it usually crazy for him?,Withnails,e8htwyr,democrats
"Tweets and farts at 3 a.m. in Trump's shit hole, what a gas!",BucknDoe,e8hnpos,democrats
"Sundowner
",greylensman312,e8itoyf,democrats
"I have a theory: In January 2017, the Chinese turned down a major deal to invest BILLIONS in his and Kush-ty's realtor properties.

Billions. He's lost BILLIONS!

That'll be enough to send me over the edge.

and throw some tarrifs out to boot.....",ReginaldJohnston,e8i0sat,democrats
"I’m liberal, but I’m tired of both sides always throwing  mental illness into these situations. As someone who has bipolar disorder it’s just annoying hearing that. Maybe Trump is just crazy as fuck, not mentally ill. There will always be a stigma on  us anyway. Society will never learn. ",mcv75,e8imsh7,democrats
**r/VeryGoodBrain**,zelda-go-go,e8i90j5,democrats
He's a stable genius,shivaswara,e8hwrno,democrats
Read the book Insanity by psychiatrist Thomas Szasz. Labeling anyone as crazy helps no one ultimately. ,MichaelTen,e8is9rf,democrats
"He wasn't *elected* at all.

Goddammit, media.  He's threatening your lives and you still won't say ""unelected,"" ""treason"" or ""regime.""

WTF does it take to just talk squarely about the national reality?",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8ia8os,democrats
"And for those wondering why that would wanna bomb CNN, this is your answer. ",A-Fan-Of-Bowman88,e8iy3su,democrats
His first name should be Adolph! ,Angelwells,e8ihvva,democrats
What hasn't CNN panel been aghast at?,mlmack,e8iig5r,democrats
you're literally doing what he said in the tweet,Wihdenghi,e8imhdv,democrats
What if? Seriously?,OkToBeTakei,e8hxkqr,democrats
I agree the other day his wife had to stop him from leaving the room and to go back and sign an executive order. Something is not right with that guy.,LeaveMeAloneBruh,e8hzshi,democrats
"It already happen with Reagan. Maybe not with Congress, but many people on the Hill were well aware of his declining mental health but didn't dare speak about it publically.",saucercrab,e8hzqjd,democrats
"Have y’all read Bob Woodward’s book and heard the shit “his people” were doing to “steer him” to do the right thing (or not the wrong fucking thing)?

The man has so many pre-conceived notions, which no amount of data and facts, from the most qualified people, can change!!  That was really the point of Woodward’s book, in my opinion. 

So, yes, there is a bit of a “shadow govt” in the White House, making sure Trump doesn’t fucking take this country completely off the rails!!",ChodaRagu,e8i2u6o,democrats
I'm guessing you weren't alive during the Reagan years then?  The guy was as senile as could be & he got 8 years in power & the  Republicans still think he's a god. ,wwaxwork,e8hyx88,democrats
it doesn't matter he knows his base just wants anger it doesn't have to be tethered to reality.,Shivshanks,e8hy1zq,democrats
"Terrorist needs to be added. They need to run as many ads as they can of the bombers van and pictures of him at Trump rallies, labeling him a Radical Republican Terrorist. Just looking at this guy's van, that is the most accurate way to describe him. ",TheFatMan2200,e8i8skh,democrats
"> Dems outta get on board with branding Trump as a ‘Radical Republican’

Hi, Dem as shit here. That name is fucking awesome though and would lead to neon shirts with him kickflipping over mexicans.",SpiralTap304,e8ieusc,democrats
"I'm confused, isn't that exactly what they are doing?",Conserv_Liberal,e8i3iry,democrats
"When it stops being profitable to do so, which will be never. ",Khanstant,e8iy882,democrats
Liberal Media,Kwillsy,e8iautz,democrats
">	Funny how lowly rated CNN, and others, can criticize me at will, even blaming me for the current spate of Bombs and ridiculously comparing this to September 11th and the Oklahoma City bombing, yet when I criticize them they go wild and scream, “it’s just not Presidential!”

>	3:14 am, Oct. 26, 2018

Mostly just his usual petty stream of consciousness.",Annux,e8i0qeo,democrats
Exactly I don’t see the tweet anywhere in that article. ,Augustus420,e8hxt1d,democrats
You know that’s a good theory. I never thought this was all ego or simply narcissism. Has to be a money angle. ,docinlft,e8i62qy,democrats
"I agree completely.  He’s just a despicable, narcissistic asshole with the attention-span of a 5-year-old.  But he’s not mentally ill (beyond his personality disorder), and I don’t see his faculties declining yet.  Democrats underestimate him at their (our) own peril.   
[And as someone with a close family member with bipolar disorder, I can appreciate the pain this amoral prick has probably caused you.]",plasticdog1,e8iwov3,democrats
/s,Evil_Dick_Turder,e8hz6bk,democrats
[removed],,e8id22b,democrats
And for those wondering who and what kinda person would wanna bomb CNN... here's your perfect hivemind specimen.,FrankieGH,e8j96wf,democrats
25th amendment. But no one has the balls to do it. They’ll just keep running an openly-acknowledged shadow government around him. ,iwascompromised,e8hyqdm,democrats
"Yes I read it! It’s so fucked up, and the amount of times they tried to tell him that tariffs will not help and how the economy actually works. He was completely lost about the economy and just took Bannon and Navarro as the complete truth. Period. ",LioSaoirse,e8ii7zy,democrats
"Ah. Just because virtually every major move and decision the Reagans made was cleared in advance with a *totally normal* woman in San Francisco who drew up horoscopes for them doesn't mean his administrations policies weren't tethered in reality.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Joan_Quigley",Starfish_Symphony,e8ig69p,democrats
"The great communicator...............Wait...WTF? It was always just like the fucking moron now. I was always thinking ""am I hearing different stuff come out of this guys mouth than these people?""",WeTrudgeOn,e8i2fgz,democrats
That’s uncomfortably true...,PraxisLD,e8i6wab,democrats
But that still plays to his base.  I prefer Draft-dodger Donnie.  Try to erode a little of his military support.  ,plasticdog1,e8ivjqb,democrats
"Democrats are such wimps. It feels like that scene in braveheart where he says “they’d fight if you would only lead them”. Middle America would vote for them, if they’d only lead. I haven’t heard Beto say “lying Ted” once about Ted Cruz. ",twistedlimb,e8ifwuh,democrats
"This is entirely self-defeating.

Why not explore the ways to *alter* the profit motive to incentivize the kind of reporting you want to see out of the media? Is it really a foregone conclusion that bullshit gives ratings?",wave_327,e8j09ib,democrats
And this is why the Emoluments clause exists,Rubber_Rose_Ranch,e8iek7s,democrats
"> But he’s not mentally ill (beyond his personality disorder),

LOL.

""He's not crazy,,, beyond his obvious craziness""",FrankieGH,e8j9aua,democrats
"He took power in a rigged coup in the EC even apart from losing by millions of votes.

The media should report reality, and stop legitimizing the unelected tyrant who keeps threatening their lives.

Don't come to a Democratic sub and try to redefine the meaning of ""elected"" to mean its opposite.
",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8ideg2,democrats
Hive minded? I’m a liberal who wouldn’t wanna bomb anybody. I’m just saying that cnn needs to tone it down just a tiny bit,A-Fan-Of-Bowman88,e8kk4gn,democrats
"Yeeaah, it’s pretty obvious that that’s what’s been going on, pretty much from the start. That’s why it’s so important we all vote in a few weeks to try to get a Democratic majority in the House.",OkToBeTakei,e8i3bdx,democrats
Smart dog.,SpiralTap304,e8ixwwx,democrats
He brought it up in the debate. I agree Dems are wimps though. Sometimes I think they should borrow some Republican tactics but then I remember I don't want them acting that way. ,gatton,e8iknh0,democrats
"It is a forgone conclusion that sensationalism, fear mongering, and various other ways to take advantage of human psychology are extremely effective. We live in an age where the primary application of psychology is advertising and marketing and media. It is a fools errand to somehow think consumers can collectively bargain with capitalists to somehow make them act more ethically and responsibly. For us to have trustworthy media, we have to decouple it from capitalism. I have not seen a single sign that anything of the sort is even remotely under consideration by anyone.",Khanstant,e8jclyo,democrats
"Lol, right?

But seriously, based on your definition, most of the Republican Party in Congress would be crazy.  McConnell, Ryan, et al. just go about it differently, but have the same selfish goals.  Just because we hate somebody who’s selfish and cares only about themselves doesn’t make them mentally ill.   Trump has always been a bit of a dim-wit outside of the self-promotion and real estate worlds, and he says and does what seems helpful to himself at the time.   

We might think his policies are “crazy” (and they are from any unbiased point of view), but all he focuses on is making money, stroking his own ego, advancing his own interests, pandering to his supporters, and attacking his detractors and opponents.   And from that perspective, everything he does is rational.  Amoral?  Yes.  Corrupt?  Yes.  Lies, cheats, and steals?  Yes.  Despicable?  Yes.  Dangerous to our democracy?  Yes.  Ruinous for future generations? Yes.  But crazy from the perspective of advancing his own self-interests?  No.  

I’m paraphrasing, but the Atlantic wrote an article a few years ago where they said the media takes Trump literally but not seriously, while his supporters take him seriously but not literally.  That’s maddening to me, but it’s completely true.      If we want to remove Trump and everything wrong that he stands for, we need to start taking him more seriously (and less literally, given that most of what he says is a distortion of the truth or an outright lie anyway; focusing on the never-ending lies just takes up too much time and energy).  ",plasticdog1,e8k7wv6,democrats
Yeah. It’s dirty business but in my opinion they’re playing the same game half-assed. “We won’t call these violence inciting healthcare eliminating backwards looking people names”. It’s okay to say “scumbag” or “nature haters” or “anti technology”. (Thanks for the info about the debate btw),twistedlimb,e8ip05k,democrats
"NASCAR - Boogity boogity boogity

Murica!",backpackwayne,e8ky880,democrats
I need to get a AIDS screening after that. ,captainmo017,e8kyfol,democrats
Ew. ,doyoueven-no,e8ln8fz,democrats
"Donald J Trump, the father most Nazis wish they'd had.",hrlngrv,e8kam2i,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8kbswe,democrats
Fucnking monster. Hope he rots in jail.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8jygtf,democrats
"A magabomber and a magashooter, all in one week.",Kitakitakita,e8k3l89,democrats
He’s anti-Trump which you would know if you read more than headlines,AntiSharp,e8kaxor,democrats
"I looked at his gab.ai page. There's a difference between anti Trump and thinking even Trump doesn't go far enough.

I'm pretty sure if he had to choose, he'd still align himself with Trump.",Kitakitakita,e8kbodw,democrats
It's called campaigning and I understand your frustration. And I  promise it will get worse over these next few days. You can block them.,backpackwayne,e8kswaf,democrats
"They're at least putting up a front of doing something about it.

The FBI is the agency actually taking this seriously, Trump and his lackeys are scrambling to pretend like they're not responsible by agreeing with everyone that it's bad.",RadioMelon,e8j3c63,democrats
The administration is the biggest threat of all!,pasarina,e8jtblc,democrats
"I have to imagine that Trump isn't too popular in the FBI right now and doing things like this gives them a real thrill. Note in his speech to the conservative black group, he said ""law enforcement"" and never FBI.",therecordcorrected,e8j4wiv,democrats
"As far as I understand the FBI is just short of completely despising Trump both for his questionable behavior and possibly being the reason they were unable to get a new office.

If the latter is true, he might be breaking some very serious rules completely unrelated to any investigations related to him at all. He's not supposed to be directly trying to interfere with regular FBI business including their base of operations.",RadioMelon,e8jjooe,democrats
"If Republicans really cared about anything but themselves, they wouldn't be Republicans.

",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8j0y9n,democrats
LOL iPhone story is total bullshit fake news. The Beast used an unsecured email server on the public internet as a digital dead drop to sell state secrets to foreign parties. She committed treason and needs to be hanged. ,98977764321,e8j48sx,democrats
#burn,HVD3Z,e8j3bap,democrats
This is the underlying difference. It's not even about conserving anything any more. ,bcartier89,e8jgdrj,democrats
"> She committed treason and needs to be hanged.

WTF is wrong with people like you? Like honestly. Not only you do you peddle false information but the violence. So not surprised that one of sent all these bombs... that's the only way you know how to silence people you dion't agree with - violence and death. Pathetic. Small small people.",FrankieGH,e8j66cn,democrats
">The Beast used an unsecured email server on the public internet as a digital dead drop to sell state secrets to foreign parties.

Is that what you guys are calling her know? “The Beast”?

Also, you got a source for your claims?

>She committed treason and needs to be hanged.


The FBI checked her server *twice* and found no evidence of wrongdoing.

And treason isn’t punishable by death you fucking psychopath.",Ghdust2,e8j5uph,democrats
Fuck off Boris. You're full of shit.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8j5r13,democrats
"Other than infantile ego.  Republicans live up their own asses.

Everything that isn't up their asses with them, they deny even exists.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8jgf7n,democrats
Not much ,Perspective2018,e8kp6nk,democrats
I’m waiting for him to die so I can go piss in his grave.,AkiTendo,e8l0bsk,democrats
"Not a president.  Never was, never will be.

His actions just reinforce his status as an insurgent tyrant at war with his own country.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8id11v,democrats
And Fox News with definitely defend any and all comments made by Trump,red_carpet_hero,e8iol4g,democrats
"It's OK. When the time comes that Donald Trump is begging for mercy and compassion from whatever courtroom he's being tried in, the judge will be reminded of this. ",Pal_Smurch,e8ivszx,democrats
‘A harrrrraaaable thang (that I directly encouraged)’,Skeetronic,e8ixfvp,democrats
"He's a leader all right- for the worst America has to offer. For the bullies, ignorant, and the corrupt. ",comfort_fiend,e8igzzu,democrats
[removed],,e8iidy6,democrats
Didn't they all call threats against him or make fun of him on the reg?,Conserv_Liberal,e8iwau1,democrats
Keep telling yourself that if it makes you feel better I guess,pedantic_sonofabitch,e8ih5v2,democrats
Did you wander in here off the streets and just start babbling? Is it too cold to sleep under a cardboard box tonight?,therecordcorrected,e8ikx1j,democrats
"Please provide evidence of either of both. Please share when any of them threatened him, advocated violence towards him. Please go ahead.",FrankieGH,e8j2gij,democrats
"I'm telling *you*, and it clearly bothers you.

Just not in the way that it would bother anyone who supports democracy.  What bothers you isn't that it's true, but that it's being said.

So be prepared to hear it a lot more.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8ihwry,democrats
You post in /r/Libertarian. Nuff said.,therecordcorrected,e8ikn4o,democrats
Yeah it does. And it makes people like you feel like shit cause you know that the vast majority of the country doesn't buy in to his bullshit like you do. That's why you need to ask these questions.,FrankieGH,e8j2khh,democrats
"I asked a question. I didn't give a fact. I thought that Maxine Waters , Eric Holder and Hilary Clinton did recently. The New York times just published a picture of trump in cross hairs. Samantha be and snoop dog made videos about killing him.

People are trying to kill his children with poisoned envelopes.

People make fun of him on TV every day.

When I read the topic I was under the impression that he needed to apologize, but no one apologizes to him for all of the stuff he goes through. That is why I asked the question wondering why he has to apologize but nobody else is accountable. ",Conserv_Liberal,e8j4h6z,democrats
Interesting take... How is the weather in fantasy land? ,pedantic_sonofabitch,e8il0ds,democrats
[removed],,e8im92v,democrats
"I don't buy into his bullshit, but I'm not surprised at all that someone like you would jump to conclusions without any evidence whatsoever.  I wonder how many other stupid opinions you have that aren't based on facts or evidence. 

Go ahead and stay in your echo chamber and let me know how that goes for you. ",pedantic_sonofabitch,e8j3rl1,democrats
"Again, please provide evidence of any of these people threatening Trump.

""Making fun"" is not a threat. And it's not been made by any of the people who received bombs.

People are trying to kill his children? When? How?

And yes he does need to apologize because he's actually made inflammatory remarks towards most of these people. He's repeatedly called for reporters and members of the press to be knocked down. He encourages people to ""lock her up""....he's suggested that she would be attacked if the Secret Service left her.  what the hell has he gone through? Criticism isn't the same as violent threats. 

So please tell me how any of these people have physically threatened him?

Or you're saying that no one should say anything negative about him? 

And you put ""making fun"" of someone on the same level as threatening? Then in that case, Trump should apologize to all the people he's been making fun off . 

But again, please tell me how any of these people have threatened him?

Don't make up shit, The whole world isn't Trump's twitter account. ",FrankieGH,e8j4y0l,democrats
"You tell me - you're clearly someone who mainlines Trump's twitter feed, and thinks reality is ""Fake News.""",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8il8is,democrats
Talk about no grasp on reality. You post in /r/Libertarian the ultimate political fantasy land.,therecordcorrected,e8ilju5,democrats
"Says the tool defending the political philosophy that never will happen except in the mind of racists/Putin lovers like the Pauls. We don't need trolls defending, because you can't, the traitor, unindicted co-conspirator, ""it's like talking to a 4th or 5th grader.""",therecordcorrected,e8ioly6,democrats
"Keep wondering. That's all you've got. I'm not jumping to any conclusions. It's a statistically proven fact that the majority is against him. But that's lost on someone like you because you think you're clever but the more you talk the more you display your ignorance.

So yeah you go ahead trying to seem clever. Once you have some facts, why don't you try to prove yourself. Otherwise you're full of empty posturing and rhetoric and we all know how small you guys are.",FrankieGH,e8j5dcb,democrats
[removed],,e8j9672,democrats
"Since you're not bright enough to read what I wrote on that sub, it was arguing for the Democrat party view on immigration....so either you're a hypocritical piece of shit, or you admit that you live in fantasy land. Which one is it? ",pedantic_sonofabitch,e8iq3jk,democrats
[removed],,e8j68m8,democrats
"/r/democrats does not feature links to that website. Please don't post unreliable sources.'

*I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/democrats) if you have any questions or concerns.*",AutoModerator,e8j967d,democrats
Your name is true to form.,Vayne13,e8iqgus,democrats
"Well why don't you point out those conclusions I'm jumping towards but I guess you feel more empowered calling me dumb etc etc. Again, not one fact, just the same old insecure insults. Keep on going. Your insults don't mean shit to me. But your lack of  facts just shows me that you're full of shit. So yeah, keep on, my friend. It's fascinating to see someone appear progressively more like an idiot the more they talk and you've become a great example.",FrankieGH,e8j6gyz,democrats
...,LordGuille,e8nch14,democrats
We miss you so much,Ronson18,e8j4kwz,democrats
"I never voted for him, but he was a good president. ",Jebediah_Johnson,e8jgtlq,democrats
I really like that Obama is just calling it like it is...,PraxisLD,e8j6g7d,democrats
Because he protected her(Killery)  😂,salaros1,e8kajx1,democrats
[removed],,e8j6za3,democrats
"So? Manning should have been indicted as well as Snowden and Assange should rot in jail the rest of his life. And what horrible police did Obama allow? Did I miss the North Dakota law enforcement coming under Federal control? No I don't think so. And yes it is easy to say he committed ""plenty of war crimes"" but not actually easy to name a single one. Go back to your favorite sub /r/imgoingtoshellforthis ",therecordcorrected,e8j7mhy,democrats
Womp womp,fuck_your_red_hat,e8j7n0l,democrats
"> Manning should have been indicted

Why? for releasing a helicopter video where journalists are murdered for no reason by a scumbag us apache pilot? Pointing out the flaws in the way we conduct war is not a fucking crime. It needs to be out there.

> Snowden and Assange should rot in jail the rest of his life.

Again why? they revealed that on one hand the spying programs america uses are against the bill of rights and on the other hand he revealed how hillary and company were setting up the hillary nomination from day one, including giving questions to hillary in advance from donna brazile and how DWS was always pro-hillary and should not have been running the dnc in the first place. That's all the emails said. No reason for those people to rot in jail. Is it inconvenient for you to see the what goes on behind closed doors?

> And what horrible police did Obama allow?

Obama was head of the executive branch at one point. meaning if he wanted to he could pull funding from the entire department in ND if they chose to go to the protest with GRENADES and BLOW PEOPLE'S ARMS OFF. This isn't a war zone so the local police should not be holding weapons of war.

> it is easy to say he committed ""plenty of war crimes"" but not actually easy to name a single one.

https://www.cfr.org/blog/obamas-final-drone-strike-data

Also this data is a conservative estimate because during the obama admin they changed the rules so that many civilians that could not be identified were considered a 'hostile threat' and counted as an enemy combatant based on their AGE, not their identity. Imagine if the police ID a dead body as a 'gang member' based on their age? Even the conservative estimates are too damning.",Speedracer98,e8j8inp,democrats
"My life doesn't revolve around tools. But to send you back into your room before you go back to your high school class on Monday:

Manning: **Afghan War documents leak** -- Informants were released and Assange said ""Well, they're informants. So, if they get killed, they've got it coming to them. They deserve it."" 

**Contents of the United States diplomatic cables leak**: The contents of the U.S. diplomatic cables leak describe in detail events and incidents surrounding international affairs from 274 embassies dating from 28 December 1966 to 28 February 2010. The diplomatic cables revealed numerous unguarded comments and revelations: critiques and praises about the host countries of various U.S. embassies, discussion and resolutions towards ending ongoing tension in the Middle East, efforts for and resistance against nuclear disarmament, actions in the War on Terror, assessments of other threats around the world, dealings between various countries, U.S. intelligence and counterintelligence efforts.

Perhaps the most sensitive of all releases as of 6 December was a cable from the U.S. State Department sent in February 2009 referencing the Critical Foreign Dependencies Initiative and listing installations and infrastructure worldwide that it considered critical to protect U.S. interests from terrorists. Before releasing this list WikiLeaks had deliberately removed details of names and locations, but much was still revealed. Ostensibly the list does not include any military facilities. Instead it includes key facilities that if attacked could disrupt the global supply chain and global communications, as well as goods and services important to the U.S. and its economy.

These are noted excerpts from the list:

* Submarine communications cables
* across the Pacific Ocean to New Zealand, Australia, China and other U.S. allies in Asia.
* across the Atlantic Ocean, particularly those from the U.K. and Ireland northwards.
* Major port hubs, particularly in China, Japan and South Korea.
* Critical sea lanes, such as the Strait of Hormuz, the Panama Canal and the Strait of Malacca.
* The Baku–Tbilisi–Ceyhan pipeline as well as many other strategic pipelines criss-crossing Eurasia.
* In connection to these pipelines also Georgia, Azerbaijan and Belarus are on the list.
* Mines that produce rare earths and other much-needed metals, especially in South Africa and Australia.
* Several underwater pipelines are listed in Japan, China and Britain.
* A long list of pharmaceutical facilities in Europe.
* Ostensibly missing are also civil nuclear power plants outside of the United States.
* Dams close to the U.S. border.

There is more, but this is way beyond just whistle blowing that you describe.

**Eric Snowden**

Most of what Snowden released was legal and still ongoing today. Edward Lucas, former Moscow bureau chief for The Economist, agreed, asserting that ""Snowden's revelations neatly and suspiciously fits the interests of one country: Russia"" and citing Masha Gessen's statement that ""The Russian propaganda machine has not gotten this much mileage out of a US citizen since Angela Davis's murder trial in 1971."" 

Russian journalist Andrei Soldatov argued that Snowden's revelations had had negative consequences for internet freedom in Russia, as Russian authorities increased their own surveillance and regulation on the pretext of protecting the privacy of Russian users. Snowden's name was invoked by Russian legislators who supported measures forcing platforms such as Google, Facebook, Twitter and Gmail and YouTube to locate their servers on Russian soil or install SORM black boxes on their servers so that Russian authorities could control them.

In early September 2013, Russian president Vladimir Putin said that, a few days before boarding a plane to Moscow, Snowden met in Hong Kong with Russian diplomatic representatives. On June 23, Snowden boarded the commercial Aeroflot flight SU213 to Moscow, accompanied by Sarah Harrison of **WikiLeaks.** That same day, Julian Assange said that WikiLeaks had paid for Snowden's lodging in Hong Kong and his flight out.

Cybersecurity scholar Peter Singer divided the material disclosed by Snowden into three categories: ""smart, useful espionage against enemies of the United States; legally questionable activities that involved US citizens through backdoors and fudging of policy/law; un-strategic (stupid) actions targeting American allies that has had huge blowback on US standing and US business."" It was postulated that these were differing ways people viewed Snowden, which could explain why he was so polarizing. Singer also spoke of a ""double legacy"" from the NSA revelations released by Snowden: ""One, it's hollowed out the American ability to operate effectively in ensuring the future of the internet itself, in the way we would hope it would be. That has huge long-term consequences. And the second is, it's been and will be a hammer-blow to American technology companies. The cloud computing industry, for example, had a recent estimate that they'll lose $36 billion worth of business because of this.""

You don't get a pass for exposing bad things by screwing up good things.

**Assange**: No need to say more than Mueller has now documented how Assange coordinated with Russian intelligence, FSB and GRU, the release of emails from the Clinton campaign. He clearly directed a campaign with Russia to elect Donald Trump. Whether or not he coordinated with the Trump campaign directly through conduits like Roger Stone has yet to be determined. Assange is guilty of espionage.

**Obama**

If you have the UN or the International Court in the Hague making a determination that he is a war criminal I would love to see it. You don't of course. Your garbage about civilians was done under Trump. The fact is that terrorists use their families to try and shield themselves. Under Obama, every attempt was made to avoid killing these enemy combatants families even though the families were on the whole, participating in their defense. The use of drones brings much less collateral damage than bombing strikes or strikes with troops attacking all which are legal. No legitimate body has made an argument against drone strikes. The American citizen that was killed this way was legitimate. He had ongoing treason and was making war against the U.S. There is no requirement to try and arrest someone doing that. You need to learn the definition of a war crime. It is clearly defined by the UN conventions in Geneva now. If you can cite one in violation, cite it or shut the fuck up.
",therecordcorrected,e8khwi2,democrats
not even a trumper i specifically called out trump as well as bush. so nice try. maybe read the post before responding.,Speedracer98,e8j84o3,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8j2vvh,democrats
"I miss her. 

We need to get more women in office as soon as possible. ",Essential_tranquilo,e8k2m0u,democrats
Just gets more and more pathetic.,Medcait,e8j22as,democrats
"""HOW'M I SUPPOSED TO SCREAM AT VOTERS ABOUT BROWN PEOPLE WHEN THIS BOMB GUY GETS ALL THE ATTENTION?""",RadioMelon,e8j3qh5,democrats
"Now he has the deaths in the Pittsburg synagogue shooting to disrupt his fear mongering over  his “caravan” crisis. He is always the victim when it isn’t all about him.
",pasarina,e8k4xsi,democrats
Hah what an ass,UserN-me,e8j0bcg,democrats
I can agree he is not presidential material but to simply say he sucks to make Warren seem like a better choice is neither productive or for that matter not  true. Stop with the every else sucks scenario to prop up your candidate. It doesn't work. .,backpackwayne,e8kcrw6,democrats
avenatti is just another white man trying to make everything about him. the right hype him up because they know that he's not a threat,Ronson18,e8kct3v,democrats
You're actually taking this seriously enough to write a reddit post complaining about it.  Stop doing that and you'll feel much better.,eric987235,e8kcvy1,democrats
Don't think you have to worry about it. He's got a lot of financial issues that are embarrassing. ,data2dave,e8khu7s,democrats
Lol how the fuck do you think this game is played ?? ,EyeNongGong36,e8kdwfj,democrats
"Yea , you are right. I just don't like to see ANY hype for this guy when we have real candidates. ",EyeNongGong36,e8kdzmu,democrats
"This is my favorite response to my post, you are right and I feel better already lol. ",EyeNongGong36,e8kdxtv,democrats
"the 2020 candidate needs to be a complete progressive, preferably a woman or poc, but a guy like beto is good too",Ronson18,e8kec32,democrats
"Beto is rising star in the party its unfortunate hes running a Texas. He needs the notoriety and its going to difficult for him to gain if he loses this election. I really hope he wins against fish monster Ted Cruz , I would def vote Beto 4 prez. ",EyeNongGong36,e8kf2r4,democrats
"Whatever the flag was, trump would have molested it in public.",jackredrum,e8ixq74,democrats
"> “This is the future of the GOP under Trump: not a party but a backwater sub-Reddit chasing conspiracies to paper over the Dear Leader's raging inconsistencies.”
> 
> I could find feeds identical to this by the dozen just by scanning my latest crop of trolls. Sayoc isn’t a one-off loner radicalized by a few edge-case media outlets; he's an inevitable outcome of an alternative-reality media silo that increasingly defines the intellectual landscape of the Trump right.",therecordcorrected,e8imawo,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8j6mdl,democrats
"Well Tucker, go and watch some of your old clips and you will know.",Stupidiseverywhere,e8iptij,democrats
Let's look just as confused as he does when he fakes not understanding rational positions. ,comfort_fiend,e8ityb7,democrats
Is he an idiot? Or is he just an asshole?,Triplea657,e8j09dt,democrats
RBF Fucker,Btravelen,e8ixyel,democrats
"He’s not stupid. He is a morally, ethically bankrupt asshole, who makes tons of money by pandering to the stupid and the bigoted and the hateful and the racist people who support trump. Those who hide behind the Bible one day then spew hate and lies the next. The same as many republicans in congress. ",dab745,e8jmnaf,democrats
That takes a special brand of stupid most people can't attain minus a traumatic head injury.,Anticipator1234,e8iu3pm,democrats
Can't he be both?,Anticipator1234,e8j0bra,democrats
Asshole.  An asshole who knows where is paycheck is coming from.,lordperiwinkle,e8j1b2i,democrats
"Well that spells it out rather well now, doesn’t it? 👍Still never understand how the lying and holding the Bible works.",pasarina,e8k473b,democrats
"I suppose neither is exclusive, and if he's the former, then he's probably both.",Triplea657,e8j0dj4,democrats
Call Macco $99.95 ,walter1950,e8ipdfm,democrats
MAGABomber confirmed! ,JohnnyZondo,e8i071o,democrats
"It's not a democrat like FOX News and Trump said?

Oh my..., I am just so shocked! 

* https://i.ytimg.com/vi/PFr-kNbXHew/maxresdefault.jpg",backpackwayne,e8i1gud,democrats
So that means Trump will be covering his legal fees.,jackredrum,e8iamx1,democrats
"Look's like we have a Radical Republican Terrorist, and that is what he needs to be called out as. ",TheFatMan2200,e8i91lz,democrats
"But muh false flag narrative. Seriously though, Trump supporters are so far off in their own world they won't accept any fact, no matter how solidly proven. Scary really. I lose more and more faith in and hope for this country every single day. ",lotusbloom74,e8inpz8,democrats
"Oh my the lengths the democrats will go to in order to make it appear as if a right winger did this!!

/joke",azurejedi,e8i1e0c,democrats
[removed],,e8i8v01,democrats
"And he has a TD meme on his van, showing once again that sub should be banned for causing more right-wing terrorism. You just knew he hung out there. He does seem to be more intelligent than the average TDer though, so he could be a mod.

So about this ""Hahaha. This will be epic if it’s proven this was some antifa quack job. The only thing that will explode are the Dimms heads."" since it is a moronic dotarder as expected /u/redditpilled or are you still in denial? Delete your account because you are clearly too stupid to be doing anything that keeps you from educating yourself so you can get a better job than frying chicken at KFC at age 25.",therecordcorrected,e8i5ru4,democrats
"His last is in the past. Now he needs put on trial and if convicted, executed. 

Edit wording and typo",GlobeTrott3r,e8i02t9,democrats
This is good news and will help boost Democrats in November. ,UserN-me,e8ioy1z,democrats
evidence??,Wihdenghi,e8imrv8,democrats
Radical Republican Terrorist confirmed. ,TheFatMan2200,e8i93rw,democrats
Is Fox actually presenting that dude as a dem? Oof,leocura,e8j0pps,democrats
"Yep and soon will pardon him, and hire him on his administration ",Roseandwolf,e8iaov3,democrats
"Reactionary is the proper term but none the less -/ registered Republican. And  I suspect probably far right anti Castro nutcase. That is common in Florida, ",data2dave,e8ib0nv,democrats
"Lol, how long before they blame us entirely for trump as a ""false flag"" and claim they never liked him and everyone that did were just soros democrat plants? 

Over under is 18 months. ",Gsteel11,e8i3bs9,democrats
Lol,Roseandwolf,e8i20il,democrats
"https://www.businesswire.com/news/home/20181026005495/en/

perhaps, but apparently no one he claims to be associated with has heard of him.",carlip,e8ihivw,democrats
Who are you talking to?,Roseandwolf,e8i63gy,democrats
"If you wanna look at it that way sure. Im more concerned that he still has packages out there in transit, which is very possible ",Roseandwolf,e8ipuxi,democrats
The Right...so violent. ,JohnnyZondo,e8iokho,democrats
They were before they actually caught him. Some wild conspiracy theory about a dem doing it to make repugs looks bad.,backpackwayne,e8j24gn,democrats
The new future head of Homeland Security. ,Jerah1999,e8ivmdl,democrats
"The last paragraph is to the trolls like the one I called out that had been coming in here with their conspiracy bs about how it was going to turn out to be a leftist antifa person sending these pipe bombs because the left is the violent group. That's a quote from that guy in TD which of course we can't link to. That's their new thing over there to call us ""Dimms"".",therecordcorrected,e8imldb,democrats
"Possible, the police are on that, I’m looking more towards the future and we need all the help we can get and although it’s warped, this is good news for Democrats.

It just is, if it was an Antifa nutcase, we’d never stop hearing the garbage from the right and Fox News and Trump himself, “liberals are terrorists” etc. wouldn’t even be close and Republicans would make this their mantra all the way to the ballot box. 

Could you imagine...what Trump/GOP would do if it was prominent conservatives and Republicans who were sent this and it was discovered it was a liberal who did it?",UserN-me,e8iqwms,democrats
Death sentence. Marching in the streets lol,Roseandwolf,e8ir8zm,democrats
"It's this kind of thinking that's problem, no matter who you support. When actual lives are being threatened, you only care about political gain. I mean even if one of the bombs had detonated, it could have killed a mail worker who could be either Republican or Democrat but apparently to you that's a non-issue cause there's a political advantage. How does that make you different from them? FFS, this isn't a video game. We really do have idiots across the board.",FrankieGH,e8j603v,democrats
*taps nose ,UserN-me,e8ix0dd,democrats
"People die for politics. People voluntarily sign up to put their life on the line for politics. That’s what war is. 

Politics is life. It’s our faith, our families, our personal values, it’s how we perceive ourselves, it’s how we see and want to see the world around us and how we go about constructing that world. 

Don’t get confused and think some slimy character in a suit on a podium is what politics is about, as most people believe.  

Politics is the ballot box, it’s governance...it’s having freedom or not. It encompasses so much and everything. Politics was ending slavery, giving women the right to vote, and choosing to fight Nazi Germany. Politics now is whether we want universal healthcare, the right of LGBT, the death penalty, abortion rights, etc. 

Right now we are at a crossroads in American history, Trump is like no president we’ve had before. Politics is the choice to keep this course, to lead in this way, or to change it (to something better). 

So yes, November elections are bigger than the lives of those killed by terrorists and there are those who died on the battlefield to allow it. 

Politicians will use events to their advantage to help reinforce a narrative, it’s tribalism and “win at all costs” as has been demonstrated by the Republicans since 2017. Truth, if these were prominent conservative and Republican targets and the perpetrator was a Antifa member, we’d never hear  the end of it from the Republicans, their media and they’d carry the “liberal terrorist” chant to the ballot box...and this is the “armed” party.  

You’re absolutely right it’s not a game and lives are at stake. ",UserN-me,e8jjcrr,democrats
Duh,Btravelen,e8ixi1w,democrats
"Oh they’ll stick by their claim. 
“The van was planted by the Dems and this “trump
Supporter”’was a stooge ",UserN-me,e8j0wbv,democrats
"Funny, all these persons have a Narcissistic Personality ",walter1950,e8jxw4z,democrats
Except his van was tweeted about last April. So....yeah they’ll still find a way to deny it.,jlhouse36,e8j106w,democrats
"Nothing ironic at all.  Republicans create despair, and then capitalize on it to create havoc.  They are sick, evil pieces of un-American shit.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8jaoyz,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8kbt47,democrats
“dime store Mussolini “. Perfect. I’m using this. ,usposeso,e8k9scy,democrats
Questions remain about all the fake Cruz votes already in the system??? ,data2dave,e8jdiex,democrats
"Texas 2018 Election 

[Early Voting Starts](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): October 22-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

[Check Your Voter Registration Status](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do)

",election_info_bot,e8jyrdy,democrats
This will be one of those elections where Dems loose by few thousand votes and it will come down to  voter suppression. Really hope the DNC is ready to go to bat on this.,skymeson,e8henej,democrats
Of course one of Republican is also in charge of the voting in that state cheating is only way he can guarantee his win.,red_carpet_hero,e8ho28x,democrats
"I don't really get the mental gymnastics Republicans play on this. Do they or do they not believe in democracy as a concept? Even a Democrat, if in a position to do so, I would never contemplate making it more difficult for Republicans to vote. Cynically, I suspect that many do not (in fact I know a few who openly admit they don't). ",Mysterions,e8hpbl7,democrats
"Can't lose an election if you only count your own voters. 

We can't stay a united country with a group that constantly cheats our democracy. There has to be a limit and that's where the line is drawn. ",The_Write_Stuff,e8hqiu6,democrats
"Whoever is responsible should go to jail for life. Taking away an Americans vote is taking away their voice. And it's clear and diliberate. No blurry lines there.

There's a reason our founding fathers put the first amendment first. ",Towns-a-Million,e8hu9y9,democrats
"A little rebellion now and again is a good thing. Don't let this shit-stain of a human being get into office, and don't let him do it without a fight. ",erosharcos,e8hvvd1,democrats
"> Do they or do they not believe in democracy as a concept?

With the amount of voter suppression, purging of voters, ensuring democrat leaning areas have much longer waiting lines, and generally doing everything they can to make it harder for democrats to vote.......they fucking hate democracy.  ",JakeT-life-is-great,e8igc81,democrats
"I'll admit Im a republican and I want those that are voting to identify themselves via a valid government issued ID. I think the ways this has been presented can often disenfranchise some voters but I strongly believe there a bipartisan way of verifying the identity of those that vote while also making sure minority voters and those of a low socio-economic standing arent discouraged from or prevented from voting. I think all parties would benefit from voter ID laws, so long as both sides can come to an agreement of how to implement it and how to enforce it.   


I dont believe any decent person on either side wants to prevent people from voting, even if it meant their candidate losing. Obviously both sides are going to have people that have that mindset and it goes everything America stands for or strives to represent (which is equal representation for everyone). I think to say, or suspect, that all Republicans don't believe in democracy is disingenuous and, as you stated in your comment, cynical. I think both sides have been led to believe the other side represents the worst in humanity and wants the absolute worst for themselves and their party and I dont see that as the case at all.",Warfighter1776,e8hxdo3,democrats
"We're not united. Democrats think Republicans are scum of the earth nazi deplorables and Republicans think Democrats are brain dead socialists drinking the kool-aid of the MSM. Maybe in some cases this is correct but I believe by in large both sides are being ostracized by their respective competitors. If we, as citizens can come together and be bipartisan, I think we will elect more bipartisan candidates which will lead to a bipartisan administration and less infighting. But when you have a nation divided like this you're going to get representatives that are more left or right leaning and unwilling to be bipartisan further dividing the country and its citizens. Its seems to be a vicious cycle.",Warfighter1776,e8hya9o,democrats
"amen

&#x200B;",JakeT-life-is-great,e8ignps,democrats
"On the voter ID thing. There would be a cost. Either to the voter or the government. If you pass it to the voter, some wouldn't be able to maintain an ID. Some don't drive. Now let's pass it onto the government. Would you raise taxes so everyone in the country has a state issued ID? 

The issue of voter fraud has been so insignificant, the cost is more than it would be worth. It's a nonproblem. Voter suppression, the security of the voting machines is a lot bigger problem that we should be throwing the money at. Our future democracy depends on it. 

One thing you have to think about when you see both sides be disingenuous, you're seeing the extremes. Bc that's what makes the news, that's what gets the clicks, that sells the papers. The vast majority on both sides aren't that way or think that way. ",tknapp2,e8i0n7n,democrats
"> I'll admit Im a republican and I want those that are voting to identify themselves via a valid government issued ID. I think the ways this has been presented can often disenfranchise some voters but I strongly believe there a bipartisan way of verifying the identity of those that vote while also making sure minority voters and those of a low socio-economic standing arent discouraged from or prevented from voting. I think all parties would benefit from voter ID laws, so long as both sides can come to an agreement of how to implement it and how to enforce it. 

I *would* agree, but we know that [voter fraud is not a statistically significant issue](https://www.washingtonpost.com/outlook/2018/10/22/voter-fraud-isnt-problem-america-low-turnout-is/?noredirect=on). In the scale of things it's an amputation for an itch. 

> I think to say, or suspect, that all Republicans don't believe in democracy is disingenuous and, as you stated in your comment, cynical.

I never said that. I said I think it's likely that *many* do not. All of the Republicans I personally know *do not* believe in democracy. All of them think that people are too stupid to rule themselves. ",Mysterions,e8i15pq,democrats
">I dont believe any decent person

Sadly, there are literally dozens of ways that republicans suppress the vote.  In this election cycle alone.  The only party supresssing voting right now is the republican party.  Generally, democrats are far more about expanding voting rights, making it easier to vote, increasing vote participation.  ",JakeT-life-is-great,e8igi8h,democrats
"Where does taking aid and material support from a hostile foreign nation fit into the definition of ""bipartisan"" in any way, shape or fashion? What's the acceptable level of cooperation with Russia? What's the acceptable level of kicking minorities off voter roles? Or challenging minority vote-by-mail signatures (and not giving them a chance to fix it)? How do you compromise with gerrymandering? A purple state like North Carolina has 13 Congressional reps and 10 of them are Republican? 

You have a funny definition of bipartisan. ",The_Write_Stuff,e8i0b94,democrats
"So, correct me if I am wrong, but voter ID to liberals is about conservatives trying to suppress votes and voter ID to conservatives is about liberals trying to allow voter fraud to continue in their favor.

You are undoubtedly right about the extremes being what is reported. It can be difficult to see through the fog and see how people actually think and feel about certain issues. 

I'll have to find it, and if I can Ill edit this comment to add it, but I saw a post about what Australia does to get votes and encourage voters and I was thinking it may be worth trying on a small scale here in America and seeing if it is successful. ",Warfighter1776,e8i3uml,democrats
"I'll admit I was led to believe voter fraud was a larger issue than it actually is. Voter fraud should still be avoided but the argument becomes, essentially, a cost-benefit analysis and a question of how. 

I think a TRUE democracy does not work. Just like any true pure-bred system never works. Socialism is something I nearly completely disagree with but it works when it comes to the police/fire department and other public entities. Democracy works in many regards and not others. I think our constitutional republic works very well in many situations but leaves something to be desired in others. No one system is perfect but I think America has done a pretty good job of taking bits and pieces of other ideologies and systems and implementing them effectively. ",Warfighter1776,e8i4sgo,democrats
"Can these not all be issues we can find agreeance and bipartisanship on? 
I have yet to see enough proof (probable cause, preponderance of the evidence, or beyond a reasonable doubt) proving Trump colluded with Russia. Everything I have seen has been circumstantial and even politico, who built giant visual tables to track everything, take s lot of guesses as to how everything fits together. 

You do realize that none of the indictments from the Mueller investigation have ANYTHING to do with the Russian collusion right? Every indictment has been for making false statements or identity theft. The only ones that havent been for indictment have been for 12 GRU operatives who were arrested for hacking the DNC emails and releasing them to wikileaks. Emails that showed that the DNC completley screwed their own voter base by making Hillary Clinton the democratic candidate even though the majority of voters wanted Bernie Sanders. So there was collusion that liberals completley ignored within their own party that likely led to Trump being elected and not a peep from anyone. But meh Russia. Bring me solid proof that would convince an independent magistrate that a crime was, is currently, or will be committed by Trump and we can scream ""IMPEACH HIM"" together. Otherwise, why don't you focus all that pent up energy on being bipartisan instead of pointing fingers and do exactly what I claimed to be the problem with today's current economic climate. ",Warfighter1776,e8i2way,democrats
"That's the general consensus on different news channels. If a law causes 1 person not to be able to use their constitutional right to vote, that's too much. I'm not saying voter fraud is okay either. 

If we find a way to give an ID to everyone for free, I think both sides will be for it. But the cost would go somewhere. 

We absolutely need to encourage more voters to actually vote. Voter turnout is embarrassing here in the US. ",tknapp2,e8i4rwn,democrats
">rying to allow voter fraud to continue in their favor.

Voter fraud is the myth that republicans like to claim....without proof of course.  And then ensure tens if not hundreds of thousands of people can't vote because of this mythical voter fraud.",JakeT-life-is-great,e8igkxo,democrats
"> I think a TRUE democracy does not work. Just like any true pure-bred system never works.

Oh, I agree. I think we both agree that a republic is the way to go. These people I'm talking about though - they straight up believe some people's votes should count more than others (or not at all). *That's* what I mean by not believing in democracy.

> Socialism is something I nearly completely disagree with but it works when it comes to the police/fire department and other public entities. 

My attitude is that socialism is a last ditch effort when capitalism doesn't work (and using both terms colloquially). If markets don't work (or can't for whatever reason) then I'd favor ""socialism"". For example, you probably disagree, but I do not think capitalism is efficient in providing affordable healthcare to the populace - as a result I favor socialized healthcare (specifically a Bismark system). 

> Democracy works in many regards and not others. I think our constitutional republic works very well in many situations but leaves something to be desired in others. No one system is perfect but I think America has done a pretty good job of taking bits and pieces of other ideologies and systems and implementing them effectively.

For the most part I agree. I think the trend of minority rule is problematic, and shows cracks in a system that is too revered to change, but at the same time long-term demographic change should adjust for that.",Mysterions,e8ie726,democrats
Yea just like the bomber was a democrat. You people will believe anything Trump tells you too. It is amazing how much you swallow on a daily basis just because Trump or FOX News told you to. ,backpackwayne,e8i37c7,democrats
"Im not basing any of what I have said on what Trump has said... I've done my own research and stayed away from NPR or Fox to see the other side. I even said I was looking a politico news piece that highlighted circumstantial connections but proved no actual proof beyond reasonable suspicion, that any crimes were committed. 

If you would actually read what I am saying instead of reading, TRUMP TRUMP TRUMP TRUMP because of your apparent fascination with everything Trump since you're so anti-Trump, you would realize that Im not just reading his Tweets and regurgitating what he or Fox is saying. Im actually doing my own research. If anything, it sounds like you're just repeating what your buddies are saying or what you're hearing on CNN. Either tha or you just literally didn't take the time to read what I said.  

And the bomber wasn't a democrat. The bomber was some bat shit crazy registered republican that LOVED Trump (evidence via his twitter photos and his van being PLASTERED in Trump stickers). Regardless of political affiliation he is a shit human being and is a domestic terrorist. Im just glad no one was hurt. ",Warfighter1776,e8i5m0o,democrats
"Snark... if anyone needed this event to realize the ""Trump"" disavowal is ever sincere needs to stop deluding themselves. He's TOXIC. BAD news. ",Perspective2018,e8j42k7,democrats
[removed],,e8j006t,democrats
"Yes, Democrats cheer acts of violence against Al Qaeda and ISIS and Assad's murderers. That is the only thing that exists since none occurs in this country. This is just more dotard bs trolling without any evidence. You show us where the few times some antifa were fighting Nazis and Democrats cheered it. Only in your sick, dotardian mind. This is what happens when you hang in a racist/white supremacist sub and support one -- you become one.",therecordcorrected,e8j0f8s,democrats
[removed],,e8j145j,democrats
"You’re full of shit.

Comparing heckling in a restaurant to sending bombs in the mail?

You people have gone full stupid.
",VegaThePunisher,e8j1xwl,democrats
"Democrats are silent? BS and you post in TD.

Every Democrat condemning Scalise shooting: 

https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2017/06/scalise-shooting-congress-senate/530277/

Pelosi condemns antifa violence, but of course the Republican running for governor in Florida has one of his own people in the Proud Boys violence in NYC. Where's the Republican condemnation of the event? Oh, there is bad people on both sides. I remember when Antifa ran someone over in the car. Or killed people.

https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/powerpost/wp/2017/08/30/pelosi-condemns-violent-actions-of-antifa-protesters/

Bernie Sanders condemns stopping Ann Coulter at Berkley:

https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/bernie-sanders-ann-coulter-berkeley_us_58fb7006e4b00fa7de14bc3d

But the same clown Republican in Congress that ""accidently"" invites the white supremacist to the state of the union, sends out fake tweet about Soros paying people in Honduras to come to the U.S. And where was the condemnation when Trump had Ted Nugent over to the White House where he and Palin could do their White Power sign in a photo? Did I miss it? And what college students do is not controlled by the Democratic Party. ",therecordcorrected,e8j1ytl,democrats
[removed],,e8j350x,democrats
"Why do you idiots jeep deleting your posts?! You say something stupid, then when you get pushback you delete. And YOU absolutely do not stay away from racist subs.",Stupidiseverywhere,e8j4b3r,democrats
"Oh yes. How stupid do you think people are. They decided to pose in front of the painting of Hillary Clinton with an OK sign, all of them. Because no one actually does that. And Trump, the media is the enemy of the people/country. What do you do when you have an enemy of the people/country? Don't think we are stupid here. The only unity Trump called for was off a teleprompter that he had a hard time spitting out. Then he is back at it again showing it was bs. He is a racist/white supremacist. He uses code words and phrases that are well understood. Don't try and give us this innocent bullshit from a guy that started the Obama birther, never gave it up and never apologized. Sell this garbage someplace else.",therecordcorrected,e8j4tud,democrats
"You just above compared heckling in a restaurant to sending bombs to people.

You are a cult loon. 

Get off your knees. 
",VegaThePunisher,e8j6sux,democrats
The mods remove it as they should. No one wants to see this garbage.,therecordcorrected,e8j4uvb,democrats
[removed],,e8j4k18,democrats
[removed],,e8j6v0y,democrats
That makes sense,Stupidiseverywhere,e8j4yf2,democrats
"I just need one, t_d",Stupidiseverywhere,e8j501n,democrats
"That’s what you did above, stupid.

People could have been killed. Take your trumpie ass-kissing elsewhere.
",VegaThePunisher,e8j6wpz,democrats
[removed],,e8j62ao,democrats
[removed],,e8j7rmm,democrats
"You’re excusing your terrorist pal.
",VegaThePunisher,e8j6tup,democrats
"Hey stupid,

the people who are trying to murder Americans are conservatives.

",VegaThePunisher,e8joh28,democrats
[removed],,e8j7c2f,democrats
[removed],,e8jyxzy,democrats
"No, the guy who sent the bombs is your pal, in case you can’t follow.

You are desperate to deflect.

The orange cult lunacy caused this shit.
",VegaThePunisher,e8j7h7c,democrats
"Um, Trumpies are currently the largest domestic terror threat. 

Get off Chicago’s dick. 
",VegaThePunisher,e8jz6of,democrats
[removed],,e8j87rb,democrats
[removed],,e8k07we,democrats
"Trump encourages violence, jackass.

He creates false equivalencies between people criticizing him,

and his supporters murdering people.

Get off your knees.

",VegaThePunisher,e8joco3,democrats
Wow you are indeed desperate to deflect from your terrorist pals. ,VegaThePunisher,e8k0ht7,democrats
[removed],,e8jxbnk,democrats
"Trump was just praising a sitting congressman for body slamming a reporter. 

This was just days ago.

What is wrong with you?",VegaThePunisher,e8jxf98,democrats
Hard to believe it's satire 🙄,Btravelen,e8ixrdh,democrats
"Imagine your job is having to re-read that horseshit.  Imagine having to even be around that monster of a  “man”.

/Shudders",bookelly,e8j0jky,democrats
"The party of civility, dignity, honor, and respect ladies and gentlemen.  Let's give them all a big round of applause..../s ",Futharon,e8iyrav,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8j6nc6,democrats
#Magabomber - now why didn’t I think of that.  ,myjuly14name,e8j6thp,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8j6nve,democrats
Pretty depressing that its only 57%,TNBIX,e8hw619,democrats
[removed],,e8iu4v9,democrats
"Yeah

Only 57% of millennials hate trump. I also thought it would be more than that.

You guys are in fucking trouble lol.",CrispyFallDay,e8igjbw,democrats
[removed],,e8ixuk4,democrats
"Wait, Recession is just around the corner and Trumptards will be an endangered species. ",data2dave,e8jbm41,democrats
[removed],,e8j9ah5,democrats
"Funny how that article never mentions Sarah Palin.

We need all the help we can get to protect the country from Trump. But in order to stop someone like him from taking power again, we need to seriously address the fundamental problems in the Republican party.

We saw you pour gasoline all over the house.  
We saw you light the match.  
We saw you tell the fire department not to show up.  

Now, you want to join the bucket brigade to put out the fire?

Okay great, and please don't stop helping.

But once the fire is out we need to have a conversation.",GarbledReverie,e8hhwz3,democrats
Anyone remember Hitler’s tactics? ,walter1950,e8gqmtm,democrats
"This is completely true. At all Trump’s rallies he encourages violence against fellow Americans, including journalists, and now these mail bombs are just the latest indication that Trump’s comments can, and do provoke violent reactions among his supporters. It’s interesting that these bombs are being sent to people who are among those with greatest personal integrity in the nation, as opposed to Trump, who has none at all.",richinsfca,e8hltpv,democrats
But her emails....,Yeahbabs,e8h0itx,democrats
So Trump is a domestic terrorists.  Not surprising at all.,shreddedkittentacos,e8h97m5,democrats
"“Cold”???
Ask the Capital Gazette if their five murdered colleagues (journalists) think it’s a Cold civil war. ",amandalucia009,e8ho4nx,democrats
"Please people! Remember that this has been going on far longer than Trump! The Republican Party is the problem, he is only the symptom. Remember Ronald Reagan and his ""liberal  press""  the Republicans demonized the press back then.  If you were liberal back then, and on up to today, you were met with scorn and derision. You were "" Just a liberal"" and were not to be taken seriously.  Then you had their minions like Rush Limbaugh, Newt Gingrich and Rupert Murdoch.  ",cpepinc,e8hq7z7,democrats
"Was cold.  After Khashoggi’s murder by MBS (Kushner’s pal) it got hot.

>  Who lives by the sword, dies by the sword.

",Touristupdatenola,e8ha2gx,democrats
[removed],,e8hmfah,democrats
 https://i.imgur.com/MHL2fRa.jpg ,Slick1ru2,e8i50pk,democrats
[removed],,e8h4mvh,democrats
Any progressive who listens to the words of McCain's former staff with anything but disgust is no true progressive.,TicsPoli,e8h1t9k,democrats
No and that's part of the problem.,morpheusia,e8gxiht,democrats
[deleted],,e8hhaf9,democrats
Khashoggi was a journalist. Not a sword fighter. ,amandalucia009,e8ho9c7,democrats
"Don’t be like them. We cannot sink to their level of encouraging violence. 
Plus he’d become a martyr. Yuck
Let him keep living & showing that he’s a jackass. ",amandalucia009,e8ho7hd,democrats
"The Democrats firmly condemned the guy who shot Scalise, and rightly so. No one sided with him. No one looked to excuse him. Trump lauded Gianforte for body slamming a journalist and laughed about it. He called the neo-nazi mob (that's what it was) in Charlottesville ""fine people"". Hed constantly calls for violence against his perceived enemies. The right doesn't have an absolute monopoly on violence, but the reaction of politicians on the right- or left-hand spectrum of politics is quite different.

Edit: and saying that the other side doesn't blame the Democrats for violence is very disingenuous. Trump and SHS started victim blaming the journalists the minute a bomb was found at CNN.",Ofbearsandmen,e8h7vsj,democrats
You are in such a fantasy world. What cyanide to Trump? Did you read that on Infowars? And where did you see any Democratic political figure stirring up hate that would remotely lead to Scalise getting shot?,therecordcorrected,e8hez36,democrats
"He is now a Democrat /r/conspiracy user. Of course in that sub they love Assange, a right-wing libertarian and Greenwald the same. In fact, the bernouts love Tulsi Gabbard, former, supposedly, homophobe, pro-war in Syria too.",therecordcorrected,e8hf4fm,democrats
"We've failed all of these preliminary tests these villains have put us through so far. Upcoming elections feel like a test that America finally studied for since it realized it's going to fail the class at this rate. Maybe it'll stop partying so hard and get serious, but it's been so used to not really caring for so long now. Sure, a sizable number of us have been paying attention every step of the way, but a majority are brainwashed victims of propaganda that also think they're doing the right thing. If November's midterm exam is failed, nothing short of perfection will raise our average enough to not plunge into adject fascism. Most of the worst shit, the plundering of our coffers and rights, have mostly been overshadowed by the less important but more showy shit this administration has been shining the spotlight on. I'm almost certain it's too late to fix this with voting, which we should have done right decades ago, because it's clear that these enemies of democracy have kicked their voter suppression plan into full gear, going even further this time than their gerrymandering creep and indirect election manipulation. ",LukariBRo,e8hw2r8,democrats
>  The pen is mightier than the sword.,Touristupdatenola,e8hq93j,democrats
"Oh yeah, radicals spew nonsense, how reassuring. 

Not to mention how exactly is she anywhere near as reprehensible as Assange or any conservative? 
",up48,e8hwcy3,democrats
Bernouts? ,Towns-a-Million,e8hfge7,democrats
"Exactly. Very written, fellow patriot ",amandalucia009,e8i2z0x,democrats
"Right...  but... ummmm
Are you implying he got what was coming to him? By virtue of being a journalist? Or... just being facetious or....??",amandalucia009,e8i2rmy,democrats
Forget polls. Vote. Get everyone you know to vote. ,Stupidiseverywhere,e8jylp8,democrats
"Somewhat surprising. Comcast hired Hugh Hewitt, Charlie Sykes, Nicole Wallace, Michael Steele and few other nitwits that spoiled the 'sane' news programming just because 'both sides' BS. I'm not interested in alternate facts",Btravelen,e8jzzbd,democrats
"I think all the gigantic media companies, at least in national elections, just spray money around the District of Columbia with a shirt cannon. But some politicians do hold their heart of hearts, & some don’t.",white_n_mild,e8k0cr3,democrats
"POTUS has made it 70+ years without learning manners. Seems unlikely he'd start now.

OTOH, I take exception to the notion that the American people deserve much better. I figure the American people needed Donald J Trump as a wake-up call. We'd damn well better consider him a wake-up call because the only alternative is to consider him a death knell for the republic.",hrlngrv,e8i9y6e,democrats
"On Faux news the Blonde Moron is saying Trump is the victim in these bomb threats, ( Trump is the victim) WTF, and that the media is cruel and has treated this President like no other President in history. ",walter1950,e8iouq0,democrats
"I was saying this to folks in my social circle after trump won the primaries. I don't like Trump, didn't vote for him, etc, but I think in the long run him getting elected might bring about good things. 

Maybe things get crazy enough that people on both sides stop and go ""Okay, time out, we've taken a wrong turn somewhere. How do we get back on the road to a better tomorrow. "" maybe we needed to hit rock bottom",WarpedDrivesEngage,e8ia8z6,democrats
I'm not a fan of burning down the field to grow a better crop versus crop rotation.,therecordcorrected,e8iabv2,democrats
"Crop rotation is great when there's time for it. However, when almost half the field is already suffering some form of blight, burning the field may make more sense plowing it into the dirt.",hrlngrv,e8ifow7,democrats
"It's best not to repeat the other side's lies in headlines even as negations of them.  

It's been proven that strategically it serves more to propagate the lie than to defuse it.

The best way to debunk is in the text of an article rather than a headline, and the headline should focus on the fact of the person having lied rather than their specific claim.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8iyekw,democrats
http://youtu.be/rHFOwlMCdto is great at showing what a farce voter id push is.,blove1150r,e8hqvsr,democrats
" The rest of her tweet thread, if anyone is curious:

>[First, some history. The 2013 Supreme Court case Shelby v. Holder gutted the 1965 Voting Rights Act by ruling that states with a history of voter suppression no longer needed the federal government to approve changes to voting rules.](https://twitter.com/HillaryClinton/status/1055835858618736641)

>[Fast-forward a few years: 24 states have put new voting restrictions in place since 2010, including photo ID rules in Alabama, ""use it or lose it"" laws in Ohio, and ""exact match"" laws in Georgia.](https://twitter.com/HillaryClinton/status/1055835859700854788)

>[In this cycle, Native Americans are scrambling for IDs because of a new voting law that requires them to use identification that lists a street address rather than a P.O. box, which many who live on reservations have used for years.](https://twitter.com/HillaryClinton/status/1055835860585930753)

>[Georgia's secretary of state, Brian Kemp, is overseeing his own election for governor and has put 53,000 voter registrations on hold, 70% of them from black voters, because they don't adhere to an ""exact match"" standard of name spellings.](https://twitter.com/HillaryClinton/status/1055835861688967168)

>[In Texas, groups like @TXCivilRights and @MOVE_Texas argue that officials' decision to limit early voting at college campus sites specifically targets students](https://twitter.com/HillaryClinton/status/1055835862854983680)

>[Republican lawmakers justify such laws because they protect against ""voter fraud."" But ""voter fraud"" has been proven in study after study to be a virtually non-existent problem, with incidence rates between 0.0003 percent and 0.0025 percent.](https://twitter.com/HillaryClinton/status/1055835864008478720)

>More
What can we do to protect our right to vote? 

>[First, know that it's still likely that you'll be able to vote quickly and easily. Problems in some areas doesn't mean there are problems everywhere.](https://twitter.com/HillaryClinton/status/1055835865233154048)

>[Second, know that if you're a registered voter, you have the right to vote. This @ACLU guide walks you through your rights.](https://twitter.com/HillaryClinton/status/1055835866323697665)

>[Third, help elect secretaries of state around the country who will work to make it easier for people to cast their ballots. @iVoteFund is leading the charge here.](https://twitter.com/HillaryClinton/status/1055835867812634624)

>[Fourth, vote for state legislature candidates and governors who will support laws that make voting registration automatic, make vote by mail possible, and extend early voting periods. @Sister_District, @flippable_org, and @TheDLCC are excellent organizations to plug into.](https://twitter.com/HillaryClinton/status/1055835870421549058)

>[America is one of the oldest democracies in the world, and voting is our most sacred right as citizens. Let's make it easy for every single American to cast a ballot.](https://twitter.com/HillaryClinton/status/1055835871503663107)

",UWCG,e8ht9s2,democrats
I'm still ready.,Touristupdatenola,e8htf5y,democrats
Happy Birthday Hillary!,shadybaby22,e8hx66v,democrats
Thank god she posted this 2 weeks before the most important election of our lifetime:2016. ,underbridge,e8hyd3z,democrats
Why are people against showing some form of identification for voting? ,ejuliuse,e8icvvm,democrats
Well she was talking about voting rights way before in 2015. Apparently you have selective hearing.,FrankieGH,e8j0wrh,democrats
[deleted],,e8idibg,democrats
"But is it that hard to get a photo ID from the local DMV or police station? If this was a requirement it's not like Jim Crow days where only non-whites would have to confirm their ID. Also, if you spell your name wrong on a government form of course it's going to be rejected. I don't see how this hurts anyone except for non-citizens who wouldn't be able to acquire an acceptable form of US photo ID, and even then non-citizens don't have the constitutional right to vote in all elections.",ejuliuse,e8ivewq,democrats
"It takes a lot of privilege to not even understand how civil liberties are still suppressed. 

If you think that this is about ""non-citizens"" then you clearly have no idea and I would recommend you educate yourself.",FrankieGH,e8j0rpi,democrats
"I didn't say civil liberties weren't being suppressed I was suggesting the idea that I don't see any negatives in having to show some simple form of ID such as a drivers license when going to vote. You have to show ID when doing things such as purchasing a firearm, alcohol and tobacco. Once again, I'm SUGGESTING that you should show identification when voting to keep records. I wasn't talking about voter suppression either I was specifically making a point about the issue of identification when voting. The only reason I mentioned non-citizens is because they are the only foreseeable people I think that wouldn't benefit from this and they don't have the constitutional right to vote in all elections anyway. Also, pretty rude to tell me to go educate myself. I could just be a dick and blast my opinions around but I'm just trying to get other peoples insight and reasoning as to why they believe that ""this"" is how things should be. No one is right about everything, not me, not you, not the GOP or even the dems.",ejuliuse,e8j2kea,democrats
"Again, everything you're saying only reinforces the privilege of your situation. You didn't say civil liberties were being suppressed but this is a case of civil liberties being suppressed. Because what you don't seem to understand that a lot of people can't get IDs becaue of the bureaucracy in place that serves certain people. 

When it comes to voting it's not just about any kind of ID, it's about photo ID. If they want it to become the rule then they should enable people to get the ID's. 

Otherwise, why aren't they calling for passports as the norm for voting? 

It's not about insight or reasoning... it's about fact. When a huge population are faced with obstacles towards receiving photo IDs then that's not a fair standard to impose.

To this day, there have miniscule instances of voter fraud because of voter ids. Yet why is it an issue now? 

And really, I don't care if you think Im being rude... you could actually go and find facts about this issue instead you'd rather hear opinions from people. The facts state that photo id laws suppress votes. And that is a civil liberty issue.  That's what we're talking about. If you don't realize it's a civil liberty issues then I respectfully ask you to educate yourself on it instead of asking reddit strangers for opinions.

If you and the GOP were so concerned about non citizens voting then they'd make passports mandatory for everyone but that's not the case is it?

Not everything is an opinion. Some things are facts. ",FrankieGH,e8j4jyb,democrats
But... it is easy to go the the DMV or local police station and request a photo ID. If instituted everyone would have to do it. I don't understand why you keep saying I'm privileged because I have a valid point. Tell me the negatives of photo ID being required for voting? The positives seem to outweigh the negatives. If you don't need photo ID you shouldn't need ID to purchase things like weapons either which would be crazy.,ejuliuse,e8jo5b4,democrats
And wait when Iran sanctions kick in ? Gas through the roof! ,data2dave,e8jdkko,democrats
I wonder how many of these Americans impacted by the financial situation still support Trump. ,red_carpet_hero,e8jv2x7,democrats
"Millionaires make decisions for millionaires, 
Middle class shut up, pay your taxes, enjoy our crumbs. ",walter1950,e8ipujb,democrats
"There are true believers, I have known some. While many of us group them with Pat Robertson, there is a difference.  I don't agree with their beliefs, but they are good people which we should recognize.
",bot420,e8j3hun,democrats
If we could organize the non believers as well as Churches do there'd never be a Trump in the Presidency. The Evangelicals who in the past avoided politics are now Trump's biggest flock. Their ability to fool themselves is without comparison. I have one in my family and to convince her to change is like talking to a rock. ,data2dave,e8jbawp,democrats
"Fuck Ben Shapiro. Honestly I don’t know how to help you, because Ben Shapiro is such a bad gauge that nothing I could recommend would be near the mark.  ",KingThallion,e8wbi0f,democrats
"Why do you think that? Also, can you give me a name of someone who you think would be a good challenge/debate for him?",psycopuppy,e8zq2ia,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8j2w4i,democrats
Good,Stupidiseverywhere,e8hp75q,democrats
"For in his Narcissistic mine he’s the victim in all these bomb threats, Faux News is playing him as the victim.
“ I like Beer” and I’m going to have a few after hearing this one. He’s the VICTIM????",walter1950,e8ip03c,democrats
"Stand up, make yourself heard. Fear is what they want.",Stupidiseverywhere,e8i44e0,democrats
"Sixty years ago my parents brought me here to escape dictatorship. Seems, in the long run, that dictatorship is catching up with us anyway.",alvarezg,e8i8qgm,democrats
I won’t let them scare me. ,iwascompromised,e8igfwm,democrats
"Don’t.

It’s time to stand up and be heard.
",VegaThePunisher,e8i3o6a,democrats
Take that fear and make it determination to not be afraid anymore and to defeat them by voting. ,UserN-me,e8j1ofg,democrats
But think how much it'd appreciate over time! An investment!!,hrlngrv,e8ifsij,democrats
"Correction: He **blames the targets**, which he has repeatedly incited his treasonous followers against.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8ijtbz,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8j6nxg,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8j2wgv,democrats
Because he usually does?,NicolasCageLovesMe,e8ibipr,democrats
"From his perspective, anyone not waiting in line to kiss his ass is against him.",hrlngrv,e8ifjfo,democrats
"Evidence, what evidence, you mean alternative facts, or fake news, this man just spews shit for his supporters to eat up.  ",walter1950,e8ipj18,democrats
[The bombing suspect is a registered Republican.](https://heavy.com/news/2018/10/cesar-sayoc-politics-republican-trump-magabomber/),wenchette,e8hvstg,democrats
There is also pictures of him attending multiple Trump rallies. ,TheFatMan2200,e8i9riq,democrats
Still wont matter. They'll say he's a progressive republican.,ytman,e8hwb35,democrats
Trump is well known for using charity's funds for personal reasons like law suits and personal purchases. He thinks that he is the charity and its his money.,dognocat,e8hs6vl,democrats
I also heard that Melania had to bid on Eric Trump at a bachelor auction once,DrNoPants,e8i1zyg,democrats
"Lmao, that's legitimately funny.",doyoueven-no,e8isypi,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22-November 4, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8j6o1s,democrats
Isn't he American Indian? How is he a MAGA bomber?,moggedbyall,e8hyqw3,democrats
"Uh oh, this guy doesn't fit the narrative.",PlanetTesla,e8i0ewo,democrats
"Well, he’s Phillipino. He’s a “maga threatener” (technically a bomb is any exploding device. A device that just mimics a bomb, but is not made to explode is not a bomb) They can’t call him a white guy like they would love to, but they sure can call him a Trump supporter.",DanIsSwell,e8i0w6f,democrats
"Because he's a self-described Trump supporter and identifies strongly with ""Make America Great Again"". How is that confusing? ",aasparaguus,e8hzbmh,democrats
"Terrorism is his goal.  None of this is some accidental side-effect of his behavior - it's what he was put in power to do.

It's how Putin does things in his own enslaved country, and it's how Putin will do things here via his designated toxin.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8gvhua,democrats
Pathological liar.  POS.,caligirl2287,e8hksa8,democrats
"The argument in the title, distilled: Instigator-in-chief shouldn't instigate.

President Trump is doing what he wants to do, and no one's going to stop him, not Democrats who currently lack the votes in Congress, and not other Republicans who sold their souls and spines in exchange for controlling all elected branches of government.",hrlngrv,e8gvryw,democrats
"Any one of Trump's numerous lies and high crimes, would have caused Obama to be impeached.",mad-n-fla,e8hbm79,democrats
He’s the anti christ.,amatrixa,e8h1p4e,democrats
[removed],,e8gya9t,democrats
"He's an embarrassment but I think people need to stop with the ""he's literally Hitler"" shit, frankly it makes us look hyperbolic.",maikuxblade,e8h3xlp,democrats
He isn’t just an embarrassment but dangerous and we have to treat it like it is. ,amatrixa,e8h478q,democrats
"California 2018 Election 

[General Election Registration Deadline](http://registertovote.ca.gov/): October 22, 2018 

[General Election](http://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/voter-registration/vote-mail/#apply): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8hwrje,democrats
"Ffs just focus on getting the house.
You haven’t won it yet, stop announcing this shit which NO ONE care about beyond the Washington bubble.
Jobs, future, safety.  Come on, we have to win. ",Bookmanfilm,e8i79ev,democrats
Consistently the unconscionable dick. ,usposeso,e8iqzsb,democrats
"Wait, who are you and what is this? Report this if it is a problem and take care of it, but don't extrapolate that the straight vote caused the defect. Thanks for spotting it, call your local polls if you haven't already notified someone.

VOTE STRAIGHT DEMOCRAT. DO IT. THE COUNTRY DEPENDS ON THAT.

Edit: friendly fire, read his stuff",Stopbeingrude,e8gwpdp,democrats
Can we fucking go back to paper ballots. Fucking seriously. ,ConstitutionCrisisUS,e8hdond,democrats
"I tracked it to the first-person account of this incident. 

https://twitter.com/leahmcelrath/status/1055637549543231489",AngryRedHerring,e8gzxlb,democrats
This needs to be on the national news today.,ytman,e8hmvms,democrats
"Democrats, we need to grow a couple and realize Republicans are worse than Russians when it comes to cheating. Remember Gore vs Bush and all the many black Floridians that were falsely accused of being felons and not allowed to vote. And leading Democrats just let Republicans roll over them. Now it's Florida, Texas and Georgia where Republicans are cheating yet again and again. 

This is obvious chicanery to automatically put Ted Cruz back in office. ",data2dave,e8jc4ry,democrats
"All things being equal, it doesn't make any difference-- vote-tally-wise-- if you vote straight ticket, or if you vote for each Democratic candidate individually.

The problem here is with the electronic voting machines that Texas, and many other states, are using.  This is just coming to light now as early voting has been going on in our state since Monday.

On the voting machine ""malfunctions"" (which are more likely machine hacks):
https://www.txdemocrats.org/media/breaking-texas-secretary-of-state-office-knew-and-did-nothing-about-hart-e-voting-machine-malfunctions/

And the twitter post where I found this pic:
https://twitter.com/auntlellie/status/1055647732906541057

I'm not trying to get people to vote anything other than Democratic.  It's just that the machines-- at least in our state-- are ""malfunctioning""; the word is that straight ticket Dem votes are flipping Senator to Ted Cruz,  and straight ticket Rep votes are flipping Senator to a no-vote.  However, these vote-flips do not seem to happen (so far) when you check the box next to each candidates' name, instead of only the box next to ""Straight Party Vote - Dem"".

Similar reports are coming out of Georgia.
https://twitter.com/TheRoot/status/1055459014664962048

YES-- VOTE DEMOCRAT.  Just don't use the single-box straight-ticket option to do it.  Vote for each Democratic candidate individually, one at a time, down the list. REPUBLICANS ARE CHEATING. AGAIN. And they are using the straight-ticket shortcut to do it.

I have been blowing the horn about the vulnerabilities of electronic voting for about twenty years.  It's no coincidence that the owner of the company that manufactures these voting machines is a die-hard Republican.  They are pulling out all the stops this time.

https://www.politico.com/magazine/story/2016/08/2016-elections-russia-hack-how-to-hack-an-election-in-seven-minutes-214144",AngryRedHerring,e8gyrdy,democrats
"You can still vote for all Democrats without using the straight ticket option-- you just have to vote for each candidate individually.  It takes a little more time, but a number of individual votes are much harder to hack than a single straight ticket vote.

Reports here in Texas are of straight ticket Democrat votes changing Senator to Cruz, and straight ticket Republican votes are leaving the Senate vote blank.

Don't vote straight ticket just because it's easy.  Vote for each candidate individually and make it harder to hack. Also, that lets you vote against Republicans in races where there are no Democrats running.",AngryRedHerring,e8gxcun,democrats
"I've gotten my absentee ballot because i'm in college, I'm doing it. I never really vote for midterms but I swear I will this time, it's very important.",FlamingAshley,e8h7b5g,democrats
I've only ever used paper (NH and VA).,SA324410,e8hdr4i,democrats
"Honest proposition:

We need Semi-Public voting. The fact that we accept that our vote can be truly counted correctly when at some point it goes into a black box is ludicrous.",ytman,e8hn6g7,democrats
"It’s funny how these little glitches all seem to favor Rs. Even in this case, a vote for D flipping to R is a 2 point difference while a vote flipping from R to null is a 1 point difference. If Democrats and Republicans were supposed to get 100 votes and 10% each voted straight ticket, Democrats would wind up with 90, and Republicans 100 (The 10 votes the republicans lost to null would be made up by the D switching to R, but D does not get any additional votes). 

Honestly seems like a damn good way to launder votes.",chuckaslaxx,e8h5iby,democrats
"So sorry buddy, I am as amped on the troll juice as anyone. Thanks for being so diligent and patient.",Stopbeingrude,e8h24ms,democrats
"[OMG, it's like Parks and Recreation for real.](https://imgur.com/a/7SzQdnc) Frankly everything that happened to Leslie on that show has come true in real life. ",bumbiddlytake2,e8hwzaz,democrats
Is it done yet!  Hurry up!!! ;P,CarbonLifeForm69,e8hhb49,democrats
That would basically end voting among many minorities. :-(,ExoticCommunication,e8hp0bw,democrats
"I hear you.  And there's a lot of misinformation out there these days.  I don't blame you for being suspicious, and I don't fault you your fire. ;)",AngryRedHerring,e8h2j52,democrats
"I turned it in! :D Just today I turned it in to the University's Post Office, I gave them the 50 cents for the stamp as well, because if I don't put a stamp they won't even look at my ballot. I made sure of everything, hopefully it does get through since my college is in a conservative-ish area.",FlamingAshley,e8igsr3,democrats
How?,ytman,e8hpafc,democrats
"Minority voters may feel pressured to vote against their interests in places, and instead of voting for themselves may choose to simply not vote. 

The secret ballot lets people vote their conscience regardless of what others think or want. 

Open ballots can lead to voter intimidation, basically. ",ExoticCommunication,e8hpo1i,democrats
"That is funny because the Secret Ballot was adopted in America in response to minority voting. Quite literally the south saw an opening in government monitored voting as a way to control votes in the ways they were comfortable with. There were rally cries in the south actively saying that when they passed the Secret Ballot laws blacks would stop voting - and it worked!

And either way, what mechanism would force minority voters to feel this intimidation without the greater country being witness to it?  If my election is being tampered with it I want it to be forced to the light not be a question in the shadows.

The Secret Ballot has a core flaw - there is no way to know the authenticity of your vote or the vote of others. I.E. if the voter counters are corrupt, which the concern of lat has been, we have no record to verify the integrity of an honest and free election.

So we have two core problems:

Secret Ballots - no ability to verify election integrity by anyone but the vote counters. Who counts the vote matters.

Public Ballots - ability to coerce people into voting particular ways by threat.

I suggest merging the two, give a level of large scale anonymity in the vote but allow all people to immediately view their vote and find it located in the large scale psuedo-anonymous tally.",ytman,e8hqll6,democrats
"Texas 2018 Election 

[Early Voting Starts](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): October 22, 2018 

[General Election](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

[Check Your Voter Registration Status](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do)

",election_info_bot,e8gz8kw,democrats
"We need widescale national voter reform today.

&#x200B;

Abusing the margins in normal less partisan times would probably go unnoticed. Abusing the margins in hyper partisan times and you will quickly see the nation seize up.",ytman,e8hmb7g,democrats
"""User error"" uh, NO! This is called voter fraud and it's a crime. It's a violation of our constitutional rights and there's no way you can pin this on the people.",ImpossibleWonder,e8hqhkm,democrats
What we need is a law saying all voting has to be on paper.,Raspberries-Are-Evil,e8hoysk,democrats
[It's Parks and Recreation gone real.](https://imgur.com/a/7SzQdnc) ,bumbiddlytake2,e8hx8qm,democrats
Lying and Cheating Ted Cruz! ,data2dave,e8jcskd,democrats
"He did.  Absolutely without question.

The asshole should be held personally liable for any injurys or death that come from his harsh rhetoric.  His political rivals and anyone who identifys with democrats or is part of the media are his common targets and his mouth breathing cult of drooling idiots take his words seriously.
These weak minded fuckers react like a well trained dog to his hate speach.

We can't be rid of these assholes soon enough... ",batshitcrazy5150,e8f607o,democrats
"Yup, the MAGABomber would not exist without 45\*",DrNoPants,e8fjdb3,democrats
"Numerous pipe bombs have been sent to leaders of the Democratic Party and vocal critics of the President. The Obamas, Clintons, Joe Biden, Kamala Harris, Maxine Waters, George Soros, Robert De Niro, and John Brennan (care of CNN) were all the targets of a attempted assassination. This list easily reads as a political hit list of the President’s favorite enemies, a President that celebrates violence and encourages the hateful rhetoric of modern politics. While many politicians in the past have played on our differences, dividing Americans, Trump has enflamed those divisions for political gain.

During campaign rallies, he routinely encouraged violence against protestors - even offering to pay the legal fees (he didn’t end up paying). Trump “joked” about 2nd Amendment solutions should Clinton win After the election, he defended the white supremacists in Charlottesville that not only beat counter protestors with sticks, bats and shields but also murdered a woman by driving a car into the crowd. During these midterm rallies, he has attacked Democrats an a angry mob that will use violence if they win back Congress (which makes no sense whatsoever, but that’s who he is). He still leads chants of lock her up, though exactly who and for what isn’t exactly clear other than political opponents (Ted Cruz also got into this by saying that his opponent Beto O’Rourke should be jailed, I guess for running against him). And just last week he celebrated a Republican representative that plead guilty to assaulting a reporter that simply asked the candidate their position on repealing the ACA. Celebrated him as an American journalist was murdered by the Saudis (who only made the Saudi enemies list when he criticized Trump). As he calls the press the enemy of the people, encouraging despots around the world to imprison and murder journalists without American retribution.

I am clearly not saying that Trump built and sent these bombs. That is the fault entirely of the bomber. But this political environment is entirely the fault of President Trump. Well, Trump and the people that support him. It is no coincidence that racists chant Trump’s name as a they harass people of a darker hue as it elicits a strong feeling of pride in the white supremacists amongst us. And I don’t just mean the frothing MAGA-hat-wearers who cheered on his celebrations of violence in real time. Republican politicians either completely ignored or mildly rebuked his rhetoric while completely caved to his hate to win an election. It’s also the fault of all of those that voted for him. You had a chance to show him and other hate mongers, that incitement of political violence remains unacceptable in America and you failed spectacularly. He faced no electoral punishment for his behaviors and you rewarded with an unexpected victory.

Yesterday, as events unfolded, the President meekly read from a statement prepared by his staff. He did not stand with the former Presidents that had been targeted. But he read, the absolute minimal statement he needed to. And that lasted for less than a day. As political opponents received more packages, he went back to the campaign trail. While he did not aggressively attack as he normally did, he did demonstrate that he doesn’t care. He mocked the idea of his own statement- saying he can be good for awhile. Then this morning he attacked the mainstream media for this situation. Because reporting on Trump’s hateful rhetoric is their fault, for repeating his words and actions. The Press Secretary (who no longer holds daily press briefings) said that it was CNN’s fault for receiving a bomb at their office.

Trump and the Republicans will not unify the country. The entire Republican platform is about fear and hate. They want to encourage the haters to get out to vote. Those that hate blacks, hate Hispanics, hate Muslims, hate immigrants, hate gays, hate trans people, hate liberals and so on. They have always done this. But now their leader actively encourages the violence that follows. Hate crimes surged in 2017 against Jews and Muslims as the White House said nothing. White supremacists feel entitled to march in the streets, even starting a brawl last week in NYC. The President says nothing, and in fact purposefully describes himself as a nationalist (exactly what those people want).

The President and his party will not change. But we can change them. We are a week away from the end of the midterm election - voting is going on right now. You can vote to support the hate and violence further emboldening Trump. Or you can condemn it by voting for the Democrats. I think the choice is simple. We are all Americans. We are not enemies. We may be opponents for sure, but we are not enemies. And we should not reward the political party that doesn't seem to understand this.",deaconheel,e8glhrw,democrats
Republican party is the enemy of the people,CanderousBossk,e8f7xlp,democrats
"Maybe they'll cut out this ""both sides"" shit and stop responding to the ""liberal media"" label by entertaining right wing nonsense.",ostrich_semen,e8f6v81,democrats
"And he’s ratcheting up this morning by blaming the media and warning them to clean-up their act fast.  I assume this means, start reporting on me like Fox does or I’ll continue to incite my merry band of idiots to commit violence against you.",Oliver_Cockburn,e8fet67,democrats
"He did, but you know what? Everyone in media, from Fox News CNN to John Oliver followed him along this tract. They amplified his horrible voice. The solution, of course, is to give this human shitbag less time on air, to talk about REAL ISSUES like Climate Change that threaten the very existence of our species. Instead we're obsessed with a sociopathic liar.",Insipid_Pedantry,e8fag7m,democrats
[deleted],,e8f8jws,democrats
WH: No u. ,Douglust_Quaids,e8fdvsz,democrats
Victim blame ofc,zffacsB,e8f9514,democrats
I totally think he's behind this abomination ,ffafayfaytfayth,e8fpp6x,democrats
That was his intention and that is why they(trumpsters)  attacked these people. Pointing it out accomplishes nothing.,UltraInstinct51,e8g77z8,democrats
He doesn’t know what that means. ,GlobeTrott3r,e8gbnnu,democrats
"I honestly think he wants these people dead so he can win empathy points by pretending it's terrible.

",UterusTim,e8gc7pk,democrats
Vote!  Make America Smart Again! old people ALWAYS VOTE!  young people only say they will!!!.....PROVE ME WRONG!  or get ready for 4 more years of tRUMP.    EARLY VOTING HAS STARTED.,Stinkymatilda,e8gce3t,democrats
That's reasonable to say. ,2HeadedTasmanianBoy,e8gew5r,democrats
"Lol, you people are so ignorant",buffalo_chum,e8gzeih,democrats
"So true.
But the idiots at Fox News are claiming that the bombs sent in the mail are a false flag.",red_carpet_hero,e8hk8q0,democrats
No shit,When_The_Levy_Breaks,e8fde16,democrats
"Ah but the liberals are the violent ones remember ?

/s",Hiccaries,e8fjwh4,democrats
"Trump is the abusive husband who beats his wife and then says, “this is all your fault, you deserve this”.",alllrighty-then,e8fsh96,democrats
"Trump is a terrorist organizer, plain and simple. He shouts out ideology, targets, methods, encouragement, and then after the attack, explicitly supports the ideals that the attacker was fighting for.

The only difference between him, and Ruhollah Khomeini is that Khomeini probably could have won a popular vote at some point in his regime.",SnarkOilSalesman,e8ftspr,democrats
"shit, traitor trump is their leader.",IIllIIllIlllI,e8fuhq9,democrats
No,spankmydrank,e8g3rci,democrats
[removed],,e8ffqof,democrats
[removed],,e8fte9l,democrats
[removed],,e8g7b5m,democrats
"CNN..
 You were asking for crazy when you start becoming a hypocritical ""news"" who can be racist when it fits your narrative against trump. And you think someone out there is crazy and pathetic enough to do this..
 And you are shocked... please. Stupid crazy attracts stupid crazies ",mythrowxra,e8g65l8,democrats
Nope. The racebaiters that are Obama and his administration brought us this. Trump and his kind are a reaction to Obama's presidency.,DicoVeritas,e8gf4wk,democrats
"All of my co workers started the “seems to me to be convenient timing, like the left is terrorizing the left to make it look like the right did this”...  it’s scary how it Fox says it, these idiots will believe and spread it.",9vapors,e8f7zld,democrats
"My Trump loving coworker said ""it's too bad they didn't go off"" and ""they need to find a better bomb maker next time"". I didn't even respond. It's so disgusting. ",katashscar,e8fjzkk,democrats
"Definitely I completely agree. I should not be held responsible for my own actions, it’s the politicians fault I act this way, I can’t think for myself so I should not be punished. 

",Tha_avg_geologist,e8gdyy4,democrats
So did he also incite the lefy wing violence? Like rand paul's beating or the congreesional shooting at the baseball field where people actually got injured. But lets not remember these instances. There are crazy people in this world unfortunately   on the left and the right.,memultipletimes,e8fkwoq,democrats
"its gotta work both ways then, when democrats say people are going to die from net neutrality, from ACA getting repealed, and Paris climate agreement being left and these things happen...

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/2017_Congressional_baseball_shooting
http://www.latimes.com/local/lanow/la-me-ln-gop-candidate-attack-20180911-story.html
https://saraacarter.com/breaking-antifa-attacks-gop-headquarters-in-nyc-warns-merely-the-beginning/
https://wreg.com/2018/10/24/utah-man-charged-for-sending-toxic-letters-to-trump-other-admin-officials/

one thing is different from dems vs GOP most republicans don't blame democrat leaders for what their followers do but the other way around not so much.",Aordaek,e8gqmja,democrats
"Jeezy like to drank, jeezy like to smoke, jeezy like to mix arm and hammer with his coke. ",Tha_avg_geologist,e8giur1,democrats
[removed],,e8fhhao,democrats
"""[...] his mouth breathing cult of drooling idiots take his words seriously. These weak minded fuckers react like a well trained dog to his hate speach [sic] .

We can't be rid of these assholes soon enough..."" 

I don't believe that Trump is on record ever having uttered something as hateful as what you just wrote. His supporters have been physically attacked on a regular basis since his success began to seem likely. Maybe you're an awful, resentful person that hates the world because you've failed and are a mere, degenerate speck of irrelevance? That certainly sucks, but it isn't Drumpf's fault.  Keep Drumpfing, though. It will certainly make the world a better place ;^). 

",SocializeHelicopters,e8gcaym,democrats
Ahhh more accusations without evidence. Interesting considering how poorly the Kavenaugh confirmation went for you liberals. You think y’all would have learned by now.,Warfighter1776,e8gsosl,democrats
Do you need a puppy and hot chocolate? I am loving the pool ure stupidity coming from the left right now,buffalo_chum,e8gzg3h,democrats
[removed],,e8fhn6q,democrats
Or use it as an excuse to censor the media. [Little by little...](https://while-you-were-sleeping.com/2018/06/18/little-by-little-bit-by-bit-unaware-they-become-monsters/) ,greenflash1775,e8flnrs,democrats
"This would have been a good strategy during the presidential campaign. Unfortunately, we are where we are, two years later. The moron is the president. Unfortunately, they have to cover him.",aftli,e8ggi7u,democrats
"Ah, yes, ignore it. Wonderful solution. Absolutely brilliant. 

Sorry man, even if left wing media ignored it and didn't give him any airtime the right wing media would. We aren't worried about the left acting in violence because of a Trump dog-whistle we are worried about the right. CNN and John Oliver not covering the president would just make things worse and allow him to do this shit completely criticized . That is the worst idea.",Rad_Association,e8fc245,democrats
"John Oliver certainly has spent a lot of time talking about Trump but I don’t think he’s covered him in an unnecessary fashion. Most of the shit he’s done has been akin to saying “hey, look at what this asshole is doing. This is bad for x, because of y, & you’ll feel it in z(time).” CNN has boosted Trump so much it’s sickening. I don’t think they meant to. I think they just wanted to be the natural Trump opposition & come out on the correct side of history. But they were doomed. You can’t possibly be a 24 hour news network & constantly bait the flame of an egomaniac & not expect some sort of adverse outcomes. Their foresight, or lack thereof, is what has given Trump ammunition to call them fake news, to say they’re obsessed with him, to excite & incite his followers even more with every story. I feel like what John Oliver has been doing is remarkably less inflammatory than what CNN has done & will continue to do. ",Team_Muff_N_Stuff,e8fbykg,democrats
"You are so right. I want more of this too. But after the election
/s",upnorthmetalhead,e8fx0vw,democrats
"Like it or not Trump is one of the most powerful men in the world right now, ignoring his vitriol isn't really on the table.",maikuxblade,e8gi2tt,democrats
"We should also remember that as problematic as he is, he is still the President of the United States. The things he says should be reported by the news, because that's their job. And people like John Oliver should continue to voice their opinions about it.",multiplelogasms,e8fiz9o,democrats
"Sure, we should ignore that potus stole his position, we should ignore him locking up children, we should ignore him saying that nazis are very fine people, we should ignore that he's a racist old narcissist who is whipping up like-minded people into a frenzy.

We should all just put our fingers in our ears while this country gets turned over to the fascists. We should maybe ask the Germans how well that works.

I understand your sentiment, particularly as it applies pre-election, but those days are done.  He is potus and what he does or says (in relation, again, to whipping up his insane base) impacts all of us.",scoobydooami,e8ftsg5,democrats
"He's the president. He's threatening and passing legislation on these issues. 

They can't ignore news? ",Gsteel11,e8fljeh,democrats
they claim it's' a chinese hoax?  you have too be kidding.  ,IIllIIllIlllI,e8fuviv,democrats
Jesus dude. I get the anger but just wow. Take a 5 minute breather and chill with the hate. ,Towns-a-Million,e8f9o2k,democrats
Duh? That's what victims are for /s,Towns-a-Million,e8f9p5d,democrats
"All I'm saying is 99% of their accusations turn out to be projections.   They seem pretty damn certain this is a political move, wonder what made them think that. ",wwaxwork,e8fxc09,democrats
"Republicans openly call their opposition the ""enemy of the people"", chant ""lock her up"" at every rally, accuse democrats and liberals of actively ""tearing down America"" and elected a man who championed a conspiracy theory that our last president was a secret Muslim spy that wasn't born in the U.S.

Don't tell me that a dozen bombs being mailed to democrats is anywhere close to McConnel being yelled at. Don't tell me antifa is a problem when you have white nationalists running down counter protestors in cars. Don't tell me it's ""both sides"", not until the left rises to the level of violence in the right. ",chuc16,e8fi2wg,democrats
"Lol you’re equating attempted assassinations with confronting politicians in public. Did you ever imagine you’d sink so low? 

But yeah. “Both sides” 
",Womeisyourfwiend,e8fk5m7,democrats
"Antifa isn't leftist in the slightest. Confrontation isn't violence, although sending bombs via USPS certainly is.",NeetSnoh,e8fgd14,democrats
Antifa is a loosely affiliated group which people can self proclaim membership. If you think literally everyone who wears black and doesn't like fascism is a mob you seriously need mental health counseling.,1337f41l,e8fjkqd,democrats
Bombs you dumb fuck. You are equating bombs to fist. You are hopeless and evil.,HurtfulPost,e8g08nm,democrats
"At least we don’t parade with white nationalists, who I’m sue you think are good people ( on both sides)?",upnorthmetalhead,e8fwom5,democrats
Says the shill,GlobeTrott3r,e8gbrtb,democrats
"You are right about one thing..., Trump has done nothing.",backpackwayne,e8gcm0e,democrats
Found the shill,GlobeTrott3r,e8gbuou,democrats
"Yes. Democrats attacking the hope of the Democratic Party. I think killing your Presidential hopeful won't drum up enough support to be worth, you know, killing your presidential hopeful.",2HeadedTasmanianBoy,e8gf6f3,democrats
"Well, political fights are different than sending a bomb with the hope of killing people. I agree they shouldn't be shocked  because nothing should shock you in this political age.

Random thought: What do you think this time in politics will be called in 50 years.",2HeadedTasmanianBoy,e8gf2p4,democrats
Yes. And simultaneously herding and funding a giant caravan of terrorists through the border. No wonder the dems lost power in 2014! They've been spending all their election money on all this stupid bullshit to make the regressives look like big mean monster bois! ,Towns-a-Million,e8f9lej,democrats
"It’s possible, but no one at this time knows who did it or why so both sides are speculating and using it to inflame their base. I don’t think it’s a “false flag” but there has been shadier shit go down in the past so we wait and let the FBI do their job. Also, vote, definitely vote. ",Mazyc,e8fp7z7,democrats
all of your co-workers?  wtf?  Do you work at the RNC or the NRA?,IIllIIllIlllI,e8fupu6,democrats
I'm sure HR would love to hear that one of their employees endorses domestic terrorism.,Thakrawr,e8fqerq,democrats
"If they had gone off, it’d be absolute nightmare for Trump and the GOP, without saying anything about the victims involved.

That is really *not* what he wants, even if he thinks he does.",Zeno84,e8ftvdh,democrats
"Rand Paul’s beating? He got in a fight with his neighbor because they’re both rich pricks. Is that so hard to believe? I mean you have seen Rand Paul speak, right? Not exactly likable. Maybe compared to Ted Cruz... ",greenflash1775,e8fl8d2,democrats
"Rand Paul got [his ass kicked](https://www.gq.com/story/inside-rand-pauls-neighborhood-fight) for piling his yard clippings on his neighbor’s lawn.
",FiscalClifBar,e8g343v,democrats
**whatabout!?!?!**,IIllIIllIlllI,e8fut1w,democrats
"хорошая попытка, иди домой",spadingo,e8fjqsa,democrats
"HA HAA HA HAAA.

good fucking luck.    Your boy is fucked, he knows it and you know it... ",batshitcrazy5150,e8fhsa9,democrats
Can't wait to see your responses when they catch the bomber and it's a guy covered in MAGA apparel. ,TheFatMan2200,e8fjc1u,democrats
"Republicans talk about repealing amendments too. 
",Gsteel11,e8flh77,democrats
"I'm sure you're right about that, guess I'm just frustrated about the fact that Trump supporters just don't care about facts, about indictments, about any of it. I'm sure we need MORE people like John Oliver keeping politicians honest, or at least a less shade of corrupt.",Insipid_Pedantry,e8fvxtm,democrats
Ratings. Period. ,KenEatsBarbie,e8fe8r0,democrats
"Sure, I agree about CNN -- it's practically unwatchable and that's a shame. ",Insipid_Pedantry,e8fw1sx,democrats
"Not only that, but was a front-runner and then nominee for president for a major political party. Ignoring him would have been irresponsible at almost every turn. ",MythGuy,e8fot34,democrats
"You're right of course, we should counter the poisonous rhetoric Trump spouts off. We should surround the debate with facts and let the people decide.",Insipid_Pedantry,e8fvr86,democrats
"I think your confused about how fascism works and what it actually is because Trump and his supporters are not that... but keep throwing out buzzwords. 


“Fascism is a form of radical authoritarian ultranationalism, characterized by dictatorial power, forcible suppression of opposition and strong regimentation of society and of the economy, which came to prominence in early 20th-century Europe”

So let’s break this down since we like focusing on facts and not “fake news”.

Trump  does not favor or enforce strict obedience to authority, especially that of the government, at the expense of personal freedom. So he’s not authoritarian.

Trump does not portray extreme nationalism that promotes the interest of one state or people above all others. He wants AMERICA to succeed as a nation. He doesn’t fit that definition either. 

He absolutely isn’t a dictator since he’s the president of a constitutional republic that used an electoral college system of voting to elect him. 

This is where it gets interesting. “FORCIBLE suppression of opposition... the only people I’ve seen using force to suppress opposition is ANTIFA. Laughably hypocritical since they call themselves anti-fascists. Surely you’ve seen the videos of them in places like Portland and at UC Berkeley. 

Trump has not enforced stricter regimentation of society or the economy. He’s done the exact opposite. 

Democrats/liberals and specially ANTIFA (a far left group of liberals) fit the definition much better than you could ever hope Trump would. 
",Warfighter1776,e8gtltb,democrats
"Umm, no. This man is going to get someone killed and is well on his way to destroying lives. I wish his mom would have swallowed whatever curdled load Donald's dad's pimple-dick dribbled out that day",Rad_Association,e8fbtt5,democrats
We’re supposed to be cool with terrorists now? Fuck that shit. ,rblue,e8g6jl2,democrats
"I'd hardly call those crude objects anything close to a pipe bomb. A dollar tree clock, with some wires and electrical tape around some PVC pipe mailed conveniently two weeks before the midterms. Recipients post pictures of the devices instead of evacuating. Sounds like a stunt made by Democrats themselves in all honesty, something like that wouldn't even make it through the postal service.",kekistanipoland,e8fmyke,democrats
"The era of stupid people basing reality on their feelings which end up only being driven by a personal agenda.

",mythrowxra,e8gfk35,democrats
> THe VIOLENT LEFT are funding caravans of refugees to seek asylum at our border! We're the good guys who separate out the toddlers and infants to throw in cages.,bossfoundmylastone,e8fo4ku,democrats
Welcome to the midwest. ,wwaxwork,e8fx9ag,democrats
"I like your way of thinking, but they wouldn't do anything. The supervisors Are also trump supporters and echo the same sentiment. ",katashscar,e8frw3o,democrats
Mighty presumptuous of you to assume that he thinks. ,ShinyBrain,e8gh3yj,democrats
So lets ignore the shooting i guess? Rand Paul's attacker was a registered dem and socialist but lets not care about this either. If it was a dem that was beatin the left would be screaming that this was right wing violence if the attacker was a registered republican. ,memultipletimes,e8flsft,democrats
If you read the other comments you would realise the point i was making.,memultipletimes,e8g36wn,democrats
Lol whatabout is a term used when somebody doesnt want to face the fact that  the opposition is just doing the same as previous people in charge and dont want it pointed out,memultipletimes,e8fw9bc,democrats
"I can tell you what he’ll say. “Well, leftists are worse! They were asking for it! They deserved it because BEnGHazi CLintOn blOwJob WheRe ArE Her EMAiLs!” ",Womeisyourfwiend,e8fjrtn,democrats
[removed],,e8flmf2,democrats
[removed],,e8fly2d,democrats
"> This man is going to get someone killed 

You really think we haven't passed this point yet? 100% someone has already killed in the name of Trump and his rhetoric.",Aurailious,e8g994m,democrats
"Damn straight he’s gonna get someone killed. Like, I dunno... The entirety of ISIS?",NickIsGroovy,e8fhrjf,democrats
"Really? I didn't realize you were an expert in explosives with access to this evidence. Do you work at the FBI, u/kekistanipoland? Tell me, were the 41 abortion clinic bombings just as amateurish? Or do you simply dismiss those incidents by accusing the medical providers of bombing their own clinics? 

Its amazing how far these alt-right extremists will go to pretend they are the victims. Literally accusing democrats of bombing themselves to avoid responsibility for their violent extremism ",chuc16,e8foawx,democrats
The very same thing Obama was doing while he was president! But you never heard about because he was a Democrat and it didn’t fit the anti-trump narrative. Children have been separated from their parents while crossing the border for decades. It’s nothing new.,Warfighter1776,e8gs0ob,democrats
Then go higher than supervisor.,scoobydooami,e8ftgrb,democrats
"It was over their HoA. Even if Rand Paul wasn’t in congress, he would have gotten attacked. It had literally zero to do with politics. ",zubatman4,e8fp9oa,democrats
"Because the shooting is the shooting, it’s clearly politically motivated so that’s one. Gabby Giffords, the pizza gate guy, every abortion clinic bombing/shooting, George Tiller, Charlottesville, Oklahoma City, etc. etc. No one can deny these incidents but looking up the voter registration when the motive is clearly just two cunts that got into it over neighborhood bullshit is a false equivalency. ",greenflash1775,e8fn9zc,democrats
"what's your first language?  Use your normal language and I'll use google translate.  

edit- you can't even respond, sad.

(see what I did there?)",IIllIIllIlllI,e8fwrfo,democrats
I hope you find a way to deradicalize yourself within the next few years. It must feel weird to live in a world where everything is a conspiracy against your side.,Jorgwalther,e8flxly,democrats
"Jesus, you kids are young. 

https://www.businessinsider.com/donald-trump-birthright-citizenship-14th-amendment-debate-2015-8

https://www.oregonlive.com/trending/2016/10/donald_trump_supporters_tweet_repeal_the_19th_amendment.html

https://m.huffpost.com/us/entry/us_5bb1f4a1e4b0343b3dc1f15f

Where is your proof of your statements? ",Gsteel11,e8fm62f,democrats
"More like people suspected of crimes, people who disagree with him, people who are against racism, people who work at pizza places... the list is longer and the pattern is pretty much chaos. He doesn't care who he hurts and ISIS hasn't seemed to be his priority target rhetorically, he saves that for our citizens...",1337f41l,e8fjcv1,democrats
"I do not claim to be an expert in explosives, however I do actually know someone who is, who's in the military. As you can tell, this prompted an interesting conversation. I have seen the numerous debunking around, and it particularly makes sense. The reason why investigators can't even detonate the pipe bombs is because they simply can't work, and looking at images shared by recipients (like the CNN one) it doesn't resemble the electronics (including the electronic trigger) that you'll find on a real pipe bomb. I mean, there's even an isis sticker on one of them...

Want to talk about violent extremism? Like when Trump was sent ricin powder? Unlike the pipe bombs, that was actually real!",kekistanipoland,e8gje4j,democrats
"> The very same thing Obama was doing while he was president!

Sorry, this is *not* a case of ""both sides are the same"" - **not even close**. Only a Trump lackey would try to defend his policies by saying ""Obama did it too"" when Obama's policies were far far more tolerant than Trump's ZERO TOLERANCE policies that separated families at massively higher numbers. But don't let the facts get in the way of your feels.

https://www.vox.com/2018/6/21/17488458/obama-immigration-policy-family-separation-border

Here's some of the takeaways from that article:

>Trump made separating families a matter of standard practice. Obama did not.

>Both presidents prosecuted many border crossers. But Trump’s “zero tolerance” policy created family separation.

>Both presidents housed “unaccompanied” minors in temporary facilities — but under Obama, they’d pretty much all arrived in the US unaccompanied

>Obama detained families together — until the courts stepped in

>Obama was faced with a genuine increase in children and families coming to the US; Trump just decided that typical numbers were unacceptable

",feature_creep,e8gxgwr,democrats
"This. If I heard that shit, I'd be in HR fast as shit. Murder is the 3rd most common cause of death in the workplace. I'd want that motherfucker gone.",HillbillyPartySloth,e8g8jd8,democrats
So are you missing my point that the dems would be calling this right wing violence if it was the other way around or you just dont believe it would be a talking point for the dems? Still no comment on the shooter though. There are crazy people on the left and the right and believe its a one sided issue is absurd.,memultipletimes,e8fq5xs,democrats
"Snowman get yo hands up high, it’s ya boy mr 17.5, I take ya back to the block, back to the kitchen, back to the pots",Tha_avg_geologist,e8giqpn,democrats
Careful with the sweets don’t burn ma seats ,Tha_avg_geologist,e8girh2,democrats
The guy that shot gabby was to the left of her politically. He thought she was to far right.  Funny how the motives of a guy who shot up a country concert aren’t of any importance to the press. ,drunkboater,e8fvadk,democrats
The point is if it was republican that beat a dem the dems would be crying right wing violence so thats why the right looks these things up because the left would do the same in a heart beat.,memultipletimes,e8ftztv,democrats
I did respond lol. Stick to the topic. My first language is irrelevant.,memultipletimes,e8g0uog,democrats
If cant understand what i wrote then this convo is over. This isnt a classroom. Read it again slowly then get back to me.,memultipletimes,e8fx0c7,democrats
[removed],,e8fmolp,democrats
[removed],,e8fnaho,democrats
[removed],,e8fmfzi,democrats
"Wait WHAT!? No! It cant be! Are you saying... That Donald Trump... Sentences criminals... To death!? AH GOD NO!!!!!

At least he didnt kill hardworking American Patriots! Rest in peace Seth Rich!",NickIsGroovy,e8flqtc,democrats
"Oh, you have a 'friend' that is an explosives expert! I see, so he's involved in the investigation? How else did he get access to these devices, how does he know so much about the inner workings of the investigation? It's almost as though you are completely full of shit

I can't find any sources that say the bombs can't be detonated. I did see that there was an ISIS sticker on one and some of the names were incorrectly spelled on the addresses. The bomb material is real, as is the detonator.

None of them went off, which would suggests to me an amateur built the bombs and was dumb enough to think a sticker would throw off the investigation in case one of them was intercepted. That's complete conjecture, but it comes from my friend who is a counter terrorism expert and former CIA director so take it for what it is (/s).

Seriously, where did you see this 'numerous debunking'? r/The_Donald? Youtube? The proud boys facebook page? Did another one of your 'friends' tell you this?

Obama was sent ricin, twice. Were those false flag operations as well?

Edit: The AP reports the man charged with the crime is a MAGA hat wearing, Alt-Right troll with an extensive criminal record and a van covered in anti liberal propaganda and conspiracy theories.",chuc16,e8hl362,democrats
"Obama DID make separating families standard practice after the courts ruled that children could not be held in the same detention center as adults awaiting trial. That decision was made under Obama and Trump had to follow the same rules. Ever jail in the US follows the same rules as well. Juveniles have n an adult detention facility can’t even see an adult inmate.

Again, it wasn’t Trumps zero tolerance policy that created the separation. It was the decision by the courts that children could not be held in adult detention facilities. Trumps zero tolerance policies simply resulted in more people being detained and sent to trial which results in higher amounts of separation that we would expect from Obama’s policies. But DHS doesn’t have a number for the Obama presidency. 

https://www.factcheck.org/2018/06/did-the-obama-administration-separate-families/

According to this article between 2010 and 2016, (for even numbers sake) 2.36 million were apprehended for crossing the border illegally. Of them, 493,000 were referred for prosecution. I’ve been unable to find out an approximate percentage in regards the ration of children to adults crossing the border so we’ll go with 10%. So that means of the 493,000 that went to trial 49,000 had kids with them. Because of the court ruling , over those 6 years 49,000 families would have been separated while they awaited trial and deportation. 

And these aren’t highlights that YOU found. It’s the bold lettering Vox used. And Vox is hardly a reputable source of just about anything.
",Warfighter1776,e8hdiqc,democrats
"No, I absolutely agree that wackjobs kill people, but if Republicans were getting bombed, it probably would be someone on the left. ",zubatman4,e8fqzoy,democrats
The shooter was a fucked up situation. ,zubatman4,e8fr10k,democrats
"> So are you missing my point that the dems would be calling this right wing violence if it was the other way around or you just dont believe it would be a talking point for the dems?

No, we'd still call it a dispute between two rich pricks.  Unlike you, apparently, we can comprehend the nuances of individual circumstances.

And the key difference between this instance, and the shooting you're referencing, is that you don't hear Democrats constantly amplifying the voices of people who demand violence against conservatives.  You don't hear Democrats calling their targets ""enemies of the people,"" and you don't hear Democrats applauding politicians that literally bodyslam reporters.

Instead, Democrats immediately admonished the shooter (in the case you reference), and Democrats practically trample over each other in an effort to be the first person to admonish a fellow Democrat who even remotely implies support for violence against conservatives (see: everyone and their mother getting on television and admonishing Maxine Waters and Kamala Harris).",nocorelyt,e8g4wfy,democrats
"Yeah, someone who was left leaning shot at some senators. That's your *one and only* incident that you cite. Shall we explore all of the incidents where the right perpetrated violence towards left? Do you really want to go there?? because your side looks pretty bad in that light.

https://www.forbes.com/sites/realspin/2017/08/21/which-ideology-has-inspired-the-most-murders-in-terrorist-attacks-on-u-s-soil/#32525d6f1e74

>some ideologies inspire more terrorism than others. Islamists have killed about 14 times as many people as Nationalist and Right Wing terrorists who, in turn, have killed about 10 times as many people as Left Wing terrorists. 

Islamists are also far-right ideologies, just because they are coming from a religion other than christianity doesn't mean they aren't right-leaning. To lean right is to lean to regressive, and unfortunately that has lead to violence far more than that coming from any left-leaning groups.

",feature_creep,e8gy3jv,democrats
Nobody knows the guys motive to shoot up the concert is probably why there wasn't much talk about it.  The media at the time was trying to think of a motive but nothing really added up to be a good case for a plausible motive. Some people are just crazy. But your example of gabby is good reason to never assume political affiliation.,memultipletimes,e8g2brw,democrats
"So you actually think that all of federal, state, and local law enforcement are conspiring together to cover up that the democrats sent these bombs to themselves? ",Jorgwalther,e8fn8aq,democrats
Imagine my shock that a troll doesnt understand links when given to him. ,Gsteel11,e8fng2y,democrats
"Links are there? Waiting on your links...

Edit: the original comment literally ended with ""brb"". It takes a second to get a link, not that you actually ever looked anything up or know how it works. ",Gsteel11,e8fmin4,democrats
"Actually hard working americans is exactly who he hates, threatens violence against and incites others to violence against.",1337f41l,e8fluaq,democrats
"> Obama DID make separating families standard practice after the courts ruled that children could not be held in the same detention center as adults awaiting trial. That decision was made under Obama 

You just disproved your own statement here. THE FUCKING COURTS decided it - NOT FUCKING OBAMA. How thick do you have to be???  Obama didn't decide to do it - a court ordered it. Was Obama also the Judge on that court? FUCK NO. Sorry, but your reply is just full of cognitive dissonance . ",feature_creep,e8hvb5w,democrats
"Yea thats common sense and nobody on this thread has said otherwise so why state that it would be somebody on the left if republicans were bombed. Regardless left or right, whoever did this is crazy. ",memultipletimes,e8frc16,democrats
When they go lower we go lower is one of many things said by the left. Or how about the kathy griffin and the headless trump that was only condemned after an uproar fron the right. Where are the dems condemning antifa when they are causing problems in he streets?These are a few of many things said by the left you just choose to turn a blind eye to. The dems only condemn these things if they are put on the spot about it. If there is no uproar from the right the left wouldnt say a thing. Dems may not say enemy of the people exactly but they sure demonized everybody on right which incites violence. Your bias clouds your judgement. To say one party is morally better then the other is foolish.,memultipletimes,e8g6m09,democrats
[removed],,e8fni6t,democrats
[removed],,e8fnkz5,democrats
[removed],,e8fmvsp,democrats
"Dunno about that. Seeing as hes the one thats created millions and millions of jobs for them. Ironically, it seems to not be the democrats taking them up. ",NickIsGroovy,e8flwu6,democrats
"I can say that one party is morally better than the other.  You know how I can say that?

When Congresswoman Waters called for confrontation, we admonished her.  When it came to Antifa, we condemned it repeatedly, and even wrote pieces on whether or not it's okay to punch a neo-Nazi (general consensus: no, it isn't).  When it came to Kathy Griffin, we harshly condemned her (and, trust me, whether a bunch of people who tweet under #tcot complained about her photo or not wasn't a factor) and she barely even has a career now in an industry that's overwhelmingly liberal.  Time and time again, we have denounced political violence by far-left extremists unequivocally, without saying there's ""bad people on both sides,"" or hemming and hawing and splitting hairs.

Meanwhile, right now, in The_Donald, your people are complaining that none of the pipe bombs went off.

That's how I can say one party is morally better than the other.",nocorelyt,e8gac4t,democrats
">When they go lower we go lower is one of many things said by the left. Or how about the kathy griffin and the headless trump that was only condemned after an uproar fron the right. Where are the dems condemning antifa when they are causing problems in he streets?

Do you know that ""antifa"" stands for Anti-Fascist??  Do you understand that they are only a thing because the right has tilted far too close to fascism? The fascism from the right is absolutely scary - including all the hateful rhetoric coming from Trump towards the media, intelligence agencies, the left, or anyone that could contribute to exposing him for what he is. 

I sometimes think about why I haven't already joined Antifa to help fight fascism in America.

Do you even think Fascism is a bad thing? It's getting pretty difficult to tell if anyone on the right would say yes to that - except maybe Robert Mueller and other old-school *real* Republican *patriots*. And no, Q-anon is not one of those. 

>The dems only condemn these things if they are put on the spot about it. If there is no uproar from the right the left wouldnt say a thing. Dems may not say enemy of the people exactly but they sure demonized everybody on right which incites violence. Your bias clouds your judgement. 

This is absolutely *pure* projection and gaslighting.  Since when has Trump ever condemned anything outright? ""Good people *on both sides*"" - PFFF what the fuck are you smoking son.

>To say one party is morally better then the other is foolish.\

It's a provable truth, unlike the ""alternative truth"" the right has openly admitted to creating for themselves.",feature_creep,e8gytsm,democrats
"Man you forget to mention that operation north woods got shot down before it actually happened. So no, that point is invalid unless you can provide an actual false flag that was used successfully instead of a proposed false flag that never happened ",ember4,e8fofd7,democrats
"Yeah I've been on the internet long enough to see the Operation Northwoods wiki page being thrown up as evidence to suggest anything is possible, which is it. 

I'm just saying, I bet it isn't.... when was the last time there was an actual false flag? I feel like the right talks about false flags SO MUCH and I don't know any democrats or liberals that actually say there are false flags going on.",Jorgwalther,e8fopxn,democrats
"Operation Northwoods never happened, it's not proof of anything. ",demauscian,e8fqbpw,democrats
Dumb asses be dumb assing. Maybe don't support the radical right wing terrorists who are the group comitting all the violence and having no world knowledge ,CanderousBossk,e8fr7oh,democrats
"You give me chicken shit and say its chicken salad and then brag about how I stopped and didnt eat it? Lol

The fucking ""wins"" you guys claim. ",Gsteel11,e8fnsxp,democrats
"So.. you YOU ask for links... and you give me this shit? Lolol

Can one SINGLE trump fan not be a huge flaming hypocrite for more than two fucking paragraphs in a row? 

Amazing... simply amazing how you're a little bitch when I ask you the same thing you asked me. ",Gsteel11,e8fn2v8,democrats
"You're also wrong, he has eliminated millions of necessary positions. He has destroyed jobs for hard working americans by placing anti science agendas in science backed government institutions like the epa.",1337f41l,e8fodlt,democrats
He can't even pay the people he hires to construct his hotels. Please do tell how he has improved anyone's life other than his own.,1337f41l,e8fo8n1,democrats
You mean in the economy that the obama fixed that trump is taking credit for?,PrincessFuckShitDamn,e8fmgyu,democrats
"You siting another reddit page isnt proof of morality just look at r/politics and there are many there who do th same. Hillary said you cant be civil with the opposition. Many on the left do think its ok to punch neo nazis and u saying the left doesnt is ridiculous. It took awhile for the left to condemn kathy if you were paying attention, most democrats i know laughed at the picture. You are completley bias.",memultipletimes,e8gcg1f,democrats
Look up attacks on conservatibes then you will see lista on cases where conservatives were ayyacked by libs. Facism is bad and if you think america is now becoming facist then u should researh more about actual facist countrys. Antifa is a joke and look at as more of a mob sense they cause more issues then anything else. Antifa has acco.plished nothing except property damage and blocking traffic. Your another bias dem. You need to get your news from multiple outlets that swing left and right to get a better picture of the truth.,memultipletimes,e8hm04q,democrats
"I would like to debate you however, I can not do it in the comments. My response time is limited to ten minutes per response because others have been downvoting me.",NickIsGroovy,e8fqfcp,democrats
[removed],,e8fnvo3,democrats
You got a link that Obama fixed the economy?,Legendary_Hypocrite,e9b8qw2,democrats
"Well this is ironic. Because Obama said he himself couldnt do it.

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DuhXkCF-L2E](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DuhXkCF-L2E)

&#x200B;",NickIsGroovy,e8fmswy,democrats
"Maybe you should do some reading yourself and educate yourself instead of swallowing blindly the rhetoric given to you by snake oil saleseman Trump.

https://www.forbes.com/sites/realspin/2017/08/21/which-ideology-has-inspired-the-most-murders-in-terrorist-attacks-on-u-s-soil/#32525d6f1e74

>**some ideologies inspire more terrorism than others.** Islamists have killed about 14 times as many people as Nationalist and **Right Wing terrorists who, in turn, have killed about 10 times as many people as Left Wing terrorists.**

To lean right is to lean to regressive, and unfortunately that has lead to violence far more than that coming from any left-leaning groups. Like it or not, islamic terrorists are also regressive right-leaning groups much like their christian right-wing extremeist counterparts in America.

",feature_creep,e8hvp85,democrats
"Lol, so fuxking sad that all you have is lying about what we both know isnt true. ",Gsteel11,e8fnz2s,democrats
Nobody can do it in just 8 years. What he can (and did) do is set positive changes in motion which trump is now taking credit for.,PrincessFuckShitDamn,e8g080x,democrats
"Thinking the left is progressive is bias because people on the right would say they opposite. Progressive in what sense? Yes islaminc terroist are regressive in the sense that still want to kill people over religous views like thousands of years ago. Is it regressive to put america first? Americans who actually care about america would say that it makes sense. Name a couple things without a bias view that is regressive to USA society that the trump administration has done. You think that republicans are regressive and conservatives believe that the ""progress"" that the left wants is ""progress"" in the wrong direction.  This is why tump won POTUS and if the dems dont get there act together then he will likely be reelected. I vote with my wallet like many americans and my wallet sais vote trump. 

",memultipletimes,e8hymx1,democrats
[removed],,e8foenf,democrats
"> Is it regressive to put america first?

By fucking up relationships with allies that have been with us since the inception of this country? Yes - that is regressive, and that's what Trump has done.

>Americans who actually care about america would say that it makes sense.

Americans who *actually* care about America can also recognize the damage Trump has done to us internationally. Ripping up treaties signals that America does not honor commitments. It sends a very bad message not to negotiate with us because the next crazy fucker the right elects will just rip up whatever progress was made - and then they will lie about it. Just as Trump has done. But i'm sure you'll find a way to squirm around that fact with some nonsense you gobbled up from Fox news or worse. 









",feature_creep,e8i2ldt,democrats
"Lol, I love how you're trying to spin you being an incompetent asshole into ""providing real links"" lol",Gsteel11,e8foz2j,democrats
"America has gotten the short stick on these treatys which would be ok if the other side held up there side of the deal. Thats why we are getting out of this treaty with russia and the nuclear deal with Iran. It actually sends a good signal to other countrys that if they dont hold up there end of the deal then we will back out of as we should be doing. Also these allys also put there country first and thats why they get more out of the deal then we do and its time for America to have the same mentality.  In the end America needs to level the playing field which trump is trying to do. You probably believe that these trade deals that trump is disrupting are actually equal for both sides. In the end our allies need us more then we need them, hence the reason the USA is called upon by other countries if something major is happening. You gave one regressive example that leaves out the details of these treaties and deals which would give you the reasons why we should back out of them. As in cleaning up previous administrations errors.",memultipletimes,e8i44o9,democrats
[removed],,e8fpcz2,democrats
"You're regurgitating Trump's lies. He lies and lies and lies about *every fucking thing*. The fact you can't or won't see that says quite a bit. It's really a shame that logic and reason has been replaced by lies and twisted political rhetoric from Trump. I really have nothing further to discuss with you, you're unfortunately quite brainwashed and willing to believe all of Trump's lies, hook line and sinker. 

",feature_creep,e8i6mq2,democrats
"Lol, I dont give a shit. I'm not reading links from some jackass troll. You dont get to start over. ",Gsteel11,e8fpibc,democrats
"""Everything F****** thing"" sounds like Trump Derangement Syndrome. ",memultipletimes,e8i9j18,democrats
When the shoe fits.. *you might be deranged*. The fact you believe obvious lies is all I need to know about you. You have more in common with the MAGAbomber than you do with liberals living decent lives.,feature_creep,e8ibgee,democrats
Dems and there accusations lol your going off,memultipletimes,e8indk8,democrats
Republicans and their lack of morality lol your going off the rails,feature_creep,e8ity0d,democrats
"Here's a suggestion: research, investigate, acknowledge and join with the people already doing this work.",AngelaMotorman,e8j2k3k,democrats
Justice Democrats. Just be an actual populist for average working Americans. Working people are the backbone of this country.,Weed_Whacker22,e8j4ck0,democrats
"This is the false equivalency to end all false equivalencies from Chris. 

No one is saying there's a ""direct"" involvement from Trump here. We all know crazies gonna crazy, it's just a matter of how that crazy is channeled. 

But I do think it's clear from this guy's background that the current political climate (driven by Trump more than any other single person, in my mind) has stirred something up within him that has empowered his desire to commit acts of violence. At a bare minimum, it's another example of his shameful divisive utilization of the bully pulpit.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e8imm4w,democrats
"/r/democrats does not allow the direct linking to external subreddits without the use of ""np"".  Please use http://np.reddit.com/r/<subreddit> when linking into external subreddits.

*I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/democrats) if you have any questions or concerns.*",AutoModerator,e8idwz4,democrats
"Not really. Doctors,  lawyers and firemen would require legal documentation to work in the US. Undocumented immigrants would likely have to find work that can be paid under the table?",Castor1234,e8ixtam,democrats
"Meh. I assume she left off those types of positions to avoid the inevitable “Dey terk er jerbs!!” Not so much implying those listed are the only jobs “brown people” can perform, but rather pointing out that immigrants often hold jobs that are typically considered undesirable. ",OkieEnglish,e8izda5,democrats
[deleted],,e8ixo9n,democrats
Seeking asylum would allow them to work legally if granted.,netadmindave,e8iy47z,democrats
Whoa! ,wheezergeezer,e8iyqke,democrats
The rightful President. She warned us of every single dark and evil thing we’ve seen the past 2 years. ,Equestriaguy,e8gkteg,democrats
"During the election she said something about how violent attack attempts against presidents and candidates only puts the Secret Service at risk, not the candidate/president. It really hit home for me because at the time, while I would never advocate or condone political violence or any violence, a tiny little part of me was like ""ugh, can someone just off this buffoon already!?"" about Trump, and then she said that and it immediately squashed the tiny little part of me that thought that. It wouldn't be Trump who would be put in danger, but his security. ",bumbiddlytake2,e8hx4sp,democrats
[removed],,e8gu8vg,democrats
Why the Fuck haven't I heard about this?!This is just another of many Trump inspired murders and affronts and yet the media still lets Trumpsters to yammer on about one semi Lefty shooting attempt on Republicans awhile ago -- an anomalous exception to the Rule of Republicans talking and stoking violence. ,data2dave,e8ibghd,democrats
Ofcourse Drumpf did. ,Stupidiseverywhere,e8ghzj2,democrats
"A couple of points

A) Hannity has literally spent almost every day of the last four years trying to get his base foaming at the mouth mad at Hillary Clinton for using an unsecured email server. Even after she lost the election he would still not drop it.

B) It makes me throw up in my mouth a little just thinking that Sean Hannity seems to be an unofficial advisor to the President.",reddit_1999,e8ghvnb,democrats
BuT hER EmAiLs!!!!,kotoamatsukamix,e8gsydt,democrats
But Hillary's emails,JayWaWa,e8gypfs,democrats
"> Through a spokesperson, Hannity said, “I never discuss who may or may not be a source for my reporting or any conversations I have with anybody. I believe in complete confidentiality with sources and or friends and family.”

So Hannity is in favor of anonymous sources now.",SupportVectorMachine,e8h7jvg,democrats
So more than just their usual pillow talk? ,WesternSon98,e8ha0es,democrats
Of course Trump did because he thinks and assumes that Hannity knows more about intelligence briefings than intelligence agency like the C.I.A. ,red_carpet_hero,e8hkd9t,democrats
It makes me throw up in my mouth a LOT that we have a complete asshat of a president who looks to a demented moron for advice.,SaltyDoggoMeo,e8gxy0s,democrats
"Admittedly, you just described both sides of the aisle in regard to each other.

Can’t say “incivility” isn’t the problem, then in the next sentence lay out a statement that sure ain’t civil talk. ",ZombieFriedChicken,e8hhqcn,democrats
Pretty sure factual statements are neither civil nor incivil (not sure what the word should be). ,Whiskeyrich,e8horu6,democrats
"This is where we're at now. Most violence is actually coming from the left right now. The inability to see or admit that is just insanely odd.

As a left to center voter, I'm being pushed closer to the center right because of how looney and uncivil the left has become. We justify our violence and refuse to look at facts. We've become who we accused Fox news of being, no difference at all thes days.",iamnotaldonsmith,e8i9e5r,democrats
"No, it's the GOP and it's radical news outlets. Trump is just riding the wave of intolerance and fear, he is an opportunist, but the GOP and conservative media are the ones who created the opportunity through years of propaganda and undermining education, science and government. ",CarbonLifeForm69,e8gqs5n,democrats
When do y'all think Trump will show his true opinions about this? His press conference annoyed the hell out of me it was obvious he didn't want to be reading those words,BinaryDive,e8h9o6s,democrats
"Trump is an old guy.  He thinks a cellphone is some 90's Nokia thing.  I have trouble explaining new technology to my dad (he's about Trump's age), and he hasn't done nearly the amount of blow Trump has.  ",90Carat,e8gwofu,democrats
Pathological liar.,caligirl2287,e8hmjlr,democrats
[removed],,e8gxnxu,democrats
I hear the FBI is searching for the mail bomber in your favorite sub. At least a 30% chance he posts there.,therecordcorrected,e8gxs6m,democrats
If they aren't they should be.,evolutionfan,e8gxv36,democrats
And the list keeps growing. FUCK Trump and his supporters.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8hjfyp,democrats
"Um, *everything* Trump has said or done exposes just how incapable he is to handle the demands of his job...",PraxisLD,e8h19wo,democrats
He hates way more than half of the country. ,orderofGreenZombies,e8h2ggv,democrats
Hate monger,caligirl2287,e8hmnhe,democrats
"Yeah, we're being generous here. ",Gsteel11,e8hqmrm,democrats
"It’s called trolling, he is a troll. ",HarpoMarks,e8hj3c7,democrats
"If there is any one thing a person can point to to explain democrats diminishing chances at retaking the senate this year, its Dianne Feinsteins incompetent gambit to try and block the appointment of judge Kavanaugh. 

This is what makes progressives furious about out of touch super rich special interest backed democrats like Dianne Feinstein. Ive voiced my own disgust with my own senator, who undoubtedly could have stopped this train-wreck that has ignited republican enthusiasm at a critical time for democrats.

You cannot make mistakes like this and still have a job in any other profession. 

Im calling on California democrats to dump Feinstein and every other out of touch corporate backed dem in the party. 

The finger pointing begins even before election day, because this problem isnt going away as long as Feinstein and her circus of incompetence continues to decimate the democratic party.",nelf4life,e8gu9dl,democrats
Total lie. Did you expect otherwise?,backpackwayne,e8hqnx8,democrats
"California 2018 Election 

[General Election Registration Deadline](http://registertovote.ca.gov/): October 22, 2018 

[General Election](http://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/voter-registration/vote-mail/#apply): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8hwspn,democrats
"I can't say I'm surprised, but this feels especially grimy to me. It's one thing to to try and raise money, but to completely fabricate an email from a sitting senator seems like a dangerous step in a terrible direction. . .",chemGradGSU,e8hqyj8,democrats
It's the new normal.,backpackwayne,e8hr7yh,democrats
I miss the old normal...,chemGradGSU,e8hrx7p,democrats
It'll be back. We just have weather through the storm.,backpackwayne,e8hs20p,democrats
"Amazing those who want to cut Social Security, Medicare are those who will never, NEVER need to use it or need it. Congressmen while in congress receive free hospital care anywhere in the DC area, they retire with a full pension, not to. Mention the $$$ stashed away from insider trading tips (legal for congress but we go to jail)   Done!!!",walter1950,e8hsk78,democrats
"If there is any one thing a person can point to to explain democrats diminishing chances at retaking the senate this year, its Dianne Feinsteins incompetent gambit to try and block the appointment of judge Kavanaugh. 

This is what makes progressives furious about out of touch super rich special interest backed democrats like Dianne Feinstein. Ive voiced my own disgust with my own senator, who undoubtedly could have stopped this train-wreck that has ignited republican enthusiasm at a critical time for democrats.

You cannot make mistakes like this and still have a job in any other profession. 

Im calling on California democrats to dump Feinstein and every other out of touch corporate backed dem in the party. 

The finger pointing begins even before election day, because this problem isnt going away as long as Feinstein and her circus of incompetence continues to decimate the democratic party.",nelf4life,e8guacj,democrats
Piece of shit is disgusting to his fucking core.   The sooner he’s locked up the better.  Total disgrace to every person in this country. ,ChangingFiveHundred,e8gt2ky,democrats
"He’s not interested in recognizing or solving any problem whatsoever.  To suggest so is to attribute, undeserved, a cognitive ability probably out of his league.  He’s like a little Red Queen (Yellow Piss King?) strutting and squawking “off with their heads” while pirouetting with his little penis and great big psychotic flamingo.  

There is no rational “there” anywhere in sight, and this normalization of his aberrance, no matter how slight, dangerously conditions people to consider him a legitimate actor in this game when he’s not.  He’s a poseur’s poser playing an imaginary deal-fiddle while torching all he surveys.  

A Midas and Nero wrapped up in a semiliterate gelatinous collection of tubes, one end of which is able to excite others like him into quaking and violent miniature versions of himself, each with their own book of matches and toy violin.

Do not dignify this imbecile with intimations of being capable of actual thought process.",myjuly14name,e8gv3kj,democrats
Part of the problem = like 90% of the problem in this case. ,orderofGreenZombies,e8h2elt,democrats
"Narcissistic Personality Disorder he will never see it understand it or be aware of it, one of he reasons he’s doing all the rallies, Ego and Power.  ",walter1950,e8hg0cd,democrats
Would you really want a professional boxer to be president into perpetuity?,neoezekiel,e8gvzqd,democrats
You can’t change stupid my guy,spoon_spoon_,e8gx1lk,democrats
Get new friends. ,piazzapizzazz,e8gxuxy,democrats
Sounds like he just needs an ass kicking. ,Dell_Hell,e8hhrro,democrats
"Remember to a Republican: ""Might makes Right!"" 

However, they're getting mighty fat and old so they might not be such a threat when they're 80. ",data2dave,e8jcg7f,democrats
Lmao. He’s trolling the shit out of you and sounds like a funny guy.,SolarTortality,e8h1bny,democrats
"President Floyd Mayweather and VP Pacquiao, everybody.

That's jester McGregor off to the side, don't mind him.",Catalyst8487,e8gz2l4,democrats
"I would agree with you under normal circumstances, except the problem is that he doesn't troll us. We troll him all the time and he actually got super heated about this. ",purplescabs,e8he5ob,democrats
"Nah, he's just a simple bully. Probably 250+ with 35 per cent body fat. Just needs a black stud to slap him silly. ",data2dave,e8jcpzm,democrats
"Well, I mean he sounds like a douche... dont we have enough trolling right now? ",Gsteel11,e8hr9de,democrats
"Of you don't believe me, I'll also tell you that he believes jews control the entire world as the 1 percent and are about to hire people to start a civil war against us. He so believes the holocaust was smudged and not as bad to Jews. He also believes that transgenders are mentally disabled and should be put down. Hes insane and we are dropping him. ",purplescabs,e8hfcpi,democrats
Trolling is all we have left now that the discourse has fallen apart,SolarTortality,e8hs4wp,democrats
Sounds like dropping him is the best idea. He's a meathead and only wins by intimidation through probably genes giving him a beefy appearance. He'd melt down fast as fuck in a real fight. Never does cardio I am sure.,data2dave,e8jclkt,democrats
"Discourse fell apart because all they did was troll? It's like praising a heroin addiction because ""it's the only way I can feel good"". ",Gsteel11,e8hsno3,democrats
"Lmfao what an insecure beta

“Genes giving him a beefy appearance” you are projecting your weakness so hard",SolarTortality,e8jdjpx,democrats
Discourse fell apart because it’s not a struggle for ideas but a struggle of power centers competing for resource dominance.,SolarTortality,e8hss2y,democrats
Just know these guys and busting them in the face will get you fired. But then sounds like you're one of these fat goofs. ,data2dave,e8jdmgm,democrats
"Lol, bullshit. It fell apart because a bunch of trump fans were racist as hell and were pissed Obama won and wanted revenge. ",Gsteel11,e8ht349,democrats
"Lmao. You are obviously so tough, reddit man",SolarTortality,e8jdpcp,democrats
Bullshit? Ok internet guy who doesn’t understand basic power analysis.,SolarTortality,e8ht58z,democrats
"Btw, checked your sparse posts and the one about Chinese microchips embedded in our Off Shored Capital Projects was enlightening but what do you expect from greedy CEOs depending on cheap foreign labor anyway?   
Glad you enjoy freedom of speech here but not in a Republican totalitarian land! ",data2dave,e8jdtrp,democrats
"So what is your exact argument? That coal miners turned into trolls because people weren't using coal as much anymore? Well what about the other 90 percent of the gop that doesn't work with resources? 

Pure bullshit. ",Gsteel11,e8hthuu,democrats
I expect them to manipulate the lowest common denominator into high/low vs the middle economic strategy. Which is exactly what they do.,SolarTortality,e8jdzns,democrats
"*Framework of societal superstructure*

Your head",SolarTortality,e8htnyw,democrats
"Huh? CEOs are ""them"" I suppose just shows that they are mediocre and over paid. Our recent ""growth"" is just more""Ching"" in their pockets and not much else. 
Maybe you can troll r/Conservative and bring back reports as we Democrats aren't allowed to comment there. ",data2dave,e8je8hy,democrats
That's not a reply. ,Gsteel11,e8hubwq,democrats
"The elite class are “them” not just CEOs. The elite class is primarily composed of industry/tech/business CEOs. Wall Street Executives. Media Super-conglomerates and film producers. Actors.  And of course the not to be forgotten, all powerful, banking cartels. ",SolarTortality,e8kzt75,democrats
THAT’s not a reply.,SolarTortality,e8hug2c,democrats
Guy who says troll is cool trolls other people. Shocker. ,Gsteel11,e8huwqe,democrats
What am I supposed to do? Explain complex nuanced topics to you so that we can argue semantics while you barely grasp the point of the discussion? No thanks dude bro,SolarTortality,e8hv50m,democrats
"I'm sorry you have to deal with the pain of talking to all the idiots in the world who are so far below you... ""dude bro"" 
What a burden... ",Gsteel11,e8hvkt4,democrats
"**Teleports behind your argument**

Nothin personal kid",SolarTortality,e8hvy1i,democrats
"And more trolling, just to complately clarify your ""position"". ",Gsteel11,e8hx93d,democrats
Don’t you have conforming to do?,SolarTortality,e8hxflf,democrats
"Says the guy using a ""teleports behind your argument"" statement.... so original and unique. ",Gsteel11,e8hxveb,democrats
Thanks. If you promise to be less unbearable maybe I’ll teach you one day.,SolarTortality,e8hy4uc,democrats
"""How to be an edgy teenager just like every other edgy teenager but be completely unique 101""",Gsteel11,e8i24fp,democrats
"You are regurgitating memes as well. See? Everyone regurgitates memes 24/7. It’s meme theory.

Your time on Reddit, however, has conditioned you to act as a drone of the status quo. You’ve been conditioned to conform conform conform or else you’ll lose karma. That’s why you behave the way you do, they made you that way.",SolarTortality,e8i2oh2,democrats
"Who gives a shit about fake internet points? Lol, you're the one taking about fucking theory of reddit. 

Someone cares way more than I do and spends even more time pretending he doesn't.",Gsteel11,e8i349l,democrats
Meme theory is not theory of reddit you scientific illiterate wtf.,SolarTortality,e8ig6ku,democrats
"Yes if only you talked about reddit conditioning too? Lol

You're a pure shit troll. ",Gsteel11,e8kep1m,democrats
"Theory of Reddit isn’t science. Meme theory is science, it has been around for decades, and the systematic methodology of Reddit to influence the dialectics into a manner conforming to the mean is Meme Theory not some retarded “Theory of Reddit” plebeian crap.",SolarTortality,e8kpbid,democrats
"That's the fucking saddest and nerdiest shit I've ever fucking heard. You're fucking talking about studying memes and reddit. 

What a worthless little bitch. ",Gsteel11,e8l074f,democrats
Despicable.,Touristupdatenola,e8hafyc,democrats
Iowa has racist as fuck to keep electing this guy. ,Gsteel11,e8hr0s8,democrats
This probably excites Trump. Stokes his ego. Bigger audience.,roycekemp,e8hh868,democrats
Stupidity. Ignorance. Jealousy. ,rockcandymtns,e8htj7r,democrats
Oh and Democrat violent protests. Don't forget those.,Strawberryweeb,e8lw1zm,democrats
Of course he didn’t. That would require empathy. It would also require that he actually care about something other than winning. These people who were sent bombs are not winners in his eyes. They would be the losers. He doesn’t care what happens to his enemies. He is a pathetic human being and I don’t know why we keep expecting him to have a shred of decency. ,candianchicksrule,e8gz7mj,democrats
"""But he did send each of them a nice care package...""",PraxisLD,e8h1mud,democrats
Trump does not even know what empathy even means.,red_carpet_hero,e8ho470,democrats
 Too many syllables for him. ,ImpossibleWonder,e8hr5p8,democrats
As she should. The gop is complicit and they should be forced to defend his insanity. Trump is a huge liability in blue states and they should leverage that. ,Gsteel11,e8hqkdf,democrats
Trump is a national disgrace that all Republicans are responsible for. ,data2dave,e8jbrvs,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting Begins](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8hrwnp,democrats
[removed],,e8gcncb,democrats
[removed],,e8gck95,democrats
[removed],,e8g6ne2,democrats
No this isn't a post about Trump saying anything. ,Stupidiseverywhere,e8gcspp,democrats
Shut the fuck up Vlad. What's with you nutscases and capslock? Get checked.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8gcpv2,democrats
[deleted],,e8g7847,democrats
[deleted],,e8gefq2,democrats
[removed],,e8g7zle,democrats
That's pretty sad.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8ggrot,democrats
[deleted],,e8g8upl,democrats
"I'm glad at least one country is taking the criminal excess of moderators seriously

Like I know in the grand scheme 645k means nothing to Facebook, but they have to do it that way because otherwise its a corrupt oligarchy with no checks and balances if they can just fine you infinite money. Trust me, noone wants to see Zuckerbeg behind an orange jump suit more than me as going after internet moderators is kind of my whole life.

But I know why they softball. You have too in a free society",Hookahwave,e8gjhxy,democrats
That'll show em,Stupidiseverywhere,e8gkd8n,democrats
"I'm in the UK we're not happy about the amount, but legally that's the max we could do given when the breach took place. With GDPR in place we could hopefully leverage a more forceful response. ",oze385,e8hbvpc,democrats
"Obama/Trump is definitely not getting the attention it deserves. I mean, I guess it is from some of us, for the presidential race in 2020 in particular. While there have been some surveys that indicate much of the Obama-to-Trump vote was motivated by ""racial anxiety"" as opposed to economics, I've not yet seen any polls about that regarding the Rust Belt area, which decided the race in 2016 and likely will again.

Polling methodology really is key with a study like that, but there is definitely something to the idea that some 2-time Obama/Trump voters nationwide voted for Obama as the exception to their normal rule, and that Trump was both a return to their normal loyalties and represented another ""change agent"" for them, in a changing country.

Economics certainly played a role though, certainly they did in manufacturing states.",OmarIsaiahBetts,e8gm2z5,democrats
"It's free speech. You cannot win this fight unless you are willing to censor these sites. You can try to argue/debate them, but they are bots. Unless you can make a bot that can argue effectively against a twitter bot, they will beat you with sheer volume. 

Of course, you can stoop down to their level and hurl insults and easy content at volume, but the problem here is that republicans have the upper hand here as well. Democrats are using nuanced positions and we care and we are doing what is best for the country, while the republicans are throwing memes and gags and innuendo and racist jokes, and conspiracy theories.

At a site level, you could organize ddos attacks against the sites, or you could hack the sites, but both of those are shady as fuck and will probably land you in jail if caught. The fundamental problem goes deeper, all the way to talk radio. Talk radio shows run by republicans have fed the populace a steady diet of bullshit. Instead of quality news programming like the bbc, or decent democratic voices you get people like michael savage on air. They have created a fertile ground for conspiracy theory and anti-democratic issues. 

&#x200B;

Ultimately, the solution is for the the democratic party to become more democratic. In fact, it should probably move to direct democracy at least within the party. Last election, we had low turnout. Why? Well hillary got a bunch of party delegates that were ""locked in"" Bernie got sidelined despite the fact that bernie would have wiped the floor with trump. And for what? Just so hillary could get her place in power? I am sorry, but no that is corruption, and I say that as a democrat. When the republicans call hillary corrupt and rotten- that resonates with me.   


I think that every single democrat should have an electronic device with a unique key. Just like the one time keys that the google 2fa authentication uses. Democrats should be able to vote with that key directly for who they want. Now you can say, but wait what if republicans register as dems? Well, they already can. The point is that with a live approval voting system where people can change their vote on a whim, the party leadership will be able to see who the best runner is, and there will be no voter regret.",Ghosteye55,e8hphtn,democrats
[removed],,e8gypkp,democrats
"/r/democrats does not feature links to that website. Please don't post unreliable sources.'

*I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/democrats) if you have any questions or concerns.*",AutoModerator,e8gypku,democrats
Republicans have always use scare tactics to get people to vote for them. ,red_carpet_hero,e8ho0fl,democrats
Do you have snippets of what points you were trying to argue?,Readingit939,e8gpxpn,democrats
r/the_dummies is just awful. I’ve had a couple of accounts banned.  Anything even remotely critical of dear leader will get you banned.  Who are the snowflakes?,90Carat,e8gw858,democrats
Cowards banned me. Phony two faced as they come.,rockcandymtns,e8gshsw,democrats
Lol it does go both ways ya know. That is the point of reddit.,SolarTortality,e8h1jzt,democrats
"I was banned also, post about Mitch McConnell comment on cutting Social Security, Medicare was called stupid libitard and that was fake news, then kicked off. ",walter1950,e8gqtby,democrats
"Yupp! Been there, done that! ",data2dave,e8jcudm,democrats
"When the gop was upset about an illegal  who murdered Mollie tibbets, /the_donald banned me for this comment. 

https://imgur.com/a/JslBESG

I was banned for leftist views. You know, logic is leftist.",bryanoens,e8h2p3l,democrats
"Yes, please show snippets fren",SolarTortality,e8h1lyk,democrats
Stop your lying bullshit trolling -- Republicans been against free speech for a long time. ,data2dave,e8jcw1a,democrats
Unnecessary hostility. Makes you look insecure.,SolarTortality,e8jdgtw,democrats
Who gives a fuck? You beta man?,data2dave,e8jdnma,democrats
Lol.,SolarTortality,e8jdo2f,democrats
Quite frustrated - my boyfriend has 24 hour shifts this week so he can't go pick up an absentee ballot and hand it in today and won't be able to vote Tuesday.  Unfortunately his polling place is a 2.5-3 hour drive from where he is currently working.  He thought he was off so didn't get the absentee.  I wish we had early voting in our state!!! ,CarolSwanson,e93mxdt,democrats
"Make... America ""great"" again? Back to the kkk terrorism of the past? ",Gsteel11,e8fl193,democrats
"Like it or not (I don't), Trump is our president. And he is supposed to lead our nation. And when he encourages violence, he is responsible. The evidence he always claim does not exist is here in the open, in his own words, coming from his own mouth.

* https://abcnews.go.com/Politics/back-trump-comments-perceived-encouraging-violence/story?id=48415766

How much longer will they follow him like Jim Jones? I hear they are serving Kool Aid with dinner tonight.",backpackwayne,e8fww90,democrats
Hint: yeah uh huh the racist old white guy who screamed “lock her up” called for violence against his political opponents ... and then it happened,Sammyg1,e8g027k,democrats
"It is critical for everyone who wants to see the back of this failed human being to vote.  Voting allows a regime change without bloodshed.  Syria has demonstrated that **Civil War Is NOT An Option**; so everybody must get out and vote.  If the turnout is at 99% then I sincerely believe that this shitshow will end.

Vote!  Vote!  Vote!",Touristupdatenola,e8fx22i,democrats
Absolutely!,backpackwayne,e8fx57j,democrats
I can not believe we are having to deal with Nazis and white-supremacists as an option in 2018. The idea of giving them the freedom to express themselves and normalizing them would make most of our grandparents and great-grandparents roll in their graves. ,GutCart,e8d1jqq,democrats
"Well, trump got half the description right in one of his speeches the other day.  He said he is a ""nationalist"".  He just left off the ""white"" part.

That will become part of the rhetoric AFTER the election if the democrats don't take at least the house.",not_that_planet,e8dg55y,democrats
If only Democrats were aware of the stakes being this high during Obama's term... we'd have never lost the white house,HawlSera,e8dtj9j,democrats
Has anyone else actually said that yet?,kerryfinchelhillary,e8dde5x,democrats
Go Joe ! You got my vote! Can Obama be Vice President?,gregdbowen,e8epg3g,democrats
"Anita Hill, Joe. Anita Hill. ",Trixietrue,e8e8tbm,democrats
"Anybody know if there's speech footage, and where to find it?",ColdDesert77,e8eceh3,democrats
[removed],,e8gbtzc,democrats
This cracker’s complicit in white supremacy everyday by living off the toil of the non white workers of the world. ,geogeogeox3,e8geff8,democrats
He's gearing up to run in 2020 to derailBernie. Please dont do it Joe,TNBIX,e8dclxi,democrats
"Remember, if every 10th sentence you utter isn’t condemning nazis, you’re part of the problem!",_fuckthiswebsite_,e8el5jy,democrats
[removed],,e8dwh9j,democrats
Is it insulting to ask him to be burns VP? Other way around mite work too.,NuzzleTheStinkWheat,e8ei2ss,democrats
No no no Biden please go away.  We're never going to climb out of this hole. ,ntrubilla,e8e9j9l,democrats
[removed],,e8dwobh,democrats
Not everyone who disagrees with you is a white supremacist creepy joe. ,Somethingfunny3,e8d3oeq,democrats
[removed],,e8d2zlm,democrats
His speech only comes now when he’s getting ready to campaign for 2020,haesforever,e8eozjk,democrats
I also don't say anything when confronted with all the dick waving at pride rallies. Does that make me complicit in the eyes of Allah? Don't think so.,mhd2015,e8emib6,democrats
"So many American soldiers died fighting against this shit its dumbfounding how no one has any knowledge in history anymore.

We have walls and walls of names of men, who died in some of the most horrific and painful ways because they believed the cause was worth fighting for.

Dear nazis, go open a history book and remember we are your worst nightmare. Go research how many nazis died trying to fulfill their beliefs. Then realize you will be a statistic in a book when we are done with you",sharpyz,e8dbw1y,democrats
"Yeah, well a fair number of those Nazis & white-supremacists are their kids.  So maybe Gramps would be more OK with it than we imagine.",ManlyBeardface,e8e69ew,democrats
"Genuine question, what kind of similarities do you see between the Trump administration and Nazi Germany?",MUFFIN1700,e8dzon6,democrats
"Right, the largest colonial powers on earth fought the Nazis to end racism... all the white butchering non whites by the tens of millions bitch get out here",geogeogeox3,e8gehxv,democrats
I imagine it’s similar to women in Iran not believing they have to deal with dark age shit too. Women whose mothers wore mini skirts and practiced medicine and law now have to parade around behind men while draped in heavy cloth because god forbid they tempt the Mike Pences of Iran. You should never think we can’t go backwards. Bill Maher is spot on when he says tolerance of intolerance will kill the left. ,lofi76,e8emitr,democrats
"They have to have the freedom to express themselves, you communist. The individual must decide if their hate speech sounds appealing, not you. Stop trying to be America’s mother. ",argues_withself,e8f5jfz,democrats
Calling anyone you disagree with a racist nazi is the problem,chiefcoolarrow8x6,e8fl6vq,democrats
I know a lot of “both candidates are equally bad” people who sobered up pretty quickly ,mishagorby,e8e2uro,democrats
Jonah Hill,JonRonDonson,e8ejr3a,democrats
"Vlad, vlad, vald. Put the vodka down.",Stupidiseverywhere,e8gd8aa,democrats
People that comment in all uppercase are typically mentally ill. Does it run in the family?,therecordcorrected,e8golkf,democrats
"Bernie is done. He needs to step aside for an actual Democrat to win. All Bernie will do is create a distraction. Even after he loses the nomination again, there will be a contingent who believe he was somehow cheated and who won’t vote for the party’s nominee in the general election.
The Democratic nominee needs to be somebody who can also appeal to more moderate Democrats and minority voters and has appeal beyond the mostly young, mostly white voters who were Sanders’ strongest supporters. ",FreeCashFlow,e8dicp0,democrats
Fuck a crakkka,geogeogeox3,e8gely3,democrats
Projection much?,PraxisLD,e8e6jrm,democrats
Bull. Shit.,PraxisLD,e8e6k6r,democrats
"41 posts on the_donald, 37 in conspiracy... Get back in your basket.",Belostoma,e8d5nu0,democrats
"That's unfortunate. Also, your logical fallacy is ad hominem. ",GobtheAlmighty,e8dc8v7,democrats
You really had to dig deep for that didn’t you,Boomslangalang,e8etflw,democrats
"We didn’t go to war with Nazis because of their opinions. We went to war with them because they were invading our allies, killing their citizens, and murdering entire races. 

There is a difference between fighting Nazis in a war and fighting Nazis at a peaceful protest. 

I know it’s ugly and upsetting. Be angry. Protest against them. Oppose them in the streets. Be louder. Be stronger. Don’t betray the democratic ideals of ideas and freedom in exchange for the destruction of bad ideas. ",Machismo01,e8edlbb,democrats
"I’m hesitant to even say we’ll beat them back like last time for fear of being labeled as a “violent protester”.  When they tell us who is responsible for the bombs showing up today and give us that person’s history, Trump and the right will be the cause. Trump has normalized their bullshit, we need to drive them back to the shadows of history with the other failed regimes. ",GutCart,e8dd0ak,democrats
Ya give em the business Tough Tony,JonRonDonson,e8ejluu,democrats
"Actually, every 3/4 nazi was killed in the EASTERN front fighting the RUSSIANS. Can you believe it. The war was 'won' with RUSSIAN blood, AMERICAN money and BRITISH intelligence services. That's the factual truth ma boi",ElPapi74,e8eq0zy,democrats
"[This article](https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/worldviews/wp/2018/06/25/trumps-hardline-view-of-immigration-draws-parallels-to-the-1930s/?noredirect=on&utm_term=.00e08d71b0c4) lays out many of the ways the Trump administration is mirroring 1930s Germany.

It's not an exact match, of course, but the targeted attacking of the free press, rampant nationalism, constant threats to lock up one's political opponents, and abysmal treatment of minorities all rings a bit too familiar to anyone who has studied the Nazi's rise to power.

Fortunately, Trump is mostly just a short-sighted narcissistic man-child, so even though he's as abhorrent as anyone in recent history, he's really just not that good at it...",PraxisLD,e8e6e3h,democrats
"The support of and unwillingness to condemn the actions of Nazis, white nationalists, and Fascists.",GutCart,e8e1o0o,democrats
There's that whataboutism you guys love so much! I wasn't alive during WWII or able to control what my forefathers did anymore than you were. But I'm alive now and I'm not going to let a bunch of racist assholes ruin this country.,GutCart,e8ggyqu,democrats
"No, the world stood up back in the 1940s and gave a resounding “fuck off Nazis”. They should be marginalized and shamed back into the “things that didn’t work” pile of history. ",GutCart,e8f5nzb,democrats
"No, being an actual fucking Nazi is the problem. ",GutCart,e8fqixq,democrats
And a lot of Яussian bots who are still trumpeting that tired old cliche...,PraxisLD,e8e6g2c,democrats
"Did you not see all the justice democrats who won races they were the underdog in? Polling shows that Bernie is the most popular left candidate. I mean you guys can elect a corporate democrat again and lose to the right 
if you want.",SignificantSmell,e8dyhbl,democrats
Do you think Kamala Harris has a chance against Trump? I really hope she runs. ,sandunespacecat,e8dvjet,democrats
"Lol. Bernie appealed to essentially everyone who wasnt on the clinton's payroll. He would have crushed trump in the general, and he'll do just that in 2020 unless tue corporate dems will  him like they did in 2016. Mark my words, in 2020 itll be Bernie or trump. No other options",TNBIX,e8dik1h,democrats
[removed],,e8fcayf,democrats
"Hey, don't shoot the messenger. That's what she said. Im all for the guy. Shame y'all can't handle the truth. People do shitty things. ",Turvain,e8e6ogt,democrats
"Oh your in my history.  Why don't you make fun of my AS too?

Great job dehumanizing anyone with a different opinion.  Just call me a white supremist ",Somethingfunny3,e8dacgd,democrats
"But if they are giving the “heil Hitler” and brandishing swastikas, do they deserve a seat at the table? I’m not saying someone who thinks immigration is bad is a Nazi. Someone calling for the death of different races while supporting Nazi ideals does not deserve to have their opinion heard and validated.",GutCart,e8fqqol,democrats
"I wrote my statement at 5am this morning before these bombs where mailed. I felt something was not right.

Its weird.",sharpyz,e8dekc5,democrats
"Lol I wasnt trying to say Russia didnt destroy them. I was stating that a nazis do not want to fuck with American boys. We will pick them apart. But wait a minute you are in fantasy land if you believe the USA didnt have a critical part in their downfall.

Who do you think cut the supplylines all over the world buddy? Who do you think stopped oil flowing through Burma fueling the nazi regime?

Who do you think helped destroy their entire African front? 

Who was there to take back france and other countries from their very grasp?

Lol mai boi ;)",sharpyz,e8eq5ls,democrats
That's a valid point. I appreciate your time.,MUFFIN1700,e8e5mcn,democrats
You’d feel better if millions of POC where under a democrat boot rather than a republican one? ,geogeogeox3,e8ghwjq,democrats
In what way are we republicans like murdering millions of innocent people?  By being against abortion and for tax cuts?,chiefcoolarrow8x6,e8fw2x1,democrats
"The problem is that Bernie will be nearing 80 by 2020 and he'll be doing one of the most stressful jobs in the world.

If he does it he'd be basically on his deathbed by the end.",shanez1215,e8emj8m,democrats
I'm from CA and I think she'd lose.,dmedtheboss,e8g1lb6,democrats
You know we listened to your crap for over two years now. Enough of your bull shit. Just go away. Seriously please join the republican party and do to them what you have done to us.,backpackwayne,e8dvr8j,democrats
"Please, tell me again how Kavanaugh, Moore, and Trump hold the moral high ground, and are perfectly suited for office?

Or how about these fine Republicans?

TL;DR: Clean up your own glass house before throwing stones...

Republican anti-abortion activist Howard Scott Heldreth is a convicted child rapist in Florida.

Republican County Commissioner David Swartz pleaded guilty to molesting two girls under the age of 11 and was sentenced to 8 years in prison.

Republican judge Mark Pazuhanich pleaded no contest to fondling a 10-year old girl and was sentenced to 10 years probation.

Republican anti-abortion activist Nicholas Morency pleaded guilty to possessing child pornography on his computer and offering a bounty to anybody who murders an abortion doctor.

Republican legislator Edison Misla Aldarondo was sentenced to 10 years in prison for raping his daughter between the ages of 9 and 17.

Republican Mayor Philip Giordano is serving a 37-year sentence in federal prison for sexually abusing 8- and 10-year old girls.

Republican campaign consultant Tom Shortridge was sentenced to three years probation for taking nude photographs of a 15-year old girl.

Republican racist pedophile and United States Senator Strom Thurmond had sex with a 15-year old black girl which produced a child.

Republican pastor Mike Hintz, whom George W. Bush commended during the 2004 presidential campaign, surrendered to police after admitting to a sexual affair with a female juvenile.

Republican legislator Peter Dibble pleaded no contest to having an inappropriate relationship with a 13-year-old girl.

Republican Congressman Donald “Buz” Lukens was found guilty of having sex with a female minor and sentenced to one month in jail.

Republican fundraiser Richard A. Delgaudio was found guilty of child porn charges and paying two teenage girls to pose for sexual photos.

Republican activist Mark A. Grethen convicted on six counts of sex crimes involving children.

Republican activist Randal David Ankeney pleaded guilty to attempted sexual assault on a child.

Republican Congressman Dan Crane had sex with a female minor working as a congressional page.

Republican activist and Christian Coalition leader Beverly Russell admitted to an incestuous relationship with his step daughter.

Republican congressman and anti-gay activist Robert Bauman was charged with having sex with a 16-year-old boy he picked up at a gay bar.

Republican Committee Chairman Jeffrey Patti was arrested for distributing a video clip of a 5-year-old girl being raped.

Republican activist Marty Glickman (a.k.a. “Republican Marty”), was taken into custody by Florida police on four counts of unlawful sexual activity with an underage girl and one count of delivering the drug LSD.

Republican legislative aide Howard L. Brooks was charged with molesting a 12-year old boy and possession of child pornography.

Republican Senate candidate John Hathaway was accused of having sex with his 12-year old baby sitter and withdrew his candidacy after the allegations were reported in the media.
Republican preacher Stephen White, who demanded a return to traditional values, was sentenced to jail after offering $20 to a 14-year-old boy for permission to perform oral sex on him.

Republican talk show host Jon Matthews pleaded guilty to exposing his genitals to an 11 year old girl.

Republican anti-gay activist Earl “Butch” Kimmerling was sentenced to 40 years in prison for molesting an 8-year old girl after he attempted to stop a gay couple from adopting her.

Republican Party leader Paul Ingram pleaded guilty to six counts of raping his daughters and served 14 years in federal prison.

Republican election board official Kevin Coan was sentenced to two years probation for soliciting sex over the internet from a 14-year old girl.

Republican politician Andrew Buhr was charged with two counts of first degree sodomy with a 13-year old boy.

Republican politician Keith Westmoreland was arrested on seven felony counts of lewd and lascivious exhibition to girls under the age of 16 (i.e. exposing himself to children).

Republican anti-abortion activist John Allen Burt was charged with sexual misconduct involving a 15-year old girl.

Republican County Councilman Keola Childs pleaded guilty to molesting a male child.

Republican activist John Butler was charged with criminal sexual assault on a teenage girl.

Republican candidate Richard Gardner admitted to molesting his two daughters.

Republican Councilman and former Marine Jack W. Gardner was convicted of molesting a 13-year old girl.

Republican County Commissioner Merrill Robert Barter pleaded guilty to unlawful sexual contact and assault on a teenage boy.

Republican City Councilman Fred C. Smeltzer, Jr. pleaded no contest to raping a 15 year-old girl and served 6-months in prison.

Republican activist Parker J. Bena pleaded guilty to possession of child pornography on his home computer and was sentenced to 30 months in federal prison and fined $18,000.

Republican parole board officer and former Colorado state representative, Larry Jack Schwarz, was fired after child pornography was found in his possession.

Republican strategist and Citadel Military College graduate Robin Vanderwall was convicted in Virginia on five counts of soliciting sex from boys and girls over the internet.

Republican city councilman Mark Harris, who is described as a “good military man” and “church goer,” was convicted of repeatedly having sex with an 11-year-old girl and sentenced to 12 years in prison.

Republican businessman Jon Grunseth withdrew his candidacy for Minnesota governor after allegations surfaced that he went swimming in the nude with four underage girls, including his daughter.

Republican director of the “Young Republican Federation” Nicholas Elizondo molested his 6-year old daughter and was sentenced to six years in prison.

Republican benefactor of conservative Christian groups, Richard A. Dasen Sr., was charged with rape for allegedly paying a 15-year old girl for sex. Dasen, 62, who is married with grown children and several grandchildren, has allegedly told police that over the past decade he paid more than $1 million to have sex with a large number of young.

Republican state senator Ralph Shortey from Oklahoma admitted to being involved in sodomy with a 17 year old male prostitute and transporting child pornography.

Republican Speaker of the House Dennis Hastert in jail for the payments he made to cover up raping his wrestlers when he was a high school coach.

Republican Judge and campaign official for President Donald Trump Tim Nolan indicted for human trafficking and forcing a minor (9) to engage in sexual activity and giving alcohol to minors (results from the court pending).
",PraxisLD,e8gpurp,democrats
"So, do they pay you by the hour, or is it more a rubles-per-post kinda thing?",PraxisLD,e8ej1cm,democrats
"I agreed with the sentiment except for your Trumpian use of the word ""creepy"" as a tagline for Joe Biden, a hardworking politician and an honorable man. Just like 'lyin Ted' and 'corrupt Hillary', these prefixes to names contain assumptions that shift the dialogue in a manipulative way. You have been manipulated to believe the ideology that these pithy little phrases contain.",sircallicott,e8dhbwp,democrats
I mean Trump supporters basically are white supremacists lol. Cannot believe they support Trump and his hateful policies. It's shameful. ,GobtheAlmighty,e8dccpo,democrats
Youre a white supremacist.,3xTheSchwarm,e8dby49,democrats
"Are they a member of “We the People”? Are the a person whose rights are protected by our highest law? 

I’m not saying we have to entertain these assholes, but we do need to allow them their right to speak their belief. That doesn’t mean we need to sit and listen, be quiet so they can speak, or even give serious consideration to those ideas. 

Be smart. Don’t give tools to the government to remove YOUR freedom in the process of taking away another’s. You make a law to squelch them, you now have a foundation when a right wing government sees YOUR ideas as offensive. ",Machismo01,e8fr2yx,democrats
[removed],,e8eqc92,democrats
"Also there are the attempts to consolidate executive power. And scapegoating and dehumanizing ethnic minorities. Also ""Fake News"" is damn-near a translation of *lügenpresse*. Not trying to sound snippy or anything, those are just off the top of my head.",microcosmic5447,e8e6rnq,democrats
What the fuck are you talking about? ,GutCart,e8groju,democrats
Oh fuck off. You know exactly what I'm talking about and don't play innocent.,GutCart,e8fxrgl,democrats
Must be record low unemployment and rising wages...,chiefcoolarrow8x6,e8fxcty,democrats
"> The problem is that Bernie will be nearing 80 by 2020

And Biden will be nearing 80 too


",GroriousNipponSteer,e8emyot,democrats
"Don’t give me that shit when Biden is around the same age. That’s also a poor reason. Even if he dies, his presidency will bring in more people from the left into the White House and boost progressive politics. Absolutely nothing will change if Biden gets elected. ",SignificantSmell,e8eo33y,democrats
"Holy shit you liberals are stupid. We’re more left than you, why the fuck would we be republicans",SignificantSmell,e8dybkm,democrats
[removed],,e8hlizh,democrats
"Well

>Just like 'lyin Ted' and 'corrupt Hillary', these prefixes to names contain assumptions that shift the dialogue in a manipulative way. You have been manipulated to believe the ideology that these pithy little phrases contain.

Not unlike:

>I mean Trump supporters basically are white supremacists lol.

Not even name calling, just straight blanketing all of them like that.  It's not really any better is it?
True, but: 


Edit:

Even if you didn't say it was

You did say that:

 **You have been manipulated to believe the ideology that these pithy little phrases contain.**",niepasremoh,e8diioc,democrats
[removed],,e8di7o3,democrats
I completely understand where you are coming from and what you are saying. My main point is that they're ideas and rhetoric needs to be condemned and called out at every turn until there is no place where they can be heard. Not that they don't have the right to be heard. More that they're shoved back into the holes they've been living in for the last 70 years and their voices drowned out by the echoes of their own stupidity.,GutCart,e8fstx6,democrats
<3 you guys I know I can on to smother out nazis. We Americans would proudly fight side by side with you to destroy this weak regime again.,sharpyz,e8eqemn,democrats
Whatever cracker,geogeogeox3,e8hymuv,democrats
Blocked,chiefcoolarrow8x6,e8g1w04,democrats
I honestly didn't know that.,shanez1215,e8epdrw,democrats
"Biden is the same age as Bernie? Holy shit.

I just felt like the Republicans would throw a lot of bullshit about him being old, tired,and weak which moderates would eat up. I love Bernie, but I feel like he needs to find someone decently well known but not outrageously controversial who's middle aged and lower with similar values.",shanez1215,e8epd35,democrats
Because all you do is bitch about the democrats. You talk shit about us non-stop. I don't care what you are. You are not a democrat and we don't want you. Go away!,backpackwayne,e8dyimr,democrats
"It's because all you're ""argument"" is really worth is a quick & dirty copy/pate reply...

So Kavanaugh is ""obviously totally innocent"" while Biden is ""totally guilty, dude""?

The same Kavanaugh that unsuccessfully used the exact same tactics against Bill Clinton a few years ago?

I bet you're also one of those ""Lock Her Up"" assholes, amiright?

ProTip: simply appending slurs onto someone's name doesn't automatically make it true, else we'd have Treasonous Trump as his standard name...

Obama and both Clintons have been investigated numerous times both while holding office and outside. No jail time, no indictments (just a bullshit politically-motivated impeachment attempt), and zero guilty pleas. 

Since 1969, Republican presidential administrations have had 121 criminal indictments and 89 convictions, while Democrats have had 3 criminal indictments and 1 conviction.

As far as Trump's Administration goes, in less than a year Mueller has already [indicted or gotten guilty pleas from 32 people and three companies](https://www.vox.com/policy-and-politics/2018/2/20/17031772/mueller-indictments-grand-jury), including four former Trump advisers who were high-ranking staff on Trump's campaign and in Trump's White House. Manafort, Trump's Campaign Chairman who has direct banking ties with Russia, is already in prison. Cohen, Trump's personal lawyer has flipped faster than a flapjack. Stone, Trump's Campaign Adviser is going down even as we speak. Weisselberg, Trump Co's CFO, has been given total immunity for his information. And Weisselberg has literally decades of Trump's financials on tap...

The entire Western Intelligence Community knows that Яussia screwed with our elections, that Trump has been in bed with Putin for decades now, and that much of the top GOP and NЯA are heavily embroiled in all of this.

*But look at the ugly Democrats, Reeee!*

",PraxisLD,e8iq4z7,democrats
"I never said it was.

Edit: I'll respond in line here since reddit seems to have a restriction on how frequently you can post in this sub. I somehow got your other message though.

You misconstrued what I was saying as agreeing with the person who called you a white supremacist. If you are truly an independent then I encourage you to examine all of these political indiscretions in a more holistic way.",sircallicott,e8dk8w5,democrats
"Given your posting history I highly doubt you are politically moderate, let alone an independent. You say that is your reasoning and then turn a blind eye to Trump who literally walked into the girls dressing room at a teenage beauty pageant. Your moral purity test doesn't hold up.

I'm not sure exactly what went down on C-Span. However, in this age of the #metoo movement, he probably just had his hand too far down some ladies' backside for a photo, something that has been happening with old men for as long as there has been photography. Doesn't make it excuseable for public figures to do this all over the place, but given the lack of outrage for this outside of radical right wing circles, I think it is safe to write that off as a non-sequitur.",sircallicott,e8dl47f,democrats
"Fair enough and I agree. I just get uncomfortable when people compare ‘these’ Nazis with ‘those’ Nazis. These ones aren’t at war with our country, they just are trying to change the culture to an end they want. So long as they do it peacefully, have fun! I just will make sure they won’t win. ",Machismo01,e8ftcf6,democrats
Well now it’s just funny,GutCart,e8i0nwf,democrats
"Do you believe that the alt-right is correct? Do you agree with neo-nazis? If you answered no, why do you keep supporting a party that does? I don't have to call them Nazis, Nazis are calling them Nazis...",GutCart,e8g5ttv,democrats
I love watching this Democratic Party schism. ,Doctor_Watson,e8elpks,democrats
"Because the democrats keep supporting republican polices in Congress to line their pockets. You also clearly don’t understand political science being that you think we should just be republicans. We live in a country with a two party system and we must support democrats as they are the only large representative of the left. Therefore the most popular candidate should win. Majority of people want Bernie and only people from the ages 50+ support Biden. NOTHING will change with Biden or other corporate dems in office. We ARE democrats, but the name has been so tarnished by corporations that we must run under the title “justice democrat” to show people that we don’t run for corporate money.",SignificantSmell,e8dz0xo,democrats
[removed],,e8ixuoa,democrats
"but the end that they want is inherently non-peaceful and non-democratic. They are at war with the values of our country, full-stop.",dmedtheboss,e8g19nx,democrats
I don't care what you want to be. You are not democrats. All you do tear the party down. You are not welcome. Go away. We do not want you here or  in our party. ,backpackwayne,e8dz94n,democrats
"So, do they pay you in Rubles per post, or is it an hourly kind of thing?",PraxisLD,e8j8kzo,democrats
"I think you guys have done pretty good job at that but go off. I mean you literally had the most famous democratic candidate run for you and still didn’t win but as I said, go off. ",SignificantSmell,e8dzkbp,democrats
[removed],,e8mholw,democrats
[removed],,e8mhptb,democrats
"Haha I love when I sort by contravercial and the repubs are actually getting a few upvotes. Im sorry to say though that what you said probably doesnt regester to most dems. They litterally think they are a majority and will win the midterms. They have no clue just how fractured their own party is. I mean, r/thedonald has more followers than r/libertarians and r/dems combined. Everyone left on those subs are practically just the leftover extremists that are still screaming into their echochambers. Great time for some trolling tbh. The NPC meme had my dying in my chair. 

Think about it, a right leaning meme became popular. There are more right leaners becoming active than the left thinks there is at the moment. They are severly underestimating how many people they can scream and yell at and still get away with",Annoying_Boss,e8eirm1,democrats
"Roy. Fucking. Moore.

ICE. Child. Separation.

You're completely full of shit, and you damn well know it...",PraxisLD,e8mjczn,democrats
"Roy. Fucking. Moore.

ICE. Child. Separation.

You're completely full of shit, and you damn well know it...",PraxisLD,e8mjel3,democrats
He basically encourages things like this.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8f5nzc,democrats
[removed],,e8f5hmt,democrats
"^ look at the idiot comparing mean words to radical conservative terrorism. 

",VegaThePunisher,e8f6rhq,democrats
Google your city and state for “in person early voting”. It’s the same as absentee voting. Super easy and quick. ,dank2918,e8gl1hn,democrats
Wait so it is Isis flag or pepe as those are two different things. Do they mean a Kekistain flag? Is there a picture?,Hookahwave,e8guh7b,democrats
"I'm not in Missouri but maybe I can help you.

[Start here to determine who is your local election authority in Missouri.](https://www.sos.mo.gov/elections/govotemissouri/localelectionauthority)

[Then print out and complete this absentee ballot request.](https://www.sos.mo.gov/CMSImages/ElectionGoVoteMissouri/AbsenteeRequestPostSI2V.pdf)

Mail or fax to your local election authority. Your ballot should arrive by mail in a few days. Complete ballot and return by mail before deadline.

",wenchette,e8g4w1m,democrats
I’m glad to see you keeping at it. This is the most important mid term ever. ,azurejedi,e8gf1ss,democrats
"Call the board of elections... or your local democratic party for your county. 

And tell your dad to grow up. ",Gsteel11,e8gsm0n,democrats
One less Trump voter eligible to vote,swole_hamster,e8g1iyi,democrats
Traitor in Chief.,mad-n-fla,e8fkjk3,democrats
[removed],,e8gcv9r,democrats
Back from the upside down Vald?,Stupidiseverywhere,e8gd6lu,democrats
"With no greatawkening around, did you decide to spread your insanity here instead?",therecordcorrected,e8go7lm,democrats
Nice pay wall,gusslover,e8fm719,democrats
[removed],,e8gebzs,democrats
"Use this page to get around the paywall:

https://outline.com/

Post the link into the search box and you can read it all.",wenchette,e8fmer3,democrats
Sure Humpty Dumpty. Maybe next we can hunt for unicorns?,Stupidiseverywhere,e8ghwvj,democrats
Were you born insane and that is why you swim in a greatawakening fantasy world or is there something that caused it at a later age? Are you supposed to be on meds and just won't take them? You don't seem to have much of a grip on reality.,therecordcorrected,e8gog1r,democrats
Do you have anything intellectually BELIEVABLE to say? ,Starlamoon777,e8gqyfg,democrats
"Sure do! You're a troll, a very shitty one, that keeps deleting your posts. You also have a nearly brand new account that almost exclusively posts to t_d. I'm also betting it's almost time for bed for you since its 5 am in Moscow comrade. Take your shit posting elsewhere.",Stupidiseverywhere,e8gr68w,democrats
"California 2018 Election 

[General Election Registration Deadline](http://registertovote.ca.gov/): October 22, 2018 

[General Election](http://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/voter-registration/vote-mail/#apply): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8gfi4p,democrats
The insane reaction to the bombs will fire people up to vote. Many Republicans are so freaked out by this they are claiming that the bombs were sent by a liberal. This will probably backfire.,kmurph72,e8g9mb8,democrats
Is there on for texas?,Stupidiseverywhere,e8fwa2x,democrats
Just look for the (D) next to their name and check the box in line with it.,chubbiguy40,e8giogp,democrats
;),Stupidiseverywhere,e8gjuim,democrats
Fucking nutcases,Stupidiseverywhere,e8gkc4h,democrats
Yea just like Obama confiscated all the guns and sent citizens to secret FEMA camps.,orr250mph,e8gkyrc,democrats
God must be so proud.,backpackwayne,e8gkxlu,democrats
It doesn't surprise me they tell these lies. What blows me away is that any sane person believes them.,backpackwayne,e8gl24n,democrats
"Yeah, but, I'm an Atheist and, trust me, this is totally true. We've been planning it for years!!",MickeyRen,e8gjynq,democrats
They don't give a flying fuck about god.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8gngle,democrats
"Alright guys... who told? Come on, fess up. Who told them about our plans? Lol",Gsteel11,e8gshwr,democrats
Of course not. They just use him to justify all the evil they do.,backpackwayne,e8gpgrq,democrats
"No need to suggest it, because it actually happened. The Saudi royal family has been playing both sides of the United States for decades and it’s about time we cut ties with them. Sadly the money talks and they’ll put up some fall guy for this killing and we’ll slap their wrist and continue doing business with them.",joefish919,e8fi5v6,democrats
Saudi Arabia financed the flight schools of the 911 terrorists with a credit card assigned to the Saudi national that was flown home by GW Bush on 9-12-2001.,mad-n-fla,e8fky4n,democrats
"Yes, you and I know it's obvious but Graham is about the only mainstream pol that's saying it. He led the Senate commission investigation into 9/11 and wants the redacted sections in the report exposed but he said they didn't have all the info at the time -/ something about Sarasota wasn't known (?). 
Both party's complicity is obvious such as the Clinton's (and Hillary's silence about the recent assassination of a journalist is damning) but above all are Bush's who were in the Ｏｉｌ and Arms  Business with the Saudis. 

Bob Graham is possibly the most successful pol in Florida's recent history and his statement on this morning's npr show left the ever-neutral NPR interviewee gasping. She was Shocked!! It goes so against all the propaganda Fed to US that the Saudis are our allies. ",data2dave,e8fkxqt,democrats
"The book the house saud, house of bush is a book that more people need to read so they open their eyes about the Saudis and Bushes. They are not our allies and the Bushes, Clintons and now Trump are all complicit in hiding how truly evil the Saudis are.",joefish919,e8fmvq1,democrats
Goddamn!,BagOfFlies,e8eh8xd,democrats
"Between being a dofus and the fact that a Republican stronghold was unfortunately destroyed by a hurricane...I don't know how DeSantis could win this one.   Still, everyone must VOTE!!!",greaper007,e8ei9at,democrats
Come on Florida! Vote this guy to the governor's office.,wi_voter,e8fawnp,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting Begins](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8epdds,democrats
[removed],,e8gf8xb,democrats
[removed],,e8gfz86,democrats
News flash: he won,Xilc,e98jmny,democrats
Did you just accidentally copy & paste two GOP talking points?,jhan1,e8ggh4s,democrats
"God damn Boris, its 3 am in Russia. Do you get OT for these late nights?",Stupidiseverywhere,e8ghst9,democrats
"Yes, Florida voters' lack of sophistication never ceases to amaze me.",greaper007,e98ncx4,democrats
Precisely what Humpty did. Laziest Russian troll this week. ,Stupidiseverywhere,e8ghu8s,democrats
no.  I looked up the Socialist on Google. Do your own research. Knowledge is power. ,Starlamoon777,e8gp2aw,democrats
[removed],,e8gi0pu,democrats
"Ha... funny. How is it a troll if its facts? 
http://www.tampabay.com/florida-politics/buzz/2018/10/24/beyond-hamilton-e-mails-and-texts-raise-questions-on-andrew-gillums-trips-with-lobbyists/",Starlamoon777,e8gps0q,democrats
Why do you lot always delete your posts? Is it in the handbook vlad?,Stupidiseverywhere,e8gqvw5,democrats
I like how this kind of thing only matter to you Idiots when it involves anyone else but Rapubs. ,Stupidiseverywhere,e8gicj8,democrats
[removed],,e8gitr8,democrats
Just like I said to you in your other senseless posts. I like how this kind of thing only matter to you Idiots when it involves anyone else but Rapubs. Keep deleting them troll.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8gqtit,democrats
It was a repeat of same paragraph by mistake.,Starlamoon777,e8gsfxe,democrats
"DO YOUR OWN RESEARCH. 
DARE TO TAKE THE RED PILL. ",Starlamoon777,e8gocsj,democrats
All of them? Ha ok!,Stupidiseverywhere,e8gsslg,democrats
Fuck off and go delete another one or your posts vlad.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8gqxdb,democrats
"I can see politicians getting divided over Trump, but are your personal relationships with friends and family affected? ",HandshakeSniffer,e8g6odz,democrats
That's all trump knows how to do. ,Gsteel11,e8fkxna,democrats
Nor does he intend to. ,usposeso,e8fv31c,democrats
[removed],,e8gdjmf,democrats
Get your stupid bullshit out of here. ,Stupidiseverywhere,e8ghm3j,democrats
Are you schizoid? ,therecordcorrected,e8gohhk,democrats
After Hillary I have little confidence in women to turn out for other women. ,Gsteel11,e8fq638,democrats
Then you must have even less faith in men.,VegaThePunisher,e8g4ons,democrats
"Pretty much, yup. I have hopes to be proven wrong. ",Gsteel11,e8g4y9r,democrats
"No, we absolutely don't.  Reality is going to strike before long.  One of those fucking bombs will blow up or the next 
alt-right moron will succeed in killing someone.  I already blame him for heather hyer and lots more.

This guy has to go soon. ",batshitcrazy5150,e8ff9kd,democrats
"Reality? Do you mean reality as in millions of people living on welfare who will starve when the government inevitably collapses?  Do you mean the reality that it takes effort to make the wheels turn and that we are encouraging people who don't turn the wheels to breed?  Do you mean reality as in pretending as if there are zero differences between the races beyond skin color, and the reason that black communities and schools are awful is purely racism (nevermind that Asians do better than whites in every measure after having been put into camps less than a century ago)?

Leftist reality has always been a mystery to me. ",SocializeHelicopters,e8gsotc,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting Begins](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8g1di1,democrats
He looks like Minkus from Boy Meets World. ,CR24752,e8gjtnj,democrats
Let’s not get complacent! Keep encouraging others to vote!,Readingit939,e8fx21b,democrats
"I think it's a very small group of people who want/would wage actual civil war. All it takes is one crazy person for a tragedy to happen sometimes, but in terms of a successful organized effort? I don't see that as plausible, even now. Maybe that's too passive a mindset, but it's definitely my read on things. There's a good-sized ""deplorable"" sect of the American population, but even the vast majority of them wouldn't be overtly violent about their awful views.

That said, I'm a proponent of safe gun ownership, for sure. And the fact that this is a conversation that even needs to be had tells us all we need to know about the state of our politics...",OmarIsaiahBetts,e8ftpt8,democrats
"As a Veteran I was trained to be ready for full blown war at a moments notice, republicans don't scare me. 

Democrats that refuse to vote, that scares the hell out of me.",chubbiguy40,e8gnsv4,democrats
"I think that a small fraction of the republican base are willing to wage war on us. The guy ran heather heyer over certainly was. I think that the small base that is willing to wage war could easily pull the larger base into conflict. Ultimately, i see three avenues. 

Avenue 1.  
The far right will mobilize at the ground level, and the state and the fed will ignore them. We already see this happening with the proud boys, but what happens if Trump instructs the FBI to stop investigating crimes committed by people against protestors or something like that? At this point, we could see violent gangs running around attacking democrats, people of color, and terrorizing the populace. They would be armed, and at that point, the only response is to shoot to kill, because the cops sure are not coming to save you.   


Avenue 2.   
This is what happened in the civil war. Its extremely unlikely, but if a state called for secession from the union, or called for another state to be removed from the union. I do not see lindsey graham calling for california to be removed from the union, and putting it to a floor vote. Again, this is an unlikely scenario, but the one with the most potential damage. 

&#x200B;

Avenue 3.   
Trump succeeds in his campaign to turn the powers of justice into a political police force. In this case, we could very well see trumped up charges being deployed against political opponents. We might even see a few high ranking senators get indicted by an fbi gone rogue. This is a natural progression from Avenue 1, and is probably the likeliest scenario. If this were to happen, it would be your constitutional right... no your duty as a citizen of the united states of america to participate in armed revolt. 

&#x200B;

I think a combination of Avenue 1, and avenue 3, in a slow frog cooker fashion is what trump will attempt. The scary thing is that it will be so gradual, that we will not get triggered to revolt. Imagine if trump had rolled out on day 1 everything we have from him now. Revolution would have happened already. Trump's diabolical genius is to drip feed the madness, depravity and despair. Arm yourselves. You will be shooting before the end of trump's second term, and he will win a second term, because the russians will steal our election a second time, and trump will instruct the fbi to ignore it.",Ghosteye55,e8g6kzy,democrats
"Said this yesterday and got a ton of downvotes. By the time the left is ready to fight for this country they will all be in re-education camps and it will be far too late. 

It’s hard to fight crazy. Crazy is focused and never stops. ",azurejedi,e8ftm6r,democrats
"This is why I have guns. And think the Democratic Party needs to ditch the gun control platform. The Right Wing in America is obviously violent, and they stockpile weapons and ammo like crazy. As it stands right now, most liberals in America are defenceless if the government breaks down and fighting erupts. This isn't as crazy as it sounds, this country has had Civil War before, and historical analysis shows that countries that have been through a Civil War in the past, have a very high likelihood of having them break out again in the future. The divisions are still there.

",smileyj78,e8g0hi9,democrats
"1) A lot closer than many people think.  There is a potential election outcome, while unlikely - that would make me have to seriously look at options for getting someone I care about out of the country for their safety.  
2) Not at all. Ultra-right wingers are deeply entrenched in the the police and military. 

3) Honestly on the question of fight or flight, I' am truly torn.",Dell_Hell,e8fvjcl,democrats
[removed],,e8g94jh,democrats
"A very small set of people overall pulled ""the colonies"" into the war that became our independence war. They were wealthy, well-connected, and had gotten use to operating with almost no real law enforcement against them or taxes.

I do not doubt that history can repeat itself.",Dell_Hell,e8fv6hi,democrats
Me too brother. ,Essential_tranquilo,e8gntg6,democrats
"This is exactly my fear. 

The left is educated... so why the HELL are we not doing anything about this?",Essential_tranquilo,e8ftp3t,democrats
"I agree. 

I feel like this has been simmering and they’ve (racists, etc. ) have been waiting to strike. ",Essential_tranquilo,e8g0xkg,democrats
"Oh Vlad, you're so cute when you're unhinged.",Stupidiseverywhere,e8ge38n,democrats
"Lol. Because we are the ones sending bombs to liberal politicians and supporters. 

Fucking delusional ass republicans man. Completely out of touch with reality. 

You guys are the only ones that are violent gun toting pieces of shit. ",Essential_tranquilo,e8g9anw,democrats
"You can check our /r/liberalgunowners ? But I seriously think someone needs to start the community of Locked, Loaded, & Left (LLL) for such a purpose.",Dell_Hell,e8fvb81,democrats
[removed],,e8gg0ja,democrats
[removed],,e8g9yry,democrats
I'm in,Stupidiseverywhere,e8fyab3,democrats
"Oh Boris, that is concerning! Anyway, how is your wife/girlfriend. You're parents doing well? How are you? Taking care of yourself?",Stupidiseverywhere,e8ggpgv,democrats
Why did you put quotes around the word bombs?,Stupidiseverywhere,e8ggurz,democrats
I find it quite cathartic. ,AkiTendo,e8fwj6r,democrats
I hope they nail whoever is fucking around.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8f59oc,democrats
Still your president lol,Gonzila077,e8ftnue,democrats
"These bombs should not be a campaign issue. 
Reasons we should not hope it'll help Democrats are ? 
Apparently none went off and weren't meant to go off. So it's a scare technique. 
Targeting was suspicious-- why weren't more Progressive Democrats targeted / Bernie Warren Booker etc ? Debbie Wasserman-Schultz is a very curious target -- hasn't she not done enough to help ReThugians?? 
If and when the culprit is caught then let's then decide whom to blame. Mostly likely it's a Dumber than Dumb redhat -- but the targeting tells me it could be otherwise. Republicans are already geared up for the later possibility-- but if we are depending on this October Surprise in order to win -- we'll be fucked if the culprit is a ""too clever by half"" agent provocateur who is trying to clinch the election. 
Supposed experts in law enforcement say it will cleared up soon. 

But voter suppression, health care and tax cuts for the rich (unwanted) seem to be our strongest gambits to win on. Immigration and Transgender rights which have dominated the Centrist discussion early this year have been a disaster whittling down our polls. 
If this bomber isn't a Republican we could be fucked. ",data2dave,e8fdx5b,democrats
"Besides the mail we get in our mailboxes, the text that we get on our phones, and voter suppression by gerrymandering, and other discriminating activities, we're going to vote. Already did, still waiting for a Democrat representative that is not taking money from Big corporations and screwing over the middle class. I understand that you got to take money to bankroll your election campaign but at the same time it needs to be moderated with the understanding that you're taking money but you're still going to do what's right for the American people and not for your bank account and what you get out of it. I'd rather vote Democrat then have the clown fish get another term but Democrats are still on thin ice in my opinion.",unknownclient78,e8ejkgt,democrats
One of the worst parts is that I had a bad feeling something like this would happen eventually.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8f5wu9,democrats
"Like Hitler’s rallies talking about Jews

Change my mind! ",walter1950,e8dm72h,democrats
"The proper comparison isn't Trump to Hitler. It's Trump's followers to the people who allowed Hitler to rise to power, and supported the terrible things he did once he was in power",walter1950,e8e3194,democrats
[removed],,e8eqqr8,democrats
[removed],,e8dxdlh,democrats
"Trump didn't encourage violence. He didn't use his resources to force his beliefs on anyone. He said he doesn't like CNN, which definitely doesn't cause any harm to CNN. I don't think advocating punishment for crimes is very similar to fascism. I don't agree with the way he represents himself publicly, but to compare him to Hitler is an appalling hyperbole. ",MUFFIN1700,e8e0uac,democrats
Get your conspiracy shit out of here. It is as worthless as dotard is as president. You are so stupid that you don't even know that stamp collectors have to request that the USPS stamp their mailed stamps from the location since half the time they don't get stamped. God damn you people are so fact free and stupid.,therecordcorrected,e8erand,democrats
"You aren't ""just saying,"" you're peddling conspiracy theories because that benefits you, Russian troll farms, and or a conservative ideology. I don't know or care why you are pushing this bs, but you sure as hell aren't ""just saying"".",VvvlvvV,e8dy0cv,democrats
"Right, based on the fact that your evidence free horse shit shows that you are close to the tipping point on total insanity. Get help before it's too late. Just like we know the Trump campaign paid for those Hondurans to come north, right? Just like you are fantasizing Trump had 100,000 at his rally in Texas. Amazing for an 18,00 seat arena. You know they pay, and this we have proof for, $100 per person to stand in line to make it look like there are people wanting to get in?

",therecordcorrected,e8dytnj,democrats
Your forgetful of when Trump literally told folks to “ do something about Hillary.” At a second amendment rally.,CosmicCharlie99,e8e1mtf,democrats
[removed],,e8dyhyd,democrats
"Yes, yes it is. The media coverage of it is dead, a false flag would probably be played up by whomever made it. Saying things in Latin doesn't add any more weight that that thing happened. This reminds me of a conversation I had with someone who said because it's possible aliens visited earth, they definitely did.

You are trying to sow doubt with bs speculation. ",VvvlvvV,e8dyvh8,democrats
"So take his personal phones away from him and give him a secure phone.

I don’t care if he refuses. Just do it for the sake of National Security. 

Jeez...",PraxisLD,e8eqwjp,democrats
"Isn’t this old old news?  Uh - I thought this was common knowledge.  Fuck, they eavesdrop on everything.  WTF was it a slow news day, the trumpbombs weren’t exciting enough?",myjuly14name,e8etq40,democrats
Saved this for future debates. It really tells a story.,backpackwayne,e8e7pvn,democrats
Can't convince 'em.. they don't believe it,Btravelen,e8e8nlb,democrats
"So what is the source? How do they know they are right wing? Even if this fits with my political views and understanding, doesn’t mean we should take it as clear facts. Could OP post links to the findings?",do6star,e8f2406,democrats
This doesn't surprise me one bit.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8f5fxb,democrats
"I think there have been more than 8 Islamist Extremists since 2010, this chart doesn’t seem entirely accuarate.",Zoollio,e8ffnwj,democrats
"The worst thing is that ""proud"" is not meant sarcastically - Republicans are proud of this.  They feel strong because their followers are willing to murder people for them.

Just like every other enemy of America in history.",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8e8fr4,democrats
"Pretty much. If you showed this to any Republican, theyd just cry 'biased sources' and 'fake news' u til you stopped trying to debate the, and then go on Twitter to say they 'destroyed a libtard ina  debate today'. Its kind of their MO these days.",begonetoxicpeople,e8e9g45,democrats
"Anti-defamation League heatmap, it's in the bottom corner.

&#x200B;",Dell_Hell,e8fw1w8,democrats
these are murders committed by Islamic extremists **in the US.**,Dell_Hell,e8fw42j,democrats
So true. ,backpackwayne,e8e8j22,democrats
That's my experience. I'm done 'debating'. It's a waste of breath and keystrokes,Btravelen,e8g4oul,democrats
"Pulse nightclub, 2016, 49 dead.

Ft Hood, 2009, 13 dead.

Both shooters said they acted in service of Islam.  

Where are these deaths in this graph?",UnexpectedStairway,e8gpyim,democrats
I'm disappointed in the Republicans' reactions but I guess I shouldn't be surprised. After the baseball shooting the Dem team took the GOP team to dinner so everyone could talk...,kerryfinchelhillary,e8f68yd,democrats
"“All time high“ ?

I can get making an argument for “higher”.

But “all time”? Really?
He could’ve still made his point without this demonstrably silly exaggeration.

",Bioman9,e8fujyc,democrats
Really? You have sourced evidence that he is wrong?,therecordcorrected,e8gp5d6,democrats
"Like Fugitive Slave Hunting, or the Reconstruction KKK, or Jim Crow, but 2018 beats all of that?

Like I said, you can plausibly argue things have been getting worse than the more recent past. But saying they’re the worst of “all time” is quite plainly false.",Bioman9,e8h97s3,democrats
"Someone tell Rudolf Hess in a wig to shut the fuck up already.
",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8en1in,democrats
I’m daily amazed that he still works there.,Motiv3z,e8cuyey,democrats
Lol too bad the deranged morons that comprise fox News' core audience are completely immune to facts that run counter to whatever propaganda conservatives are spewing.,JayWaWa,e8ch1jf,democrats
I'm always worried Shep Smith will be fired one day because he's one of the only people left at Fox News that doesn't just roll over and push propaganda.,RadioMelon,e8cvlov,democrats
"I don’t like that my views on Shep are softening, but I do like that he’s growing a pair. ",ChestyLaRue83,e8db3r0,democrats
Trump has basically run his campaign and presidency on fear mongering.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8czkc0,democrats
"I don't know why no one is talking about how they're literally just stealing this [bullshit storyline from one of Steve Bannon's favorite books, The Camp of the Saints](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Camp_of_the_Saints?wprov=sfla1). They're not even trying anymore.",Castor1234,e8d890k,democrats
"I hope some other network hires him away ... as he's the best thing on Fox. Have to admit he is the one ""fair and balanced"" single entity there. ",data2dave,e8d3yal,democrats
The only person at that propaganda network I feel any inkling of respect towards.,ULRB90,e8cx7yk,democrats
"Maybe he's looking for a job at CNN as the ""moderate Republican"". Every news channel needs one so they don't look _too_ biased. It's surprising this is on Fox News but less that it was Shepard Smith. Between the usual lunacy of that network once in a blue moon he or Cavuto will say something reasonable. It usually doesn't last long but those are the only two that can _sometimes_ put politics aside.",E404_User_Not_Found,e8d1nb9,democrats
"You can talk till you're blue in the face Shep - until your network fires Hannity and the other alternative reality mongers who rule the prime time of your network the lies will still be propagated and believed.  If I were you, I'd have quit in protest a long time ago.",AkiTendo,e8cv0wp,democrats
Why can't he have a TV show at 8pm every night,Ikoikobythefio,e8d4wu9,democrats
AND WHY IS EVERY NEWS OUTLET COVERING THIS AND NOT LOCAL/NATIONAL NEWS. Some dickhead won’t stop talking about it while they suppress voters and destroy courts.,Skeetronic,e8cvngs,democrats
Facts don't matter.  ,hackel,e8chqt4,democrats
"Too bad will fall on deaf ears and minds.  Those that need to understand won't listen and those who would listen already know.

Easier for people whose opinions and identity are based on lies and fictions to further contort thinking than it is to change their identity that is wrapped up in the bs they're fed and willingly, greedily, feed at the trough.

If your opinions and thinking are based on lies and fictions then facts and reality won't change them.

",plastigoop,e8d6vk2,democrats
The blackmail he must have...,iowajaycee,e8cw7rk,democrats
Murdoch likes him a lot. That is why he gave him a huge contract a couple of years ago. He's not going nowhere unless he wants to.,therecordcorrected,e8dhxfq,democrats
"I agree, but I often use Shep's clips on Facebook (which is the only one of my social media accounts my parents follow) because I'm also friends on FB with a lot of ""old family friends."" My mom has always voted Dem (I think it's a chip installed when you're born in Detroit LOL), but my dad is a very recent convert. Plus, if I do the work of digging up Shep's cips, Mom & Dad will share them, and their other friends will watch them just because they're Fox News. Their particular brand of old white people aren't the worst of the Trump-humpers - they're GOP by default (which is bad enough) - but if I can sneak a bit of anti-trump-programming into their day, I'll take the opportunity.",Scarya,e8dghbj,democrats
"Or, consider he legitimizes their network and therefore reinforces the propaganda. He’s a feature, not a bug. ",GlandyThunderbundle,e8cxlrv,democrats
"Not as long as his mentor and friend Murdoch is alive. And even then,  Murdoch gave him a massive a least $8 million a year re-signed this year so if he is fired you pay him to work. Not going to happen.",therecordcorrected,e8dibli,democrats
"Non-Mobile link: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Camp_of_the_Saints?wprov=sfla1
***
^HelperBot ^v1.1 ^/r/HelperBot_ ^I ^am ^a ^bot. ^Please ^message ^/u/swim1929 ^with ^any ^feedback ^and/or ^hate. ^Counter: ^222469",HelperBot_,e8d89kw,democrats
He just re-signed this year. Do you think Murdoch wouldn't take them to court if they tried? Why would he stop working for his friend and mentor?,therecordcorrected,e8digva,democrats
"> Every news channel needs one

This is exactly why they keep him around at Fox. ",dj-kitty,e8d208c,democrats
"MSNBC regularly has reasonable conservatives on at night, like David Frum and that guy from Wisconsin.  (I'm blocking on his name.)  And these conservatives don't get interrupted, badgered and mocked, like liberals do on Fox.  Eye-rolling is a major tool of ""persuasion"" on Fox.  

EDIT: Charlie Sykes, from radio station WTMJ, is the conservative whose name I couldn't remember.",stankind,e8d6mwm,democrats
I wonder if Shepard Smith hates his job.,RadioMelon,e8d04ef,democrats
"Or he realizes he’s able to reach a demographic that normally has its collective ears shut to anything but traditional fox and breitbart.

Keep it up, Shep!
",Ceilani,e8d9xc3,democrats
"I suspect he's not un-compromised but he supplies ""cover"". Also, it's a tight market for ""talking heads"" -- the less ""pretty"" tend to be at Fox except for ol Megan. Shit looks is all that matters on TV, like Reagan!! ",data2dave,e8dr14y,democrats
"I meant from the other party but, yeah, good point. Poor guy is going to get roasted by conservatives that would rather believe somehow democrats organized thousands of people from Central America to walk 1100 miles so they could win a mid-term election. ",E404_User_Not_Found,e8d43ej,democrats
"No, it is because Murdoch is his friend and mentor.",therecordcorrected,e8diir2,democrats
"I won't watch debates or interviews on any network where that shit happens. Many left-leaning politicians feel they need to go on Fox's network to show they are willing to face the opposition and do due diligence. Unfortunately, Fox uses it to push a narrative. It's well-known that they try to convince people to come on their shows by saying they want to give them a chance to announce their platform or by saying they want to talk about something like the economy. Yet when these people get on their shows Fox immediately pivots to something they didn't agree to talk about (usually the ""hot button"" topic of the time) and then just run the guest into the ground by talking over them. O'Reilly did this all the time and his little protege Tucker seems to have ran with it as well. To the trump voter they ""owned the lib"" but most I think most reasonable people see it as unproductive and unprofessional.",E404_User_Not_Found,e8d9jy4,democrats
"Compared to the Republican Party, David Frum would be put on a stake and burnt if he tried to rejoin it. For gun control? For universal health care? etc. Regrets Iraq not a big deal as Trump does that. But his other stands are now to far moderate for the Republican party.",therecordcorrected,e8diotw,democrats
He absolutely does but he's rich because of it,Ikoikobythefio,e8d4ygm,democrats
"At over $8 million a year, it would have to be the killing of innocents before I would hate it.",therecordcorrected,e8didzm,democrats
"I actually continue to watch Fox News at night some, mainly to be aware of what nonsense they're saying lately.  I believe we should all watch EVERYTHING, and not self-censor.  ",stankind,e8dw1uw,democrats
Pleas do so! Especially in northern california. We have been stuck with Doug Lamalfa for too long... way too long.,Jgrigg17,e8d9736,democrats
"Hi everyone, I hope all is well. November is super important, not just for the good of the party, but for the good of the nation, its people, and the values we hold dear. The last election we saw really low turn-out...like really low.   

&#x200B;

I posted two maps to kinda drive this point home. Look at the one on the left, imagine what percentage of those pies would be blue if the map on the right was a bit more colorful.   

&#x200B;

Make sure that you get out and vote. Make sure you help your family get to the booth. Volunteer your time to your local party. Donate to local candidates: A Nelson win in FL does us the same good as a Beto win in TX.  

&#x200B;

If we all work together the 2018 and 2020 maps could look a lot more blue!",_Vaf,e8czilt,democrats
Another thing to remember is GCB numbers don't mean anything.  It's all about district by district.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8dd3ep,democrats
How accurate is this? Because that's an exciting amount of Blue for Alabama ,BinaryDive,e8dzl0o,democrats
And McClintock. Both need to go. ,coachadam,e8dae2t,democrats
"But her emails! Dotard is the FSB's and GRU's wet dream.

If it is the Chinese and Russians, then it is every other country that wants to also.

> In what amounts to a marriage of lobbying and espionage, the Chinese have pieced together a list of the people with whom Mr. Trump regularly speaks in hopes of using them to influence the president, the officials said.

> Foreign governments are well aware of the risk, and so leaders like Mr. Xi and Mr. Putin avoid using cellphones when possible. President Barack Obama was careful with cellphones, too. 

> **They said they had further confidence he was not spilling secrets because he rarely digs into the details of the intelligence he is shown and is not well versed in the operational specifics of military or covert activities.**

> Last year, Mr. Trump’s cellphone was left behind in a golf cart at his club in Bedminster, N.J., causing a scramble to locate it, according to two people familiar with what took place.
> 
> Mr. Trump is supposed to swap out his two official phones every 30 days for new ones but rarely does, bristling at the inconvenience. White House staff members are supposed to set up the new phones exactly like the old ones, but the new iPhones cannot be restored from backups of his old phones because doing so would transfer over any malware.

So let me get this straight. They can't set up phones exactly like the old ones because they don't want to transfer malware over so he keeps using phones with malware on them? 

Come on in dotardians. Justify this.",therecordcorrected,e8efaz5,democrats
"I don’t care if he refuses. 

Just take them away from him and give him a secure phone...",PraxisLD,e8ehtiu,democrats
"But, but, the pundits said the Blue Wave was dying! /s",ULRB90,e8cxxz5,democrats
"Yeah polls aren't perfect, but they're (logically) a better predictor than anything else.",1239pm,e8d523o,democrats
"Any second now, right wingers are going to declare this a false flag. Fox News will either push that narrative or ignore this story completely.",JayWaWa,e8d3hfm,democrats
The story on The Hill mentions one was also found at the Obama's DC residence.,iowajaycee,e8d1jss,democrats
Now there's one at CNN headquarters,megs1120,e8d7kdc,democrats
">  If she [H. Clinton] gets to pick her judges, nothing you can do, folks, […]  Although the Second Amendment people — maybe there is, I don’t know.

POTUS 45.


August 9 2016.


List of POTUS 45's *known* victims...

1.  Jamal Khashoggi.


2. ...
",Touristupdatenola,e8cxkwt,democrats
Soros and now the Clinton's? Sounds like someone has been busy. ,Gsteel11,e8d046r,democrats
"Now found targeting Soros, Clinton, Obama, CNN/Brennan, Wasserman-Schultz, Cuomo.",iowajaycee,e8dbr4r,democrats
How anemic is this sub to have such little traffic?   Still more subs than the republican bastion.  Dems need to lose the corporate stuff.,CharmingCockroach,e8eie1d,democrats
Go read the comments on the Fox News story if you want to prove you’re correct. ,Carpicon,e8dck2z,democrats
"Don't forget the classic, ""ANTIFA is just as bad! Because my feeeeeeeeeeeeelings!!!""",open_perspective,e8ddkgj,democrats
Don't forget Heather Heyer. ,homojojojo,e8dbe8l,democrats
[removed],,e8ddjvb,democrats
I believe Kennedy actually got the US into Vietnam.,mad_poet_navarth,e8dk545,democrats
The Tonkin false flag happened 9 months after Kennedy was killed,carlip,e8dqcd5,democrats
"OK, but according to Wikipedia in 1963 there were already 16000 US troops there. 
",mad_poet_navarth,e8ebc2f,democrats
B-But the left are the violent ones!! /S,Ghdust2,e8ddzp0,democrats
Republicans showing their true faces.,KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8db52u,democrats
The whole thing makes me so angry.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8ddxhb,democrats
"
This is all so disturbing and insane. 

We came so close to a national terror crisis. 

At least there seems to be a pretty bipartisan condemnation of this.",Bioman9,e8dhbvb,democrats
"Words have consequences, Mr. Predisent.  ",tinydrumpf,e8e0j4r,democrats
Hope they catch the #MAGABomber before someone gets hurt ,DrNoPants,e8dhmjx,democrats
[removed],,e8dxazu,democrats
"I love how most, if not all, of you just assume this was a republican, or some alt-right cronie.  How about you keep your assumptions to yourself and form an opinion when more information is released?  None of you know shit, so don't be stupid.",Harry_Maybourne_NID,e8ebac4,democrats
"One thing that drives me nuts as an ex Republican (huge Ron Paul fan) that is now a Democrat is that Democrats are too nice. They let the right run roughshod all over them in politics. 

The right has long ago gone passed the stage of needing a civil war so one side wins or loses. The days of looking for common ground are over. Both sides think the other side is insane or criminals. So let’s duke it out. Winner take all. Loser has leaders jailed and party members removed from the country. 

The right is already checking registrations and building toward this. But the left sits on their hands and bemoans the situation. There are far more liberals and progressives in this country. It would be a fairly quick war. ",azurejedi,e8de75h,democrats
Just logged on to media and What the heck is going on? ,2thousandEighteen,e8eoyc7,democrats
[removed],,e8dbfig,democrats
"Well we shouldn’t immediately assume this terror Attack wasn’t done by someone of the far left (to stir controversy in the trump administration), but yes it is likely that this was done by some crazy alt right guy who lives in his moms basement 

",harryjam30,e8dzbgr,democrats
You'll believe anything you are told to believe. You are a lost cause.  Where did they ship your testicles too?  No need to respond. I would have nothing more to say to you. ,backpackwayne,e8dxi9w,democrats
"Look I understand Democrats need to stand up for themselves, but stooping to the low level of a Republican in today’s politics and suggesting a war (even if this is a joke), isn’t gonna get anyone anywhere. ",DC_1210,e8dy23o,democrats
Are you ok?,VegaThePunisher,e8dblmb,democrats
You can tell my the grammar. Republican. ,azurejedi,e8deonm,democrats
[removed],,e8dyntz,democrats
"They go low we go high. Said every good soul in Russia during Stalin’s rise. Or in Germany during hitlers. Again, if one party can physically stop certain voters from voting and the other party does not do the same you will lose. Period. ",azurejedi,e8dy6kh,democrats
He's a trump supporter. Of course he's not ok.,Ghdust2,e8debkc,democrats
"No one here is buying your shit, It is funny how just an hour ago FOX News tried to say the same thing. My god man. You have lost all decency, credibility and rationality. There is plenty of reason in this case to throw out insults. You deserve them and more. I can't believe you would actually say such a moronic thing in public. Oh yea..., you are doing it  anonymously on the internet. How brave of you.",backpackwayne,e8dz30d,democrats
Fighting these injustices is possible without suggesting war. I mean come on.,DC_1210,e8dzchp,democrats
">  If she [H. Clinton] gets to pick her judges, nothing you can do, folks, […]  Although the Second Amendment people — maybe there is, I don’t know.

POTUS 45 on August 9th 2016.",Touristupdatenola,e8dtcjh,democrats
 And refers to the Democrats as an angry unhinged mob ,bergerac121,e8dvkhy,democrats
"With a little effort, we could fill a few pages with his efforts to incite",Btravelen,e8dw1xw,democrats
Well including you Mr. Flake. You voted to confirm him.,backpackwayne,e8dd4p2,democrats
We won't miss you shithead.,eric987235,e8ddy7y,democrats
Maybe he just retired because he was afraid of being defeated.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8deceg,democrats
"Better put him on the SCOTUS, just to be sure though. ",psufan5,e8dfdxw,democrats
Pathetic Coward. ,walter1950,e8dl4h3,democrats
"Arizona 2018 Election 

[Early Voting](https://azsos.gov/elections/voting-election/contact-information-county-election-officials): October 10-November 2, 2018 

[General Election](https://azsos.gov/elections/voting-election/contact-information-county-election-officials): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8dtwm8,democrats
"American political parties

https://i.imgur.com/C87xx6T.jpg

Lul",khalifornia420,e8e41r3,democrats
"That’s the point. No one knows if he was lying or if CBF was lying, and in America we say that you’re innocent without evidence to suggest otherwise.

I should point out that this is a massively galvanizing issue for the right - even more than it is for the left. Democrats would do well to let this go, because there’s lots more issues that will do more to erode GOP support like Saudi Arabia support/lack of condemnation, etc. I’m honest when I say that as a member of the right I would be happy if the left continued to harp on Kavenaugh, because I can see the unity fading without it being in the news anymore.",crimsonchin68,e8dg7f9,democrats
"There was evidence.  The FBI declined to look into it.  
If you don't want division maybe you should stop lieing.

You should be ashamed, if you are galvanized by it.

I am now listen to Hannity call liberals ""left wing lunatics"" and harping on the ""liberal mob"".
Bombings are apparently ok if you mess w people's meals.

You right wingers need to look in the mirror, before you cry about division and civility.   ",areyouseriousdotard,e8dl5hu,democrats
I wish there was not such a division in the first place. We are all American after all.,Stupidiseverywhere,e8dhqn8,democrats
Which division are you talking about? Or the division between right and left in general?,crimsonchin68,e8dkmud,democrats
"In general. Sorry, should have been more clear.",Stupidiseverywhere,e8dl28e,democrats
"I wholeheartedly agree, then.",crimsonchin68,e8dl5qt,democrats
"They also just found one at Time Warner Center where CNN is....... don't be alarmed, I'm sure the people who sent all these bombs didnt mean any harm and are ""very fine people.""",rhodeislandah,e8d12n6,democrats
">  If she [H. Clinton] gets to pick her judges, nothing you can do, folks, […]  Although the Second Amendment people — maybe there is, I don’t know.

POTUS 45 on August 9th 2016.",Touristupdatenola,e8db42a,democrats
Just watch him change the narrative if that happens. He is going to do an entire 180 and become friends with the Democrats!,Readingit939,e8egazx,democrats
"Florida 2018 Election 

[Early Voting Begins](https://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/early-voting/): October 22, 2018 

[General Election](http://dos.myflorida.com/elections/for-voters/voting/absentee-voting/): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8epe1b,democrats
"Not just clean it up, but also take the blame for the situation getting that shitty in the first place.",Intanjible,e8b5vd0,democrats
"Like any good circus, someone has to clean up after the elephants...",Electriclumpy,e8c4nx9,democrats
"Clinton improved things from the late '80s early '90s stagnation under Bush I, only to see Bush II policies blow up the deficit again. Obama righted the ship again only to have Trump attempt to take credit. And now we're heading for some rough waters in 2019-20 as a result of the Trump import/export tariffs taking full effect. The news of big companies like Ford and Caterpillar seeing big impacts due to rising steel prices is the canary in the coal mine, so to speak. ",PortlanderGoneWild,e8b7m9r,democrats
It is what stops Dems from running a proactive economic agenda. ,stos313,e8c3xyg,democrats
Not “running into the ground”. But “running it into their pockets”,backtoreality00,e8bqk1s,democrats
"I’ve always looked at the economy with a 2 year delay. If you do that the pattern really really becomes clear. 

I think most of not all policy changes take 2 years to really have an impact on the economy. It doesn’t change over night. 

If you go back to in bush SR, which is the earliest in my life time using this theory you will see that republican presidents always harm the economy and democrats always improve it. 

",Jesta23,e8bibmf,democrats
"THANK YOU! It’s about time someone said it out loud! 

It’s ALWAYS up to a dem president to  fix what the republican president screwed up. Then the next 4-8 years is a repeat process 🙄",lonely-flowers,e8bcvj9,democrats
"Happens every time. What's coming is gonna be epic. Protect your investments, large or small. ",GoodTimes2018,e8cfak7,democrats
"More like ""Republicans line their own pockets, Dems come in and fix up the economy a little bit and claim they've solved the problem once and for all. Then a Republican gets back into office and fucks it up again."" Maybe we should stop voting for either party and see how the country turns out 🤔",Clolarion,e8cen1v,democrats
"I believe the word he wants is ""looting""",CTcupcakes,e8cpnwr,democrats
I'm so glad he said it.  Sometimes I feel like Obama can be a bit too polite.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8cz3gh,democrats
"It's exactly the same in the UK: the conservative party (Tories) well themselves as fiscally responsible while pointing at the Labour party as irresponsible yet data from 1945 until present day shows that the Tories have always left the country in a worse financial position.

The current government (Tories) have not only had nearly 10 years of austerity but they have doubled the deficit

http://www.primeeconomics.org/articles/taq30tk04ljnvpyfos059pp0w7gnpe",makeinstall,e8cj4ct,democrats
r/noshit,clonedspork,e8bjlfy,democrats
I don’t know If I would say democrats “come back and clean things up”. A lot of things happened in the early days of the obama administration that was straight up corporate welfare. Saying a financial crisis is over on paper is different from the direct results felt on the ground. A lot of working class people are in the same boat they were In back in 08’. ,moogsynth87,e8c6t5b,democrats
Absolutely true.,bananamanwill,e8ccp1p,democrats
The Government debt is becoming humongous and the interest payment on the debt is predicted to become $ 1 trillion a year.,Proclivitor,e8chhnp,democrats
"Jesus, 'this headline' looks 'awfully' forced 'to make' it look 'like' someone 'said' something - Paris Hilton, 2001~2004

Now, off to read the article",StinnaDeTrinna,e8cvmlz,democrats
What planet do you people live on? Just curious so I know to stay far away from it,thispenismine,e8gvbwj,democrats
[deleted],,e8bft2m,democrats
Except our economy is doing great rn but okay,BoomBamShlop,e8cjobn,democrats
No I think it’s just a pattern of republicans and democrat presidents being in the pockets of lobbyists and democrats like to paint themselves as the good guys when in reality they’re a gang of money grabbing charlatans ,FreshStink,e8cmatk,democrats
I thought the economy was doing pretty well right now.,HA5396,e8b6lh0,democrats
"I guess this is my day for being enraged at Democrats who suddenly find their spine once they leave office and no longer have the power to do jack shit. First it was Eric ""gerrymandering is bad"" Holder gee asshole, you couldn't have possibly focused on gerrymandering when you were Attorney Fucking General instead of trying for marijuana convictions in Colorado, could you?

Now it's Barrack Obama telling us, now that he's safely unable to do anything about it, that there's this pattern of Republicans crashing the economy and leaving it to Democrats to fix. This is news to you asshole? You didn't notice that during your entire term in office when you literally spent the first four years of your Presidency picking up the pieces of the Bush recession?

Obama lacked the spine to offer even the most mild criticism of Republicans when he was President but now, \*\*NOW\*\* that he's out of office and totally powerless he suddenly discovers that maybe, possibly, those Republicans he kept surrendering to aren't really good custodians of the national economy?

&#x200B;

Any Democrat who didn't fight like a rabid wolverine when they were in office should shut the fuck up once they leave office. I don't need to hear those sorry fuckers who couldn't fight for me after I voted for them tell me how brave they are now. Just shut up you pathetic cowards.",sotonohito,e8b9vm2,democrats
Thanks Clinton!  That repeal of Glass Steagal was awesome!,GDmaxxx,e8c874w,democrats
[removed],,e8c6nen,democrats
"Let's assume this is true. 

Then why the f*ck did Obama NEGOTIATE with the Republicans in 2009 over the economic stimulus? 

Why the f*ck did Obama NEGOTIATE with the Republicans over Health Care when they all ended up voting against him? 

Seems there is a pattern of Republicans running the economy 'into the ground' and Democrats negotiating with Republicans on how to clean things up. ",Xi_32,e8cgtdu,democrats
Interesting opinion,realskidmarkmania,e8c5lct,democrats
‘Detroit’,unlucky1994,e8ckvgm,democrats
Who is the Republican who ran California into the ground?,SirSquawck,e8ccnxh,democrats
"""Obama caused the Great Recession!""

You mean the one that started a year before he was sworn in? 

Edited for rules or something

Further edited for not having fixed earlier rule violation

Edit: You know, it's always interesting seeing these anti-Dem/pro-Repub comments come in in the middle of the night during Russian business hours",TVK777,e8ba6io,democrats
"That's the real purpose of the tax breaks. Ruin the country, way over spend, lose power, other guys have to raise taxes to fix the giant mess, yell about taxes to get back into power, ruin the country some more.",PeverseRolarity,e8bx19f,democrats
"And if we get our Blue Wave, guess what?  The shit is about to hit the fan, and we'll get the blame.  

The GOP pulled the pin out of the grenade, then tossed it into our court.",jefuchs,e8bjrg2,democrats
Maybe they should do away with this circus like they did the actual circus. Elephants cause too much damage...,Snifflewinks,e8cku0u,democrats
"Between tariffs, rising income inequality, a growing housing bubble in states that experienced strong growth through the Obama years, unpaid for tax cuts, the bulk of boomers set to retire, and an over valued stock market, I’d say the economy is ripe for a solid downturn... just in time for Dems to control the house and reap the blame from Trump and his supporters who get hit the hardest. Not to mention how swimmingly the donor class comes out of this mess. The Dems need to step up and improve their messaging on the economy, but that’s “Republican” territory. Not sure how they succeeded with this branding, but Americans need to wake up and pay attention.",BrodyLoren,e8bc27z,democrats
And the healthcare burden. Medicare is on it's way to bankruptcy and we can't think about any of this stuff because trump is sucking up all the oxygen. ,Cannabis_Prym,e8b9071,democrats
Canary in the nuclear bomb shaft,CanderousBossk,e8bddcf,democrats
"Clinton did some things well, but let's remember that regardless of who was president the internet boom was happening.",SusBoiSlime,e8chxq9,democrats
Honestly it makes me so angry knowing he is stealing Obama’s accomplishments. Another white male stealing from people of color. At this point I wish the economy would completely collapse to prove the point to stupid Drumpf supporters!,bluegirlwins,e8bk1si,democrats
"Clinton inherited a robust Economy from the bush administration. nafta deal, dot com boom, big fat check from the Saudi’s and Germany for first gulf war. Clinton never enacted a single policy that did anything to benefit the us economy. He did destroy the us housing and securities industries cause almost a complete collapse under second bush admin. Not to mention he had an opportunity to kill or capture bin laden after terror attacks on us embassey and uss Cole and did nothing. He was a shitty president who happened to be president at a time America was strong economically ",pryda22,e8cm08n,democrats
"Deal , we ll see how the economy is doing in a year? Would you guys give credit to the President if in a year its good? ",nptown,e8c3rve,democrats
"For the past \~30 years, GOP policy usually leads to short term gains and long term loses. They defend it with a contrived expectation that the short term gains will boost the economy and overcome the future loses, but that never actually happens. It's like they can't understand that their short term gains are essentially being funded by stealing future earnings.",GISftw,e8btq89,democrats
And the dems are always rewarded with being voted out because the electorate has a short memory and is undereducated. ,azad_ninja,e8bxezb,democrats
"My PoliSci teacher, who was a Republican, said there’s a trend of the economy crashing, Dems fixing it, people getting too confident and Repubs over-deregulating, then Dems fixing it.  That really opened my eyes.",PotatoPrince84,e8bfv2n,democrats
/r/noshitsherlock,SlobBarker,e8bvgpg,democrats
"I would wholeheartedly disagree:

Job creation

* http://www.msnbc.com/sites/msnbc/files/styles/embedded_image/public/3.9.18.png?itok=Rhh9iHCq

Job creation compared to Trump:

* https://www.macleans.ca/wp-content/uploads/2018/01/OT_JOBS.jpg
GDP:

* http://www.msnbc.com/sites/msnbc/files/styles/embedded_image/public/7.27.18.png?itok=wemVSfbg

Economic Growth:

* https://www.economicshelp.org/wp-content/uploads/2017/02/us-economic-growth.png

Stock Market - Obama vs. Trump

* https://www.macleans.ca/wp-content/uploads/2018/01/OT_STOCKS.jpg",backpackwayne,e8c7g7u,democrats
Government debt is not personal debt,barchueetadonai,e8cr61h,democrats
That's a fucking bingo!,HillbillyPartySloth,e8cdtm1,democrats
It is. I'm not an economist but my understanding is that conservative economic policies cause short-term economic prosperity while creating bubbles that inevitably burst and lead to a recession.,maikuxblade,e8b7ggg,democrats
"Obama created a strong foundation for our economy, and it grew steadily as a result.  Trump cut taxes nearly in half, which takes the strong foundation and injects a jot of nitrous to it.  Other than balloon the deficit, this is just a boost on an existing good economy.  Whatever.

But now, to keep this train going, he's repealing Dodd-Frank and EPA standards, meaning he's rolling back regulation, which lowers business costs.  So it's effectively another tax-cut.  Unfortunately, most economic recessions are caused by increasing levels of financial fraud in the economy.  It increases when regulations roll back and becomes essentially legal fraud.  So things that were previously against the law become legal, but they're still shady and cause what basically amounts to lying and stealing to occur at greater levels.  This lowers trust between companies and banks doing business together, and when trust get's low enough, money stops changing hands and a recession hits.

On top of this, he's created a shitload of protectionist tariffs.  These naturally benefit certain US companies, and the only reason that it hasn't tanked the rest of the US economy due to input costs is that the businesses are balancing them out with lower taxes and less regulation.

So he took a stable, strong economy, added nitrous, pulled off the brakes, and pushed it downhill.  As a result, it picked up speed.

But now he's using the deficit as an excuse to cut the social safety net.  Social Security, Medicare, Medicaid, Obamacare, etc., are all next on the copping block.  If those get cut, then a massive amount of money that flows into the economy from the federal government will suddenly stop.  If you've read the first part of my post, you know that recessions happen when money stops changing hands.  Well this would be a big example of exactly that.  What percentage of our economy relies on the current system of welfare?  We can measure it in the dollars spent, but what about the secondary and tertiary systems that also rely on it?  It's probably a big number.

Trumps economy is the Obama economy without any accountability or control.  Pretty soon, the federal government will have a lot less influence than it did.  What that boils down to is higher highs and lower lows, and a faster cycle.  An economy without regulation will be much more volatile, with the highs and lows closer together, and I don't think that's good for long term growth.  

What will it be like when every recession is as bad as 2008, and we have one every 3 to 5 years?  And don't think that you'll be included in the good times.  They'll be far better, but only the richest of the rich will ever reap the benefits.  What it means for you and me is being employed much of the time, but fired every. single. time. there's a downturn.",COPCO2,e8b93a9,democrats
"I upvoted you because you’re right, not sure if people can disagree. But the problem is we’re setting ourselves up for failure with fewer trade partners and less tax revenue to pay for infrastructure. This is going to be a big big mess to clean up.

Edit: the worst part is that people will probably blame the coming economic problems on whoever immediately succeeds Trump instead of looking at the actual reasons behind them. I had a conservative friend say that his rule is the presidents policies have a delay of about a year before the economy responds. What a simplistic, embarrassing understanding to make public.",mishagorby,e8c2nby,democrats
"Obama didn't have the political capital to do anything you're suggesting. I hate to play the race card but Obama was stuck playing the role of First Black President. Let's review the Obama administration ""scandals"":

* The tan suit
* Trayvon could have looked like my son
* The Birther movement
* Fucking dijon mustard
* Made the frogs gay

It was literally a meme to blame shit on Obama with a ""thanks Obama"" even though he brought us out of the cesspool of shit that the Bush administration lead us into. I don't know why anybody thought he was able to be a liberal superhero when he barely had the political capital to be the least audacious man to hold the office in a half century. Hell, even his teenage daughters who grew up in the national spotlight didn't make a single gaffe. ",maikuxblade,e8baoj3,democrats
"*Couldn't fight for me after I voted for them*

By that logic, Trump lost years ago when he dodged the draft. 

**DODGED** the draft. 

That whole cowardism statement really chimes in there. ",NobleRynne,e8bxsi2,democrats
Obama made the banks bigger which was also pretty great,bambam219,e8cgzrq,democrats
"Is demonrats the best you got... really? God you people are as dumb as we think. If your leadership wasn't supervillain-level evil, I would worry about how you people get to your polling places. Like you let *her* drive? On a public road?",HillbillyPartySloth,e8ce2cm,democrats
"I mean you're right. Obama's commitment to bipartisanship and negotiating was part of why a lot of his programs are disappointments. Obamacare and the stimulus would have went a lot better if he just ignored the republicans (Obamacare especially).

I think after having actually worked with them, and realizing that most modern Republican talking points are based on hopes and dreams, and their legislators just do not believe in compromise, he realizes this. He's much more jaded to the GOP now.",lurkyduck,e8fibr3,democrats
WTF are you talking about. California has one of the highest standards of living in the country.,HillbillyPartySloth,e8cduws,democrats
"I worked crew on the smallest of small-time talk shows and we had a guest come on that angrily blamed Obama for the financial crash. After the show, I asked him if he knew it started before Obama, right, and he just sort of dismissed that and said he didn’t follow the news.",CaptainJAmazing,e8bsr7r,democrats
My parents told me Clinton caused the recession.  Believed it until I figured out how years worked.,PotatoPrince84,e8bfrmn,democrats
"2008: Market crashes, last year of Bush's 2nd term

2009: It's all Obama's fault

 
2016: US economy is going strong, last year of Obama's 2nd term

2017: It's all due to Trump

[MRW](https://i.kym-cdn.com/entries/icons/original/000/026/913/excuse.jpg)",alacp1234,e8cch9t,democrats
[removed],,e8bcwya,democrats
"Funny how investors are forward looking and react to a disaster before it was elected, 
How did that NAFTA work out for Democrats? How about the health care thingy you all fucked up? 
How about every city and state you all have run are complete shit holes? Who you going to blame for all your failure? 
Anyone who votes for a Dem with their track record of failure would have to be brain dead, ",getndown2bus,e8cjqus,democrats
"I had a job when he took office. After that and for 3 years after, I didn’t. He’s gone and I’ve never been better. Since Trump got elected my 401k has doubled my wages are up, and I’m looking to buy a house for the first time in my life. Rewrite history all you want, I actually lived through it. I know the truth.",delawarepilot,e8c9mbl,democrats
"Republicans campaign on the idea that government doesn't work, then they get elected and prove it.",SargeantSasquatch,e8cdkr6,democrats
All the problems that Trump is creating will come home to roost once Dem's take over.  Our nation's enemies aren't dumb enough to act while Trump is doing all their dirty work.  They'll wait until we have power and then push the nationalist stance against us from within.  Shit hasn't even started to stink yet.  ,ThatWentWellish,e8cw5b1,democrats
"> The Dems need to step up and improve their messaging on the economy, but that’s “Republican” territory.

WHY? Why? Democrats should be talking about this in the first paragraph every time they are on TV. ""Republicans always blow-up the economy."" Republicans win on this issue because their messaging is so solid. Democrats must do it even better. It helps that Democrats have the facts on their side -- I hope.",dead_pirate_robertz,e8c4qne,democrats
"Yeah they need to expropriate some fucking capital from the 21st century robber barons and put people to work for the things we *need* at wages we can *live* on. Give people a say in the things they do everyday and make democracy a reality for working people, and, by extension, all people. If we don't, the whole thing is going to collapse. ",hyasbawlz,e8c0dob,democrats
"> just in time for Dems to control the house and reap the blame from Trump and his supporters who get hit the hardest. 

no, people blame the President in office, never Congress. Remember that we held both chambers of Congress in 2007-2008, only the biggest GOP hacks said it was the Democrats' fault. No one paid attention to them and Republicans had to own the Great Recession. ",Clarko95,e8ck8rk,democrats
Except it won’t prove anything to them. They do not operate in facts or reality. ,BrodyLoren,e8bmccv,democrats
"A brand new fake liberal account?  So surprising, you never see those.  

""Look fellow Trumpers, libruls are as dumb as we are!""",MostSensualPrimate,e8c7w70,democrats
They arent this fucking dumb are they?,HillbillyPartySloth,e8cdily,democrats
[Why President Bill Clinton's Economic Policies Were Effective](https://www.thebalance.com/president-bill-clinton-s-economic-policies-3305559),PortlanderGoneWild,e8dk1o0,democrats
"Yes. 

I’m actually curious how the tariffs will pan out long term. 

Most people on the left are trashing them, but I think there is a chance they will hurt short term but be beneficial long term. 

Of course I don’t know, but it’ll be interesting to see how it goes. ",Jesta23,e8c43zg,democrats
!RemindMe 1 year,HillbillyPartySloth,e8cdk4g,democrats
What about him made him a Republican then?,GhettoMango,e8bp0h2,democrats
"Talking about the welfare of humans in terms of job creation and the stock market really doesnt reflect lived experience. Job creation means more people receiving wages, but it has no indication of how much individuals make. It definitely implies more business, and under capitalism more money going into the stock market and into the pockets of investors and business owners.

Basically, these statistics alone are only indicators of his w well the wealthy are doing. Jobs can actually make peoples lives worse if they dont pay well or have poor conditions.

It would be interesting to see data that reflects peoples' lifestyles, i.e. how many people are buying homes?   How many people live in an average household? Homelessness rates. Affordability of healthcare. Affordability of food. Affordability of luxuries.

",dontpanic_benice,e8ca1cp,democrats
What part of on paper didn’t you understand? ,moogsynth87,e8c7p89,democrats
Especially for those that pay no tax.,Proclivitor,e8cs3oy,democrats
"This. A lot of people look into how things affect them immediately, instead of focusing on what happens long term.",MediocreHeroine,e8b7yjs,democrats
"Exactly, and typically when things are going well, we pay down the deficit so we can drive it back up when stuff hits the fan. Like the 2008 bailout or putting your unexpected new breaks on a credit card. Unfortunately thats not happening right now... We're earning more than ever, but we're not ""saving"" for a rainy day, we're still spending faster than we're earning, and we're not spending it on anything useful. ",kayakguy429,e8b8cel,democrats
It frustrates me that a recession will probably hit when a democrat is back in office- and it’s obvious who will be blamed. ,sadiegoose1377,e8c3m3c,democrats
Ah yeah that’s what I’ve been saying to people who talk up the economy right now. I can’t believe we’ve become the party of trade,mishagorby,e8c2kjf,democrats
"This is partially incorrect. It is typically good to increase government spending or decrease taxes in a recession. In times of economic prosperity, it is best to decrease government spending or increase taxes. The latter two strategies tend to cause a bubble and lead to a recession faster, but one is associated with conservative politics and one is associated with liberal politics. The economy will always have peaks and valleys. It’s the government’s job to soften them as best as possible.",TheGreatSalvador,e8ci2d4,democrats
I love how you included the gay frogs one lmao,spiCCy_boii,e8bocrm,democrats
"He had external limitations yes, but he was self limited by his own worship of bipartisanship for the sake of bipartisanship and his idiot belief in the willingness of Republicans to work with him.

I'm not arguing that he could have done more from a policy perspective, but he damn sure could have spoken up more about the way the Republicans were ratfucking America.

&#x200B;

EDIT: He could also have stopped appointing Republicans to high positions. If it hadn't been for Obama's senseless faith in bipartisanship leading him to appoint lifelong Republican James Comey to run the FBI then Hillary Clinton would be President right now and Trump would be a punchline.",sotonohito,e8bb980,democrats
CA has 25% of the nations homeless. LA alone has over 10%.,apatheticviews,e8coyod,democrats
Who told you that? CNN? I'm sure the absurd amount of homeless people there have a fantastic standard of living!,SirSquawck,e8ctp1t,democrats
"Has an angry opinion about it, but ""doesn't follow the news.""",shanez1215,e8bv0dn,democrats
Is it bad that for a second I questioned which Clinton they were blaming?,TVK777,e8bi1hr,democrats
"They're probably referring to the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act. Indeed it was a factor and indeed Clinton signed it into law. Conveniently, Republicans forget that it was a Republican bill with bipartisan support.",imlarrybird,e8bjwf3,democrats
[removed],,e8bd26v,democrats
"NAFTA was great, so...

>health care

You mean the Republican system that republicans pretended they didn’t create?

>city and state

Lol. Is that why CA is the 6th largest economy in the world? Is that why MA is the best place to live in the country?


",Selethorme,e8cwcg0,democrats
"That's a vague timeline that attributes a lot of major growth to. . . wherever you work to about a year in office and credits the president in office for any net positive or negatives. Not to say it couldn't be accurate, just that realistically those sort of economic swings take a while to process. You could have easily had your job killed by Bush era politics and your wages doubled by Obama era politics.",Jibbjabb43,e8cghow,democrats
You know YOUR truth.,QueenRotidder,e8cmey9,democrats
Unless your 401k went from $300 to $600 you're a liar and you can't prove your statement. ,kensal78,e8ceruc,democrats
"It blows my mind that that argument holds water with the Repugnant base. ""Government is broken,"" says the guy who broke it, ""and the only fix is to sell everything the country owns to my rich ass hole friends for pennies on the dollar.""

Goes hand in hand with the monopoly man taking off his top hat for a doofy trucker had and these mouth breathing morons thought he was a man of the people. Honestly I can't fathom being that stupid. ",PeverseRolarity,e8exrqx,democrats
"These are not normal times, you really think Trump supporters are gonna turn on him? All he has to do is blame Democrats and Immigrants for a Recession, all of the ground work has been laid. There are a lot of people in the middle who will gravitate to that message too, because end of the day they only care about the economy, it’s the only reason his approval from the middle isn’t totally cratered out. Keep an eye out for politically convenient terrorist scares if the economy severely corrects itself.",BrodyLoren,e8d7q88,democrats
What are you even talking about?,bluegirlwins,e8cfc12,democrats
He signed the trade deal.... that bush created Clinton  literally had no input. Most of the jobs created were solely based on a huge boom in the economy due to the internet boom. Like I stated. Homeownership did grow under him and then they all lost them in the late 2000’s because they were toxic mortgages that the people couldn’t afford and destroyed the economy along with it. Only other thing that article lists as an accomplishment is how he hammered the upper middle class with a huge tax hike and to this day one of the main reasons upper class whites haven’t voted Democrat the last 20 years.,pryda22,e8ef4cu,democrats
"That was a reasonable response, well done sir. Same, I think the tariffs are inherently bad but long term they could pay off.",nptown,e8c5ap9,democrats
"I will be messaging you on [**2019-10-24 04:58:24 UTC**](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=2019-10-24 04:58:24 UTC To Local Time) to remind you of [**this link.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/democrats/comments/9qq9aw/obama_theres_a_pattern_of_republicans_running_the/)

[**CLICK THIS LINK**](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[https://www.reddit.com/r/democrats/comments/9qq9aw/obama_theres_a_pattern_of_republicans_running_the/]%0A%0ARemindMe!  1 year) to send a PM to also be reminded and to reduce spam.

^(Parent commenter can ) [^(delete this message to hide from others.)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Delete Comment&message=Delete! e8cdkbg)

_____

|[^(FAQs)](http://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/24duzp/remindmebot_info/)|[^(Custom)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[LINK INSIDE SQUARE BRACKETS else default to FAQs]%0A%0ANOTE: Don't forget to add the time options after the command.%0A%0ARemindMe!)|[^(Your Reminders)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=List Of Reminders&message=MyReminders!)|[^(Feedback)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBotWrangler&subject=Feedback)|[^(Code)](https://github.com/SIlver--/remindmebot-reddit)|[^(Browser Extensions)](https://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/4kldad/remindmebot_extensions/)
|-|-|-|-|-|-|",RemindMeBot,e8cdkbg,democrats
>who *was* a Republican ,Glorious_Shadopan,e8bq7p5,democrats
"I mean, you can be fiscally conservative and still respect that there are other ways to govern. At the core, the Republican policy platforms of small government, traditional values and fiscal responsibility are good things and can work. They also can become the shit show we currently have. 

",HillbillyPartySloth,e8cdqrm,democrats
"So the demacrats save for a rainy day? I agree that we need to cut spending, but I don't know how improving the econmomy is running into the ground.",HA5396,e8bboe2,democrats
"And if he said ""the Republicans are sabotaging me/my administration/democracy"" he would have been accused of being divisive himself.",maikuxblade,e8bbm3y,democrats
It sounds like you want a democrat Trump.,GhettoMango,e8bpk6a,democrats
"California is the state with the greatest population in the United States. LA is also the largest city in California and the second largest in America in terms of population. Of course, California would have the largest amount of homeless people as it has the most people. ",BeastLee97,e8cq1lf,democrats
"Umm. I lived there. The homeless rate is compounded by a lot of things, that fact that there are 40 million people there, that the weather is pretty mild so people flock there, and the fact that there are amazing social programs statewide. 

You're cute. Judging a place you've never been because the infotainment talking heads says it's bad. ",HillbillyPartySloth,e8cw7w0,democrats
"Yeah, I wanted to call him on that more, but he was kind of intimidating and also a “friend of the station.”",CaptainJAmazing,e8cx6pn,democrats
Blaming one makes as much sense as blaming the other...,uknowitstrue,e8bis1m,democrats
"I knew Clinton played a part because of a few of his right-leaning actions, but Bush had 8 years to correct them and also helped the crash.",PotatoPrince84,e8bl9tr,democrats
[removed],,e8bd62x,democrats
"NAFTA was great? For who,? The middle class or was it great for large multi national corporations to move manifacturing overseas and pay people almost nothing? 
Not one republican voted for Obamacare , so they did not create the mess.
Mass is not the best place to live, 
And communist China is a much larger socialist economy then California and would you want to live there? 
",getndown2bus,e8ef9jg,democrats
"Asking me to release my taxes? How Democrat of you LOL, it was more like $30,000. I’m probably a lot older than you.",delawarepilot,e8cotky,democrats
"well, there's a difference between Trump supporters and Trump voters. If there is a recession, then enough voters could defect to make a big difference. His margin of victory in swing states (not just MI/PA/WI, but also NC and FL) was quite small. The 1 million or so Obama->Trump voters who made the critical difference in the Rust Belt states would be the first to jump ship. 

Then you would also demoralize all the Republicans who were wishy-washy on voting for him in 2016 but ""came home"" in the last 2 weeks of the election. You don't have to win them, you just have to demoralize them into staying home, voting third party, or leaving the top of the ballot blank. The only reason they're sticking with him now is because of the economy and the courts. Take away the economy and it would be a disaster for the Republicans.

Since 2004, Republicans have been stuck in a vote total range of 60-63 million votes. Shedding even a small amount of votes from Trump's total in 2016 would be fatal. 

And there's so much cynicism and skepticism towards Trump that I think a terrorist attack wouldn't lead to a rally-around-the-flag effect. In fact, it could outright backfire if people think he wasn't keeping us safe. ",Clarko95,e8decl7,democrats
They are implying you are a troll account brigading here. ,BrodyLoren,e8d9mct,democrats
"Nah, they prove how unreliable the US is as a trading nation, so other countries in the long term try and move away from the US as much as possible to shield themselves from whatever obsurd thing your next retarded president does. ",Random57579,e8cdpri,democrats
">  I think the tariffs are inherently bad but long term they could pay off.

this makes absolutely no sense",Clarko95,e8ckai9,democrats
Maybe he ded. ,GhettoMango,e8bq9pb,democrats
"When you try to people what to do and not to do in the bedroom, you don’t believe in small government. When you try to stop a certain demographic of immigrants coming in looking for a better life in America, you don’t believe in traditional values. When you keep expanding the military so that we can start a war in every non-white nation in the world, you don’t believe in fiscal conservatism.",barchueetadonai,e8cr26i,democrats
"Because some ways of the economy being unhealthy—like a valuation bubble, where assets are being exchanged for far more than their real value—leads to making more money in the short term. That’s not “improving the economy”, because when that bubble bursts, far more wealth will be lost on average for the average person than was gained during the bubble. ",thePuck,e8bi4kf,democrats
"Given that the dems decreased the deficit that Trump has ballooned, yes. The dems do save. Significantly.",Selethorme,e8cvynt,democrats
So? The Republicans accused him of much worse than being divisive on a daily basis. And if a person is so cowardly they refuse to speak the truth because they're afraid the other side will call them mean names then that person has no business being in the Oval Office.,sotonohito,e8bbzl9,democrats
"Fighting against Republicans doesn't require that a person be a sort of mirror image of Trump. Merely that they fight instead of, as Schumer did today, surrender.",sotonohito,e8bybx3,democrats
"CA has 40M people of 320M (12.5% roughly). It has 25% of the Homeless population. That is DISPROPORTIONATELY more homeless than it should by a factor of two. Los Angeles has 4M population (1.25% of the US population) but has 10%\~ of US's TOTAL Homeless Population. 

In no way does that ""make sense"" that LA would have 10 times the normal homeless distribution. ",apatheticviews,e8ebdz8,democrats
"I don't need to live somewhere to know what the facts say about it... California has the highest housing cost in the nation which is the leading reason for the huge rise in homelessness. Also to your point about population, more people leave California now than come to the state. People aren't flocking there anymore, they are flocking the fck out for many reasons, illegal immigration being the leader. The population is not the reason for the homeless increase since it has been steady for years. The weather has little to do with either. Those are superficial reasons that don't actually contribute to the problem much at all. You can have pride in your state but to ignore the glaring flaws is dishonest. ",SirSquawck,e8cxm57,democrats
Although policy can affect things later down the road. Like how some of the deregulation decades before the recession contributed to it. ,mkeeconomics,e8c2gls,democrats
The 08 crash was a result of decades of deregulation going back to at least Reagan. Saying that it was all Clinton fault is like blaming the civil war on James k Polk.,Bay1Bri,e8bqsv6,democrats
"Do you know what NAFTA even did? Because the way you phrased that question indicates you don’t.

>not one republican voted for Obamacare

That doesn’t disprove what I said. It was literally the same system that Mitt Romney, a Republican, instituted in Massachusetts. They called it Romneycare.

>mass is not the best place to live

The data directly disproves you there. Lying doesn’t help your case.

>China

The fact remains that blue states prop up red ones financially.",Selethorme,e8eof01,democrats
"If you're older than me and never owned a home and only have 30k in your 401 I feel sorry for you. Also, you sort of proved you're lying because how would taxes show your 401k balance?",kensal78,e8crfpk,democrats
How do you its a he and not a giant amoeba?,dontpanic_benice,e8c98do,democrats
How do you determine that they are being traded at too high of a value.,HA5396,e8bsetb,democrats
"So you're suggesting he should have, what, ignored political realities so he could show the Republicans what's what?",maikuxblade,e8bceae,democrats
Exactly. He was certainly a factor but... blaming him but not Reagan or Bush makes no sense.,mkeeconomics,e8c2ig4,democrats
"Yes, I lived through NAFTA and we still get fucked by NAFTA everyday, it lowered tariffs  on trade allowing American company's to produce goods at 2 dollars a day instead of paying American workers ,50 dollars a hour in the USA destroying the middle class, 
Romney was never a conservative republican,( disproves that it's not really a republican plan, ) 
Indiana , Georgia, Texas are rated as the best places to live and raise children( proves you a liar once again) 
The fact remains the blue states contribute less and receive more federal tax dollars in welfare and other benefits then other states. 
I get to California all the time. 
It is the worst state in the country to visit, live in, or work in in the whole country. 
The only reason it stays afloat is because of government welfare money and military money. 
The state loots everyone  in the state. 
California has more homeless and drug addicts of anyplace I have ever seen, 
California has more working poor then any state in the USA, just to survive in California a worker has to earn 35 dollars a hour, and that is poor and most do not earn that much in California because of illegal aliens driving wages down. 
Now , look at your uninformed , illogucal statements with no facts to back your statements up , then look at my facts, 
You look pretty foolish now don't you? 
",getndown2bus,e8ezhsw,democrats
He’s probably 12. Or a troll.,Selethorme,e8cwdx9,democrats
"I’m 43. I’m sure I haven’t had the same advantages as you. I’ve worked hard. Earned everything I have. Don’t feel sorry for me. I’m happy. If you are doing better than me, God bless.",delawarepilot,e8ln4ci,democrats
When prices just keep ballooning with no change in supply or demand. ,thePuck,e8c17w6,democrats
"I have no idea what you're even talking about or what position you're advocating. You seem to be arguing that Obama, for mysterious reasons you vaguely label ""political realities"", was unable to speak honestly and truthfully about the Republicans.

&#x200B;

Are you really saying that the ""political reality"" is/was that Republicans can say anything they want, but that Democrats must always be milquetoast cowards who never utter the slightest criticism of Republicans? Are you arguing that it was entirely right and proper for Sen. Schumer to equate mild vandalism of an empty Republican office building with a mail bomb sent to murder George Soros, because the ""political reality"" somehow means that while he's in office Schumer must always kowtow to the Republicans and give scolding lectures to any liberal who gets slightly uppity? ",sotonohito,e8bdnt2,democrats
"Blaming Clinton makes no sense here to me. He signed a law that was **republican** and had **bipartisan** support. I'd like to see the numbers but if he had veto'd it wouldn't congress have passed it anyway, since, yknow, it had bipartisan support?",,e8c4ri7,democrats
"Both Bushes, don't forget to emphasize that the R's elected a father/son President combo as well.  ",ThatWentWellish,e8cw1l1,democrats
"I’m sorry, I look foolish when you claim Romney isn’t a conservative republican?

>Indiana, Georgia, Texas

Nice bullshit, but again, pulling stuff out of your ass doesn’t work.
https://amp.usatoday.com/amp/93920456
None of those states even show up.

>contribute less

Nope. Stop lying.

https://www.businessinsider.com/red-states-are-welfare-queens-2011-8

>no facts

Aw, that’s adorable.
",Selethorme,e8f0f52,democrats
At what age will you learn to stop lying on the internet?,kensal78,e8lxvib,democrats
"It's hard to believe, but there was a time when politicians believed in behaving representable. Being the first black president goes far beyond the 8 years of his presidency. It will be referenced, examined, and criticised until some catastrophe wipes it from record and memory. So yes, Obama couldn't simply say whatever he wanted to because the unfortunate reality is his opponents were looking for any and all reasons to attack him. That means biting your tongue and remaining composed.

And many today still hope for bipartisanship, it would be great if the two parties could reconcile. It didn't happen during Obama, but he can't be faulted for not trying, and I hope that all presidents will continue trying to bridge the gap.

It's better to start out polite because you can always change to being mean, but once you are mean, no one will ever believe it when you are nice.",Slowter,e8bk6nq,democrats
"Probably. I’m just saying that even though he was a factor in it, it doesn’t make sense to blame only him when Reagan and Bush jr did much more that lead to the recession.",mkeeconomics,e8d18ug,democrats
"Oh yeah, of course. I was mainly referring to George W in my comment though.",mkeeconomics,e8d15pc,democrats
"Check US news and world report, 
I guess it depends who idea of best places to live is, I just looked at US news and world report, it had Boston listed as 25 best places to live ( taxes are to high, crime is to high and traffic to high, cost of real estate is to expensive to ever make Boston or mass, or California , anyplace in those states a decent place to live, the same goes for places like Denver , Portland Oregon or Seattle , 
This is why places like the Carolinas, Texas , Indiana , Kentucky and Tennessee are considered top places to live, work and raise a family , 
If you listen to Obama, Hillary , US today, MSNBC , California and Mass are wonderful places to live, 
If you actually seen the states, compared the cost of those states and conditions of those states and areas then your bull shit and whoever placed these areas as high on the list bull shit does not go very far. 
 ",getndown2bus,e8f0w9j,democrats
"I have absolutely no hope for bipartisanship and I am absolutely, utterly, opposed to any Democrat who thinks of working with the current Republican Party. We should not be cooperating with people who run kiddie concentration camps, period.

Maybe, possibly, if the Republican Party undergoes a major purge and expels every single authoritarian, every sadist, every homophobe, every racist, every misogynist, and all Republicans get down on their knees and beg the children they tortured for forgiveness **MAYBE** I could see bipartisanship then. But not until then. Until then they are evil and cooperating with them in any way is unacceptable.

In its current incarnation the Republicans are not people with whom we have reasonable disagreements over matters of policy, but rather a force of evil to be overcome.

EDIT: As for Obama, there's a difference between ""remaining composed"" and being a milquetoast coward. ",sotonohito,e8bm7e4,democrats
"Boston is a city. It isn’t Massachusetts as a whole.

Sorry, but you can’t fight the dada with anecdotes. Also, USAtoday is a right leaning publication.",Selethorme,e8f0y3r,democrats
"We have different beliefs and that's fine. It's a reflection of our values. I won't try to change your mind since it is clear you aren't interested in that. We just have decidedly different ways we want to go about change and that's painting our interpretations of others. Good luck, I hope one of us succeeds.",Slowter,e8bnl2y,democrats
"No, USA has never been right leaning , just because a publication is not Pravda does not mean it's right leaning, 
That's like saying Joe Scarborough is a conservative. 
Or like saying Joe Biden is a conservative, 
Compared to the rest of the democrat party Joe Biden probably is a conservative, 
I was just in Mass, cape cod area , nice place to visit very pretty in the fall. 
That still does not change the fact that Mass is to expensive to live in and the quality of life and standard of living because of taxes and regulations job opportunity,crime and cost of housing are still not as good as places such as Texas, Indiana , Tennessee, north Carolina , Idaho or many other areas that are listed as the best places to live in the USA based on actually criteria , now some liberal blogger who says , hey ,LA and Seattle are wonderful , upon visiting LA and Seattle you find out they are not so wonderful when you view then from a critical standpoint based on actually criteria as to what makes a place a good place to live .
Like cost of living, employment , education for children, crime and drug use, taxes and regulations. 
I grew up when I was a kid in Oregon, lived around 4 years in California ( it's not as nice as it once was ) so I speak from my experiences of those places. 
People have a better standard of living in Indiana or Texas than  California or Mass or New York , , how come? You argue that it's not, but I seen first hand the truth . 
Would I rather live in North Carolina then California ? Yes, 
Would I rather live in Indiana then New York? Yes 
Would I rather live in a small suburban city vs a large urban areas ? Yes 
Why is that from my first hand experience would I rather live these places then the wonderful Utopias you think are great? 
They are cleaner, safer, more economic  opportunitys , housing is cheaper and quality of life is way better ,
And none of these ares all have one thing in common, they are run by Republicans and these are better areas then the ones ran by Democrats, 
Wow, imagine that, everywhere ran by Democrats is complete failures, 
I do not even have to prove the argument, you do it for me . 
You talk about how large the economy is in California , the economy is large in China too, I do not see you beating the doors off the hinges trying to get into China , you already have your socialist Utopias in place, you do not have to change America into China , all you have to do is move to China , that way you can leave people who like being capitalists alone , 
",getndown2bus,e8f33ke,democrats
"http://yourlogicalfallacyis.com/anecdotal

But thanks for the bullshit.",Selethorme,e8f8bno,democrats
[deleted],,e8dvf7m,democrats
"Cool video but there will be no ""blue wave"" unless people go knock on doors or phone bank. Need to work to make it happen. If you need helping getting in touch with someone on how or where to canvass or phone bank send me a message.",Bleacherblues,e8dvt5b,democrats
Save your defeatism for someone else. ,MordSithBestSith,e8dvy18,democrats
[deleted],,e8dwka0,democrats
Already doing my part! ,MordSithBestSith,e8dw1vo,democrats
[removed],,e8e0488,democrats
Not around these loonies,Btravelen,e8dvr93,democrats
"DJIA = Dow Jones Industrial Average.

YTD = year-to-date.

",wenchette,e8dxzk3,democrats
Takes two years for a new presidents economic impact to start taking hold. The crash is coming. ,azurejedi,e8e83ti,democrats
"-0.28% YTD

Motherfucker...",eric987235,e8ej3sc,democrats
"""California Neo-Nazi""...LOL.  Some people are just born to lose, ain't they?",KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8e1dl2,democrats
"Hey there are black and Latino member of the Proud Boys, a white supremacist group. ",jamalwhite70,e8e2fn1,democrats
Sudden hankering to watch BlacKkKlansman.,KubrickIsMyCopilot,e8e2t9r,democrats
"One of the biggest racists I've personally known was half black and half Vietnamese. He resented his birth parents and wanted nothing more than to be able to join white supremacist groups. He subscribed t their news letters and donated money to them, but hated that he could never show his face. It was really sad to see. ",Zombies_Are_Dead,e8ew4v7,democrats
"Say it a few weeks ago. Good movie, and Spike Lee relates it to what's going on today. ",jamalwhite70,e8e3vlp,democrats
I got something like this a few days ago. It was actually meant for my father-in-law but it was sent to me. He checked and his ballot had been turned in. How they new he requested an absentee ballot I do not know. ,scatterbrained81,e8dv8cc,democrats
That’s easy: Kris Kobach is the (GOP) Kansas Secretary of State and has full access to the voter database. Doubtlessly playing fast and loose with the info for partisan purposes.,jsu152,e8dver0,democrats
Im in Michigan and so is my father-in-law. ,scatterbrained81,e8dvkk3,democrats
"Michigan SoS is Ruth Johnson. [Different name, same team](https://g.co/kgs/a8N9FP) ",jsu152,e8dvs76,democrats
trump would go full saudi to hold onto power.,chubbiguy40,e8e5duk,democrats
"How do you know who sent these? I mean, unless you've seen some breaking news that I haven't, we don't know anything yet. It COULD be white nationalists, but it could also be some mentally ill person, etc.

Let's wait for the facts to come out. This is a big deal, it's clearly terrorism, so whoever did it WILL be caught.",beenyweenies,e8dn3nl,democrats
"How fucking typical GOP, they are all crooks ",Link_1986,e8d0zmc,democrats
">A state law allows election officials to reject absentee ballots if they see a signature mismatch in the voter’s paperwork. Voters have no way to contest the decision.
>
>...
>
>Georgia has been a high priority among voting rights lawyers because the Republican gubernatorial candidate, Brian Kemp, is the current secretary of state responsible for election administration.",wenchette,e8dtnls,democrats
Oh brother...,PlanetTesla,e8eb8i4,democrats
"California 2018 Election 

[General Election Registration Deadline](http://registertovote.ca.gov/): October 22, 2018 

[General Election](http://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/voter-registration/vote-mail/#apply): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8e74gp,democrats
I love Joe Biden and how he never holds back.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8czc5t,democrats
"Seems like more candidates would be talking about this subject, Mitch McConnell has stated “ we will cut Medicare S. S. And Medicaid” after a $1.5 Trillion tax cut and $700 Billion Defense increase he now says it’s a Bipartisan problem. Fuck you Mitch  ",walter1950,e8cpdyz,democrats
"I am sure the bombs being sent to nonRepublicabs will be blamed -- ""on the Left""! ",data2dave,e8d3spq,democrats
Please just stop with the conspiracy theories. ,Bioman9,e8dhgf4,democrats
"Also saves America.

&#x200B;

Forgot That.",bananamanwill,e8cifpm,democrats
"🤣 that’s hysterical!! I suppose violent rhetoric, perpetual lying, spreading hate & dividing the country is what saving America looks like to you! Sad! :( ",hartwerger,e8ghu0p,democrats
"Oh please let him do it, Jesus SNL will have a field day, ",walter1950,e8cpo0h,democrats
"I can picture it now

  


Giuliani: blah blah blah liberal false flag to discredit the president blah blah treasonous democrats blah blah trying to create another 9-11 blah blah totally incoherent babbling about something totally unrelated.",JayWaWa,e8ciqcj,democrats
"""I miss being on TV."" What a pathetic old man.",GutCart,e8d31mo,democrats
I wonder if he even knows what that term means and that the alt-right uses it so much.,kerryfinchelhillary,e8czz98,democrats
"I'm honestly not sure if Trump is aware of the meaning of all this. On the one hand, I have no doubts hes a racist. On the other, I have even less hes an idiot",begonetoxicpeople,e8cd43l,democrats
"He said, ""They tell me I shouldn't use this word, and I know, but I'm bringing it back.""
He fucking knows.",Raspberries-Are-Evil,e8d13ap,democrats
"Note Breitbart had an article on it just before he started spouting it. Steve Bannon, alt-right. He had a clue at minimum. I know he has heard of National Socialists.",therecordcorrected,e8cd767,democrats
When congress and senate are mixed. It’s gridlock. Nothing gets done one way or the other. And right now that sounds good enough. ,azurejedi,e8dedg4,democrats
"Win - investigations. Likely start impeachment, granted Senate won't likely remove. 

Lose - not much, see last two years. ",Gsteel11,e8d3lyh,democrats
"Winning at least one chamber (which would likely be the House) is still huge IMO. Legislation has to pass both chambers of Congress, so Democratic control of one of them is instrumental to blocking more shitty healthcare repeal/tax cuts/etc that Republicans want so badly. So Dems still wouldn't be able to produce much active legislation, but they could at least stop the destructive stuff from passing.",stellar_guy,e8d3z7z,democrats
"An analogy I use is that a big blue wave is not VE-Day, it's a successful landing at Normandy. Simply put, we fight and keep fighting until something like this cannot happen again. In a less esoteric sense, holding the House stops all right-wing lunacy from becoming law.   ",davidmac1993,e8d9yib,democrats
"**Edit:**  Something I didn't even consider initially: where is it stated that most democratic legislators want to even pursue impeachment?  After all, this sounds more like a [Republican talking point to galvanize their base ](https://fivethirtyeight.com/features/republicans-are-talking-about-impeachment-way-more-than-democrats/)

I hate Trump as the next guy. But I'm also aware of how politically risky impeachment can be.  How do we know that impeachment will sustain the Democratic party past the midterms.  Moreover, how will it directly progress to solving issues like the Opioid Crisis, the Debt, Health care prices, and the Environment?  Pence can better maneuver the legislative branch no matter who is in power (see his record as governor of Indiana, he wasn't quite  popular, but he was able to accomplish what he wanted).",SarquisDeSade,e8d3zc1,democrats
"And most important of all, budgets start in the House. Having the House gives us enormous control over that process and forces them to play ball with us.",astrognash,e8d4zdi,democrats
[deleted],,e8d4gu0,democrats
"I mean it depends on what the investigations they hold find...  but I can't imagine there aren't at least huge violations of the emoluments clause. 

All the dem congress could do is impeach him for his crimes, the gop would have to decide in the Senate if they want to keep a criminal. 

And I think it really goes beyond political strategy here to... he is a criminal. 

And I don't see the gop moving to any real degree on any of those issues. They didnt really with a majority. Lol",Gsteel11,e8d4779,democrats
"Fair points, I will elaborate.

1.   I was referencing the \[political ramifications\]([https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Impeachment\_of\_Bill\_Clinton#Political\_ramifications](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Impeachment_of_Bill_Clinton#Political_ramifications)) that occurred after Bill Clinton's impeachment.  After the Republicans impeached (then acquitted) Clinton, it increased his popularity rating, and the Democrats gained seats in the 2000 US Congressional election.  While Bush did indeed win the presidential election, I see the Clinton's increased popularity and the Democrats gains in house seats as a result of the impeachment effort backfiring.  Reverse the roles, and its not unlikely that Republicans gain from any impeachment effort Democrats do regardless of legitimacy.
2. The second sentence was me asking for justification on how impeaching Trump is realistically the **best** way Democrats can use their power make life for the average citizen in America better.  In other words, why is it worth it to divert energy and political clout from dealing with those other issues and use that energy and political clout toward impeaching Trump?
3. I must say, the third claim is  wrong as worded upon re-reading it.  He was an average governor of Indiana at best and controversial at worst.  For example, sometimes he would accomplish tax cuts, but not at the rate he wanted.  Or he would sign a law like the \[Religious Freedom Restoration Act\]([https://www.rollcall.com/politics/mike-pence-governor-indiana-record-meteoric-rise-controversial-political-past](https://www.rollcall.com/politics/mike-pence-governor-indiana-record-meteoric-rise-controversial-political-past)) and get a lot of flak for it. The claim that he can better maneuver the legislative branch is not proven.  That said, he managed to get to the Vice Presidency.  So while he did personally get what he wanted, the way I worded it earlier - that it implied he will be better than Trump at getting what he wants legislatively - was wrong.  Here is a brief summary of his \[record as governor\]([https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mike\_Pence#2012\_election](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mike_Pence#2012_election))",SarquisDeSade,e8d79y0,democrats
*cough*Benghazi*cough*,cerevant,e8cysro,democrats
"Dumb, Republicans have been overzealous far more than Democrats forever. ",data2dave,e8d3pbh,democrats
I voted today. Did you? ,kyleksq,e8a7gb8,democrats
My birthday is nov 24 and I’m 17 😑,HVD3Z,e8aynbe,democrats
Trump is a pathological liar.   That is no surprise to anyone.,caligirl2287,e8afhe8,democrats
"For real... Democrats need to be blasting all of the clips of Trump promising better, cheaper, insurance for everyone that'll be cheaper than Obamacare. Then ask where it is?",Meimnot555,e8ajrad,democrats
"Don’t like this..
https://www.nbcnews.com/news/amp/ncna922881

",allyourbase1975,e8akvtt,democrats
"Wisconsin 2018 Election 

[General Election Registration Deadline](https://myvote.wi.gov/en-us/registertovote): November 6, 2018 

[General Election](https://myvote.wi.gov/en-us/FindMyPollingPlace): November 6, 2018 

",election_info_bot,e8fgznd,democrats
"Oh, thank goodness someone told us Trump has been lying all along, and that we should vote for Democrats! We never would have known it otherwise! ",HILLBOT9000,e8aqub9,democrats
This is why I voted Bernie Sanders.,Serialk,e8bz3wi,democrats
This guy isnt a democrat.,thatpj,e8amjvl,democrats
Let's worry about what we are going to do and who the fuck we are going to put in office. We need a good relatable candidate! ,Tangsta1,e8annl9,democrats
Bernie!,maluminse,e8a7vsx,democrats
I enjoy the fact that deeply conservative states deny their constituents affordable care that they already paid for.   This way takes longer but the results are the same - lack of basic affordable healthcare results in a lower quality of life with a much shorter life expectancy.  lol.  fuck 'em.  Trash states own the bottom of the barrel in every quality of life category.  Do we really want to change that.  ,IIllIIllIlllI,e8aegxc,democrats
Yep. Spot on synopsis.,jpguitfiddler,e8b3or1,democrats
[removed],,e8a6hk1,democrats
"Sure did.  Waited almost an hour in line.  Would do it again... If only they'd let me :P

Beto vs. Ted here.",Mel928,e8aack0,democrats
[removed],,e8a7jxe,democrats
You can still do your part. Encourage those around you to vote ,dydski,e8azcrg,democrats
"Believe it or not, I’m **still** taken aback with all his lies. I guess I thought he’d start acting like a president and lie less, but I was stupid.  He is a sociopath, a pathological liar and lying constantly on the campaign trail...Democrats had nothing to do with the “Caravan.”",pasarina,e8bb445,democrats
I just don’t get it!! Can’t they (repubs) see what they’ve done to our country?!?!? Vote Dem!!!,faeretech,e8aq639,democrats
I just don’t get it!! Can’t they (repubs) see what they’ve done to our country?!?!? Vote Dem!!!,faeretech,e8aq6h6,democrats
I just don’t get it!! Can’t they (repubs) see what they’ve done to our country?!?!? Vote Dem!!!,faeretech,e8aq5tl,democrats
"Drives me nuts to hear:

 ""We must stop Republicans at all costs!""

So join the Democratic party for a united front?

""Hell no!""",projexion_reflexion,e8ang5e,democrats
will always remind me of burt and ernie.  also more relevant.,IIllIIllIlllI,e8aee9p,democrats
"""fuck 'em"". What is wrong with you? That attitude won't get anything changed and only further divides us, like the Russian trolls are trying to do. ",hairychested1,e8ahzyu,democrats
"I don’t see this booming economy, I don’t see any “taking on China” and I don’t see any decent jobs.",Pols_Voice_Z64,e8a6pa2,democrats
"Booming record debt and record government spending; increased the deficit while Obama decreased it. Next they’ll balance it on the back of me and you by cutting social security/Medicare. Family of 4 making $175,000 with a mortgage actually saw taxes increase 10% under Trump “tax cut” scam meanwhile Trump & his family pay nothing. Idiot people vote against their best interests while being played with distractions such as racism, just like the elitist republicans always do. They laugh at their idiot voters. Meanwhile the first POTUS ever to lick the boot of all time king socialist communist Vladimir Putin. Our allies meanwhile dislike is more everyday and we are left to take on the world. Stock market under Obama went up much more. Republicans now the kings of record government spending and simultaneously the highest tax receipts from the middle class.",NarfNarf1,e8a7t0w,democrats
You waited in line for a midterm vote for an your? Man I really hope theres a line at my polling station but ive never ever needed more than 5-10 mins to vote in a midterm. ,noralily23,e8ad3xg,democrats
This guy is is a 22d old account pushing apathy. Just proceed with caution. ,Boomslangalang,e8abolt,democrats
Vote anyway.    You have a reason.    There's a million reasons.   Even if it's only to feel better about yourself.,smeagolheart,e8a8icw,democrats
"> Did you vote in any competitive races?

Yes. CA 42nd. A very important race. 

> I wish we had a different structure that allows for multiple parties. 

I do agree there is a delusion in America of there only being two parties 

> Because, as much as I hate turmp, I have no reason to vote

This is flawed logic and a terrible reason not to vote. ",kyleksq,e8a8kjn,democrats
I know but it sucks that im hearing all this shit happen and I can’t do anything but “help”. I actually want to vote ya know?,HVD3Z,e8b0tda,democrats
"GOP voters don't care about country, its tribalism, racism and propaganda only that matters to them.

For the elected GOP officials, its only about money and power, country be damned. The entire party is treasonous at this point.",Crotean,e8b4ucm,democrats
"They have money in their eyes, they can't see anything else.",jpguitfiddler,e8b3whw,democrats
[removed],,e8asfmr,democrats
"It's another way of saying, ""do what you want then.""

Also, I'm not trying to unite with bigots.  Fuck them.  They can die alone and be remembered like the slavers and segregationists before them.",IIllIIllIlllI,e8aiglh,democrats
"What about GDP and job growth?

Also I took home lots more cash last year and this year. DOW also doesn’t lie right?",warlord85,e8a6rda,democrats
"When did he lick Putin's boot?

Google ""Dow Jones"", see what were the values from 2008 to 2016, and from 2016 to 2018, sure you can't argue with chart can you? I package is $180k, and I got major tax cut last year. Economy is booming, new jobs every where, you just can't ignore that.",warlord85,e8a82ik,democrats
Not more than two minute wait at mine ever either. I sure hope it is crowded. Go Beto! My neighborhood is over the top for Beto!,pasarina,e8bakpv,democrats
"The turnout was fantastic.  Our county has a map of polling places with signal lights.  Red = over an hour wait.  Green = less than half an hour.  I chose a green location and still waited that long.  There were a few red, a couple yellow, and mostly green.

It was the first day of early voting, so that's a big part of it.

Then again, one headline read that in our county 92% of eligible voters are registered.  It'd be great if they all vote.  Maybe it'll stay busy.",Mel928,e8adeqm,democrats
Probably a russian in crimea.,Glendalerian,e8anck6,democrats
"Lose more rights? Jesus fucking Christ. 

Why do you care what happens in someone's bedroom between consenting adults? Why do you want to force a woman to carry a baby to term but then don't give a shit about said baby once it is born? Why do you want to allow insurance companies to deny coverage when people have already paid for astronomical premiums and deductibles? Why allow healthcare prices to go completely unregulated? Why do you want to cut taxes for the wealthy while the vast majority of the recovery of the recession has gone to the top 1%, meanwhile we are deficit spending ourselves into oblivion? Why vote for a party that does not care about a legacy to leave our children but rather a debt laden country with crumbling infrastructure and a poisoned environment?

But yeah, you still have your rights! ",Whit3W0lf,e8awtmw,democrats
That is as hyperbolic as Trump himself,hairychested1,e8ajx33,democrats
"I ended up with a pay cut so my CEO could fuck over his employees and my community to fill his own pockets with share buy backs.

Now onto the future where the Feds are forced to raise taxes because of dumb corporate shills.",ctophermh89,e8afknu,democrats
You’re an idiot if you think the stock market is an indicator of economic health. Hasn’t worked out too well every other time in our history. ,Boomslangalang,e8ac0n3,democrats
What a one dimensional reality you live in. Bullshit metrics of a sugar high overheated economy due to the tough choices made by Democrats to clean up - once again - discredited Republican ideas that repeatedly lead to economic collapse. Get your head out your ass and look at things in more than quarterly reports. ,Boomslangalang,e8abrh8,democrats
"Sure you can ignore that.   The stock market goes up, most people doesn't affect.   

Who gives a shit about new minimum wage jobs when you can break your arm and you go to the hospital and end up bankrupt.  Who cares about derivatives when your car breaks down and you wind up losing your job because you can't get to work and now you really can't afford to fix it.

Great for your 180k but you are the exception.   Watch out for the peasants revolting.",smeagolheart,e8a8lwi,democrats
I really hope the momentum is out there! Lets change things for the better. ,noralily23,e8bbkbg,democrats
[removed],,e8ax9es,democrats
">What a one dimensional reality you live in. Bullshit metrics of a sugar high overheated economy due to the tough choices made by Democrats to clean up - once again - discredited Republican ideas that repeatedly lead to economic collapse. Get your head out your ass and look at things in more than quarterly reports.

that's just your opinion, not truth",warlord85,e8ac5i5,democrats
"I'm not the exception, my families, friends, in all pay ranges had all enjoyed tax cut.

&#x200B;

Why go bankrupt when go to the hospital? Because of the shitty Obamacare, why not repeal it and let the market decide, you will have good, affordable health insurances from private companies.

&#x200B;

It's call the free market.",warlord85,e8a8s85,democrats
Solid response. ,noralily23,e8ayput,democrats
You’re a simpleton. Nothing to be gained here. ,Boomslangalang,e8acp0r,democrats
"No, before obamacare shit was worse. Most people want all the parts of obamacare but just have had it demonized to them. My dad, who is self employeed and hit with hard aca premiums, who droppepd insurance 10 months ago because he hates it is considering going back. 
",noralily23,e8ad6z3,democrats
Wut? Do you not remember 10 years ago?,awesomefaceninjahead,e8apdys,democrats
[removed],,e8azyiu,democrats
">22d old account pushing apathy. Just proceed

what?",warlord85,e8acpyn,democrats
I recognize your comment wasn't directed at me but i did want to clarify i thought it was not a good thing the way he responded. ,noralily23,e8b0aw4,democrats
"Do more than vote and volunteer. Fucking run. There should not be a single race, not even dogcatcher, where a republican candidate runs unopposed. Disgraceful. ",Elfzwolf179,e8byafq,democrats
"What is your guys honest opinion about the elections? I’m not an American and the impression that i get from watching news and reading the paper is that trump is a) always in the news b) economy is doing well c) he is putting a lot of pressure on corporates to keep jobs in US especially IT d) he is screwing with china.

",Wiz83,e8b7jq6,democrats
We can't stay a united nation with these people. ,The_Write_Stuff,e8c385s,democrats
Lock him up for what? Wtf is wrong with these people?,Stupidiseverywhere,e8c3pna,democrats
"JFC, at least Trump actually could think of something Hillary could have been potentially criminally charged with",begonetoxicpeople,e8c3v6n,democrats
"Come and try, Rafie. ",VegaThePunisher,e8c45lj,democrats
"Texas 2018 Election 

[Early Voting Starts](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): October 22, 2018 

[General Election](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do): November 6, 2018 

[Check Your Voter Registration Status](https://teamrv-mvp.sos.texas.gov/MVP/mvp.do)

",election_info_bot,e8cson3,democrats
Why? Whats his reasoning?,BryanIndigo,e8c188r,democrats
They are fucking crazy,Stupidiseverywhere,e8c4lft,democrats
"Ah yes, jailing political rivals. Nothing says democracy like that. ",hard-in-the-ms-paint,e8c5xnn,democrats
">Lock him up for what?

Sick jams, I think. ",sdgoat,e8c6xw3,democrats
"Im sorry I forgot who I was asking, ",BryanIndigo,e8c1di9,democrats
They are loony,Stupidiseverywhere,e8c6quq,democrats
